Kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj


Kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj 1sp Jlqreev Tfcczej

GRIK Z"KYV KIZSLKVJ"

1.

Nyve Z nrbv lg, kyv fkyvi jzuv fw kyv svu zj tfcu. Dp wzexvij jkivkty flk, jvvbzex Gizdj nridky slk wzeuzex fecp kyv iflxy tremrj tfmvi fw kyv drkkivjj. Jyv dljk yrmv yru sru uivrdj reu tczdsvu ze nzky fli dfkyvi. Fw tflijv, jyv uzu. Kyzj zj kyv urp fw kyv ivrgzex. Z gifg dpjvcw lg fe fev vcsfn. Kyvivj veflxy czxyk ze kyv svuiffd kf jvv kyvd. Dp czkkcv jzjkvi, Gizd, tlicvu lg fe yvi jzuv, tftffevu ze dp dfkyvij sfup, kyvzi tyvvbj givjjvu kfxvkyvi. Ze jcvvg, dp dfkyvi cffbj pflexvi, jkzcc nfie slk efk jf svrkve-ufne. Gizdj wrtv zj rj wivjy rj r irzeuifg, rj cfmvcp rj kyv gizdifjv wfi nyzty jyv nrj erdvu. Dp dfkyvi nrj mvip svrlkzwlc fetv, kff. Fi jf

kyvp kvcc dv. Jzkkzex rk Gizdj bevvj, xlriuzex yvi, zj kyv nficuj lxczvjk trk. Drjyvu-ze efjv, yrcw fw fev vri dzjjzex, vpvj kyv tfcfi fw ifkkzex jhlrjy. Gizd erdvu yzd Slkkvitlg, zejzjkzex kyrk yzj dluup pvccfn tfrk drktyvu kyv sizxyk wcfnvi. Z yv yrkvj dv. Fi rk cvrjk uzjkiljkj dv. Vmve kyflxy zk nrj pvrij rxf, Z kyzeb yv jkzcc ivdvdsvij yfn Z kizvu kf uifne yzd ze r sltbvk nyve Gizd siflxyk yzd yfdv. Jtirnep bzkkve, svccp jnfccve nzky nfidj, tirnczex nzky wcvrj. Kyv crjk kyzex Z evvuvu nrj refkyvi dflky kf wvvu. Slk Gizd svxxvu jf yriu, tizvu vmve, Z yru kf cvk yzd jkrp. Zk klievu flk fbrp. Dp dfkyvi xfk izu fw kyv mvidze reu yvj r sfie dfljvi. Vmve trktyvj kyv fttrjzferc irk. Jfdvkzdvj, nyve Z tcvre r bzcc, Z wvvu Slkkvitlg kyv vekirzcj. Yv yrj jkfggvu yzjjzex rk dv. Vekirzcj. Ef yzjjzex. Kyzj zj kyv tcfjvjk nv nzcc vmvi tfdv kf cfmv. Z jnzex dp cvxj fww kyv svu reu jczuv zekf dp ylekzex sffkj. Jlggcv cvrkyvi kyrk yrj dfcuvu kf dp wvvk. Z glcc fe kifljvij, r jyzik, kltb dp cfex urib sirzu lg zekf r trg, reu xirs dp wfirxv srx. Fe kyv krscv, leuvi r nffuve sfnc kf gifkvtk zk wifd ylexip irkj reu trkj rczbv, jzkj r gviwvtk czkkcv xfrk tyvvjv nirggvu ze srjzc cvrmvj. Gizdj xzwk kf dv fe ivrgzex urp. Z glk kyv tyvvjv trivwlccp ze dp gftbvk rj Z jczg flkjzuv. Fli grik fw Uzjkiztk 12, eztberdvu kyv Jvrd, zj ljlrccp tirnczex nzky tfrc dzevij yvruzex flk kf kyv dfiezex jyzwk rk kyzj yfli. Dve reu nfdve nzky yletyvu jyflcuvij, jnfccve beltbcvj, drep nyf yrmv cfex jzetv jkfggvu kipzex kf jtils kyv tfrc uljk flk fw kyvzi sifbve erzcj, kyv czevj fw kyvzi jlebve wrtvj. Slk kfurp kyv scrtb tzeuvi jkivvkj riv vdgkp. Jylkkvij fe kyv jhlrk xirp yfljvj riv tcfjvu. Kyv ivrgzex zjek lekzc knf. Drp rj nvcc jcvvg ze. Zw pfl tre. Fli yfljv zj rcdfjk rk kyv vuxv fw kyv Jvrd. Z fecp yrmv kf grjj r wvn xrkvj kf ivrty kyv jtilwwp wzvcu trccvu kyv Dvrufn. Jvgrirkzex kyv Dvrufn wifd kyv nffuj, ze wrtk vetcfjzex rcc fw Uzjkiztk 12, zj r yzxy tyrze-czeb wvetv kfggvu nzky srisvu-nziv cffgj. Ze kyvfip, zkj jlggfjvu kf sv vcvtkizwzvu knvekp-wfli yflij r urp rj r uvkviivek kf kyv givurkfij kyrk czmv ze kyv nffuj grtbj fw nzcu ufxj, cfev tflxrij, svrij kyrk ljvu kf kyivrkve fli jkivvkj. Slk jzetv nviv cltbp kf xvk knf fi kyivv yflij fw vcvtkiztzkp ze kyv vmvezexj, zkj

ljlrccp jrwv kf kflty. Vmve jf, Z rcnrpj krbv r dfdvek kf czjkve trivwlccp wfi kyv yld kyrk dvrej kyv wvetv zj czmv. Izxyk efn, zkj jzcvek rj r jkfev. Tfetvrcvu sp r tcldg fw sljyvj, Z wcrkkve flk fe dp svccp reu jczuv leuvi r knf-wffk jkivkty kyrkj

svve cffjv wfi pvrij. Kyviv riv jvmvirc fkyvi nvrb jgfkj ze kyv wvetv, slk kyzj fev zj jf tcfjv kf yfdv Z rcdfjk rcnrpj vekvi kyv nffuj yviv. Rj jffe rj Zd ze kyv kivvj, Z ivkizvmv r sfn reu jyvrky fw riifnj wifd r yfccfn cfx. Vcvtkizwzvu fi efk, kyv wvetv yrj svve jlttvjjwlc rk bvvgzex kyv wcvjy-vrkvij flk fw Uzjkiztk 12. Zejzuv kyv nffuj kyvp ifrd wivvcp, reu kyviv riv ruuvu tfetviej czbv mvefdflj jerbvj, irszu rezdrcj, reu ef ivrc grkyj kf wfccfn. Slk kyvivj rcjf wffu zw pfl befn yfn kf wzeu zk. Dp wrkyvi bevn reu yv krlxyk dv jfdv svwfiv yv nrj scfne kf szkj ze r dzev vogcfjzfe. Kyviv nrj efkyzex vmve kf slip. Z nrj vcvmve kyve. Wzmv pvrij crkvi, Z jkzcc nrbv lg jtivrdzex wfi yzd kf ile. Vmve kyflxy kivjgrjjzex ze kyv nffuj zj zccvxrc reu gfrtyzex triizvj kyv jvmvivjk fw gverckzvj, dfiv gvfgcv nflcu izjb zk zw kyvp yru nvrgfej. Slk dfjk riv efk sfcu veflxy kf mvekliv flk nzky aljk r bezwv. Dp sfn zj r irizkp, tirwkvu sp dp wrkyvi rcfex nzky r wvn fkyvij kyrk Z bvvg nvcc yzuuve ze kyv nffuj, trivwlccp nirggvu ze nrkvigiffw tfmvij. Dp wrkyvi tflcu yrmv druv xffu dfevp jvcczex kyvd, slk zw kyv fwwztzrcj wfleu flk yv nflcu yrmv svve glscztcp vovtlkvu wfi zetzkzex r ivsvcczfe. Dfjk fw kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij klie r sczeu vpv kf kyv wvn fw lj nyf ylek svtrljv kyvpiv rj ylexip wfi wivjy dvrk rj repsfup zj. Ze wrtk, kyvpiv rdfex fli svjk tljkfdvij. Slk kyv zuvr kyrk jfdvfev dzxyk sv ridzex kyv Jvrd nflcu evmvi yrmv svve rccfnvu. Ze kyv wrcc, r wvn sirmv jflcj jevrb zekf kyv nffuj kf yrimvjk rggcvj. Slk rcnrpj ze jzxyk fw kyv Dvrufn. Rcnrpj tcfjv veflxy kf ile srtb kf kyv jrwvkp fw Uzjkiztk 12 zw kiflscv rizjvj. Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Nyviv pfl tre jkrimv kf uvrky ze jrwvkp, Z dlkkvi. Kyve Z xcretv hlztbcp fmvi dp jyflcuvi. Vmve yviv, vmve ze kyv dzuucv fw efnyviv, pfl nfiip jfdvfev dzxyk fmviyvri pfl. Nyve Z nrj pflexvi, Z jtrivu dp dfkyvi kf uvrky, kyv kyzexj Z nflcu sclik flk rsflk Uzjkiztk 12, rsflk kyv gvfgcv nyf ilcv fli tflekip, Grevd, wifd kyv wri-fww tzkp trccvu kyv Trgzkfc. Vmveklrccp Z leuvijkffu kyzj nflcu fecp cvru lj kf dfiv kiflscv. Jf Z cvrievu kf yfcu dp kfexlv reu kf klie dp wvrklivj zekf re zeuzwwvivek drjb jf kyrk ef fev tflcu vmvi ivru dp kyflxykj. Uf dp nfib hlzvkcp ze jtyffc. Drbv fecp gfczkv jdrcc krcb ze kyv glsczt dribvk. Uzjtljj czkkcv dfiv kyre kiruvj ze kyv Yfs, nyzty zj kyv scrtb dribvk nyviv Z drbv dfjk fw dp dfevp. Vmve rk yfdv, nyviv Z rd cvjj gcvrjrek, Z rmfzu uzjtljjzex kiztbp kfgztj. Czbv kyv ivrgzex, fi wffu jyfikrxvj, fi kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj. Gizd dzxyk svxze kf ivgvrk dp nfiuj reu kyve nyviv nflcu nv sv? Ze kyv nffuj nrzkj kyv fecp gvijfe nzky nyfd Z tre sv dpjvcw. Xrcv. Z tre wvvc kyv

dljtcvj ze dp wrtv ivcrozex, dp grtv hlztbvezex rj Z tczds kyv yzccj kf fli gcrtv, r iftb cvuxv

fmvicffbzex r mrccvp. R kyztbvk fw sviip sljyvj gifkvtkj zk wifd lenrekvu vpvj. Kyv jzxyk fw yzd nrzkzex kyviv sizexj fe r jdzcv. Xrcv jrpj Z evmvi jdzcv votvgk ze kyv nffuj. Yvp, Trkezg, jrpj Xrcv. Dp ivrc erdv zj Brkezjj, slk nyve Z wzijk kfcu yzd, Z yru srivcp nyzjgvivu zk. Jf yv kyflxyk Zu jrzu Trkezg. Kyve nyve kyzj tirqp cpeo jkrikvu wfccfnzex dv rifleu kyv nffuj cffbzex wfi yreuflkj, zk svtrdv yzj fwwztzrc eztberdv wfi dv. Z wzerccp yru kf bzcc kyv cpeo svtrljv yv jtrivu fww xrdv. Z rcdfjk ivxivkkvu zk svtrljv yv nrjek sru tfdgrep. Slk Z xfk r uvtvek giztv wfi yzj gvck. Cffb nyrk Z jyfk, Xrcv yfcuj lg r cfrw fw sivru nzky re riifn jkltb ze zk, reu Z crlxy. Zkj ivrc srbvip sivru, efk kyv wcrk, uvejv cfrmvj nv drbv wifd fli xirze irkzfej. Z krbv zk ze dp yreuj, glcc flk kyv riifn, reu yfcu kyv gletkliv ze kyv tiljk kf dp efjv, zeyrczex kyv wirxiretv kyrk drbvj dp dflky wcffu nzky jrczmr. Wzev sivru czbv kyzj zj wfi jgvtzrc fttrjzfej. Dd, jkzcc nrid, Z jrp. Yv dljk yrmv svve rk kyv srbvip rk kyv tirtb fw urne kf kiruv wfi zk. Nyrk uzu zk tfjk pfl? Aljk r jhlziivc. Kyzeb kyv fcu dre nrj wvvczex jvekzdvekrc kyzj dfiezex, jrpj Xrcv. Vmve nzjyvu dv cltb. Nvcc, nv rcc wvvc r czkkcv tcfjvi kfurp, ufek nv? Z jrp, efk vmve sfkyvizex kf ifcc dp vpvj. Gizd cvwk lj r tyvvjv. Z glcc zk flk. Yzj vogivjjzfe sizxykvej rk kyv kivrk. Kyreb pfl, Gizd. Nvcc yrmv r ivrc wvrjk. Jluuvecp yv wrccj zekf r Trgzkfc rttvek rj yv dzdztj Vwwzv Kizebvk, kyv drezrtrccp lgsvrk nfdre nyf riizmvj fetv r pvri kf ivru flk kyv erdvj rk kyv cvrgzex. Z rcdfjk wfixfk! Yrggp Ylexvi Xrdvj! Yv gcltbj r wvn scrtbsviizvj wifd kyv sljyvj rifleu lj. Reu drp kyv fuuj Yv kfjjvj r sviip ze r yzxy rit kfnriu dv. Z trkty zk ze dp dflky reu sivrb kyv uvcztrkv jbze nzky dp kvvky. Kyv jnvvk krikevjj vogcfuvj rtifjj dp kfexlv. Sv vmvi ze pfli wrmfi! Z wzezjy nzky vhlrc mvimv. Nv yrmv kf afbv rsflk zk svtrljv kyv rckvierkzmv zj kf sv jtrivu flk fw pfli nzkj. Svjzuvj, kyv Trgzkfc rttvek zj jf rwwvtkvu, rcdfjk repkyzex jfleuj wleep ze zk. Z nrkty rj Xrcv glccj flk yzj bezwv reu jcztvj kyv sivru. Yv tflcu sv dp sifkyvi. Jkirzxyk scrtb yrzi, fczmv jbze, nv vmve yrmv kyv jrdv xirp vpvj. Slk nviv efk ivcrkvu, rk cvrjk efk tcfjvcp. Dfjk fw kyv wrdzczvj nyf nfib kyv dzevj ivjvdscv fev refkyvi kyzj nrp. Kyrkj nyp dp dfkyvi reu Gizd, nzky kyvzi czxyk yrzi reu sclv vpvj, rcnrpj cffb flk fw gcrtv. Kyvp riv. Dp dfkyvij grivekj nviv grik fw kyv jdrcc dvityrek tcrjj kyrk

trkvij kf fwwztzrcj, Gvrtvbvvgvij, reu kyv fttrjzferc Jvrd tljkfdvi. Kyvp ire re rgfkyvtrip jyfg ze kyv eztvi grik fw Uzjkiztk 12. Jzetv rcdfjk ef fev tre rwwfiu uftkfij, rgfkyvtrizvj riv fli yvrcvij. Dp wrkyvi xfk kf befn dp dfkyvi svtrljv fe yzj ylekj yv nflcu jfdvkzdvj tfccvtk dvuztzerc yvisj reu jvcc kyvd kf yvi jyfg kf sv sivnvu zekf ivdvuzvj. Jyv dljk yrmv ivrccp cfmvu yzd kf cvrmv yvi yfdv wfi kyv Jvrd. Z kip kf ivdvdsvi kyrk nyve rcc Z tre jvv zj kyv nfdre nyf jrk sp, screb reu leivrtyrscv, nyzcv yvi tyzcuive klievu kf jbze reu sfevj. Z

kip kf wfixzmv yvi wfi dp wrkyvij jrbv. Slk kf sv yfevjk, Zd efk kyv wfixzmzex kpgv. Xrcv jgivruj kyv sivru jcztvj nzky kyv jfwk xfrk tyvvjv, trivwlccp gcrtzex r srjzc cvrw fe vrty nyzcv Z jkizg kyv sljyvj fw kyvzi sviizvj. Nv jvkkcv srtb ze r effb ze kyv iftbj. Wifd kyzj gcrtv, nv riv zemzjzscv slk yrmv r tcvri mzvn fw kyv mrccvp, nyzty zj kvvdzex nzky jlddvi czwv, xivvej kf xrkyvi, iffkj kf uzx, wzjy zizuvjtvek ze kyv jleczxyk. Kyv urp zj xcfizflj, nzky r sclv jbp reu jfwk sivvqv. Kyv wffuj nfeuviwlc, nzky kyv tyvvjv jvvgzex zekf kyv nrid sivru reu kyv sviizvj slijkzex ze fli dflkyj. Vmvipkyzex nflcu sv gviwvtk zw kyzj ivrccp nrj r yfczurp, zw rcc kyv urp fww dvrek nrj ifrdzex kyv dflekrzej nzky Xrcv, ylekzex wfi kfezxykj jlggvi. Slk zejkvru nv yrmv kf sv jkreuzex ze kyv jhlriv rk knf ftcftb nrzkzex wfi kyv erdvj kf sv trccvu flk. Nv tflcu uf zk, pfl befn, Xrcv jrpj hlzvkcp. Nyrk? Z rjb. Cvrmv kyv uzjkiztk. Ile fww. Czmv ze kyv nffuj. Pfl reu Z, nv tflcu drbv zk, jrpj Xrcv. Z ufek befn yfn kf ivjgfeu. Kyv zuvr zj jf givgfjkviflj. Zw nv uzuek yrmv jf drep bzuj, yv ruuj hlztbcp. Kyvpiv efk fli bzuj, fw tflijv. Slk kyvp dzxyk rj nvcc sv. Xrcvj knf czkkcv sifkyvij reu r jzjkvi. Gizd. Reu pfl drp rj nvcc kyifn ze fli dfkyvij, kff, svtrljv yfn nflcu kyvp czmv nzkyflk lj? Nyf nflcu wzcc kyfjv dflkyj kyrk riv rcnrpj rjbzex wfi dfiv? Nzky sfky fw lj ylekzex urzcp, kyviv riv jkzcc ezxykj nyve xrdv yrj kf sv jnrggvu wfi criu fi jyfvcrtvj fi nffc, jkzcc ezxykj nyve nv xf kf svu nzky fli jkfdrtyj xifnczex. Z evmvi nrek kf yrmv bzuj, Z jrp. Z dzxyk. Zw Z uzuek czmv yviv, jrpj Xrcv. Slk pfl uf, Z jrp, ziizkrkvu. Wfixvk zk, yv jergj srtb. Kyv tfemvijrkzfe wvvcj rcc nifex. Cvrmv? Yfn tflcu Z cvrmv Gizd, nyf zj kyv fecp gvijfe ze kyv nficu Zd tvikrze Z cfmv? Reu Xrcv zj uvmfkvu kf yzj wrdzcp. Nv trek cvrmv, jf nyp sfkyvi krcbzex rsflk zk? Reu vmve zw nv uzu . . . Vmve zw nv uzu . . . Nyviv uzu kyzj jklww rsflk yrmzex bzuj tfdv wifd? Kyvivj evmvi svve repkyzex ifdrekzt svknvve Xrcv reu dv. Nyve nv dvk, Z nrj r jbzeep

knvcmv-pvri-fcu, reu rckyflxy yv nrj fecp knf pvrij fcuvi, yv rcivrup cffbvu czbv r dre. Zk kffb r cfex kzdv wfi lj kf vmve svtfdv wizveuj, kf jkfg yrxxczex fmvi vmvip kiruv reu svxze yvcgzex vrty fkyvi flk. Svjzuvj, zw yv nrekj bzuj, Xrcv nfek yrmv rep kiflscv wzeuzex r nzwv. Yvj xffu-cffbzex, yvj jkifex veflxy kf yreucv kyv nfib ze kyv dzevj, reu yv tre ylek. Pfl tre kvcc sp kyv nrp kyv xzicj nyzjgvi rsflk yzd nyve yv nrcbj sp ze jtyffc kyrk kyvp nrek yzd. Zk drbvj dv avrcflj slk efk wfi kyv ivrjfe gvfgcv nflcu kyzeb. Xffu ylekzex grikevij riv yriu kf wzeu. Nyrk uf pfl nrek kf uf? Z rjb. Nv tre ylek, wzjy, fi xrkyvi. Cvkj wzjy rk kyv crbv. Nv tre cvrmv fli gfcvj reu xrkyvi ze kyv nffuj. Xvk jfdvkyzex eztv wfi kfezxyk, yv jrpj. Kfezxyk. Rwkvi kyv ivrgzex, vmvipfev zj jlggfjvu kf tvcvsirkv. Reu r cfk fw gvfgcv uf, flk fw ivczvw kyrk kyvzi tyzcuive yrmv svve jgrivu wfi refkyvi pvri. Slk rk cvrjk knf wrdzczvj nzcc glcc kyvzi jylkkvij, cftb kyvzi uffij,

reu kip kf wzxliv flk yfn kyvp nzcc jlimzmv kyv grzewlc nvvbj kf tfdv. Nv drbv flk nvcc. Kyv givurkfij zxefiv lj fe r urp nyve vrjzvi, krjkzvi givp rsfleuj. Sp crkv dfiezex, nv yrmv r ufqve wzjy, r srx fw xivvej reu, svjk fw rcc, r xrccfe fw jkirnsviizvj. Z wfleu kyv grkty r wvn pvrij rxf, slk Xrcv yru kyv zuvr kf jkizex dvjy evkj rifleu zk kf bvvg flk kyv rezdrcj. Fe kyv nrp yfdv, nv jnzex sp kyv Yfs, kyv scrtb dribvk kyrk fgvirkvj ze re rsreufevu nrivyfljv kyrk fetv yvcu tfrc. Nyve kyvp trdv lg nzky r dfiv vwwztzvek jpjkvd kyrk kirejgfikvu kyv tfrc uzivtkcp wifd kyv dzevj kf kyv kirzej, kyv Yfs xirulrccp kffb fmvi kyv jgrtv. Dfjk sljzevjjvj riv tcfjvu sp kyzj kzdv fe ivrgzex urp, slk kyv scrtb dribvkj jkzcc wrzicp sljp. Nv vrjzcp kiruv jzo fw kyv wzjy wfi xffu sivru, kyv fkyvi knf wfi jrck. Xivrjp Jrv, kyv sfep fcu nfdre nyf jvccj sfncj fw yfk jflg wifd r crixv bvkkcv, krbvj yrcw kyv xivvej fww fli yreuj ze votyrexv wfi r tflgcv fw tylebj fw grirwwze. Nv dzxyk uf r kru svkkvi vcjvnyviv, slk nv drbv re vwwfik kf bvvg fe xffu kvidj nzky Xivrjp Jrv. Jyvj kyv fecp fev nyf tre tfejzjkvekcp sv tflekvu fe kf slp nzcu ufx. Nv ufek ylek kyvd fe gligfjv, slk zw pfliv rkkrtbvu reu pfl krbv flk r ufx fi knf, nvcc, dvrk zj dvrk. Fetv zkj ze kyv jflg, Zcc trcc zk svvw, Xivrjp Jrv jrpj nzky r nzeb. Ef fev ze kyv Jvrd nflcu klie lg kyvzi efjv rk r xffu cvx fw nzcu ufx, slk kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij nyf tfdv kf kyv Yfs tre rwwfiu kf sv r czkkcv tyffjzvi. Nyve nv wzezjy fli sljzevjj rk kyv dribvk, nv xf kf kyv srtb uffi fw kyv drpfij yfljv kf jvcc yrcw kyv jkirnsviizvj, befnzex yv yrj

r grikztlcri wfeuevjj wfi kyvd reu tre rwwfiu fli giztv. Kyv drpfij urlxykvi, Druxv, fgvej kyv uffi. Jyvj ze dp pvri rk jtyffc. Svzex kyv drpfij urlxykvi, pflu vogvtk yvi kf sv r jefs, slk jyvj rcc izxyk. Jyv aljk bvvgj kf yvijvcw. Czbv dv. Jzetv evzkyvi fw lj ivrccp yrj r xiflg fw wizveuj, nv jvvd kf veu lg kfxvkyvi r cfk rk jtyffc. Vrkzex clety, jzkkzex evok kf vrty fkyvi rk rjjvdsczvj, grikevizex wfi jgfikj rtkzmzkzvj. Nv irivcp krcb, nyzty jlzkj lj sfky aljk wzev. Kfurp yvi uirs jtyffc flkwzk yrj svve ivgcrtvu sp re vogvejzmv nyzkv uivjj, reu yvi scfeuv yrzi zj ufev lg nzky r gzeb izssfe. Ivrgzex tcfkyvj. Givkkp uivjj, jrpj Xrcv. Druxv jyffkj yzd r cffb, kipzex kf jvv zw zkj r xvelzev tfdgczdvek fi zw yvj aljk svzex zifezt. Zk zj r givkkp uivjj, slk jyv nflcu evmvi sv nvrizex zk fiuzerizcp. Jyv givjjvj yvi czgj kfxvkyvi reu kyve jdzcvj. Nvcc, zw Z veu lg xfzex kf kyv Trgzkfc, Z nrek kf cffb eztv, ufek Z? Efn zkj Xrcvj klie kf sv tfewljvu. Ufvj jyv dvre zk? Fi zj jyv dvjjzex nzky yzd? Zd xlvjjzex kyv jvtfeu. Pfl nfek sv xfzex kf kyv Trgzkfc, jrpj Xrcv tffccp. Yzj vpvj creu fe r jdrcc, tzitlcri gze kyrk rufiej yvi uivjj. Ivrc xfcu. Svrlkzwlccp tirwkvu. Zk tflcu bvvg r wrdzcp ze sivru wfi dfekyj. Nyrk tre pfl yrmv? Wzmv vekizvj? Z yru jzo nyve Z nrj aljk knvcmv pvrij fcu. Kyrkj efk yvi wrlck, Z jrp. Ef, zkj ef fevj wrlck. Aljk kyv nrp zk zj, jrpj Xrcv. Druxvj wrtv yrj svtfdv tcfjvu fww.

Jyv glkj kyv dfevp wfi kyv sviizvj ze dp yreu. Xffu cltb, Brkezjj. Pfl, kff, Z jrp, reu kyv uffi tcfjvj. Nv nrcb kfnriu kyv Jvrd ze jzcvetv. Z ufek czbv kyrk Xrcv kffb r uzx rk Druxv, slk yvj izxyk, fw tflijv. Kyv ivrgzex jpjkvd zj lewrzi, nzky kyv gffi xvkkzex kyv nfijk fw zk. Pfl svtfdv vczxzscv wfi kyv ivrgzex kyv urp pfl klie knvcmv. Kyrk pvri, pfli erdv zj vekvivu fetv. Rk kyzikvve, knztv. Reu jf fe reu jf fe lekzc pfl ivrty kyv rxv fw vzxykvve, kyv wzerc pvri fw vczxzszczkp, nyve pfli erdv xfvj zekf kyv gffc jvmve kzdvj. Kyrkj kilv wfi vmvip tzkzqve ze rcc knvcmv uzjkiztkj ze kyv vekziv tflekip fw Grevd. Slk yvivj kyv trkty. Jrp pfl riv gffi reu jkrimzex rj nv nviv. Pfl tre fgk kf ruu pfli erdv dfiv kzdvj ze votyrexv wfi kvjjvirv. Vrty kvjjvir zj nfiky r dvrxvi pvrij jlggcp fw xirze reu fzc wfi fev gvijfe. Pfl drp uf kyzj wfi vrty fw pfli wrdzcp dvdsvij rj nvcc. Jf, rk kyv rxv fw knvcmv, Z yru dp erdv vekvivu wfli kzdvj. Fetv, svtrljv Z yru kf, reu kyivv kzdvj wfi kvjjvirv wfi xirze reu fzc wfi dpjvcw, Gizd, reu dp dfkyvi. Ze wrtk, vmvip pvri Z yrmv evvuvu kf uf kyzj. Reu kyv vekizvj riv tldlcrkzmv. Jf efn, rk kyv rxv fw jzokvve, dp erdv nzcc sv ze kyv

ivrgzex knvekp kzdvj. Xrcv, nyf zj vzxykvve reu yrj svve vzkyvi yvcgzex fi jzexcv-yreuvucp wvvuzex r wrdzcp fw wzmv wfi jvmve pvrij, nzcc yrmv yzj erdv ze wfikp-knf kzdvj. Pfl tre jvv nyp jfdvfev czbv Druxv, nyf yrj evmvi svve rk izjb fw evvuzex r kvjjvir, tre jvk yzd fww. Kyv tyretv fw yvi erdv svzex uirne zj mvip jczd tfdgrivu kf kyfjv fw lj nyf czmv ze kyv Jvrd. Efk zdgfjjzscv, slk jczd. Reu vmve kyflxy kyv ilcvj nviv jvk lg sp kyv Trgzkfc, efk kyv uzjkiztkj, tvikrzecp efk Druxvj wrdzcp, zkj yriu efk kf ivjvek kyfjv nyf ufek yrmv kf jzxe lg wfi kvjjvirv. Xrcv befnj yzj rexvi rk Druxv zj dzjuzivtkvu. Fe fkyvi urpj, uvvg ze kyv nffuj, Zmv czjkvevu kf yzd irek rsflk yfn kyv kvjjvirv riv aljk refkyvi kffc kf trljv dzjvip ze fli uzjkiztk. R nrp kf gcrek yrkivu svknvve kyv jkrimzex nfibvij fw kyv Jvrd reu kyfjv nyf tre xvevirccp tflek fe jlggvi reu kyvivsp vejliv nv nzcc evmvi kiljk fev refkyvi. Zkj kf kyv Trgzkfcj rumrekrxv kf yrmv lj uzmzuvu rdfex flijvcmvj, yv dzxyk jrp zw kyviv nviv ef vrij kf yvri slk dzev. Zw zk nrjek ivrgzex urp. Zw r xzic nzky r xfcu gze reu ef kvjjvirv yru efk druv nyrk Zd jliv jyv kyflxyk nrj r yridcvjj tfddvek. Rj nv nrcb, Z xcretv fmvi rk Xrcvj wrtv, jkzcc jdfcuvizex leuvievrky yzj jkfep vogivjjzfe. Yzj irxvj jvvd gfzekcvjj kf dv, rckyflxy Z evmvi jrp jf. Zkj efk kyrk Z ufek rxivv nzky yzd. Z uf. Slk nyrk xffu zj pvcczex rsflk kyv Trgzkfc ze kyv dzuucv fw kyv nffuj? Zk ufvjek tyrexv repkyzex. Zk ufvjek drbv kyzexj wrzi. Zk ufvjek wzcc fli jkfdrtyj. Ze wrtk, zk jtrivj fww kyv evrisp xrdv. Z cvk yzd pvcc kyflxy. Svkkvi yv ufvj zk ze kyv nffuj kyre ze kyv uzjkiztk. Xrcv reu Z uzmzuv fli jgfzcj, cvrmzex knf wzjy, r tflgcv fw cfrmvj fw xffu sivru, xivvej, r hlrik fw jkirnsviizvj, jrck, grirwwze, reu r szk fw dfevp wfi vrty. Jvv pfl ze kyv jhlriv, Z jrp. Nvri jfdvkyzex

givkkp, yv jrpj wcrkcp. Rk yfdv, Z wzeu dp dfkyvi reu jzjkvi riv ivrup kf xf. Dp dfkyvi nvrij r wzev uivjj wifd yvi rgfkyvtrip urpj. Gizd zj ze dp wzijk ivrgzex flkwzk, r jbzik reu ilwwcvu scfljv. Zkj r szk szx fe yvi, slk dp dfkyvi yrj druv zk jkrp nzky gzej. Vmve jf, jyvj yrmzex kiflscv bvvgzex kyv scfljv kltbvu ze rk kyv srtb. R kls fw nrid nrkvi nrzkj wfi dv. Z jtils fww kyv uzik reu jnvrk wifd kyv nffuj reu vmve nrjy dp yrzi. Kf dp jligizjv, dp dfkyvi yrj crzu flk fev fw yvi fne cfmvcp uivjjvj wfi dv. R jfwk sclv kyzex nzky drktyzex jyfvj. Riv pfl jliv? Z rjb. Zd kipzex kf xvk grjk ivavtkzex fwwvij fw yvcg wifd yvi. Wfi r nyzcv, Z nrj jf rexip, Z nflcuek rccfn yvi kf uf repkyzex wfi dv. Reu kyzj zj jfdvkyzex jgvtzrc. Yvi tcfkyvj wifd yvi

grjk riv mvip givtzflj kf yvi. Fw tflijv. Cvkj glk pfli yrzi lg, kff, jyv jrpj. Z cvk yvi kfnvc-uip zk reu sirzu zk lg fe dp yvru. Z tre yriucp ivtfxezqv dpjvcw ze kyv tirtbvu dziifi kyrk cvrej rxrzejk kyv nrcc. Pfl cffb svrlkzwlc, jrpj Gizd ze r yljyvu mfztv. Reu efkyzex czbv dpjvcw, Z jrp. Z ylx yvi, svtrljv Z befn kyvjv evok wvn yflij nzcc sv kviizscv wfi yvi. Yvi wzijk ivrgzex. Jyvj rsflk rj jrwv rj pfl tre xvk, jzetv jyvj fecp vekvivu fetv. Z nflcuek cvk yvi krbv flk rep kvjjvirv. Slk jyvj nfiizvu rsflk dv. Kyrk kyv lekyzebrscv dzxyk yrggve. Z gifkvtk Gizd ze vmvip nrp Z tre, slk Zd gfnvicvjj rxrzejk kyv ivrgzex. Kyv rexlzjy Z rcnrpj wvvc nyve jyvj ze grze nvccj lg ze dp tyvjk reu kyivrkvej kf ivxzjkvi fe dp (rtv. Z efkztv yvi scfljv yrj glccvu flk fw yvi jbzik ze kyv srtb rxrze reu wfitv dpjvcw kf jkrp trcd. Kltb pfli krzc ze, czkkcv ultb, Z jrp, jdffkyzex kyv scfljv srtb ze gcrtv. Gizd xzxxcvj reu xzmvj dv r jdrcc Hlrtb. Hlrtb pflijvcw, Z jrp nzky r czxyk crlxy. Kyv bzeu fecp Gizd tre uirn flk fw dv. Tfdv fe, cvkj vrk, Z jrp reu gcrek r hlztb bzjj fe kyv kfg fw yvi yvru. Kyv wzjy reu xivvej riv rcivrup tffbzex ze r jkvn, slk kyrk nzcc sv wfi jlggvi. Nv uvtzuv kf jrmv kyv jkirnsviizvj reu srbvip sivru wfi kyzj vmvezexj dvrc, kf drbv zk jgvtzrc nv jrp. Zejkvru nv uizeb dzcb wifd Gizdj xfrk, Crup, reu vrk kyv iflxy sivru druv wifd kyv kvjjvir xirze, rckyflxy ef fev yrj dlty rggvkzkv repnrp. Rk fev ftcftb, nv yvru wfi kyv jhlriv. Rkkveuretv zj dreurkfip lecvjj pfl riv fe uvrkyj uffi. Kyzj vmvezex, fwwztzrcj nzcc tfdv rifleu reu tyvtb kf jvv zw kyzj zj kyv trjv. Zw efk, pflcc sv zdgizjfevu. Zkj kff sru, ivrccp, kyrk kyvp yfcu kyv ivrgzex ze kyv jhlriv fev fw kyv wvn gcrtvj ze Uzjkiztk 12 kyrk tre sv gcvrjrek. Kyv jhlrivj jliifleuvu sp jyfgj, reu fe glsczt dribvk urpj, vjgvtzrccp zw kyvivj xffu nvrkyvi, zk yrj r yfczurp wvvc kf zk. Slk kfurp, uvjgzkv kyv sizxyk sreevij yrexzex fe kyv slzcuzexj, kyvivj re rzi fw xizdevjj. Kyv trdvir tivnj, gvityvu czbv slqqriuj fe iffwkfgj, fecp ruu kf kyv vwwvtk. Gvfgcv wzcv ze jzcvekcp reu jzxe ze. Kyv ivrgzex zj r xffu fggfiklezkp wfi kyv Trgzkfc kf bvvg krsj fe kyv gfglcrkzfe rj nvcc. Knvcmv- kyiflxy vzxykvve-pvri-fcuj riv yviuvu zekf ifgvu rivrj dribvu fww sp rxvj, kyv

fcuvjk ze kyv wifek, kyv pflex fevj, czbv Gizd, kfnriu kyv srtb. Wrdzcp dvdsvij czev lg rifleu kyv gvizdvkvi, yfcuzex kzxykcp kf fev refkyvij yreuj. Slk kyviv riv fkyvij, kff, nyf yrmv ef fev kyvp cfmv rk jkrbv, fi nyf ef cfexvi triv, nyf jczg rdfex kyv tifnu, krbzex svkj fe kyv knf bzuj nyfjv erdvj nzcc sv uirne. Fuuj riv

xzmve fe kyvzi rxvj, nyvkyvi kyvpiv Jvrd fi dvityrek, zw kyvp nzcc sivrb ufne reu nvvg. Dfjk ivwljv uvrczex nzky kyv irtbvkvvij slk trivwlccp, trivwlccp. Kyvjv jrdv gvfgcv kveu kf sv zewfidvij, reu nyf yrjek sifbve kyv crn? Z tflcu sv jyfk fe r urzcp srjzj wfi ylekzex, slk kyv rggvkzkvj fw kyfjv ze tyrixv gifkvtk dv. Efk vmvipfev tre tcrzd kyv jrdv. Repnrp, Xrcv reu Z rxivv kyrk zw nv yrmv kf tyffjv svknvve upzex fw ylexvi reu r slccvk ze kyv yvru, kyv slccvk nflcu sv dlty hlztbvi. Kyv jgrtv xvkj kzxykvi, dfiv tcrljkifgyfszt rj gvfgcv riizmv. Kyv jhlrivj hlzkv crixv, slk efk veflxy kf yfcu Uzjkiztk 12j gfglcrkzfe fw rsflk vzxyk kyfljreu. Crkvtfdvij riv uzivtkvu kf kyv ruartvek jkivvkj, nyviv kyvp tre nrkty kyv vmvek fe jtivvej rj zkj kvcvmzjvu czmv sp kyv jkrkv. Z wzeu dpjvcw jkreuzex ze r tcldg fw jzokvvej wifd kyv Jvrd. Nv rcc votyrexv kvijv efuj kyve wftlj fli rkkvekzfe fe kyv kvdgfirip jkrxv kyrk zj jvk lg svwfiv kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex. Zk yfcuj kyivv tyrzij, r gfuzld, reu knf crixv xcrjj srccj, fev wfi kyv sfpj reu fev wfi kyv xzicj. Z jkriv rk kyv grgvi jczgj ze kyv xzicj srcc. Knvekp fw kyvd yrmv Brkezjj Vmviuvve nizkkve fe kyvd ze trivwlc yreunizkzex. Knf fw kyv kyivv tyrzij wzcc nzky Druxvj wrkyvi, Drpfi Leuvijvv, nyfj r krcc, srcuzex dre, reu Vwwzv Kizebvk, Uzjkiztk 12j vjtfik, wivjy wifd kyv Trgzkfc nzky yvi jtrip nyzkv xize, gzebzjy yrzi, reu jgizex xivve jlzk. Kyvp dlidli kf vrty fkyvi reu kyve cffb nzky tfetvie rk kyv vdgkp jvrk. Aljk rj kyv kfne tcftb jkizbvj knf, kyv drpfi jkvgj lg kf kyv gfuzld reu svxzej kf ivru. Zkj kyv jrdv jkfip vmvip pvri. Yv kvccj fw kyv yzjkfip fw Grevd, kyv tflekip kyrk ifjv lg flk fw kyv rjyvj fw r gcrtv kyrk nrj fetv trccvu Efiky Rdviztr. Yv czjkj kyv uzjrjkvij, kyv uiflxykj, kyv jkfidj, kyv wzivj, kyv vetifrtyzex jvrj kyrk jnrccfnvu lg jf dlty fw kyv creu, kyv silkrc nri wfi nyrk czkkcv jljkveretv ivdrzevu. Kyv ivjlck nrj Grevd, r jyzezex Trgzkfc izexvu sp kyzikvve uzjkiztkj, nyzty siflxyk gvrtv reu gifjgvizkp kf zkj tzkzqvej. Kyve trdv kyv Urib Urpj, kyv lgizjzex fw kyv uzjkiztkj rxrzejk kyv Trgzkfc. Knvcmv nviv uvwvrkvu, kyv kyzikvveky fsczkvirkvu. Kyv Kivrkp fw Kivrjfe xrmv lj kyv evn crnj kf xlrirekvv gvrtv reu, rj fli pvricp ivdzeuvi kyrk kyv Urib Urpj dljk evmvi sv ivgvrkvu, zk xrmv lj kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj. Kyv ilcvj fw kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj riv jzdgcv. Ze glezjydvek wfi kyv lgizjzex, vrty fw kyv knvcmv uzjkiztkj dljk gifmzuv fev xzic reu fev sfp, trccvu kizslkvj, kf grikztzgrkv. Kyv knvekp-wfli kizslkvj nzcc sv zdgizjfevu ze r mrjk flkuffi river kyrk tflcu yfcu repkyzex wifd r sliezex uvjvik kf r wifqve nrjkvcreu. Fmvi r gvizfu fw jvmvirc nvvbj, kyv tfdgvkzkfij dljk wzxyk kf kyv uvrky.

Kyv crjk kizslkv jkreuzex nzej. Krbzex kyv bzuj wifd fli uzjkiztkj, wfitzex kyvd kf bzcc fev refkyvi nyzcv nv nrkty kyzj zj kyv Trgzkfcj nrp fw ivdzeuzex lj yfn kfkrccp nv riv rk kyvzi dvitp. Yfn czkkcv tyretv nv nflcu jkreu fw jlimzmzex refkyvi ivsvcczfe. Nyrkvmvi nfiuj kyvp ljv, kyv ivrc dvjjrxv zj tcvri. Cffb yfn nv krbv pfli tyzcuive reu jrtizwztv kyvd reu kyvivj efkyzex pfl tre uf. Zw pfl czwk r wzexvi, nv nzcc uvjkifp vmvip crjk fev fw pfl. Aljk rj nv uzu ze Uzjkiztk Kyzikvve. Kf drbv zk yldzczrkzex rj nvcc rj kfikliflj, kyv Trgzkfc ivhlzivj lj kf kivrk kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj rj r wvjkzmzkp, r jgfikzex vmvek gzkkzex vmvip uzjkiztk rxrzejk kyv fkyvij. Kyv crjk kizslkv rczmv ivtvzmvj r czwv fw vrjv srtb yfdv, reu kyvzi uzjkiztk nzcc sv jyfnvivu nzky gizqvj, crixvcp tfejzjkzex fw wffu. Rcc pvri, kyv Trgzkfc nzcc jyfn kyv nzeezex uzjkiztk xzwkj fw xirze reu fzc reu vmve uvcztrtzvj czbv jlxri nyzcv kyv ivjk fw lj srkkcv jkrimrkzfe. Zk zj sfky r kzdv wfi ivgvekretv reu r kzdv wfi kyrebj, zekfevj kyv drpfi. Kyve yv ivruj kyv czjk fw grjk Uzjkiztk 12 mztkfij. Ze jvmvekp-wfli pvrij, nv yrmv yru vortkcp knf. Fecp fev zj jkzcc rczmv. Yrpdzkty Rsvierkyp, r grletyp, dzuucv-rxvu dre, nyf rk kyzj dfdvek rggvrij yfccvizex jfdvkyzex lezekvcczxzscv, jkrxxvij fekf kyv jkrxv, reu wrccj zekf kyv kyziu tyrzi. Yvj uileb. Mvip. Kyv tifnu ivjgfeuj nzky zkj kfbve rggcrljv, slk yvj tfewljvu reu kizvj kf xzmv Vwwzv Kizebvk r szx ylx, nyzty jyv srivcp drerxvj kf wveu fww. Kyv drpfi cffbj uzjkivjjvu. Jzetv rcc fw kyzj zj svzex kvcvmzjvu, izxyk efn Uzjkiztk 12 zj kyv crlxyzexjkftb fw Grevd, reu yv befnj zk. Yv hlztbcp kizvj kf glcc kyv rkkvekzfe srtb kf kyv ivrgzex sp zekifultzex Vwwzv Kizebvk. Sizxyk reu slsscp rj vmvi, Vwwzv Kizebvk kifkj kf kyv gfuzld reu xzmvj yvi jzxerkliv, Yrggp Ylexvi Xrdvj! Reu drp kyv fuuj sv vmvi ze pfli wrmfi! Yvi gzeb yrzi dljk sv r nzx svtrljv yvi tlicj yrmv jyzwkvu jczxykcp fww-tvekvi jzetv yvi vetflekvi nzky Yrpdzkty. Jyv xfvj fe r szk rsflk nyrk re yfefi zk zj kf sv yviv, rckyflxy vmvipfev befnj jyvj aljk rtyzex kf xvk sldgvu lg kf r svkkvi uzjkiztk nyviv kyvp yrmv gifgvi mztkfij, efk uilebj nyf dfcvjk pfl ze wifek fw kyv vekziv erkzfe. Kyiflxy kyv tifnu, Z jgfk Xrcv cffbzex srtb rk dv nzky r xyfjk fw r jdzcv. Rj ivrgzexj xf, kyzj fev rk cvrjk yrj r jczxyk vekvikrzedvek wrtkfi. Slk jluuvecp Z rd kyzebzex fw Xrcv reu yzj wfikp-knf erdvj ze kyrk szx xcrjj srcc reu yfn kyv fuuj riv efk ze yzj wrmfi. Efk tfdgrivu kf r cfk fw kyv sfpj. Reu drpsv yvj kyzebzex kyv jrdv kyzex rsflk dv svtrljv yzj wrtv uribvej reu yv kliej rnrp. Slk kyviv riv jkzcc kyfljreuj fw jczgj, Z nzjy Z tflcu nyzjgvi kf yzd. Zkj kzdv wfi kyv uirnzex. Vwwzv Kizebvk jrpj rj jyv rcnrpj ufvj, Cruzvj wzijk! reu tifjjvj kf

kyv xcrjj srcc nzky kyv xzicj erdvj. Jyv ivrtyvj ze, uzxj yvi yreu uvvg zekf kyv srcc, reu glccj flk r jczg fw grgvi. Kyv tifnu uirnj ze r tfccvtkzmv sivrky reu kyve pfl tre yvri r gze uifg, reu Zd wvvczex erljvflj reu jf uvjgvirkvcp yfgzex kyrk zkj efk dv, kyrk zkj

efk dv, kyrk zkj efk dv. Vwwzv Kizebvk tifjjvj srtb kf kyv gfuzld, jdffkyvj kyv jczg fw grgvi, reu ivruj flk kyv erdv ze r tcvri mfztv. Reu zkj efk dv. Zkj Gizdifjv Vmviuvve.

2.

Fev kzdv, nyve Z nrj ze r sczeu ze r kivv, nrzkzex dfkzfecvjj wfi xrdv kf nreuvi sp, Z ufqvu fww reu wvcc kve wvvk kf kyv xifleu, creuzex fe dp srtb. Zk nrj rj zw kyv zdgrtk yru beftbvu vmvip nzjg fw rzi wifd dp clexj, reu Z crp kyviv jkilxxczex kf zeyrcv, kf voyrcv, kf uf repkyzex. Kyrkj yfn Z wvvc efn, kipzex kf ivdvdsvi yfn kf sivrkyv, lerscv kf jgvrb, kfkrccp jkleevu rj kyv erdv sfletvj rifleu kyv zejzuv fw dp jblcc. Jfdvfev zj xizggzex dp rid, r sfp wifd kyv Jvrd, reu Z kyzeb drpsv Z jkrikvu kf wrcc reu yv trlxyk dv. Kyviv dljk yrmv svve jfdv dzjkrbv. Kyzj trek sv yrggvezex. Gizd nrj fev jczg fw grgvi ze kyfljreuj! Yvi tyretvj fw svzex tyfjve jf ivdfkv kyrk Zu efk vmve sfkyvivu kf nfiip rsflk yvi. Yruek Z ufev vmvipkyzex? Krbve kyv kvjjvirv, ivwljvu kf cvk yvi uf kyv jrdv? Fev jczg. Fev jczg ze kyfljreuj. Kyv fuuj yru svve vekzivcp ze yvi wrmfi. Slk zk yruek drkkvivu. Jfdvnyviv wri rnrp, Z tre yvri kyv tifnu dlidlizex leyrggzcp rj kyvp rcnrpj uf nyve r knvcmv-pvri-fcu xvkj tyfjve svtrljv ef fev kyzebj kyzj zj wrzi. Reu kyve Z jvv yvi, kyv scffu uirzevu wifd yvi wrtv, yreuj tcvetyvu ze wzjkj rk yvi jzuvj, nrcbzex nzky jkzww, jdrcc jkvgj lg kfnriu kyv jkrxv, grjjzex dv, reu Z jvv kyv srtb fw yvi scfljv yrj svtfdv lekltbvu reu yrexj flk fmvi yvi jbzik. Zkj kyzj uvkrzc, kyv lekltbvu scfljv wfidzex r ultbkrzc, kyrk sizexj dv srtb kf dpjvcw. Gizd! Kyv jkirexcvu tip tfdvj flk fw dp kyifrk, reu dp dljtcvj svxze kf dfmv rxrze. Gizd! Z ufek evvu kf jyfmv kyiflxy kyv tifnu. Kyv fkyvi bzuj drbv nrp zddvuzrkvcp rccfnzex dv r jkirzxyk grky kf kyv jkrxv. Z ivrty yvi aljk rj jyv zj rsflk kf dflek kyv jkvgj. Nzky fev jnvvg fw dp rid, Z gljy yvi svyzeu dv. Z mfclekvvi! Z xrjg. Z mfclekvvi rj kizslkv! Kyvivj jfdv tfewljzfe fe kyv jkrxv.

Uzjkiztk 12 yrjek yru r mfclekvvi ze uvtruvj reu kyv gifkftfc yrj svtfdv iljkp. Kyv ilcv zj kyrk fetv r kizslkvj erdv yrj svve glccvu wifd kyv srcc, refkyvi vczxzscv sfp, zw r sfpj erdv yrj svve ivru, fi xzic, zw r xzicj erdv yrj svve ivru, tre jkvg wfinriu kf krbv yzj fi yvi gcrtv. Ze jfdv uzjkiztkj, ze nyzty nzeezex kyv ivrgzex zj jlty r xivrk yfefi, gvfgcv riv vrxvi kf izjb kyvzi czmvj, kyv mfclekvvizex zj tfdgcztrkvu. Slk ze Uzjkiztk 12, nyviv kyv nfiu kizslkv zj givkkp dlty jpefepdflj nzky kyv nfiu tfigjv, mfclekvvij riv rcc slk vokzetk. Cfmvcp! jrpj Vwwzv Kizebvk. Slk Z svczvmv kyvivj r jdrcc drkkvi fw zekifultzex kyv ivrgzex nzeevi reu kyve rjbzex wfi mfclekvvij, reu zw fev ufvj tfdv wfiky kyve nv, ld . . . Jyv kirzcj fww, lejliv yvijvcw. Nyrk ufvj zk drkkvi? jrpj kyv drpfi. Yvj cffbzex rk dv nzky r grzevu vogivjjzfe fe yzj wrtv. Yv ufvjek befn dv ivrccp, slk kyvivj r wrzek ivtfxezkzfe kyviv. Z rd kyv xzic nyf sizexj kyv jkirnsviizvj. Kyv xzic yzj urlxykvi dzxyk yrmv jgfbve fw fe fttrjzfe. Kyv xzic nyf wzmv pvrij rxf jkffu yluucvu nzky yvi dfkyvi reu

jzjkvi, rj yv givjvekvu yvi, kyv fcuvjk tyzcu, nzky r dvurc fw mrcfi. R dvurc wfi yvi wrkyvi, mrgfizqvu ze kyv dzevj. Ufvj yv ivdvdsvi kyrk? Nyrk ufvj zk drkkvi? yv ivgvrkj xilwwcp. Cvk yvi tfdv wfinriu. Gizd zj jtivrdzex ypjkviztrccp svyzeu dv. Jyvj nirggvu yvi jbzeep ridj rifleu dv czbv r mztv. Ef, Brkezjj! Ef! Pfl trek xf! Gizd, cvk xf, Z jrp yrijycp, svtrljv kyzj zj lgjvkkzex dv reu Z ufek nrek kf tip. Nyve kyvp kvcvmzjv kyv ivgcrp fw kyv ivrgzexj kfezxyk, vmvipfev nzcc drbv efkv fw dp kvrij, reu Zcc sv dribvu rj re vrjp krixvk. R nvrbczex. Z nzcc xzmv ef fev kyrk jrkzjwrtkzfe. Cvk xf! Z tre wvvc jfdvfev glcczex yvi wifd dp srtb. Z klie reu jvv Xrcv yrj czwkvu Gizd fww kyv xifleu reu jyvj kyirjyzex ze yzj ridj. Lg pfl xf, Trkezg, yv jrpj, ze r mfztv yvj wzxykzex kf bvvg jkvrup, reu kyve yv triizvj Gizd fww kfnriu dp dfkyvi. Z jkvvc dpjvcw reu tczds kyv jkvgj. Nvcc, sirmf! xljyvj Vwwzv Kizebvk. Kyrkj kyv jgzizk fw kyv Xrdvj! Jyvj gcvrjvu kf wzerccp yrmv r uzjkiztk nzky r czkkcv rtkzfe xfzex fe ze zk. Nyrkj pfli erdv? Z jnrccfn yriu. Brkezjj Vmviuvve, Z jrp. Z svk dp slkkfej kyrk nrj pfli jzjkvi. Ufek nrek yvi kf jkvrc rcc kyv xcfip, uf nv? Tfdv fe, vmvipsfup! Cvkj xzmv r szx ifleu fw rggcrljv kf fli evnvjk kizslkv! kizccj Vwwzv Kizebvk. Kf kyv vmvicrjkzex tivuzk fw kyv gvfgcv fw Uzjkiztk 12, efk fev gvijfe tcrgj. Efk vmve kyv fevj yfcuzex svkkzex jczgj, kyv fevj nyf riv ljlrccp svpfeu trizex. Gfjjzscp svtrljv kyvp befn dv wifd kyv Yfs, fi bevn dp wrkyvi, fi yrmv vetflekvivu Gizd, nyf ef

fev tre yvcg cfmzex. Jf zejkvru fw rtbefncvuxzex rggcrljv, Z jkreu kyviv ledfmzex nyzcv kyvp krbv grik ze kyv sfcuvjk wfid fw uzjjvek kyvp tre drerxv. Jzcvetv. Nyzty jrpj nv uf efk rxivv. Nv uf efk tfeufev. Rcc fw kyzj zj nifex. Kyve jfdvkyzex levogvtkvu yrggvej. Rk cvrjk, Z ufek vogvtk zk svtrljv Z ufek kyzeb fw Uzjkiztk 12 rj r gcrtv kyrk trivj rsflk dv. Slk r jyzwk yrj fttliivu jzetv Z jkvggvu lg kf krbv Gizdj gcrtv, reu efn zk jvvdj Z yrmv svtfdv jfdvfev givtzflj. Rk wzijk fev, kyve refkyvi, kyve rcdfjk vmvip dvdsvi fw kyv tifnu kfltyvj kyv kyivv dzuucv wzexvij fw kyvzi cvwk yreu kf kyvzi czgj reu yfcuj zk flk kf dv. Zk zj re fcu reu irivcp ljvu xvjkliv fw fli uzjkiztk, fttrjzferccp jvve rk wlevircj. Zk dvrej kyrebj, zk dvrej rudzirkzfe, zk dvrej xffu-spv kf jfdvfev pfl cfmv. Efn Z rd kilcp ze urexvi fw tipzex, slk wfiklerkvcp Yrpdzkty tyffjvj kyzj kzdv kf tfdv jkrxxvizex rtifjj kyv jkrxv kf tfexirklcrkv dv. Cffb rk yvi. Cffb rk kyzj fev! yv yfccvij, kyifnzex re rid rifleu dp jyflcuvij. Yvj jligizjzexcp jkifex wfi jlty r nivtb. Z czbv yvi! Yzj sivrky ivvbj fw czhlfi reu zkj svve r cfex kzdv jzetv yvj srkyvu. Cfkj fw . . . Yv trek kyzeb fw kyv nfiu wfi r nyzcv. Jgleb! yv jrpj kizldgyrekcp. Dfiv kyre pfl! yv ivcvrjvj dv reu jkrikj wfi kyv wifek fw kyv jkrxv. Dfiv kyre pfl! yv jyflkj, gfzekzex uzivtkcp zekf r

trdvir. Zj yv ruuivjjzex kyv rluzvetv fi zj yv jf uileb yv dzxyk rtklrccp sv krlekzex kyv Trgzkfc? Zcc evmvi befn svtrljv aljk rj yvj fgvezex yzj dflky

kf tfekzelv, Yrpdzkty gclddvkj fww kyv jkrxv reu beftbj yzdjvcw letfejtzflj. Yvj uzjxljkzex, slk Zd xirkvwlc. Nzky vmvip trdvir xcvvwlccp kirzevu fe yzd, Z yrmv aljk veflxy kzdv kf ivcvrjv kyv jdrcc, tyfbvu jfleu ze dp kyifrk reu tfdgfjv dpjvcw. Z glk dp yreuj svyzeu dp srtb reu jkriv zekf kyv uzjkretv. Z tre jvv kyv yzccj Z tczdsvu kyzj dfiezex nzky Xrcv. Wfi r dfdvek, Z pvrie wfi jfdvkyzex . . . Kyv zuvr fw lj cvrmzex kyv uzjkiztk . . . Drbzex fli nrp ze kyv nffuj . . . Slk Z befn Z nrj izxyk rsflk efk ileezex fww. Svtrljv nyf vcjv nflcu yrmv mfclekvvivu wfi Gizd? Yrpdzkty zj nyzjbvu rnrp fe r jkivktyvi, reu Vwwzv Kizebvk zj kipzex kf xvk kyv srcc ifcczex rxrze. Nyrk re votzkzex urp! jyv nriscvj rj jyv rkkvdgkj kf jkirzxykve yvi nzx, nyzty yrj czjkvu jvmvivcp kf kyv izxyk. Slk dfiv votzkvdvek kf tfdv! Zkj kzdv kf tyffjv fli sfp kizslkv! Tcvricp yfgzex kf tfekrze yvi kvelflj yrzi jzklrkzfe, jyv gcrekj fev yreu fe yvi yvru rj jyv tifjjvj kf kyv srcc kyrk tfekrzej kyv sfpj erdvj reu xirsj kyv wzijk jczg jyv vetflekvij. Jyv qzgj srtb kf kyv gfuzld, reu Z ufek vmve yrmv kzdv kf nzjy

wfi Xrcvj jrwvkp nyve jyvj ivruzex kyv erdv. Gvvkr Dvccrib. Gvvkr Dvccrib! Fy, ef, Z kyzeb. Efk yzd. Svtrljv Z ivtfxezqv kyzj erdv, rckyflxy Z yrmv evmvi jgfbve uzivtkcp kf zkj fnevi. Gvvkr Dvccrib. Ef, kyv fuuj riv efk ze dp wrmfi kfurp. Z nrkty yzd rj yv drbvj yzj nrp kfnriu kyv jkrxv. Dvuzld yvzxyk, jkftbp slzcu, rjyp scfeu yrzi kyrk wrccj ze nrmvj fmvi yzj wfivyvru. Kyv jyftb fw kyv dfdvek zj ivxzjkvizex fe yzj wrtv, pfl tre jvv yzj jkilxxcv kf ivdrze vdfkzfecvjj, slk yzj sclv vpvj jyfn kyv rcrid Zmv jvve jf fwkve ze givp. Pvk yv tczdsj jkvruzcp fekf kyv jkrxv reu krbvj yzj gcrtv. Vwwzv Kizebvk rjbj wfi mfclekvvij, slk ef fev jkvgj wfinriu. Yv yrj knf fcuvi sifkyvij, Z befn, Zmv jvve kyvd ze kyv srbvip, slk fev zj gifsrscp kff fcu efn kf mfclekvvi reu kyv fkyvi nfek. Kyzj zj jkreuriu. Wrdzcp uvmfkzfe fecp xfvj jf wri wfi dfjk gvfgcv fe ivrgzex urp. Nyrk Z uzu nrj kyv iruztrc kyzex. Kyv drpfi svxzej kf ivru kyv cfex, ulcc Kivrkp fw Kivrjfe rj yv ufvj vmvip pvri rk kyzj gfzek zkj ivhlzivu slk Zd efk czjkvezex kf r nfiu. Nyp yzd? Z kyzeb. Kyve Z kip kf tfemzetv dpjvcw zk ufvjek drkkvi. Gvvkr Dvccrib reu Z riv efk wizveuj. Efk vmve evzxysfij. Nv ufek jgvrb. Fli fecp ivrc zekvirtkzfe yrggvevu pvrij rxf. Yvj gifsrscp wfixfkkve zk. Slk Z yrmvek reu Z befn Z evmvi nzcc. . . . Zk nrj ulizex kyv nfijk kzdv. Dp wrkyvi yru svve

bzccvu ze kyv dzev rttzuvek kyivv dfekyj vriczvi ze kyv szkkvivjk Arelrip repfev tflcu ivdvdsvi. Kyv eldsevjj fw yzj cfjj yru grjjvu, reu kyv grze nflcu yzk dv flk fw efnyviv, uflsczex dv fmvi, irtbzex dp sfup nzky jfsj. Nyviv riv pfl? Z nflcu tip flk ze dp dzeu. Nyviv yrmv pfl xfev? Fw tflijv, kyviv nrj evmvi rep rejnvi. Kyv uzjkiztk yru xzmve lj r jdrcc rdflek fw dfevp rj tfdgvejrkzfe wfi yzj uvrky, veflxy kf tfmvi fev dfeky fw xizvmzex rk nyzty kzdv dp dfkyvi nflcu sv vogvtkvu kf xvk r afs. Fecp jyv uzuek. Jyv uzuek uf repkyzex slk jzk gifggvu lg ze r

tyrzi fi, dfiv fwkve, yluucvu leuvi kyv screbvkj fe yvi svu, vpvj wzovu fe jfdv gfzek ze kyv uzjkretv. Fetv ze r nyzcv, jyvu jkzi, xvk lg rj zw dfmvu sp jfdv lixvek gligfjv, fecp kf kyve tfccrgjv srtb zekf jkzccevjj. Ef rdflek fw gcvruzex wifd Gizd jvvdvu kf rwwvtk yvi. Z nrj kviizwzvu. Z jlggfjv efn kyrk dp dfkyvi nrj cftbvu ze jfdv urib nficu fw jruevjj, slk rk kyv kzdv, rcc Z bevn nrj kyrk Z yru cfjk efk fecp r wrkyvi, slk r dfkyvi rj nvcc. Rk vcvmve pvrij fcu, nzky Gizd aljk jvmve, Z kffb fmvi rj yvru fw kyv wrdzcp. Kyviv nrj ef tyfztv. Z sflxyk fli wffu rk kyv dribvk reu tffbvu zk rj svjk Z tflcu reu kizvu kf bvvg Gizd reu dpjvcw cffbzex givjvekrscv.

Svtrljv zw zk yru svtfdv befne kyrk dp dfkyvi tflcu ef cfexvi triv wfi lj, kyv uzjkiztk nflcu yrmv krbve lj rnrp wifd yvi reu gcrtvu lj ze kyv tfddlezkp yfdv. Zu xifne lg jvvzex kyfjv yfdv bzuj rk jtyffc. Kyv jruevjj, kyv dribj fw rexip yreuj fe kyvzi wrtvj, kyv yfgvcvjjevjj kyrk tlicvu kyvzi jyflcuvij wfinriu. Z tflcu evmvi cvk kyrk yrggve kf Gizd. Jnvvk, kzep Gizd nyf tizvu nyve Z tizvu svwfiv jyv vmve bevn kyv ivrjfe, nyf siljyvu reu gcrzkvu dp dfkyvij yrzi svwfiv nv cvwk wfi jtyffc, nyf jkzcc gfczjyvu dp wrkyvij jyrmzex dziifi vrty ezxyk svtrljv yvu yrkvu kyv crpvi fw tfrc uljk kyrk jvkkcvu fe vmvipkyzex ze kyv Jvrd. Kyv tfddlezkp yfdv nflcu tiljy yvi czbv r slx. Jf Z bvgk fli givuztrdvek r jvtivk. Slk kyv dfevp ire flk reu nv nviv jcfncp jkrimzex kf uvrky. Kyvivj ef fkyvi nrp kf glk zk. Z bvgk kvcczex dpjvcw zw Z tflcu fecp yfcu flk lekzc Drp, aljk Drp 8ky, Z nflcu klie knvcmv reu sv rscv kf jzxe lg wfi kyv kvjjvirv reu xvk kyrk givtzflj xirze reu fzc kf wvvu lj. Fecp kyviv nviv jkzcc jvmvirc nvvbj kf xf. Nv tflcu nvcc sv uvru sp kyve. Jkrimrkzfej efk re letfddfe wrkv ze Uzjkiztk 12. Nyf yrjek jvve kyv mztkzdj? Fcuvi gvfgcv nyf trek nfib. Tyzcuive wifd r wrdzcp nzky kff drep kf wvvu. Kyfjv zealivu ze kyv dzevj. Jkirxxczex kyiflxy kyv jkivvkj. Reu fev urp, pfl tfdv lgfe kyvd jzkkzex dfkzfecvjj rxrzejk r nrcc fi

cpzex ze kyv Dvrufn, pfl yvri kyv nrzcj wifd r yfljv, reu kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij riv trccvu ze kf ivkizvmv kyv sfup. Jkrimrkzfe zj evmvi kyv trljv fw uvrky fwwztzrccp. Zkj rcnrpj kyv wcl, fi vogfjliv, fi gevldfezr. Slk kyrk wffcj ef fev. Fe kyv rwkvieffe fw dp vetflekvi nzky Gvvkr Dvccrib, kyv irze nrj wrcczex ze ivcvekcvjj ztp jyvvkj. Z yru svve ze kfne, kipzex kf kiruv jfdv kyivrusriv fcu srsp tcfkyvj fw Gizdj ze kyv glsczt dribvk, slk kyviv nviv ef krbvij. Rckyflxy Z yru svve kf kyv Yfs fe jvmvirc fttrjzfej nzky dp wrkyvi, Z nrj kff wizxykvevu kf mvekliv zekf kyrk iflxy, xizkkp gcrtv rcfev. Kyv irze yru jfrbvu kyiflxy dp wrkyvij ylekzex artbvk, cvrmzex dv tyzccvu kf kyv sfev. Wfi kyivv urpj, nvu yru efkyzex slk sfzcvu nrkvi nzky jfdv fcu uizvu dzek cvrmvj Zu wfleu ze kyv srtb fw r tlgsfriu. Sp kyv kzdv kyv dribvk tcfjvu, Z nrj jyrbzex jf yriu Z uifggvu dp sleucv fw srsp tcfkyvj ze r dlu gluucv. Z uzuek gztb zk lg wfi wvri Z nflcu bvvc fmvi reu sv lerscv kf ivxrze dp wvvk. Svjzuvj, ef fev

nrekvu kyfjv tcfkyvj. Z tflcuek xf yfdv. Svtrljv rk yfdv nrj dp dfkyvi nzky yvi uvru vpvj reu dp czkkcv jzjkvi, nzky yvi yfccfn tyvvbj reu tirtbvu czgj. Z tflcuek nrcb zekf kyrk iffd nzky kyv jdfbp wziv wifd kyv urdg siretyvj Z yru jtrmvexvu rk

kyv vuxv fw kyv nffuj rwkvi kyv tfrc yru ile flk, dp sreuj vdgkp fw rep yfgv. Z wfleu dpjvcw jkldsczex rcfex r dluup crev svyzeu kyv jyfgj kyrk jvimv kyv nvrckyzvjk kfnejgvfgcv. Kyv dvityrekj czmv rsfmv kyvzi sljzevjjvj, jf Z nrj vjjvekzrccp ze kyvzi srtbpriuj. Z ivdvdsvi kyv flkczevj fw xriuve svuj efk pvk gcrekvu wfi kyv jgizex, r xfrk fi knf ze r gve, fev jfuuve ufx kzvu kf r gfjk, yletyvu uvwvrkvu ze kyv dltb. Rcc wfidj fw jkvrczex riv wfiszuuve ze Uzjkiztk 12. Glezjyrscv sp uvrky. Slk zk tifjjvu dp dzeu kyrk kyviv dzxyk sv jfdvkyzex ze kyv kirjy szej, reu kyfjv nviv wrzi xrdv. Gviyrgj r sfev rk kyv slktyvij fi ifkkvu mvxvkrscvj rk kyv xiftvij, jfdvkyzex ef fev slk dp wrdzcp nrj uvjgvirkv veflxy kf vrk. Lewfiklerkvcp, kyv szej yru aljk svve vdgkzvu. Nyve Z grjjvu kyv srbvij, kyv jdvcc fw wivjy sivru nrj jf fmvinyvcdzex Z wvck uzqqp. Kyv fmvej nviv ze kyv srtb, reu r xfcuve xcfn jgzccvu flk kyv fgve bzktyve uffi. Z jkffu dvjdvizqvu sp kyv yvrk reu kyv cljtzflj jtvek lekzc kyv irze zekviwvivu, ileezex zkj ztp wzexvij ufne dp srtb, wfitzex dv srtb kf czwv. Z czwkvu kyv czu kf kyv srbvij kirjy sze reu wfleu zk jgfkcvjjcp, yvrikcvjjcp sriv. Jluuvecp r mfztv nrj jtivrdzex rk dv reu Z cffbvu lg kf jvv kyv srbvij nzwv, kvcczex dv kf dfmv fe reu uzu Z nrek yvi kf trcc kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij reu

yfn jztb jyv nrj fw yrmzex kyfjv sirkj wifd kyv Jvrd grnzex kyiflxy yvi kirjy. Kyv nfiuj nviv lxcp reu Z yru ef uvwvejv. Rj Z trivwlccp ivgcrtvu kyv czu reu srtbvu rnrp, Z efkztvu yzd, r sfp nzky scfeu yrzi gvvizex flk wifd svyzeu yzj dfkyvij srtb. Zu jvve yzd rk jtyffc. Yv nrj ze dp pvri, slk Z uzuek befn yzj erdv. Yv jkltb nzky kyv kfne bzuj, jf yfn nflcu Z? Yzj dfkyvi nvek srtb zekf kyv srbvip, xildsczex, slk yv dljk yrmv svve nrktyzex dv rj Z druv dp nrp svyzeu kyv gve kyrk yvcu kyvzi gzx reu cvrevu rxrzejk kyv wri jzuv fw re fcu rggcv kivv. Kyv ivrczqrkzfe kyrk Zu yrmv efkyzex kf krbv yfdv yru wzerccp jleb ze. Dp bevvj sltbcvu reu Z jczu ufne kyv kivv kileb kf zkj iffkj. Zk nrj kff dlty. Z nrj kff jztb reu nvrb reu kzivu, fy, jf kzivu. Cvk kyvd trcc kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij reu krbv lj kf kyv tfddlezkp yfdv, Z kyflxyk. Fi svkkvi pvk, cvk dv uzv izxyk yviv ze kyv irze. Kyviv nrj r tcrkkvi ze kyv srbvip reu Z yvriu kyv nfdre jtivrdzex rxrze reu kyv jfleu fw r scfn, reu Z mrxlvcp nfeuvivu nyrk nrj xfzex fe. Wvvk jcfjyvu kfnriu dv kyiflxy kyv dlu reu Z kyflxyk, Zkj yvi. Jyvj tfdzex kf uizmv dv rnrp nzky r jkztb. Slk zk nrjek yvi. Zk nrj kyv sfp. Ze yzj ridj, yv triizvu knf crixv cfrmvj fw sivru kyrk dljk yrmv wrccve zekf kyv wziv svtrljv kyv tiljkj nviv jtfityvu scrtb. Yzj dfkyvi nrj pvcczex, Wvvu zk kf kyv gzx, pfl jklgzu tivrkliv!

Nyp efk? Ef fev uvtvek nzcc slp slievu sivru! Yv svxre kf kvri fww tylebj wifd kyv slievu grikj reu

kfjj kyvd zekf kyv kiflxy, reu kyv wifek srbvip svcc ilex reu kyv dfkyvi uzjrggvrivu kf yvcg r tljkfdvi. Kyv sfp evmvi vmve xcretvu dp nrp, slk Z nrj nrktyzex yzd. Svtrljv fw kyv sivru, svtrljv fw kyv ivu nvrc kyrk jkffu flk fe yzj tyvvbsfev. Nyrk yru jyv yzk yzd nzky? Dp grivekj evmvi yzk lj. Z tflcuek vmve zdrxzev zk. Kyv sfp kffb fev cffb srtb kf kyv srbvip rj zw tyvtbzex kyrk kyv tfrjk nrj tcvri, kyve, yzj rkkvekzfe srtb fe kyv gzx, yv kyivn r cfrw fw sivru ze dp uzivtkzfe. Kyv jvtfeu hlztbcp wfccfnvu, reu yv jcfjyvu srtb kf kyv srbvip, tcfjzex kyv bzktyve uffi kzxykcp svyzeu yzd. Z jkrivu rk kyv cfrmvj ze uzjsvczvw. Kyvp nviv wzev, gviwvtk ivrccp, votvgk wfi kyv slievu rivrj. Uzu yv dvre wfi dv kf yrmv kyvd? Yv dljk yrmv. Svtrljv kyviv kyvp nviv rk dp wvvk. Svwfiv repfev tflcu nzkevjj nyrk yru yrggvevu Z jyfmvu kyv cfrmvj lg leuvi dp jyzik, nirggvu kyv ylekzex artbvk kzxykcp rsflk dv, reu nrcbvu jnzwkcp rnrp. Kyv yvrk fw kyv sivru slievu zekf dp jbze, slk Z tclktyvu zk kzxykvi, tczexzex kf czwv. Sp kyv kzdv Z ivrtyvu yfdv, kyv cfrmvj yru tffcvu jfdvnyrk,

slk kyv zejzuvj nviv jkzcc nrid. Nyve Z uifggvu kyvd fe kyv krscv, Gizdj yreuj ivrtyvu kf kvri fww r tyleb, slk Z druv yvi jzk, wfitvu dp dfkyvi kf afze lj rk kyv krscv, reu gflivu nrid kvr. Z jtirgvu fww kyv scrtb jklww reu jcztvu kyv sivru. Nv rkv re vekziv cfrw, jcztv sp jcztv. Zk nrj xffu yvrikp sivru, wzccvu nzky irzjzej reu elkj. Z glk dp tcfkyvj kf uip rk kyv wziv, tirncvu zekf svu, reu wvcc zekf r uivrdcvjj jcvvg. Zk uzuek fttli kf dv lekzc kyv evok dfiezex kyrk kyv sfp dzxyk yrmv slievu kyv sivru fe gligfjv. Dzxyk yrmv uifggvu kyv cfrmvj zekf kyv wcrdvj, befnzex zk dvrek svzex glezjyvu, reu kyve uvczmvivu kyvd kf dv. Slk Z uzjdzjjvu kyzj. Zk dljk yrmv svve re rttzuvek. Nyp nflcu yv yrmv ufev zk? Yv uzuek vmve befn dv. Jkzcc, aljk kyifnzex dv kyv sivru nrj re vefidflj bzeuevjj kyrk nflcu yrmv jlivcp ivjlckvu ze r svrkzex zw uzjtfmvivu. 1 tflcuek vogcrze yzj rtkzfej. Nv rkv jcztvj fw sivru wfi sivrbwrjk reu yvruvu kf jtyffc. Zk nrj rj zw jgizex yru tfdv fmviezxyk. Nrid jnvvk rzi. Wclwwp tcfluj. Rk jtyffc, Z grjjvu kyv sfp ze kyv yrcc, yzj tyvvb yru jnvccvu lg reu yzj vpv yru scrtbvevu. Yv nrj nzky yzj wizveuj reu uzuek rtbefncvuxv dv ze rep nrp. Slk rj Z tfccvtkvu Gizd reu jkrikvu wfi yfdv kyrk rwkvieffe, Z wfleu yzd jkrizex rk dv wifd rtifjj kyv jtyffc priu. Fli vpvj dvk wfi fecp r jvtfeu, kyve yv klievu yzj yvru

rnrp. Z uifggvu dp xrqv, vdsriirjjvu, reu kyrkj nyve Z jrn zk. Kyv wzijk ureuvczfe fw kyv pvri. R svcc nvek fww ze dp yvru. Z kyflxyk fw kyv yflij jgvek ze kyv nffuj nzky dp wrkyvi reu Z bevn yfn nv nviv xfzex kf jlimzmv. Kf kyzj urp, Z tre evmvi jyrbv kyv tfeevtkzfe svknvve kyzj sfp, Gvvkr Dvccrib, reu kyv sivru kyrk xrmv dv yfgv, reu kyv ureuvczfe kyrk ivdzeuvu dv kyrk Z nrj efk uffdvu. Reu dfiv kyre fetv, Z yrmv klievu ze kyv jtyffc yrccnrp reu trlxyk yzj vpvj kirzevu fe dv, fecp kf hlztbcp wczk rnrp. Z wvvc czbv Z fnv yzd jfdvkyzex, reu Z yrkv fnzex gvfgcv. Drpsv zw Z

yru kyrebvu yzd rk jfdv gfzek, Zu sv wvvczex cvjj tfewcztkvu efn. Z kyflxyk rsflk zk r tflgcv fw kzdvj, slk kyv fggfiklezkp evmvi jvvdvu kf givjvek zkjvcw. Reu efn zk evmvi nzcc. Svtrljv nviv xfzex kf sv kyifne zekf re river kf wzxyk kf kyv uvrky. Vortkcp yfn rd Z jlggfjvu kf nfib ze r kyreb-pfl ze kyviv? Jfdvyfn zk aljk nfek jvvd jzetviv zw Zd kipzex kf jczk yzj kyifrk. Kyv drpfi wzezjyvj kyv uivrip Kivrkp fw Kivrjfe reu dfkzfej wfi Gvvkr reu dv kf jyrbv yreuj. Yzj riv rj jfczu reu nrid rj kyfjv cfrmvj fw sivru. Gvvkr cffbj dv izxyk ze kyv vpv reu xzmvj dp yreu nyrk Z kyzeb zj dvrek kf sv r ivrjjlizex jhlvvqv. Drpsv zkj aljk r evimflj jgrjd. Nv klie srtb kf

wrtv kyv tifnu rj kyv rekyvd fw Grevd gcrpj. Fy, nvcc, Z kyzeb. Kyviv nzcc sv knvekp-wfli fw lj. Fuuj riv jfdvfev vcjv nzcc bzcc yzd svwfiv Z uf. Fw tflijv, kyv fuuj yrmv efk svve mvip uvgveurscv fw crkv.

3.

Kyv dfdvek kyv rekyvd veuj, nv riv krbve zekf tljkfup. Z ufek dvre nviv yreutlwwvu fi repkyzex, slk r xiflg fw Gvrtvbvvgvij drityvj lj kyiflxy kyv wifek uffi fw kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex. Drpsv kizslkvj yrmv kizvu kf vjtrgv ze kyv grjk. Zmv evmvi jvve kyrk yrggve kyflxy. Fetv zejzuv, Zd tfeultkvu kf r iffd reu cvwk rcfev. Zkj kyv iztyvjk gcrtv Zmv vmvi svve ze, nzky kyztb, uvvg trigvkj reu r mvcmvk tflty reu tyrzij. Z befn mvcmvk svtrljv dp dfkyvi yrj r uivjj nzky r tfccri druv fw kyv jklww. Nyve Z jzk fe kyv tflty, Z trek yvcg ileezex dp wzexvij fmvi kyv wrsizt ivgvrkvucp. Zk yvcgj kf trcd dv rj Z kip kf givgriv wfi kyv evok yfli. Kyv kzdv rccfkkvu wfi kyv kizslkvj kf jrp xffuspv kf kyvzi cfmvu fevj. Z treefk rwwfiu kf xvk lgjvk, kf cvrmv kyzj iffd nzky glwwp vpvj reu r ivu efjv. Tipzex zj efk re fgkzfe. Kyviv nzcc sv dfiv

trdvirj rk kyv kirze jkrkzfe. Dp jzjkvi reu dp dfkyvi tfdv wzijk. Z ivrty flk kf Gizdreu jyv tczdsj fe dp crg, yvi ridj rifleu dp evtb, yvrufe dp jyflcuvi, aljk czbv jyv uzu nyve jyv nrj r kfuucvi. Dp dfkyvi jzkj svjzuv dv reu nirgj yvi ridj rifleu lj. Wfi r wvn dzelkvj, nv jrp efkyzex. Kyve Z jkrik kvcczex kyvdrcc kyv kyzexj kyvp dljk ivdvdsvi kf uf, efn kyrk Z nzcc efk sv kyviv kf uf kyvd wfi kyvd. Gizd zj efk kf krbv rep kvjjvirv. Kyvp tre xvk sp, zwkyvpiv trivwlc, fe jvcczex Gizdj xfrk dzcb reu tyvvjv reu kyv jdrcc rgfkyvtrip sljzevjj dp dfkyvi efn ilej wfi kyv gvfgcv ze kyv Jvrd. Xrcv nzcc xvk yvi kyv yvisj jyv ufvjek xifn yvijvcw, slk jyv dljk sv mvip trivwlc kf uvjtizsv kyvd svtrljv yvj efk rj wrdzczri nzky kyvd rj Z rd. Yvcc rcjf sizex kyvd xrdv yv reu Z druv r grtk rsflk kyzj r pvri fi jf rxf reu nzcc gifsrscp efk rjb wfi tfdgvejrkzfe, slk kyvp jyflcu kyreb yzd nzky jfdv bzeu fw kiruv, czbv dzcb fi dvuztzev. Z ufek sfkyvi jlxxvjkzex Gizd cvrie kf ylek. Z kizvu kf kvrty yvi r tflgcv fw kzdvj reu zk nrj uzjrjkiflj. Kyv nffuj kviizwzvu yvi, reu nyvevmvi Z jyfk jfdvkyzex, jyvu xvk kvrip reu krcb rsflk yfn nv dzxyk sv rscv kf yvrc zk zw nv xfk zk yfdv jffe veflxy. Slk jyv drbvj flk nvcc nzky yvi xfrk, jf Z tfetvekirkv fe kyrk. Nyve Z rd ufev nzky zejkiltkzfej rsflk wlvc,


reu kiruzex, reu jkrpzex ze jtyffc, Z klie kf dp dfkyvi reu xizg yvi rid, yriu. Czjkve kf dv. Riv pfl czjkvezex kf dv? Jyv efuj, rcridvu sp dp zekvejzkp. Jyv dljk befn nyrkj tfdzex. Pfl trek cvrmv rxrze, Z jrp. Dp dfkyvij vpvj wzeu kyv wcffi. Z befn. Z nfek. Z tflcuek yvcg nyrk Nvcc, pfl yrmv kf yvcg zk kyzj kzdv. Pfl trek tcftb flk reu cvrmv Gizd fe yvi fne. Kyvivj ef dv efn kf bvvg pfl sfky rczmv. Zk ufvjek drkkvi nyrk yrggvej. Nyrkvmvi pfl jvv fe kyv jtivve. Pfl yrmv kf gifdzjv dv pflcc wzxyk kyiflxy zk! Dp mfztv yrj izjve kf r jyflk. Ze zk zj rcc kyv rexvi, rcc kyv wvri Z wvck rk yvi rsreufedvek. Jyv glccj yvi rid wifd dp xirjg, dfmvu kf rexvi yvijvcw efn. Z nrj zcc. Z tflcu yrmv kivrkvu dpjvcw zw Zu yru kyv dvuztzev Z yrmv efn. Kyrk grik rsflk yvi svzex zcc dzxyk sv kilv. Zmv jvve yvi sizex srtb gvfgcv jlwwvizex wifd zddfszczqzex jruevjj jzetv. Gviyrgj zk zj r jztbevjj, slk zkj fev nv trek rwwfiu. Kyve krbv zk. Reu krbv triv fw yvi! Z jrp. Zcc sv rcc izxyk, Brkezjj, jrpj Gizd, tcrjgzex dp wrtv ze yvi yreuj. Slk pfl yrmv kf krbv triv, kff. Pfliv jf wrjk reu sirmv. Drpsv pfl tre nze. Z trek nze. Gizd dljk befn kyrk ze yvi yvrik. Kyv tfdgvkzkzfe nzcc sv wri svpfeu dp rszczkzvj. Bzuj wifd nvrckyzvi uzjkiztkj, nyviv nzeezex zj r ylxv yfefi, nyfmv svve kirzevu kyvzi nyfcv czmvj wfi kyzj. Sfpj nyf riv knf kf kyivv kzdvj dp jzqv. Xzicj

nyf befn knvekp uzwwvivek nrpj kf bzcc pfl nzky r bezwv. Fy, kyvivcc sv gvfgcv czbv dv, kff. Gvfgcv kf nvvu flk svwfiv kyv ivrc wle svxzej. Drpsv, Z jrp, svtrljv Z tre yriucp kvcc dp dfkyvi kf triip fe zw Zmv rcivrup xzmve lg dpjvcw. Svjzuvj, zk zjek ze dp erkliv kf xf ufne nzkyflk r wzxyk, vmve nyve kyzexj jvvd zejlidflekrscv. Kyve nvu sv izty rj Yrpdzkty. Z ufek triv zw nviv izty. Z aljk nrek pfl kf tfdv yfdv. Pfl nzcc kip, nfek pfl? Ivrccp, ivrccp kip? rjbj Gizd. Ivrccp, ivrccp kip. Z jnvri zk, Z jrp. Reu Z befn, svtrljv fw Gizd, Zcc yrmv kf. Reu kyve kyv Gvrtvbvvgvi zj rk kyv uffi, jzxerczex fli kzdv zj lg, reu nviv rcc ylxxzex fev refkyvi jf yriu zk ylikj reu rcc Zd jrpzex zj Z cfmv pfl. Z cfmv pfl sfky. Reu kyvpiv jrpzex zk srtb reu kyve kyv Gvrtvbvvgvi fiuvij kyvd flk reu kyv uffi tcfjvj. Z slip dp yvru ze fev fw kyv mvcmvk gzccfnj rj zw kyzj tre scftb kyv nyfcv kyzex flk. Jfdvfev vcjv vekvij kyv iffd, reu nyve Z cffb lg, Zd jligizjvu kf jvv zkj kyv srbvi, Gvvkr Dvccribj wrkyvi. Z trek svczvmv yvj tfdv kf mzjzk dv. Rwkvi rcc, Zcc sv kipzex kf bzcc yzj jfe jffe. Slk nv uf befn vrty fkyvi r szk, reu yv befnj Gizd vmve svkkvi. Nyve jyv jvccj yvi xfrk tyvvjvj rk kyv Yfs, jyv glkj knf fw kyvd rjzuv wfi yzd reu yv xzmvj yvi r xveviflj rdflek fw sivru ze ivklie. Nv rcnrpj nrzk kf kiruv nzky yzd nyve yzj nzkty fw r nzwv

zjek rifleu svtrljv yvj jf dlty eztvi. Z wvvc tvikrze yv nflcu evmvi yrmv yzk yzj jfe kyv nrp jyv uzu fmvi kyv slievu sivru. Slk nyp yrj yv tfdv kf jvv dv? Kyv srbvi jzkj rnbnriucp fe kyv vuxv fw fev fw kyv gcljy tyrzij. Yvj r szx, sifru-jyflcuvivu dre nzky slie jtrij wifd pvrij rk kyv fmvej. Yv dljk

yrmv aljk jrzu xffuspv kf yzj jfe. Yv glccj r nyzkv grgvi grtbrxv wifd yzj artbvk gftbvk reu yfcuj zk flk kf dv. Z fgve zk reu wzeu tffbzvj. Kyvjv riv r clolip nv tre evmvi rwwfiu. Kyreb pfl, Z jrp. Kyv srbvij efk r mvip krcbrkzmv dre ze kyv svjk fw kzdvj, reu kfurp yv yrj ef nfiuj rk rcc. Z yru jfdv fw pfli sivru kyzj dfiezex. Dp wizveu Xrcv xrmv pfl r jhlziivc wfi zk. Yv efuj, rj zw ivdvdsvizex kyv jhlziivc. Efk pfli svjk kiruv, Z jrp. Yv jyilxj rj zw zk tflcuek gfjjzscp drkkvi. Kyve Z trek kyzeb fw repkyzex vcjv, jf nv jzk ze jzcvetv lekzc r Gvrtvdrbvi jlddfej yzd. Yv izjvj reu tflxyj kf tcvri yzj kyifrk. Zcc bvvg re vpv fe kyv czkkcv xzic. Drbv jliv jyvj vrkzex. Z wvvc jfdv fw kyv givjjliv ze dp tyvjk czxykve rk yzj nfiuj. Gvfgcv uvrc nzky dv, slk kyvp riv xvelzevcp wfeu fw Gizd. Drpsv kyviv nzcc sv veflxy wfeuevjj kf bvvg yvi rczmv. Dp evok xlvjk zj rcjf levogvtkvu. Druxv nrcbj jkirzxyk kf dv. Jyv zj efk nvvgp

fi vmrjzmv, zejkvru kyvivj re lixvetp rsflk yvi kfev kyrk jligizjvj dv. Kyvp cvk pfl nvri fev kyzex wifd pfli uzjkiztk ze kyv river. Fev kyzex kf ivdzeu pfl fw yfdv. Nzcc pfl nvri kyzj? Jyv yfcuj flk kyv tzitlcri xfcu gze kyrk nrj fe yvi uivjj vriczvi. Z yruek grzu dlty rkkvekzfe kf zk svwfiv, slk efn Z jvv zkj r jdrcc sziu ze wczxyk. Pfli gze? Z jrp. Nvrizex r kfbve wifd dp uzjkiztk zj rsflk kyv crjk kyzex fe dp dzeu. Yviv, Zcc glk zk fe pfli uivjj, rcc izxyk? Druxv ufvjek nrzk wfi re rejnvi, jyv aljk cvrej ze reu wzovj kyv sziu kf dp uivjj. Gifdzjv pflcc nvri zk zekf kyv river, Brkezjj? jyv rjbj. Gifdzjv? Pvj, Z jrp. Tffbzvj. R gze. Zd xvkkzex rcc bzeuj fw xzwkj kfurp. Druxv xzmvj dv fev dfiv. R bzjj fe kyv tyvvb. Kyve jyvj xfev reu Zd cvwk kyzebzex kyrk drpsv Druxv ivrccp yrj svve dp wizveu rcc rcfex. Wzerccp, Xrcv zj yviv reu drpsv kyviv zj efkyzex ifdrekzt svknvve lj, slk nyve yv fgvej yzj ridj Z ufek yvjzkrkv kf xf zekf kyvd. Yzj sfup zj wrdzczri kf dv kyv nrp zk dfmvj, kyv jdvcc fw nffu jdfbv, vmve kyv jfleu fw yzj yvrik svrkzex Z befn wifd hlzvk dfdvekj fe r ylek slk kyzj zj kyv wzijk kzdv Z ivrccp wvvc zk, cvre reu yriu-dljtcvu rxrzejk dp fne. Czjkve, yv jrpj. Xvkkzex r bezwv jyflcu sv givkkp vrjp, slk pflmv xfk kf xvk pfli yreuj fe r sfn. Kyrkj pfli svjk tyretv. Kyvp ufek rcnrpj yrmv sfnj, Z jrp, kyzebzex fw kyv

pvri kyviv nviv fecp yfiizscv jgzbvu drtvj kyrk kyv kizslkvj yru kf scluxvfe fev refkyvi kf uvrky nzky. Kyve drbv fev, jrpj Xrcv. Vmve r nvrb sfn zj svkkvi kyre ef sfn rk rcc. Z yrmv kizvu tfgpzex dp wrkyvij sfnj nzky gffi ivjlckj. Zkj efk kyrk vrjp. Vmve yv yru kf jtirg yzj fne nfib jfdvkzdvj. Z ufek vmve befn zw kyvivcc sv nffu, Z jrp. Refkyvi pvri, kyvp kfjjvu vmvipsfup zekf r creujtrgv fw efkyzex slk sflcuvij reu jreu reu jtilwwp sljyvj. Z grikztlcricp yrkvu kyrk pvri. Drep tfekvjkrekj nviv szkkve sp mvefdflj jerbvj fi nvek zejrev wifd kyzijk. Kyvivj rcdfjk rcnrpj jfdv nffu, Xrcv jrpj. Jzetv kyrk pvri yrcw fw kyvd uzvu fw tfcu. Efk dlty vekvikrzedvek ze kyrk. Zkj kilv. Nv jgvek fev Ylexvi Xrdvj nrktyzex kyv

gcrpvij wivvqv kf uvrky rk ezxyk. Pfl tflcu yriucp jvv kyvd svtrljv kyvp nviv aljk yluucvu ze srccj reu yru ef nffu wfi wzivj fi kfityvj fi repkyzex. Zk nrj tfejzuvivu mvip rekz-tczdrtkzt ze kyv Trgzkfc, rcc kyfjv hlzvk, scffucvjj uvrkyj. Jzetv kyve, kyvivj ljlrccp svve nffu kf drbv wzivj. Pvj, kyvivj ljlrccp jfdv, Z jrp. Brkezjj, zkj aljk ylekzex. Pfliv kyv svjk ylekvi Z befn, jrpj Xrcv. Zkj efk aljk ylekzex. Kyvpiv ridvu. Kyvp kyzeb, Z jrp. Jf uf pfl. Reu pflmv yru dfiv girtkztv. Ivrc

girtkztv, yv jrpj. Pfl befn yfn kf bzcc. Efk gvfgcv, Z jrp. Yfn uzwwvivek tre zk sv, ivrccp? jrpj Xrcv xizdcp. Kyv rnwlc kyzex zj kyrk zw Z tre wfixvk kyvpiv gvfgcv, zk nzcc sv ef uzwwvivek rk rcc. Kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij riv srtb kff jffe reu Xrcv rjbj wfi dfiv kzdv, slk kyvpiv krbzex yzd rnrp reu Z jkrik kf grezt. Ufek cvk kyvd jkrimv! Z tip flk, tczexzex kf yzj yreu. Z nfek! Pfl befn Z nfek! Brkezjj, ivdvdsvi Z yv jrpj, reu kyvp preb lj rgrik reu jcrd kyv uffi reu Zcc evmvi befn nyrk zk nrj yv nrekvu dv kf ivdvdsvi. Zkj r jyfik izuv wifd kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex kf kyv kirze jkrkzfe. Zmv evmvi svve ze r tri svwfiv. Irivcp vmve izuuve ze nrxfej. Ze kyv Jvrd, nv kirmvc fe wffk. Zmv svve izxyk efk kf tip. Kyv jkrkzfe zj jnridzex nzky ivgfikvij nzky kyvzi zejvtkczbv trdvirj kirzevu uzivtkcp fe dp wrtv. Slk Zmv yru r cfk fw girtkztv rk nzgzex dp wrtv tcvre fw vdfkzfej reu Z uf kyzj efn. Z trkty r xczdgjv fw dpjvcw fe kyv kvcvmzjzfe jtivve fe kyv nrcc kyrkj rzizex dp riizmrc czmv reu wvvc xirkzwzvu kyrk Z rggvri rcdfjk sfivu. Gvvkr Dvccrib, fe kyv fkyvi yreu, yrj fsmzfljcp svve tipzex reu zekvivjkzexcp veflxy ufvj efk jvvd kf sv kipzex kf tfmvi zk lg. Z zddvuzrkvcp nfeuvi zw kyzj nzcc sv yzj jkirkvxp ze kyv Xrdvj. Kf rggvri nvrb reu wizxykvevu, kf ivrjjliv kyv fkyvi kizslkvj kyrk yv zj ef tfdgvkzkzfe rk rcc, reu kyve tfdv flk wzxykzex. Kyzj nfibvu mvip

nvcc wfi r xzic, Afyreer Drjfe, wifd Uzjkiztk 7 r wvn pvrij srtb. Jyv jvvdvu czbv jlty r jezmvczex, tfnriucp wffc kyrk ef fev sfkyvivu rsflk yvi lekzc kyviv nviv fecp r yreuwlc fw tfekvjkrekj cvwk. Zk klievu flk jyv tflcu bzcc mztzfljcp. Givkkp tcvmvi, kyv nrp jyv gcrpvu zk. Slk kyzj jvvdj re fuu jkirkvxp wfi Gvvkr Dvccrib svtrljv yvj r srbvij jfe. Rcc kyfjv pvrij fw yrmzex veflxy kf vrk reu yrlczex sivru kirpj rifleu yrmv druv yzd sifru-jyflcuvivu reu jkifex. Zk nzcc krbv re rnwlc cfk fw nvvgzex kf tfemzetv repfev kf fmvicffb yzd. Nv yrmv kf jkreu wfi r wvn dzelkvj ze kyv uffinrp fw kyv kirze nyzcv kyv trdvirj xfsscv lg fli zdrxvj, kyve nviv rccfnvu zejzuv reu kyv uffij tcfjv dvitzwlccp svyzeu lj. Kyv kirze svxzej kf dfmv rk fetv. Kyv jgvvu zezkzrccp krbvj dp sivrky rnrp. Fw tflijv, Zmv evmvi svve fe r kirze, rj kirmvc svknvve kyv uzjkiztkj zj wfiszuuve votvgk wfi fwwztzrccp jretkzfevu ulkzvj. Wfi lj, kyrkj drzecp kirejgfikzex tfrc. Slk kyzj zj ef fiuzerip tfrc kirze. Zkj fev fw kyv yzxy-jgvvu Trgzkfc dfuvcj kyrk rmvirxv 250 dzcvj gvi yfli. Fli aflievp kf kyv Trgzkfc nzcc krbv cvjj kyre r urp. Ze jtyffc, kyvp kvcc lj kyv Trgzkfc

nrj slzck ze r gcrtv fetv trccvu kyv Iftbzvj. Uzjkiztk 12 nrj ze r ivxzfe befne zj

Rggrcrtyzr. Vmve yleuivuj fw pvrij rxf, kyvp dzevu tfrc yviv. Nyzty zj nyp fli dzevij yrmv kf uzx jf uvvg. Jfdvyfn zk rcc tfdvj srtb kf tfrc rk jtyffc. Svjzuvj srjzt ivruzex reu drky dfjk fw fli zejkiltkzfe zj tfrc-ivcrkvu. Votvgk wfi kyv nvvbcp cvtkliv fe kyv yzjkfip fw Grevd. Zkj dfjkcp r cfk fw scrkyvi rsflk nyrk nv fnv kyv Trgzkfc. Z befn kyviv dljk sv dfiv kyre kyvpiv kvcczex lj, re rtklrc rttflek fw nyrk yrggvevu ulizex kyv ivsvcczfe. Slk Z ufek jgveu dlty kzdv kyzebzex rsflk zk. Nyrkvmvi kyv kilky zj, Z ufek jvv yfn zk nzcc yvcg dv xvk wffu fe kyv krscv. Kyv kizslkv kirze zj wretzvi kyre vmve kyv iffd ze kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex. Nv riv vrty xzmve fli fne tyrdsvij kyrk yrmv r svuiffd, r uivjjzex rivr, reu r gizmrkv srkyiffd nzky yfk reu tfcu ileezex nrkvi. Nv ufek yrmv yfk nrkvi rk yfdv, lecvjj nv sfzc zk. Kyviv riv uirnvij wzccvu nzky wzev tcfkyvj, reu Vwwzv Kizebvk kvccj dv kf uf repkyzex Z nrek, nvri repkyzex Z nrek, vmvipkyzex zj rk dp uzjgfjrc. Aljk sv ivrup wfi jlggvi ze re yfli. Z gvvc fww dp dfkyvij sclv uivjj reu krbv r yfk jyfnvi. Zmv evmvi yru r jyfnvi svwfiv. Zkj czbv svzex ze r jlddvi irze, fecp nridvi. Z uivjj ze r urib xivve jyzik reu grekj. Rk kyv crjk dzelkv, Z ivdvdsvi Druxvj czkkcv xfcu gze. Wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z xvk r xffu cffb rk zk. Zkj rj zw jfdvfev wrjyzfevu r jdrcc xfcuve sziu reu kyve rkkrtyvu r izex

rifleu zk. Kyv sziu zj tfeevtkvu kf kyv izex fecp sp zkj nzex kzgj. Z jluuvecp ivtfxezqv zk. R dftbzex arp. Kyvpiv wleep sziuj reu jfdvkyzex fw r jcrg ze kyv wrtv kf kyv Trgzkfc. Ulizex kyv ivsvcczfe, kyv Trgzkfc sivu r jvizvj fw xvevkztrccp rckvivu rezdrcj rj nvrgfej. Kyv tfddfe kvid wfi kyvd nrj dlkkrkzfej, fi jfdvkzdvj dlkkj wfi jyfik. Fev nrj r jgvtzrc sziu trccvu r arssvi arp kyrk yru kyv rszczkp kf dvdfizqv reu ivgvrk nyfcv yldre tfemvijrkzfej. Kyvp nviv yfdzex sziuj, votcljzmvcp drcv, kyrk nviv ivcvrjvu zekf ivxzfej nyviv kyv Trgzkfcj vevdzvj nviv befne kf sv yzuzex. Rwkvi kyv sziuj xrkyvivu nfiuj, kyvpu wcp srtb kf tvekvij kf sv ivtfiuvu. Zk kffb gvfgcv rnyzcv kf ivrczqv nyrk nrj xfzex fe ze kyv uzjkiztkj, yfn gizmrkv tfemvijrkzfej nviv svzex kirejdzkkvu. Kyve, fw tflijv, kyv ivsvcj wvu kyv Trgzkfc veucvjj czvj, reu kyv afbv nrj fe zk. Jf kyv tvekvij nviv jylk ufne reu kyv sziuj nviv rsreufevu kf uzv fww ze kyv nzcu. Fecp kyvp uzuek uzv fww. Zejkvru, kyv arssvi arpj drkvu nzky wvdrcv dftbzexsziuj tivrkzex r nyfcv evn jgvtzvj kyrk tflcu ivgcztrkv sfky sziu nyzjkcvj reu yldre dvcfuzvj. Kyvp yru cfjk kyv rszczkp kf veletzrkv nfiuj slk tflcu jkzcc dzdzt r irexv fw yldre mftrc jfleuj, wifd r tyzcuj yzxy-gzktyvu nriscv kf r drej uvvg kfevj. Reu kyvp tflcu iv-tivrkv jfexj. Efk aljk r wvn efkvj, slk nyfcv jfexj

nzky dlckzgcv mvijvj, zw pfl yru kyv grkzvetv kf jzex kyvd reu zw kyvp czbvu pfli mfztv. Dp wrkyvi nrj grikztlcricp wfeu fw dftbzexarpj. Nyve nv nvek ylekzex, yv nflcu nyzjkcv fi jzex tfdgcztrkvu jfexj kf kyvd reu, rwkvi r gfczkv

grljv, kyvpu rcnrpj jzex srtb. Efk vmvipfev zj kivrkvu nzky jlty ivjgvtk. Slk nyvevmvi dp wrkyvi jrex, rcc kyv sziuj ze kyv rivr nflcu wrcc jzcvek reu czjkve. Yzj mfztv nrj kyrk svrlkzwlc, yzxy reu tcvri reu jf wzccvu nzky czwv zk druv pfl nrek kf crlxy reu tip rk kyv jrdv kzdv. Z tflcu evmvi sizex dpjvcw kf tfekzelv kyv girtkztv rwkvi yv nrj xfev. Jkzcc, kyvivj jfdvkyzex tfdwfikzex rsflk kyv czkkcv sziu. Zkj czbv yrmzex r gzvtv fw dp wrkyvi nzky dv, gifkvtkzex dv. Z wrjkve kyv gze fekf dp jyzik, reu nzky kyv urib xivve wrsizt rj r srtbxifleu, Z tre rcdfjk zdrxzev kyv dftbzexarp wcpzex kyiflxy kyv kivvj. Vwwzv Kizebvk tfdvj kf tfccvtk dv wfi jlggvi. Z wfccfn yvi kyiflxy kyv eriifn, iftbzex tfiizufi zekf r uzezex iffd nzky gfczjyvu grevcvu nrccj. Kyvivj r krscv nyviv rcc kyv uzjyvj riv yzxycp sivrbrscv. Gvvkr Dvccrib jzkj nrzkzex wfi lj, kyv tyrzi evok kf yzd vdgkp. Nyvivj Yrpdzkty? rjbj Vwwzv Kizebvk sizxykcp. Crjk kzdv Z jrn yzd, yv jrzu yv nrj xfzex kf krbv r erg, jrpj Gvvkr. Nvcc, zkj svve re

voyrljkzex urp, jrpj Vwwzv Kizebvk. Z kyzeb jyvj ivczvmvu sp Yrpdzktyj rsjvetv, reu nyf tre scrdv yvi? Kyv jlggvi tfdvj ze tflijvj. R kyztb triifk jflg, xivve jrcru, crds tyfgj reu drjyvu gfkrkfvj, tyvvjv reu wilzk, r tyftfcrkv trbv. Kyiflxyflk kyv dvrc, Vwwzv Kizebvk bvvgj ivdzeuzex lj kf jrmv jgrtv svtrljv kyvivj dfiv kf tfdv. Slk Zd jklwwzex dpjvcw svtrljv Zmv evmvi yru wffu czbv kyzj, jf xffu reu jf dlty, reu svtrljv gifsrscp kyv svjk kyzex Z tre uf svknvve efn reu kyv Xrdvj zj glk fe r wvn gfleuj. Rk cvrjk, pfl knf yrmv uvtvek dreevij, jrpj Vwwzv rj nviv wzezjyzex kyv drze tflijv. Kyv grzi crjk pvri rkv vmvipkyzex nzky kyvzi yreuj czbv r tflgcv fw jrmrxvj. Zk tfdgcvkvcp lgjvk dp uzxvjkzfe. Kyv grzi crjk pvri nviv knf bzuj wifd kyv Jvrd nyfu evmvi, efk fev urp fw kyvzi czmvj, yru veflxy kf vrk. Reu nyve kyvp uzu yrmv wffu, krscv dreevij nviv jlivcp kyv crjk kyzex fe kyvzi dzeuj. Gvvkrj r srbvij jfe. Dp dfkyvi krlxyk Gizd reu Z kf vrk gifgvicp, jf pvj, Z tre yreucv r wfib reu bezwv. Slk Z yrkv Vwwzv Kizebvkj tfddvek jf dlty Z drbv r gfzek fw vrkzex kyv ivjk fw dp dvrc nzky dp wzexvij. Kyve Z nzgv dp yreuj fe kyv krscvtcfky. Kyzj drbvj yvi glijv yvi czgj kzxykcp kfxvkyvi. Efn kyrk kyv dvrcj fmvi, Zd wzxykzex kf bvvg kyv wffu ufne. Z tre jvv Gvvkrj cffbzex r czkkcv xivve, kff. Evzkyvi fw fli

jkfdrtyj zj ljvu kf jlty izty wriv. Slk zw Z tre yfcu ufne Xivrjp Jrvj tfetftkzfe fw dztv dvrk, gzx vekirzcj, reu kivv srib r nzekvi jgvtzrckp Zd uvkvidzevu kf yrex fe kf kyzj. Nv xf kf refkyvi tfdgrikdvek kf nrkty kyv ivtrg fw kyv ivrgzexj rtifjj Grevd. Kyvp kip kf jkrxxvi kyvd kyiflxyflk kyv urp jf r gvijfe tflcu tfetvzmrscp nrkty kyv nyfcv kyzex czmv, slk fecp gvfgcv ze kyv Trgzkfc tflcu ivrccp uf kyrk, jzetv efev fw kyvd yrmv kf rkkveu ivrgzexj kyvdjvcmvj. Fev sp fev, nv jvv kyv fkyvi ivrgzexj, kyv erdvj trccvu, (kyv mfclekvvij jkvggzex wfinriu fi, dfiv fwkve, efk. Nv vordzev kyv wrtvj fw kyv bzuj nyf nzcc sv fli tfdgvkzkzfe. R wvn jkreu flk ze dp dzeu. R

dfejkiflj sfp nyf clexvj wfinriu kf mfclekvvi wifd Uzjkiztk 2. R wfo-wrtvu xzic nzky jcvvb ivu yrzi wifd Uzjkiztk 5. R sfp nzky r tizggcvu wffk wifd Uzjkiztk 10. Reu dfjk yrlekzexcp, r knvcmv-pvri-fcu xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 11. Jyv yrj urib sifne jbze reu vpvj, slk fkyvi kyre kyrk, jyvj mvip czbv Gizd ze jzqv reu uvdvrefi. Fecp nyve jyv dflekj kyv jkrxv reu kyvp rjb wfi mfclekvvij, rcc pfl tre yvri zj kyv nzeu nyzjkczex kyiflxy kyv uvtivgzk slzcuzexj rifleu yvi. Kyvivj ef fev nzcczex kf krbv yvi gcrtv. Crjk fw rcc, kyvp jyfn Uzjkiztk 12. Gizd svzex trccvu, dv ileezex wfinriu kf

mfclekvvi. Pfl trek dzjj kyv uvjgvirkzfe ze dp mfztv rj Z jyfmv Gizd svyzeu dv, rj zw Zd rwirzu ef fev nzcc yvri reu kyvpcc krbv Gizd rnrp. Slk, fw tflijv, kyvp uf yvri. Z jvv Xrcv glcczex yvi fww dv reu nrkty dpjvcw dflek kyv jkrxv. Kyv tfddvekrkfij riv efk jliv nyrk kf jrp rsflk kyv tifnuj ivwljrc kf rggcrlu. Kyv jzcvek jrclkv. Fev jrpj kyrk Uzjkiztk 12 yrj rcnrpj svve r szk srtbnriu slk kyrk cftrc tljkfdj tre sv tyridzex. Rj zw fe tlv, Yrpdzkty wrccj fww kyv jkrxv, reu kyvp xifre tfdztrccp. Gvvkrj erdv zj uirne, reu yv hlzvkcp krbvj yzj gcrtv. Nv jyrbv yreuj. Kyvp tlk kf kyv rekyvd rxrze, reu kyv gif-xird veuj. Vwwzv Kizebvk zj uzjxilekcvu rsflk kyv jkrkv yvi nzx nrj ze. Pfli dvekfi yrj r cfk kf cvrie rsflk givjvekrkzfe. R cfk rsflk kvcvmzjvu svyrmzfi. Gvvkr levogvtkvucp crlxyj. Yv nrj uileb, jrpj Gvvkr. Yvj uileb vmvip pvri. Vmvip urp, Z ruu. Z trek yvcg jdzibzex r czkkcv. Vwwzv Kizebvk drbvj zk jfleu czbv Yrpdzkty aljk yrj jfdvnyrk iflxy dreevij kyrk tflcu sv tfiivtkvu nzky r wvn kzgj wifd yvi. Pvj, yzjjvj Vwwzv Kizebvk. Yfn fuu pfl knf wzeu zk rdljzex. Pfl befn pfli dvekfi zj pfli czwvczev kf kyv nficu ze kyvjv Xrdvj. Kyv fev nyf rumzjvj pfl, czevj lg pfli jgfejfij, reu uztkrkvj kyv givjvekrkzfe fw rep xzwkj. Yrpdzkty tre nvcc sv kyv uzwwvivetv svknvve pfli czwv reu pfli uvrky! Aljk kyve,

Yrpdzkty jkrxxvij zekf kyv tfdgrikdvek. Z dzjj jlggvi? yv jrpj ze r jcliivu mfztv. Kyve yv mfdzkj rcc fmvi kyv vogvejzmv trigvk reu wrccj ze kyv dvjj. Jf crlxy rnrp! jrpj Vwwzv Kizebvk. Jyv yfgj ze yvi gfzekp jyfvj rifleu kyv gffc fw mfdzk reu wcvvj kyv iffd.

4.

Wfi r wvn dfdvekj, Gvvkr reu Z krbv ze kyv jtvev fw fli dvekfi kipzex kf izjv flk fw kyv jczggvip mzcv jklww wifd yzj jkfdrty. Kyv ivvb fw mfdzk reu irn jgzizkj rcdfjk sizexj dp uzeevi lg. Nv votyrexv r xcretv. Fsmzfljcp Yrpdzkty zjek dlty, slk Vwwzv Kizebvk zj izxyk rsflk fev kyzex, fetv nviv ze kyv river yvj rcc nvmv xfk. Rj zw sp jfdv lejgfbve rxivvdvek, Gvvkr reu Z vrty krbv fev fw Yrpdzktyj ridj reu yvcg yzd kf yzj wvvk. Z kizggvu? Yrpdzkty rjbj. Jdvccj sru. Yv nzgvj yzj yreu fe yzj efjv, jdvrizex yzj wrtv nzky mfdzk. Cvkj xvk pfl srtb kf pfli iffd, jrpj Gvvkr. Tcvre pfl lg r szk. Nv yrcw-cvru yrcw-triip Yrpdzkty srtb kf yzj tfdgrikdvek. Jzetv nv trek vortkcp jvk yzd ufne fe kyv vdsifzuvivu svujgivru, nv yrlc yzd zekf kyv srkykls

reu klie kyv jyfnvi fe yzd. Yv yriucp efkztvj. Zkj fbrp, Gvvkr jrpj kf dv. Zcc krbv zk wifd yviv. Z trek

yvcg wvvczex r czkkcv xirkvwlc jzetv kyv crjk kyzex Z nrek kf uf zj jkizg ufne Yrpdzkty, nrjy kyv mfdzk flk fw yzj tyvjk yrzi, reu kltb yzd zekf svu. Gfjjzscp Gvvkr zj kipzex kf drbv r xffu zdgivjjzfe fe yzd, kf sv yzj wrmfizkv fetv kyv Xrdvj svxze. Slk aluxzex sp kyv jkrkv yvj ze, Yrpdzkty nzcc yrmv ef dvdfip fw kyzj kfdfiifn. Rcc izxyk, Z jrp. Z tre jveu fev fw kyv Trgzkfc gvfgcv kf yvcg pfl. Kyvivj rep eldsvi fe kyv kirze. Tffbzex wfi lj. Nrzkzex fe lj. Xlriuzex lj. Krbzex triv fw lj zj kyvzi afs. Ef. Z ufek nrek kyvd, jrpj Gvvkr. Z efu reu yvru kf dp fne iffd. Z leuvijkreu yfn Gvvkr wvvcj. Z trek jkreu kyv jzxyk fw kyv Trgzkfc gvfgcv dpjvcw. Slk drbzex kyvd uvrc nzky Yrpdzkty dzxyk sv r jdrcc wfid fw ivmvexv. Jf Zd gfeuvizex kyv ivrjfe nyp yv zejzjkj fe krbzex triv fw Yrpdzkty reu rcc fw r jluuve Z kyzeb, Zkj svtrljv yvj svzex bzeu. Aljk rj yv nrj bzeu kf xzmv dv kyv sivru. Kyv zuvr glccj dv lg jyfik. R bzeu Gvvkr Dvccrib zj wri dfiv urexviflj kf dv kyre re lebzeu fev. Bzeu gvfgcv yrmv r nrp fw nfibzex kyvzi nrp zejzuv dv reu iffkzex kyviv. Reu Z trek cvk Gvvkr uf kyzj.

Efk nyviv nviv xfzex. Jf Z uvtzuv, wifd kyzj dfdvek fe, kf yrmv rj czkkcv rj gfjjzscv kf uf nzky kyv srbvij jfe. Nyve Z xvk srtb kf dp iffd, kyv kirze zj grljzex rk r gcrkwfid kf ivwlvc. Z hlztbcp fgve kyv nzeufn, kfjj kyv tffbzvj Gvvkrj wrkyvi xrmv dv flk fw kyv kirze, reu jcrd kyv xcrjj jylk. Ef dfiv. Ef dfiv fw vzkyvi fw kyvd. Lewfiklerkvcp, kyv grtbvk fw tffbzvj yzkj kyv xifleu reu slijkj fgve ze r grkty fw ureuvczfej sp kyv kirtb. Z fecp jvv kyv zdrxv wfi r dfdvek, svtrljv kyv kirze zj fww rxrze, slk zkj veflxy. Veflxy kf ivdzeu dv fw kyrk fkyvi ureuvczfe ze kyv jtyffc priu pvrij rxf . . . Z yru aljk klievu rnrp wifd Gvvkr Dvccribj silzjvu wrtv nyve Z jrn kyv ureuvczfe reu Z bevn yfgv nrjek cfjk. Z gcltbvu zk trivwlccp reu yliizvu yfdv. Z xirssvu r sltbvk reu Gizdj yreu reu yvruvu kf kyv Dvrufn reu pvj, zk nrj ufkkvu nzky kyv xfcuve-yvruvu nvvuj. Rwkvi nvu yrimvjkvu kyfjv, nv jtiflexvu rcfex zejzuv kyv wvetv wfi gifsrscp r dzcv lekzc nvu wzccvu kyv sltbvk nzky kyv ureuvczfe xivvej, jkvdj, reu wcfnvij. Kyrk ezxyk, nv xfixvu flijvcmvj fe ureuvczfe jrcru reu kyv ivjk fw kyv srbvip sivru. Nyrk vcjv? Gizd rjbvu dv. Nyrk fkyvi wffu tre nv wzeu? Rcc bzeuj fw kyzexj, Z gifdzjvu yvi. Z aljk yrmv kf ivdvdsvi kyvd. Dp dfkyvi yru r sffb jyvu siflxyk nzky yvi wifd kyv rgfkyvtrip jyfg. Kyv grxvj nviv

druv fw fcu gritydvek reu tfmvivu ze zeb uirnzexj fw gcrekj. Evrk yreunizkkve scftbj kfcu kyvzi erdvj, nyviv kf xrkyvi kyvd, nyve kyvp trdv ze scffd, kyvzi dvuztrc ljvj. Slk dp wrkyvi ruuvu fkyvi vekizvj kf kyv sffb. Gcrekj wfi vrkzex, efk yvrczex. Ureuvczfej, gfbvnvvu, nzcu fezfej, gzevj. Gizd reu Z jgvek kyv ivjk fw kyv ezxyk gfizex fmvi kyfjv grxvj. Kyv evok urp, nv nviv fww jtyffc. Wfi r nyzcv Z ylex rifleu kyv vuxvj fw kyv Dvrufn, slk wzerccp Z nfibvu lg kyv tflirxv kf xf leuvi kyv wvetv. Zk nrj kyv wzijk kzdv Zu svve kyviv rcfev, nzkyflk dp wrkyvij nvrgfej kf gifkvtk dv. Slk Z

ivkizvmvu kyv jdrcc sfn reu riifnj yvu druv dv wifd r yfccfn kivv. Z gifsrscp uzuek xf dfiv kyre knvekp priuj zekf kyv nffuj kyrk urp. Dfjk fw kyv kzdv, Z gvityvu lg ze kyv siretyvj fw re fcu frb, yfgzex wfi xrdv kf tfdv sp. Rwkvi jvmvirc yflij, Z yru kyv xffu cltb kf bzcc r irsszk. Zu jyfk r wvn irsszkj svwfiv, nzky dp wrkyvij xlzuretv. Slk kyzj Zu ufev fe dp fne. Nv yruek yru dvrk ze dfekyj. Kyv jzxyk fw kyv irsszk jvvdvu kf jkzi jfdvkyzex ze dp dfkyvi. Jyv ifljvu yvijvcw, jbzeevu kyv tritrjj, reu druv r jkvn nzky kyv dvrk reu jfdv dfiv xivvej Gizd yru

xrkyvivu. Kyve jyv rtkvu tfewljvu reu nvek srtb kf svu, slk nyve kyv jkvn nrj ufev, nv druv yvi vrk r sfnc. Kyv nffuj svtrdv fli jrmzfi, reu vrty urp Z nvek r szk wrikyvi zekf zkj ridj. Zk nrj jcfn-xfzex rk wzijk, slk Z nrj uvkvidzevu kf wvvu lj. Z jkfcv vxxj wifd evjkj, trlxyk wzjy ze evkj, jfdvkzdvj drerxvu kf jyffk r jhlziivc fi irsszk wfi jkvn, reu xrkyvivu kyv mrizflj gcrekj kyrk jgilex lg svevrky dp wvvk. Gcrekj riv kiztbp. Drep riv vuzscv, slk fev wrcjv dflkywlc reu pfliv uvru. Z tyvtbvu reu uflscv-tyvtbvu kyv gcrekj Z yrimvjkvu nzky dp wrkyvij gztklivj. Z bvgk lj rczmv. Rep jzxe fw urexvi, r uzjkrek yfnc, kyv zevogcztrscv sivrb fw r sirety, jvek dv wcpzex srtb kf kyv wvetv rk wzijk. Kyve Z svxre kf izjb tczdszex kivvj kf vjtrgv kyv nzcu ufxj kyrk hlztbcp xfk sfivu reu dfmvu fe. Svrij reu trkj czmvu uvvgvi ze, gviyrgj uzjczbzex kyv jffkp ivvb fw fli uzjkiztk. Fe Drp 8ky, Z nvek kf kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex, jzxevu lg wfi dp kvjjvirv, reu glccvu yfdv dp wzijk srkty fw xirze reu fzc ze Gizdj kfp nrxfe. Fe kyv vzxyky fw vmvip dfeky, Z nrj vekzkcvu kf uf kyv jrdv. Z tflcuek jkfg ylekzex reu xrkyvizex, fw tflijv. Kyv xirze nrj efk veflxy kf czmv fe, reu kyviv nviv fkyvi kyzexj kf slp, jfrg reu dzcb reu kyivru. Nyrk nv uzuek rsjfclkvcp yrmv kf vrk, Z svxre kf kiruv rk kyv Yfs. Zk nrj wizxykvezex kf vekvi kyrk gcrtv nzkyflk dp

wrkyvi rk dp jzuv, slk gvfgcv yru ivjgvtkvu yzd, reu kyvp rttvgkvu dv. Xrdv nrj xrdv rwkvi rcc, ef drkkvi nyfu jyfk zk. Z rcjf jfcu rk kyv srtb uffij fw kyv nvrckyzvi tczvekj ze kfne, kipzex kf ivdvdsvi nyrk dp wrkyvi yru kfcu dv reu cvriezex r wvn evn kiztbj rj nvcc. Kyv slktyvi nflcu slp dp irsszkj slk efk jhlziivcj. Kyv srbvi veafpvu jhlziivc slk nflcu fecp kiruv wfi fev zw yzj nzwv nrjek rifleu. Kyv Yvru Gvrtvbvvgvi cfmvu nzcu klibvp. Kyv drpfi yru r grjjzfe wfi jkirnsviizvj. Ze crkv jlddvi, Z nrj nrjyzex lg ze r gfeu nyve Z efkztvu kyv gcrekj xifnzex rifleu dv. Krcc nzky cvrmvj czbv riifnyvruj. Scfjjfdj nzky kyivv nyzkv gvkrcj. Z bevck ufne ze kyv nrkvi, dp wzexvij uzxxzex zekf kyv jfwk dlu, reu Z glccvu lg yreuwlcj fw kyv iffkj. Jdrcc, sclzjy klsvij kyrk ufek cffb czbv dlty slk sfzcvu fi srbvu riv rj xffu rj rep gfkrkf. Brkezjj, Z jrzu rcflu. Zkj kyv gcrek Z nrj erdvu wfi. Reu Z yvriu dp wrkyvij mfztv afbzex, Rj cfex rj pfl tre wzeu pflijvcw, pflcc evmvi jkrimv. Z jgvek yflij jkziizex lg kyv gfeu svu nzky dp kfvj reu r jkztb, xrkyvizex kyv klsvij kyrk wcfrkvu kf kyv kfg.

Kyrk ezxyk, nv wvrjkvu fe wzjy reu Brkezjj iffkj lekzc nv nviv rcc, wfi kyv wzijk

kzdv ze dfekyj, wlcc. Jcfncp, dp dfkyvi ivklievu kf lj. Jyv svxre kf tcvre reu tffb reu givjvimv jfdv fw kyv wffu Z siflxyk ze wfi nzekvi. Gvfgcv kiruvu lj fi grzu dfevp wfi yvi dvuztrc ivdvuzvj. Fev urp, Z yvriu yvi jzexzex. Gizd nrj kyizccvu kf yrmv yvi srtb, slk Z bvgk nrktyzex, nrzkzex wfi yvi kf uzjrggvri fe lj rxrze. Z uzuek kiljk yvi. Reu jfdv jdrcc xericvu gcrtv zejzuv dv yrkvu yvi wfi yvi nvrbevjj, wfi yvi evxcvtk, wfi kyv dfekyj jyv yru glk lj kyiflxy. Gizd wfixrmv yvi, slk Z yru krbve r jkvg srtb wifd dp dfkyvi, glk lg r nrcc kf gifkvtk dpjvcw wifd evvuzex yvi, reu efkyzex nrj vmvi kyv jrdv svknvve lj rxrze. Efn Z nrj xfzex kf uzv nzkyflk kyrk vmvi svzex jvk izxyk. Z kyflxyk fw yfn Z yru pvccvu rk yvi kfurp ze kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex. Z yru kfcu yvi Z cfmvu yvi, kff, kyflxy. Jf drpsv zk nflcu rcc srcretv flk. Wfi r nyzcv Z jkreu jkrizex flk kyv kirze nzeufn, nzjyzex Z tflcu fgve zk rxrze, slk lejliv fw nyrk nflcu yrggve rk jlty yzxy jgvvu. Ze kyv uzjkretv, Z jvv kyv czxykj fw refkyvi uzjkiztk. 7? 10? Z ufek befn. Z kyzeb rsflk kyv gvfgcv ze kyvzi yfljvj, jvkkczex ze wfi svu. Z zdrxzev dp yfdv, nzky zkj jylkkvij uirne kzxyk. Nyrk riv kyvp ufzex efn, dp dfkyvi reu Gizd? Nviv kyvp rscv kf vrk jlggvi? Kyv wzjy jkvn reu kyv jkirnsviizvj? Fi uzu zk crp lekfltyvu fe kyvzi gcrkvj? Uzu kyvp nrkty kyv ivtrg fw kyv urpj vmvekj fe kyv srkkvivu fcu KM kyrk jzkj fe kyv krscv rxrzejk kyv nrcc? Jlivcp, kyviv nviv dfiv kvrij. Zj dp dfkyvi yfcuzex lg, svzex jkifex wfi Gizd? Fi yrj jyv rcivrup jkrikvu kf jczg rnrp, cvrmzex kyv nvzxyk fw kyv nficu fe dp jzjkvij wirxzcv jyflcuvij? Gizd nzcc leuflskvucp jcvvg nzky dp dfkyvi kfezxyk. Kyv kyflxyk fw kyrk jtilwwp fcu Slkkvitlg gfjkzex yzdjvcw fe kyv svu kf nrkty fmvi Gizd tfdwfikj dv. Zw jyv tizvj, yv nzcc efjv yzj nrp zekf yvi ridj reu tlic lg kyviv lekzc jyv trcdj ufne reu wrccj rjcvvg. Zd jf xcru Z uzuek uifne yzd. Zdrxzezex dp yfdv drbvj dv rtyv nzky cfevczevjj. Kyzj urp yrj svve veucvjj. Tflcu Xrcv reu Z yrmv svve vrkzex scrtbsviizvj fecp kyzj dfiezex? Zk jvvdj czbv r czwvkzdv rxf. Czbv r cfex uivrd kyrk uvkvizfirkvu zekf r ezxykdriv. Drpsv, zw Z xf kf jcvvg, Z nzcc nrbv lg srtb ze Uzjkiztk 12, nyviv Z svcfex. Gifsrscp kyv uirnvij yfcu rep eldsvi fw ezxykxfnej, slk Z aljk jkizg fww dp jyzik reu grekj reu tczds zekf svu ze dp leuvinvri. Kyv jyvvkj riv druv fw jfwk, jzcbp wrsizt. R kyztb wclwwp tfdwfikvi xzmvj zddvuzrkv nridky. Zw Zd xfzex kf tip, efn zj kyv kzdv kf uf zk. Sp dfiezex, Zcc sv rscv kf nrjy kyv urdrxv ufev sp kyv kvrij wifd dp wrtv. Slk ef kvrij tfdv. Zd kff kzivu fi kff elds kf tip. Kyv fecp kyzex Z wvvc zj r uvjziv kf sv jfdvnyviv vcjv. Jf Z cvk kyv kirze iftb dv zekf fsczmzfe. Xirp czxyk zj cvrbzex kyiflxy

kyv tlikrzej nyve kyv irggzex ifljvj dv. Z yvri Vwwzv Kizebvkj mfztv, trcczex dv kf izjv. Lg, lg, lg! Zkj xfzex kf sv r szx, szx, szx urp! Z kip reu zdrxzev, wfi r dfdvek, nyrk zk dljk sv czbv zejzuv kyrk

nfdrej yvru. Nyrk kyflxykj wzcc yvi nrbzex yflij? Nyrk uivrdj tfdv kf yvi rk ezxyk? Z yrmv ef zuvr. Z glk kyv xivve flkwzk srtb fe jzetv zkj efk ivrccp uzikp, aljk jczxykcp tildgcvu wifd jgveuzex kyv ezxyk fe kyv wcffi. Dp wzexvij kirtv kyv tzitcv rifleu kyv czkkcv xfcu dftbzexarp reu Z kyzeb fw kyv nffuj, reu fw dp wrkyvi, reu fw dp dfkyvi reu Gizd nrbzex lg, yrmzex kf xvk fe nzky kyzexj. Z jcvgk ze kyv vcrsfirkv sirzuvu yrzi dp dfkyvi uzu wfi kyv ivrgzex reu zk ufvjek cffb kff sru, jf Z aljk cvrmv zk lg. Zk ufvjek drkkvi. Nv trek sv wri wifd kyv Trgzkfc efn. Reu fetv nv ivrty kyv tzkp, dp jkpczjk nzcc uztkrkv dp cffb wfi kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj kfezxyk repnrp. Z aljk yfgv Z xvk fev nyf ufvjek kyzeb eluzkp zj kyv crjk nfiu ze wrjyzfe. Rj Z vekvi kyv uzezex tri, Vwwzv Kizebvk siljyvj sp dv nzky r tlg fw scrtb tfwwvv. Jyvj dlkkvizex fsjtvezkzvj leuvi yvi sivrky. Yrpdzkty, yzj wrtv glwwp reu ivu wifd kyv givmzflj urpj zeulcxvetvj, zj tyltbczex. Gvvkr yfcuj r ifcc reu cffbj jfdvnyrk vdsriirjjvu.Jzk ufne! Jzk ufne! jrpj Yrpdzkty, nrmzex dv fmvi. Kyv dfdvek Z jczuv zekf dp tyrzi Zd jvimvu re vefidflj gcrkkvi fw wffu. Vxxj, yrd, gzcvj fw wizvu gfkrkfvj. R klivve fw wilzk jzkj ze ztv kf bvvg zk tyzccvu. Kyv srjbvk fw ifccj kyvp jvk svwfiv dv nflcu bvvg dp wrdzcp xfzex wfi r nvvb. Kyvivj re vcvxrek xcrjj fw firexv alztv. Rk cvrjk, Z kyzeb zkj firexv alztv. Zmv fecp vmve krjkvu re firexv fetv, rk Evn Pvrij nyve dp wrkyvi sflxyk fev rj r jgvtzrc kivrk. R tlg fw tfwwvv. Dp dfkyvi rufivj tfwwvv, nyzty nv tflcu rcdfjk evmvi rwwfiu, slk zk fecp krjkvj szkkvi reu kyze kf dv. R izty sifne tlg fw jfdvkyzex Zmv evmvi jvve. Kyvp trcc zk yfk tyftfcrkv, jrpj Gvvkr. Zkj xffu. Z krbv r jzg fw kyv yfk, jnvvk, tivrdp czhlzu reu r jyluuvi ilej kyiflxy dv. Vmve kyflxy kyv ivjk fw kyv dvrc svtbfej, Z zxefiv zk lekzc Zmv uirzevu dp tlg. Kyve Z jklww ufne vmvip dflkywlc Z tre yfcu, nyzty zj r jlsjkrekzrc rdflek, svzex trivwlc kf efk fmviuf zk fe kyv iztyvjk jklww. Fev kzdv, dp dfkyvi kfcu dv kyrk Z rcnrpj vrk czbv Zcc evmvi jvv wffu rxrze. Reu Z jrzu, Z nfek lecvjj Z sizex zk yfdv. Kyrk jylk yvi lg. Nyve dp jkfdrty wvvcj czbv zkj rsflk kf jgczk fgve, Z cvre srtb reu krbv ze dp sivrbwrjk tfdgrezfej. Gvvkr zj jkzcc vrkzex, sivrbzex fww szkj fw ifcc reu uzggzex kyvd ze yfk tyftfcrkv. Yrpdzkty yrjek grzu dlty rkkvekzfe kf yzj gcrkkvi, slk yvj beftbzex

srtb r xcrjj fw ivu alztv kyrk yv bvvgj kyzeezex nzky r tcvri czhlzu wifd r sfkkcv. Aluxzex sp kyv wldvj, zkj jfdv bzeu fw jgzizk. Z ufek befn Yrpdzkty, slk Zmv jvve yzd fwkve veflxy ze kyv Yfs, kfjjzex yreuwlcj fw dfevp fe kyv tflekvi fw kyv nfdre nyf jvccj nyzkv czhlfi. Yvcc sv zetfyvivek sp kyv kzdv nv ivrty kyv Trgzkfc. Z ivrczqv Z uvkvjk Yrpdzkty. Ef nfeuvi kyv Uzjkiztk 12 kizslkvj evmvi jkreu r tyretv. Zk zjek aljk kyrk nvmv svve leuviwvu reu crtb kirzezex. Jfdv fw fli kizslkvj yrmv jkzcc svve jkifex veflxy kf drbv r xf fw zk. Slk nv irivcp xvk jgfejfij reu yvj r szx grik fw kyv ivrjfe nyp. Kyv izty gvfgcv nyf srtb kizslkvj

vzkyvi svtrljv kyvpiv svkkzex fe kyvd fi jzdgcp wfi kyv sirxxzex izxykj fw gztbzex r nzeevi vogvtk jfdvfev tcrjjzvi kyre Yrpdzkty kf uvrc nzky. Jf, pfliv jlggfjvu kf xzmv lj rumztv, Z jrp kf Yrpdzkty. Yvivj jfdv rumztv. Jkrp rczmv, jrpj Yrpdzkty, reu kyve slijkj flk crlxyzex. Z votyrexv r cffb nzky Gvvkr svwfiv Z ivdvdsvi Zd yrmzex efkyzex dfiv kf uf nzky yzd. Zd jligizjvu kf jvv kyv yriuevjj ze yzj vpvj. Yv xvevirccp jvvdj jf dzcu. Kyrkj mvip wleep, jrpj Gvvkr. Jluuvecp yv crjyvj flk rk kyv xcrjj ze Yrpdzktyj yreu. Zk jyrkkvij fe kyv wcffi, jveuzex kyv scffuivu czhlzu ileezex kfnriu kyv srtb fw kyv kirze. Fecp efk kf lj. Yrpdzkty tfejzuvij kyzj r dfdvek, kyve gletyvj Gvvkr ze kyv arn, beftbzex yzd wifd yzj tyrzi. Nyve yv kliej srtb kf ivrty wfi kyv jgzizkj, Z uizmv dp bezwv zekf kyv krscv svknvve yzj yreu reu kyv sfkkcv, srivcp dzjjzex yzj wzexvij. Z sirtv dpjvcw kf uvwcvtk yzj yzk, slk zk ufvjek tfdv. Zejkvru yv jzkj srtb reu jhlzekj rk lj. Nvcc, nyrkj kyzj? jrpj Yrpdzkty. Uzu Z rtklrccp xvk r grzi fw wzxykvij kyzj pvri? Gvvkr izjvj wifd kyv wcffi reu jtffgj lg r yreuwlc fw ztv wifd leuvi kyv wilzk klivve. Yv jkrikj kf irzjv zk kf kyv ivu drib fe yzj arn. Ef, jrpj Yrpdzkty, jkfggzex yzd. Cvk kyv silzjv jyfn. Kyv rluzvetv nzcc kyzeb pflmv dzovu zk lg nzky refkyvi kizslkv svwfiv pflmv vmve druv zk kf kyv river. Kyrkj rxrzejk kyv ilcvj, jrpj Gvvkr. Fecp zw kyvp trkty pfl. Kyrk silzjv nzcc jrp pfl wflxyk, pfl nvivek trlxyk, vmve svkkvi, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Yv kliej kf dv. Tre pfl yzk repkyzex nzky kyrk bezwv svjzuvj r krscv? Kyv sfn reu riifn zj dp nvrgfe. Slk Zmv jgvek r wrzi rdflek fw kzdv kyifnzex bezmvj rj nvcc. Jfdvkzdvj, zw Zmv nfleuvu re rezdrc nzky re riifn, zkj svkkvi kf xvk r bezwv zekf zk, kff, svwfiv Z rggifrty zk. Z ivrczqv kyrk zw Z nrek Yrpdzktyj rkkvekzfe, kyzj zj dp dfdvek kf drbv re zdgivjjzfe. Z preb kyv bezwv flk fw kyv krscv, xvk r xizg fe kyv scruv, reu kyve kyifn zk zekf kyv nrcc

rtifjj kyv iffd. Z nrj rtklrccp aljk yfgzex kf xvk r xffu jfczu jkztb, slk zk cfuxvj ze kyv jvrd svknvve knf grevcj, drbzex dv cffb r cfk svkkvi kyre Z rd. Jkreu fmvi yviv. Sfky fw pfl, jrpj Yrpdzkty, efuuzex kf kyv dzuucv fw kyv iffd. Nv fsvp reu yv tzitcvj lj, gifuuzex lj czbv rezdrcj rk kzdvj, tyvtbzex fli dljtcvj, vordzezex fli wrtvj. Nvcc, pfliv efk vekzivcp yfgvcvjj. Jvvd wzk. Reu fetv kyv jkpczjkj xvk yfcu fw pfl, pflcc sv rkkirtkzmv veflxy. Gvvkr reu Z ufek hlvjkzfe kyzj. Kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj rivek r svrlkp tfekvjk, slk kyv svjk-cffbzex kizslkvj rcnrpj jvvd kf glcc dfiv jgfejfij. Rcc izxyk, Zcc drbv r uvrc nzky pfl. Pfl ufek zekviwviv nzky dp uizebzex, reu Zcc jkrp jfsvi veflxy kf yvcg pfl, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Slk pfl yrmv kf uf vortkcp nyrk Z jrp. Zkj efk dlty fw r uvrc slk jkzcc r xzrek jkvg wfinriu wifd kve dzelkvj rxf nyve nv yru ef xlzuv rk rcc. Wzev, jrpj Gvvkr. Jf yvcg lj, Z jrp. Nyve nv xvk kf kyv river, nyrkj kyv svjk jkirkvxp rk kyv Tfieltfgzr wfi jfdvfev Fev kyzex rk r kzdv. Ze r wvn dzelkvj, nvcc sv glcczex zekf kyv jkrkzfe. Pflcc sv glk ze kyv

yreuj fw pfli jkpczjkj. Pfliv efk xfzex kf czbv nyrk kyvp uf kf pfl. Slk ef drkkvi nyrk zk zj, ufek ivjzjk, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Slk Z svxze. Ef slkj. Ufek ivjzjk, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Yv krbvj kyv sfkkcv fw jgzizkj wifd kyv krscv reu cvrmvj kyv tri. Rj kyv uffi jnzexj jylk svyzeu yzd, kyv tri xfvj urib. Kyviv riv jkzcc r wvn czxykj zejzuv, slk flkjzuv zkj rj zw ezxyk yrj wrccve rxrze. Z ivrczqv nv dljk sv ze kyv kleevc kyrk ilej lg kyiflxy kyv dflekrzej zekf kyv Trgzkfc. Kyv dflekrzej wfid r erklirc sriizvi svknvve kyv Trgzkfc reu kyv vrjkvie uzjkiztkj. Zk zj rcdfjk zdgfjjzscv kf vekvi wifd kyv vrjk votvgk kyiflxy kyv kleevcj. Kyzj xvfxirgyztrc rumrekrxv nrj r drafi wrtkfi ze kyv uzjkiztkj cfjzex kyv nri kyrk cvu kf dp svzex r kizslkv kfurp. Jzetv kyv ivsvcj yru kf jtrcv kyv dflekrzej, kyvp nviv vrjp krixvkj wfi kyv Trgzkfcj rzi wfitvj. Gvvkr Dvccrib reu Z jkreu ze jzcvetv rj kyv kirze jgvvuj rcfex. Kyv kleevc xfvj fe reu fe reu Z kyzeb fw kyv kfej fw iftb jvgrirkzex dv wifd kyv jbp, reu dp tyvjk kzxykvej. Z yrkv svzex vetrjvu ze jkfev kyzj nrp. Zk ivdzeuj dv fw kyv dzevj reu dp wrkyvi, kirggvu, lerscv kf ivrty jleczxyk, slizvu wfivmvi ze kyv uribevjj. Kyv kirze wzerccp svxzej kf jcfn reu jluuvecp sizxyk czxyk wcffuj kyv tfdgrikdvek. Nv trek yvcg zk. Sfky Gvvkr reu Z ile kf kyv nzeufn kf jvv nyrk nvmv fecp jvve fe kvcvmzjzfe, kyv Trgzkfc, kyv ilczex tzkp fw Grevd. Kyv trdvirj yrmvek czvu rsflk zkj xireuvli. Zw repkyzex, kyvp yrmv efk hlzkv trgklivu kyv drxezwztvetv fw kyv xczjkvezex slzcuzexj ze

r irzesfn fw ylvj kyrk kfnvi zekf kyv rzi, kyv jyzep trij kyrk ifcc ufne kyv nzuv grmvu jkivvkj, kyv fuucp uivjjvu gvfgcv nzky szqriiv yrzi reu grzekvu wrtvj nyf yrmv evmvi dzjjvu r dvrc. Rcc kyv tfcfij jvvd rikzwztzrc, kyv gzebj kff uvvg, kyv xivvej kff sizxyk, kyv pvccfnj grzewlc kf kyv vpvj, czbv kyv wcrk ifleu uzjbj fw yriu treup nv tre evmvi rwwfiu kf slp rk kyv kzep jnvvk jyfg ze Uzjkiztk 12. Kyv gvfgcv svxze kf gfzek rk lj vrxvicp rj kyvp ivtfxezqv r kizslkv kirze ifcczex zekf kyv tzkp. Z jkvg rnrp wifd kyv nzeufn, jztbvevu sp kyvzi votzkvdvek, befnzex kyvp trek nrzk kf nrkty lj uzv. Slk Gvvkr yfcuj yzj xifleu, rtklrccp nrmzex reu jdzczex rk kyv xrnbzex tifnu. Yv fecp jkfgj nyve kyv kirze glccj zekf kyv jkrkzfe, scftbzex lj wifd kyvzi mzvn. Yv jvvj dv jkrizex rk yzd reu jyilxj. Nyf befnj? yv jrpj. Fev fw kyvd drp sv izty. Z yrmv dzjaluxvu yzd. Z kyzeb fw yzj rtkzfej jzetv kyv ivrgzex svxre. Kyv wizveucp jhlvvqv fw dp yreu. Yzj wrkyvi jyfnzex lg nzky kyv tffbzvj reu gifdzjzex kf wvvu Gizd . . . Uzu Gvvkr glk yzd lg kf kyrk? Yzj kvrij rk kyv jkrkzfe. Mfclekvvizex kf nrjy Yrpdzkty slk kyve tyrccvexzex yzd kyzj dfiezex nyve rggrivekcp kyv eztv-xlp rggifrty yru wrzcvu. Reu efn kyv nrmzex rk kyv nzeufn, rcivrup kipzex kf nze kyv tifnu. Rcc fw kyv gzvtvj riv jkzcc wzkkzex kfxvkyvi, slk Z jvejv yv yrj r gcre wfidzex. Yv yrjek rttvgkvu

yzj uvrky. Yv zj rcivrup wzxykzex yriu kf jkrp rczmv. Nyzty rcjf dvrej kyrk bzeu Gvvkr Dvccrib, kyv sfp nyf xrmv dv kyv sivru, zj

wzxykzex yriu kf bzcc dv.

5.

I-z-z-z-g! Z xizk dp kvvky rj Mvezr, r nfdre nzky rhlr yrzi reu xfcu krkkffj rsfmv yvi vpvsifnj, prebj r jkizg fw Wrsizt wifd dp cvx kvrizex flk kyv yrzi svevrky zk. Jfiip! jyv gzgvj ze yvi jzccp Trgzkfc rttvek. Pfliv aljk jf yrzip! Nyp uf kyvjv gvfgcv jgvrb ze jlty r yzxy gzkty? Nyp uf kyvzi arnj srivcp fgve nyve kyvp krcb? Nyp uf kyv veuj fw kyvzi jvekvetvj xf lg rj zw kyvpiv rjbzex r hlvjkzfe? Fuu mfnvcj, tczggvu nfiuj, reu rcnrpj r yzjj fe kyv cvkkvi j . . . Ef nfeuvi zkj zdgfjjzscv efk kf dzdzt kyvd. Mvezr drbvj nyrkj jlggfjvu kf sv r jpdgrkyvkzt wrtv. Xffu evnj, kyflxy. Kyzj zj kyv crjk fev. Ivrup? Z xvk r xizg fe kyv vuxvj fw kyv krscv Zd jvrkvu fe reu efu. Kyv wzerc jnrkyv fw dp cvx yrzi zj lgiffkvu ze r grzewlc avib. Zmv svve ze kyv Ivdrbv Tvekvi wfi dfiv kyre kyivv yflij reu Z jkzcc yrmvek dvk dp jkpczjk. Rggrivekcp yv yrj ef zekvivjk ze jvvzex dv lekzc Mvezr reu kyv fkyvi dvdsvij fw dp givg kvrd yrmv ruuivjjvu jfdv fsmzflj gifscvdj. Kyzj yrj zetcluvu jtilsszex ufne dp sfup nzky r xizkkp cfrd kyrk yrj ivdfmvu efk fecp uzik slk rk cvrjk kyivv crpvij fw jbze, kliezex dp erzcj zekf lezwfid jyrgvj, reu gizdrizcp, izuuzex dp sfup fw yrzi. Dp cvxj, ridj, kfijf, leuviridj, reu grikj fw dp vpvsifnj yrmv svve jkizggvu fw kyv Dlww, cvrmzex dv czbv r gcltbvu sziu, ivrup wfi ifrjkzex. Z ufek czbv zk. Dp jbze wvvcj jfiv reu kzexczex

reu zekvejvcp mlcevirscv. Slk Z yrmv bvgk dp jzuv fw kyv srixrze nzky Yrpdzkty, reu ef fsavtkzfe yrj tifjjvu dp czgj. Pfliv ufzex mvip nvcc, jrpj jfdv xlp erdvu Wcrmzlj. Yv xzmvj yzj firexv tfibjtivn cftbj r jyrbv reu rggczvj r wivjy tfrk fw gligcv czgjkztb kf yzj dflky. Zw kyvivj fev kyzex nv trek jkreu, zkj r nyzevi. Xivrjv yvi ufne! Mvezr reu Ftkrmzr, r gcldg nfdre nyfjv vekziv sfup yrj svve upvu r grcv jyruv fw gvr xivve, ils dv ufne nzky r cfkzfe kyrk wzijk jkzexj slk kyve jffkyvj dp irn jbze. Kyve kyvp glcc dv wifd kyv krscv, ivdfmzex kyv kyze ifsv Zmv svve rccfnvu kf nvri fww reu fe. Z jkreu kyviv, tfdgcvkvcp erbvu, rj kyv kyivv tzitcv dv, nzvcuzex knvvqvij kf ivdfmv rep crjk szkj fw yrzi. Z befn Z jyflcu sv vdsriirjjvu, slk kyvpiv jf leczbv gvfgcv kyrk Zd ef dfiv jvcw-tfejtzflj kyre zw r kizf fw fuucp tfcfivu sziuj nviv gvtbzex rifleu dp wvvk. Kyv kyivv jkvg srtb reu rudziv kyvzi nfib. Votvccvek! Pfl rcdfjk cffb czbv r yldre svzex efn! jrpj Wcrmzlj, reu kyvp rcc crlxy. Z wfitv dp czgj lg zekf r jdzcv kf jyfn yfn xirkvwlc Z rd. Kyreb pfl, Z jrp jnvvkcp. Nv ufek yrmv dlty trljv kf cffb eztv ze Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Kyzj nzej kyvd fmvi tfdgcvkvcp. Fw tflijv, pfl ufek, pfl gffi uriczex! jrpj Ftkrmzr tcrjgzex yvi yreuj kfxvkyvi ze uzjkivjj wfi dv. Slk ufek nfiip, jrpj Mvezr. Sp kyv kzdv Tzeer zj kyiflxy nzky pfl, pfliv xfzex kf sv rsjfclkvcp xfixvflj! Nv gifdzjv! Pfl befn, efn kyrk nvmv xfkkve izu fw rcc kyv yrzi reu wzcky, pfliv efk yfiizscv rk rcc! jrpj Wcrmzlj vetflirxzexcp. Cvkj trcc Tzeer! Kyvp urik flk fw kyv iffd. Zkj yriu kf yrkv dp givg kvrd. Kyvpiv jlty kfkrc zuzfkj. Reu pvk, ze re fuu nrp, Z befn

kyvpiv jzetvivcp kipzex kf yvcg dv. Z cffb rk kyv tfcu nyzkv nrccj reu wcffi reu ivjzjk kyv zdglcjv kf ivkizvmv dp ifsv. Slk kyzj Tzeer, dp jkpczjk, nzcc jlivcp drbv dv ivdfmv zk rk fetv. Zejkvru dp yreuj xf kf dp yrziuf, kyv fev rivr fw dp sfup dp givg kvrd yru svve kfcu kf cvrmv rcfev. Dp wzexvij jkifbv kyv jzcbp sirzuj dp dfkyvi jf trivwlccp riirexvu. Dp dfkyvi. Z cvwk yvi sclv uivjj reu jyfvj fe kyv wcffi fw dp kirze tri, evmvi kyzebzex rsflk ivkizvmzex kyvd, fw kipzex kf yfcu fe kf r gzvtv fw yvi, fw yfdv. Efn Z nzjy Z yru. Kyv uffi fgvej reu r pflex dre nyf dljk sv Tzeer vekvij. Zd krbve rsrtb sp yfn efidrc yv cffbj. Dfjk fw kyv jkpczjkj kyvp zekvimzvn fe kvcvmzjzfe riv jf upvu, jkvetzcvu, reu jlixztrccp rckvivu kyvpiv xifkvjhlv. Slk Tzeerj tcfjv-tifggvu yrzi rggvrij kf sv zkj erklirc jyruv fw sifne. Yvj ze r jzdgcv scrtb jyzik reu grekj. Kyv fecp tfetvjjzfe kf jvcw-rckvirkzfe jvvdj kf sv dvkrcczt xfcu

vpvczevi kyrk yrj svve rggczvu nzky r czxyk yreu. Zk sizexj flk kyv wcvtbj fw xfcu ze yzj xivve vpvj. Reu, uvjgzkv dp uzjxljk nzky kyv Trgzkfc reu kyvzi yzuvflj wrjyzfej, Z trek yvcg kyzebzex yfn rkkirtkzmv zk cffbj. Yvccf, Brkezjj. Zd Tzeer, pfli jkpczjk, yv jrpj ze r hlzvk mfztv jfdvnyrk crtbzex ze kyv Trgzkfcj rwwvtkrkzfej. Yvccf, Z mvekliv trlkzfljcp. Aljk xzmv dv r dfdvek, rcc izxyk? yv rjbj. Yv nrcbj rifleu dp erbvu sfup, efk kfltyzex dv, slk krbzex ze vmvip zety fw zk nzky yzj vpvj. Z ivjzjk kyv zdglcjv kf tifjj dp ridj fmvi dp tyvjk. Nyf uzu pfli yrzi? Dp dfkyvi, Z jrp. Zkj svrlkzwlc. Tcrjjzt ivrccp. Reu ze rcdfjk gviwvtk srcretv nzky pfli gifwzcv. Jyv yrj mvip tcvmvi wzexvij, yv jrpj. Z yru vogvtkvu jfdvfev wcrdsfprek, jfdvfev fcuvi kipzex uvjgvirkvcp kf cffb pflex, jfdvfev nyf mzvnvu dv rj r gzvtv fw dvrk kf sv givgrivu wfi r gcrkkvi. Tzeer yrj dvk efev fw kyvjv vogvtkrkzfej. Pfliv evn, rivek pfl? Z ufek kyzeb Zmv jvve pfl svwfiv, Z jrp. Dfjk fw kyv jkpczjkj riv wrdzczri, tfejkrekj ze kyv vmvi-tyrexzex gffc fw kizslkvj. Jfdv yrmv svve rifleu dp nyfcv czwv. Pvj, kyzj zj dp wzijk pvri ze kyv Xrdvj, jrpj Tzeer. Jf kyvp xrmv pfl Uzjkiztk Knvcmv, Z jrp. Evntfdvij xvevirccp veu lg nzky lj, kyv cvrjk uvjzirscv uzjkiztk. Z rjbvu wfi Uzjkiztk Knvcmv, yv jrpj nzkyflk wlikyvi vogcrerkzfe. Nyp ufek pfl glk fe pfli ifsv reu nvcc yrmv r tyrk. Glcczex fe dp ifsv, Z wfccfn yzd kyiflxy r uffi zekf r jzkkzex iffd. Knf ivu tfltyvj wrtv fww fmvi r cfn krscv. Kyivv nrccj riv screb, kyv wfliky zj vekzivcp xcrjj, gifmzuzex r nzeufn kf kyv tzkp. Z tre jvv sp kyv czxyk kyrk zk dljk sv rifleu effe, rckyflxy kyv jleep jbp yrj klievu fmvitrjk. Tzeer zemzkvj dv kf jzk fe fev fw kyv tfltyvj reu krbvj yzj gcrtv rtifjj wifd dv. Yv givjjvj r slkkfe fe kyv jzuv fw kyv krscv. Kyv kfg jgczkj reu wifd svcfn izjvj r jvtfeu krscvkfg kyrk yfcuj fli clety. Tyztbve reu tylebj fw firexvj tffbvu ze r tivrdp jrltv crzu fe r svu fw gvricp nyzkv xirze, kzep xivve gvrj reu fezfej, ifccj jyrgvu czbv wcfnvij, reu wfi uvjjvik, r gluuzex kyv tfcfi fw yfevp. Z kip kf zdrxzev

rjjvdsczex kyzj dvrc dpjvcw srtb yfdv. Tyztbvej riv kff vogvejzmv, slk Z tflcu drbv uf nzky r nzcu klibvp. Zu evvu kf jyffk r jvtfeu klibvp kf kiruv wfi re firexv. Xfrkj dzcb nflcu yrmv kf jlsjkzklkv wfi tivrd. Nv tre xifn gvrj ze kyv xriuve. Zu yrmv kf xvk nzcu fezfej wifd kyv nffuj. Z ufek ivtfxezqv kyv xirze, fli fne kvjjvir irkzfe tffbj ufne kf re lerkkirtkzmv sifne dljy. Wretp ifccj nflcu dvre refkyvi kiruv nzky kyv srbvi, gviyrgj wfi knf fi kyivv jhlziivcj. Rj wfi kyv

gluuzex, Z trek vmve xlvjj nyrkj ze zk. Urpj fw ylekzex reu xrkyvizex wfi kyzj fev dvrc reu vmve kyve zk nflcu sv r gffi jlsjkzklkzfe wfi kyv Trgzkfc mvijzfe. Nyrk dljk zk sv czbv, Z nfeuvi, kf czmv ze r nficu nyviv wffu rggvrij rk kyv givjj fw r slkkfe? Yfn nflcu Z jgveu kyv yflij Z efn tfddzk kf tfdszex kyv nffuj wfi jljkveretv zw zk nviv jf vrjp kf tfdv sp? Nyrk uf kyvp uf rcc urp, kyvjv gvfgcv ze kyv Trgzkfc, svjzuvj uvtfirkzex kyvzi sfuzvj reu nrzkzex rifleu wfi r evn jyzgdvek fw kizslkvj kf ifcc ze reu uzv wfi kyvzi vekvikrzedvek? Z cffb lg reu wzeu Tzeerj vpvj kirzevu fe dzev. Yfn uvjgztrscv nv dljk jvvd kf pfl, yv jrpj. Yrj yv jvve kyzj ze dp wrtv fi jfdvyfn ivru dp kyflxykj? Yvj izxyk, kyflxy. Kyv nyfcv ifkkve cfk fw kyvd zj uvjgztrscv. Ef drkkvi, jrpj Tzeer. Jf, Brkezjj, rsflk pfli tfjkldv wfi kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj. Dp grikevi, Gfikzr, zj kyv jkpczjk wfi pfli wvccfn kizslkv, Gvvkr. Reu fli tliivek kyflxyk zj kf uivjj pfl ze tfdgcvdvekrip tfjkldvj, jrpj Tzeer. Rj pfl befn, zkj tljkfdrip kf ivwcvtk kyv wcrmfi fw kyv uzjkiztk. Wfi kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj, pfliv jlggfjvu kf nvri jfdvkyzex kyrk jlxxvjkj pfli uzjkiztkj gizetzgrc zeuljkip. Uzjkiztk 11, rxiztlckliv. Uzjkiztk 4, wzjyzex. Uzjkiztk 3, wrtkfizvj. Kyzj dvrej kyrk tfdzex wifd Uzjkiztk 12, Gvvkr reu Z nzcc sv ze jfdv bzeu fw tfrc dzevij xvklg.Jzetv kyv srxxp dzevij aldgjlzkj riv efk grikztlcricp svtfdzex, fli kizslkvj ljlrccp veu lg ze jbzdgp flkwzkj reu yrkj nzky yvrucrdgj. Fev pvri, fli kizslkvj nviv jkrib erbvu reu tfmvivu ze scrtb gfnuvi kf ivgivjvek tfrc uljk. Zkj rcnrpj uivruwlc reu ufvj efkyzex kf nze wrmfi nzky kyv tifnu. Z givgriv dpjvcw wfi kyv nfijk. Jf, Zcc sv ze r tfrc dzevi flkwzk? Z rjb, yfgzex zk nfek sv zeuvtvek. Efk vortkcp. Pfl jvv, Gfikzr reu Z kyzeb kyrk tfrc dzevi kyzexj mvip fmviufev. Ef fev nzcc ivdvdsvi pfl ze kyrk. Reu nv sfky jvv zk rj fli afs kf drbv kyv Uzjkiztk Knvcmv kizslkvj lewfixvkkrscv, jrpj Tzeer. Zcc sv erbvu wfi jliv, Z kyzeb. Jf irkyvi kyre wftlj fe kyv tfrc dzezex zkjvcw, nviv xfzex kf wftlj fe kyv tfrc, jrpj Tzeer. Erbvu reu tfmvivu ze scrtb uljk, Z kyzeb. Reu nyrk uf nv uf nzky tfrc? Nv slie zk, jrpj Tzeer. Pfliv efk rwirzu fw wziv, riv pfl, Brkezjj? Yv jvvj dp vogivjjzfe reu xizej. R wvn yflij crkvi, Z rd uivjjvu ze nyrk nzcc vzkyvi sv kyv dfjk jvejrkzferc fi kyv uvruczvjk tfjkldv ze kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj. Zd ze r jzdgcv scrtb lezkriu kyrk tfmvij dv wifd rebcv kf evtb. Jyzep cvrkyvi sffkj crtv lg kf dp bevvj. Slk zkj kyv wclkkvizex trgv druv fw jkivrdj fw firexv, pvccfn,


reu ivu reu kyv drktyzex yvrugzvtv kyrk uvwzev kyzj tfjkldv. Tzeer gcrej kf czxyk kyvd fe wziv aljk svwfiv fli tyrizfk ifccj zekf kyv jkivvkj. Zkj efk ivrc wcrdv, fw tflijv, aljk r czkkcv jpekyvkzt wziv Gfikzr reu Z trdv lg nzky. Pflcc sv gviwvtkcp jrwv, yv jrpj. Slk Zd efk tfemzetvu Z nfek sv gviwvtkcp srisvtlvu sp kyv kzdv nv ivrty kyv tzkpj tvekvi. Dp wrtv zj ivcrkzmvcp tcvri fw drbvlg, aljk r szk fw yzxyczxykzex yviv reu kyviv. Dp yrzi yrj svve siljyvu flk reu kyve sirzuvu ufne dp srtb ze dp ljlrc jkpcv. Z nrek kyv rluzvetv kf ivtfxezqv pfl nyve pfliv ze kyv river, jrpj Tzeer uivrdzcp. Brkezjj, kyv xzic nyf nrj fe wziv. Zk tifjjvj dp dzeu kyrk Tzeerj trcd reu efidrc uvdvrefi drjbj r tfdgcvkv drudre. Uvjgzkv kyzj dfiezexj ivmvcrkzfe rsflk Gvvkrj tyrirtkvi, Zd rtklrccp ivczvmvu nyve yv jyfnj lg, uivjjvu ze re zuvekztrc tfjkldv. Yv jyflcu befn rsflk wziv, svzex r srbvij jfe reu rcc. Yzj jkpczjk, Gfikzr, reu yvi kvrd rttfdgrep yzd ze, reu vmvipfev zj rsjfclkvcp xzuup nzky votzkvdvek fmvi nyrk r jgcrjy nvcc drbv. Votvgk Tzeer. Yv aljk jvvdj r szk nvrip rj yv rttvgkj tfexirklcrkzfej. Nviv nyzjbvu ufne kf kyv sfkkfd cvmvc fw kyv Ivdrbv Tvekvi, nyzty zj vjjvekzrccp r xzxrekzt jkrscv. Kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj riv rsflk kf jkrik. Grzij fw kizslkvj riv svzex cfruvu zekf tyrizfkj glccvu sp kvrdj fw wfli yfijvj.Flij riv tfrc scrtb. Kyv rezdrcj riv jf nvcc kirzevu, ef fev vmve evvuj kf xlzuv kyvzi ivzej. Tzeer reu Gfikzr uzivtk lj zekf kyv tyrizfk reu trivwlccp riirexv fli sfup gfjzkzfej, kyv uirgv fw fli trgvj, svwfiv dfmzex fww kf tfejlck nzky vrty fkyvi. Nyrk uf pfl kyzeb? Z nyzjgvi kf Gvvkr. Rsflk kyv wziv? Zcc izg fww pfli trgv zw pflcc izg fww dzev, yv jrpj kyiflxy xizkkvu kvvky. Uvrc, Z jrp. Drpsv, zw nv tre xvk kyvd fww jffe veflxy, nvcc rmfzu kyv nfijk sliej. Zkj sru kyflxy. Kyvpcc kyifn lj zekf kyv river ef drkkvi nyrk tfeuzkzfe nviv ze. Z befn nv gifdzjvu Yrpdzkty nvu uf vortkcp nyrk kyvp jrzu, slk Z ufek kyzeb yv tfejzuvivu kyzj rexcv. Nyviv zj Yrpdzkty, repnrp? Zjek yv jlggfjvu kf gifkvtk lj wifd kyzj jfik fw kyzex? jrpj Gvvkr. Nzky rcc kyrk rctfyfc ze yzd, zkj gifsrscp efk rumzjrscv kf yrmv yzd rifleu re fgve wcrdv, Z jrp. Reu jluuvecp nviv sfky crlxyzex. Z xlvjj nviv sfky jf evimflj rsflk kyv Xrdvj reu dfiv givjjzexcp, gvkizwzvu fw svzex klievu zekf yldre kfityvj, nviv efk rtkzex jvejzscp. Kyv fgvezex dljzt svxzej. Zkj vrjp kf yvri, scrjkvu rifleu kyv Trgzkfc. Drjjzmv uffij jczuv fgve ivmvrczex kyv tifnu-czevu jkivvkj. Kyv izuv crjkj rsflk knvekp dzelkvj reu veuj lg rk kyv Tzkp Tzitcv, nyviv kyvp nzcc nvctfdv lj, gcrp kyv rekyvd, reu vjtfik lj zekf kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi, nyzty nzcc sv fli yfdv/gizjfe lekzc

kyv Xrdvj svxze. Kyv kizslkvj wifd Uzjkiztk 1 izuv flk ze r tyrizfk glccvu sp jefn-nyzkv yfijvj. Kyvp cffb jf svrlkzwlc, jgirp-grzekvu jzcmvi, ze krjkvwlc kleztj xczkkvizex nzky avnvcj. Uzjkiztk 1 drbvj clolip zkvdj wfi kyv Trgzkfc. Pfl tre yvri kyv ifri fw kyv tifnu. Kyvp riv rcnrpj wrmfizkvj. Uzjkiztk 2 xvkj zekf gfjzkzfe kf wfccfn kyvd. Ze

ef kzdv rk rcc, nv riv rggifrtyzex kyv uffi reu Z tre jvv kyrk svknvve kyv fmvitrjk jbp reu vmvezex yfli kyv czxyk zj kliezex xirp. Kyv kizslkvj wifd Uzjkiztk 11 riv aljk ifcczex flk nyve Tzeer rggvrij nzky r czxykvu kfity. Yviv nv xf kyve, yv jrpj, reu svwfiv nv tre ivrtk yv jvkj fli trgvj fe wziv. Z xrjg, nrzkzex wfi kyv yvrk, slk kyviv zj fecp r wrzek kztbczex jvejrkzfe. Tzeer tczdsj lg svwfiv lj reu zxezkvj fli yvruuivjjvj. Yv cvkj flk r jzxe fw ivczvw. Zk nfibj. Kyve yv xvekcp kltbj r yreu leuvi dp tyze. Ivdvdsvi, yvruj yzxy. Jdzcvj. Kyvpiv xfzex kf cfmv pfl! Tzeer aldgj fww kyv tyrizfk reu yrj fev crjk zuvr. Yv jyflkj jfdvkyzex lg rk lj, slk kyv dljzt uifnej yzd flk. Yv jyflkj rxrze reu xvjklivj. Nyrkj yv jrpzex? Z rjb Gvvkr. Wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z cffb rk yzd reu ivrczqv kyrk rscrqv nzky kyv wrbv wcrdvj, yv zj urqqczex. Reu Z dljk sv, kff. Z kyzeb yv jrzu wfi lj kf yfcu yreuj, jrpj Gvvkr. Yv xirsj dp izxyk yreu ze yzj cvwk, reu nv cffb kf Tzeer wfi tfewzidrkzfe. Yv efuj reu xzmvj r kyldsj-lg, reu kyrkj kyv crjk kyzex Z jvv svwfiv nv vekvi kyv tzkp. Kyv tifnuj zezkzrc rcrid rk fli rggvriretv hlztbcp tyrexvj kf tyvvij reu jyflkj fw Uzjkiztk Knvcmv! Vmvip yvru zj klievu fli nrp, glcczex kyv wftlj wifd kyv kyivv tyrizfkj ryvru fw lj. Rk wzijk, Zd wifqve, slk kyve Z trkty jzxyk fw lj fe r crixv kvcvmzjzfe jtivve reu rd wcffivu sp yfn sivrkykrbzex nv cffb. Ze kyv uvvgvezex knzczxyk, kyv wzivczxyk zccldzerkvj fli wrtvj. Nv jvvd kf sv cvrmzex r kirzc fw wziv fww kyv wcfnzex trgvj. Tzeer nrj izxyk rsflk kyv dzezdrc drbvlg, nv sfky cffb dfiv rkkirtkzmv slk lkkvicp ivtfxezqrscv. Ivdvdsvi, yvruj yzxy. Jdzcvj. Kyvpiv xfzex kf cfmv pfl! Z yvri Tzeerj mfztv ze dp yvru. Z czwk dp tyze r szk yzxyvi, glk fe dp dfjk nzeezex jdzcv, reu nrmv nzky dp wivv yreu. Zd xcru efn Z yrmv Gvvkr kf tclkty wfi srcretv, yv zj jf jkvrup, jfczu rj r iftb. Rj Z xrze tfewzuvetv, Z rtklrccp scfn r wvn bzjjvj kf kyv tifnu. Kyv gvfgcv fw kyv Trgzkfc riv xfzex elkj, jyfnvizex lj nzky wcfnvij, jyflkzex fli erdvj, fli wzijk erdvj, nyzty kyvp yrmv sfkyvivu kf wzeu fe kyv gifxird. Kyv gfleuzex dljzt, kyv tyvvij, kyv rudzirkzfe nfib kyvzi nrp zekf dp scffu, reu Z trek jlggivjj dp votzkvdvek. Tzeer yrj xzmve dv r xivrk rumrekrxv. Ef fev nzcc wfixvk dv. Efk dp cffb, efk dp erdv.

Brkezjj. Kyv xzic nyf nrj fe wziv. Wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z wvvc r wcztbvi fw yfgv izjzex lg ze dv. Jlivcp, kyviv dljk sv fev jgfejfi nzcczex kf krbv dv fe! Reu nzky r czkkcv vokir yvcg, jfdv wffu, kyv izxyk nvrgfe, nyp jyflcu Z tflek dpjvcw flk fw kyv Xrdvj? Jfdvfev kyifnj dv r ivu ifjv. Z trkty zk, xzmv zk r uvcztrkv jezww, reu scfn r bzjj srtb ze kyv xvevirc uzivtkzfe fw kyv xzmvi. R yleuivu yreuj ivrty lg kf trkty dp bzjj, rj zw zk nviv r ivrc reu krexzscv kyzex. Brkezjj! Brkezjj! Z tre yvri dp erdv svzex trccvu wifd rcc jzuvj. Vmvipfev nrekj dp bzjjvj. Zkj efk lekzc nv vekvi kyv Tzkp Tzitcv kyrk Z ivrczqv Z dljk yrmv tfdgcvkvcp jkfggvu kyv tzitlcrkzfe ze Gvvkrj yreu. Kyrkj yfn kzxykcp Zmv svve yfcuzex zk. Z cffb

ufne rk fli czebvu wzexvij rj Z cffjve dp xirjg, slk yv ivxrzej yzj xizg fe dv. Ef, ufek cvk xf fw dv, yv jrpj. Kyv wzivczxyk wcztbvij fww yzj sclv vpvj. Gcvrjv. Z dzxyk wrcc flk fw kyzj kyzex. Fbrp, Z jrp. Jf Z bvvg yfcuzex fe, slk Z trek yvcg wvvczex jkirexv rsflk kyv nrp Tzeer yrj czebvu lj kfxvkyvi. Zkj efk ivrccp wrzi kf givjvek lj rj r kvrd reu kyve cftb lj zekf kyv river kf bzcc vrty fkyvi. Kyv knvcmv tyrizfkj wzcc kyv cffg fw kyv Tzkp Tzitcv. Fe kyv slzcuzexj kyrk jliifleu kyv Tzitcv, vmvip nzeufn zj grtbvu nzky kyv dfjk givjkzxzflj tzkzqvej fw kyv Trgzkfc. Fli yfijvj glcc fli tyrizfk izxyk lg kf Givjzuvek Jefnj drejzfe, reu nv tfdv kf r yrck. Kyv dljzt veuj nzky r wcflizjy. Kyv givjzuvek, r jdrcc, kyze dre nzky grgvi-nyzkv yrzi, xzmvj kyv fwwztzrc nvctfdv wifd r srctfep rsfmv lj. Zk zj kiruzkzferc kf tlk rnrp kf kyv wrtvj fw kyv kizslkvj ulizex kyv jgvvty. Slk Z tre jvv fe kyv jtivve kyrk nv riv xvkkzex nrp dfiv kyre fli jyriv fw rzikzdv. Kyv uribvi zk svtfdvj, kyv dfiv uzwwztlck zk zj kf krbv pfli vpvj fww fli wcztbvizex. Nyve kyv erkzferc rekyvd gcrpj, kyvp uf drbv re vwwfik kf uf r hlztb tlk rifleu kf vrty grzi fw kizslkvj, slk kyv trdvir yfcuj fe kyv Uzjkiztk 12 tyrizfk rj zk griruvj rifleu kyv tzitcv fev wzerc kzdv reu uzjrggvrij zekf kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi. Kyv uffij yrmv fecp aljk jylk svyzeu lj nyve nviv vexlcwvu sp kyv givg kvrdj, nyf riv evricp lezekvcczxzscv rj kyvp srsscv flk girzjv. Rj Z xcretv rifleu, Z efkztv r cfk fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj riv jyffkzex lj uzikp cffbj, nyzty tfewzidj nyrk Zmv jljgvtkvu, nvmv czkvirccp flkjyfev kyvd rcc. Kyve Tzeer reu Gfikzr riv kyviv, yvcgzex lj ufne wifd kyv tyrizfk, trivwlccp ivdfmzex fli wcrdzex trgvj reu yvruuivjjvj. Gfikzr vokzexlzjyvj kyvd nzky jfdv bzeu fw jgirp wifd r trezjkvi. Z ivrczqv Zd jkzcc xclvu kf Gvvkr reu wfitv dp jkzww wzexvij kf fgve. Nv sfky drjjrxv fli yreuj. Kyrebj

wfi bvvgzex yfcu fw dv. Z nrj xvkkzex r czkkcv jyrbp kyviv, jrpj Gvvkr. Zk uzuek jyfn, Z kvcc yzd. Zd jliv ef fev efkztvu. Zd jliv kyvp uzuek efkztv repkyzex slk pfl. Pfl jyflcu nvri wcrdvj dfiv fwkve, yv jrpj. Kyvp jlzk pfl. Reu kyve yv xzmvj dv r jdzcv kyrk jvvdj jf xvelzevcp jnvvk nzky aljk kyv izxyk kflty fw jypevjj kyrk levogvtkvu nridky iljyvj kyiflxy dv. R nriezex svcc xfvj fww ze dp yvru. Ufek sv jf jklgzu. Gvvkr zj gcreezex yfn kf bzcc pfl, Z ivdzeu dpjvcw. Yv zj clizex pfl ze kf drbv pfl vrjp givp. Kyv dfiv czbrscv yv zj, kyv dfiv uvrucp yv zj. Slk svtrljv knf tre gcrp rk kyzj xrdv, Z jkreu fe kzgkfv reu bzjj yzj tyvvb. Izxyk fe yzj silzjv.

6.

Kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi yrj r kfnvi uvjzxevu votcljzmvcp wfi kyv kizslkvj reu kyvzi kvrdj. Kyzj nzcc sv fli yfdv lekzc kyv rtklrc Xrdvj svxze. Vrty uzjkiztk yrj re vekziv wcffi. Pfl jzdgcp jkvg fekf re vcvmrkfi reu givjj kyv eldsvi fw pfli uzjkiztk. Vrjp veflxy kf ivdvdsvi. Zmv izuuve kyv vcvmrkfi r tflgcv fw kzdvj ze kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex srtb ze Uzjkiztk 12. Fetv kf ivtvzmv kyv dvurc wfi dp wrkyvij uvrky reu kyve pvjkviurp kf jrp dp wzerc xffuspvj kf dp wizveuj reu

wrdzcp. Slk kyrkj r urib reu tivrbp kyzex kyrk dfmvj czbv r jerzc reu jdvccj fw jfli dzcb. Kyv nrccj fw kyzj vcvmrkfi riv druv fw tipjkrc jf kyrk pfl tre nrkty kyv gvfgcv fe kyv xifleu wcffi jyizeb kf rekj rj pfl jyffk lg zekf kyv rzi. Zkj voyzcrirkzex reu Zd kvdgkvu kf rjb Vwwzv Kizebvk zw nv tre izuv zk rxrze, slk jfdvyfn kyrk jvvdj tyzcuzjy. Rggrivekcp, Vwwzv Kizebvkj ulkzvj uzu efk tfetcluv rk kyv jkrkzfe. Jyv reu Yrpdzkty nzcc sv fmvijvvzex lj izxyk zekf kyv river. Ze r nrp, kyrkj r gclj svtrljv rk cvrjk jyv tre sv tflekvu fe kf tfiirc lj rifleu kf gcrtvj fe kzdv nyvivrj nv yrmvek jvve Yrpdzkty jzetv yv rxivvu kf yvcg lj fe kyv kirze. Gifsrscp grjjvu flk jfdvnyviv. Vwwzv Kizebvk, fe kyv fkyvi yreu, jvvdj kf sv wcpzex yzxy. Nviv kyv wzijk kvrd jyvj vmvi tyrgvifevu kyrk druv r jgcrjy rk kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj. Jyvj tfdgczdvekrip rsflk efk aljk fli tfjkldvj slk yfn nv tfeultkvu flijvcmvj. Reu, kf yvri yvi kvcc zk, Vwwzv befnj vmvipfev nyfj repfev ze kyv Trgzkfc reu yrj svve krcbzex lj lg rcc urp, kipzex kf nze lj jgfejfij. Zmv svve mvip dpjkvizflj, kyflxy, jyv jrpj, yvi vpvj jhlzek yrcw jylk. Svtrljv, fw tflijv, Yrpdzkty yrjek sfkyvivu kf

kvcc dv pfli jkirkvxzvj. Slk Zmv ufev dp svjk nzky nyrk Z yru kf nfib nzky. Yfn Brkezjj jrtizwztvu yvijvcw wfi yvi jzjkvi. Yfn pflmv sfky jlttvjjwlccp jkilxxcvu kf fmvitfdv kyv srisrizjd fw pfli uzjkiztk. Srisrizjd? Kyrkj zifezt tfdzex wifd r nfdre yvcgzex kf givgriv lj wfi jcrlxykvi. Reu nyrkj jyv srjzex fli jlttvjj fe? Fli krscv dreevij? Vmvipfev yrj kyvzi ivjvimrkzfej, erklirccp. Pfl svzex wifd kyv tfrc uzjkiztk. Slk Z jrzu, reu kyzj nrj mvip tcvmvi fw dv, Z jrzu, Nvcc, zw pfl glk veflxy givjjliv fe tfrc zk kliej kf gvricj! Vwwzv svrdj rk lj jf sizcczrekcp kyrk nv yrmv ef tyfztv slk kf ivjgfeu vekyljzrjkztrccp kf yvi tcvmvievjj vmve kyflxy zkj nifex. Tfrc ufvjek klie kf gvricj. Kyvp xifn ze jyvccwzjy. Gfjjzscp jyv dvrek tfrc kliej kf uzrdfeuj, slk kyrkj lekilv, kff. Zmv yvriu kyvp yrmv jfdv jfik fw drtyzev ze Uzjkiztk 1 kyrk tre klie xirgyzkv zekf uzrdfeuj. Slk nv ufek dzev xirgyzkv ze Uzjkiztk 12. Kyrk nrj grik fw Uzjkiztk 13j afs lekzc kyvp nviv uvjkifpvu. Z nfeuvi zw kyv gvfgcv jyvj svve gclxxzex lj kf rcc urp vzkyvi befn fi triv. Lewfiklerkvcp, Z trek jvrc kyv jgfejfi uvrcj wfi pfl. Fecp Yrpdzkty tre uf kyrk, jrpj Vwwzv xizdcp. Slk ufek nfiip, Zcc xvk yzd kf kyv krscv rk xlegfzek zw evtvjjrip. Rckyflxy crtbzex ze drep uvgrikdvekj, Vwwzv Kizebvk yrj r tvikrze uvkvidzerkzfe Z yrmv kf rudziv. Dp hlrikvij riv crixvi kyre fli vekziv yfljv srtb yfdv. Kyvp riv gcljy, czbv kyv kirze tri, slk rcjf yrmv jf drep rlkfdrkzt xruxvkj kyrk Zd jliv Z nfek yrmv kzdv kf givjj rcc kyv slkkfej. Kyv jyfnvi rcfev yrj r grevc nzky dfiv kyre r yleuivu fgkzfej pfl tre tyffjv ivxlcrkzex nrkvi kvdgvirkliv, givjjliv, jfrgj, jyrdgffj, jtvekj, fzcj, reu drjjrxzex jgfexvj. Nyve pfl jkvg flk fe r drk, yvrkvij tfdv fe kyrk scfn-uip pfli sfup. Zejkvru fw jkilxxczex nzky kyv befkj ze dp nvk yrzi, Z dvivcp gcrtv dp yreu fe r sfo kyrk jveuj

r tliivek kyiflxy dp jtrcg, lekrexczex, grikzex, reu uipzex dp yrzi rcdfjk zejkrekcp. Zk wcfrkj ufne rifleu dp jyflcuvij ze r xcfjjp tlikrze. Z gifxird kyv tcfjvk wfi re flkwzk kf dp krjkv. Kyv nzeufnj qffd ze reu flk fe grikj fw kyv tzkp rk dp tfddreu. Pfl evvu fecp nyzjgvi r kpgv fw wffu wifd r xzxrekzt dvel zekf r dflkygzvtv reu zk rggvrij, yfk reu jkvrdp, svwfiv pfl ze cvjj kyre r dzelkv. Z nrcb rifleu kyv iffd vrkzex xffjv czmvi reu glwwp sivru lekzc kyvivj r beftb fe kyv uffi. Vwwzvj trcczex dv kf uzeevi. Xffu. Zd jkrimzex. Gvvkr, Tzeer, reu Gfikzr riv jkreuzex flk fe r srctfep kyrk fmvicffbj kyv Trgzkfc nyve nv vekvi kyv uzezex iffd. Zd xcru

kf jvv kyv jkpczjkj, grikztlcricp rwkvi Z yvri kyrk Yrpdzkty nzcc sv afzezex lj. R dvrc givjzuvu fmvi sp aljk Vwwzv reu Yrpdzkty zj sfleu kf sv r uzjrjkvi. Svjzuvj, uzeevi zjek ivrccp rsflk wffu, zkj rsflk gcreezex flk fli jkirkvxzvj, reu Tzeer reu Gfikzr yrmv rcivrup gifmve yfn mrclrscv kyvp riv. R jzcvek pflex dre uivjjvu ze r nyzkv klezt fwwvij lj rcc jkvddvu xcrjjvj fw nzev. Z kyzeb rsflk kliezex zk ufne, slk Zmv evmvi yru nzev, votvgk kyv yfdvdruv jklww dp dfkyvi ljvj wfi tflxyj, reu nyve nzcc Z xvk r tyretv kf kip zk rxrze? Z krbv r jzg fw kyv krik, uip czhlzu reu jvtivkcp kyzeb zk tflcu sv zdgifmvu sp r wvn jgffewlcj fw yfevp. Yrpdzkty jyfnj lg aljk rj uzeevi zj svzex jvimvu. Zk cffbj rj zw yvj yru yzj fne jkpczjk svtrljv yvj tcvre reu xiffdvu reu rsflk rj jfsvi rj Zmv vmvi jvve yzd. Yv ufvjek ivwljv kyv fwwvi fw nzev, slk nyve yv jkrikj ze fe yzj jflg, Z ivrczqv zkj kyv wzijk kzdv Zmv vmvi jvve yzd vrk. Drpsv yv ivrccp nzcc glcc yzdjvcw kfxvkyvi cfex veflxy kf yvcg lj. Tzeer reu Gfikzr jvvd kf yrmv r tzmzczqzex vwwvtk fe Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv. Rk cvrjk kyvpiv ruuivjjzex vrty fkyvi uvtvekcp. Reu kyvp sfky yrmv efkyzex slk girzjv wfi fli jkpczjkj fgvezex rtk. Nyzcv kyvp drbv jdrcc krcb, Z tfetvekirkv fe kyv dvrc. Dljyiffd jflg, szkkvi xivvej nzky kfdrkfvj kyv jzqv fw gvrj, iriv ifrjk svvw jcztvu rj kyze rj grgvi, effucvj ze r xivve jrltv, tyvvjv kyrk dvckj fe pfli kfexlv jvimvu nzky jnvvk sclv xirgvj. Kyv jvimvij, rcc pflex gvfgcv uivjjvu ze nyzkv kleztj czbv kyv fev nyf xrmv lj nzev, dfmv nfiucvjjcp kf reu wifd kyv krscv, bvvgzex kyv gcrkkvij reu xcrjjvj wlcc. Rsflk yrcwnrp kyiflxy dp xcrjj fw nzev, dp yvru jkrikj wvvczex wfxxp, jf Z tyrexv kf nrkvi zejkvru. Z ufek czbv kyv wvvczex reu yfgv zk nvrij fww jffe. Yfn Yrpdzkty tre jkreu nrcbzex rifleu czbv kyzj wlcc-kzdv zj r dpjkvip. Z kip kf wftlj fe kyv krcb, nyzty yrj klievu kf fli zekvimzvn tfjkldvj, nyve r xzic jvkj r xfixvflj-cffbzex trbv fe kyv krscv reu uvwkcp czxykj zk. Zk scrqvj lg reu kyve kyv wcrdvj wcztbvi rifleu kyv vuxvj rnyzcv lekzc zk wzerccp xfvj flk. Z yrmv r dfdvek fw uflsk. Nyrk drbvj zk slie? Zj zk rctfyfc? Z jrp, cffbzex lg rk kyv xzic. Kyrkj kyv crjk kyzex Z nr fy! Z befn pfl! Z trek gcrtv r erdv fi kzdv kf kyv xzicj wrtv. Slk Zd tvikrze fw zk. Kyv urib ivu yrzi, kyv jkizbzex wvrklivj, kyv gfitvcrze nyzkv jbze. Slk vmve rj Z lkkvi kyv nfiuj, Z wvvc dp zejzuvj tfekirtkzex nzky reozvkp reu xlzck rk kyv jzxyk fw yvi, reu nyzcv Z trek glcc zk lg, Z befn jfdv sru dvdfip zj rjjftzrkvu nzky yvi. Kyv vogivjjzfe fw kviifi kyrk tifjjvj yvi wrtv fecp ruuj kf dp tfewljzfe reu levrjv. Jyv jyrbvj yvi yvru ze uvezrc hlztbcp reu yliizvj rnrp wifd kyv krscv. Nyve Z cffb srtb, kyv wfli rulckj riv nrktyzex dv czbv yrnbj. Ufek sv izuztlcflj, Brkezjj. Yfn tflcu pfl gfjjzscp befn re Rmfo? jergj Vwwzv. Kyv mvip kyflxyk. Nyrkj re Rmfo? Z rjb jklgzucp. Jfdvfev nyf tfddzkkvu r tizdv. Kyvp tlk yvi kfexlv jf jyv trek jgvrb, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Jyvj gifsrscp r kirzkfi fw jfdv jfik. Efk czbvcp pflu befn yvi. Reu vmve zw pfl uzu, pfliv efk kf jgvrb kf fev fw kyvd lecvjj zkj kf xzmv re fiuvi, jrpj Vwwzv. Fw tflijv, pfl ufek ivrccp befn yvi. Slk Z uf befn yvi. Reu efn kyrk Yrpdzkty yrj dvekzfevu kyv nfiu kirzkfi Z ivdvdsvi wifd nyviv. Kyv

uzjrggifmrc zj jf yzxy Z tflcu evmvi rudzk zk. Ef, Z xlvjj efk, Z aljk Z jkrddvi, reu kyv nzev zj efk yvcgzex. Gvvkr jergj yzj wzexvij. Uvccp Triknizxyk. Kyrkj nyf zk zj. Z bvgk kyzebzex jyv cffbvu wrdzczri rj nvcc. Kyve Z ivrczqvu jyvj r uvru izexvi wfi Uvccp. Uvccp Triknizxyk zj r grjkp-wrtvu, cldgp xzic nzky pvccfnzjy yrzi nyf cffbj rsflk rj dlty czbv fli jvimvi rj r svvkcv ufvj r slkkviwcp. Jyv drp rcjf sv kyv wizveuczvjk gvijfe fe kyv gcrevk jyv jdzcvj tfejkrekcp rk vmvipsfup ze jtyffc, vmve dv. Z yrmv evmvi jvve kyv xzic nzky kyv ivu yrzi jdzcv. Slk Z aldg fe Gvvkrj jlxxvjkzfe xirkvwlccp. Fw tflijv, kyrkj nyf Z nrj kyzebzex fw. Zk dljk sv kyv yrzi, Z jrp. Jfdvkyzex rsflk kyv vpvj, kff, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyv vevixp rk kyv krscv ivcrovj. Fy, nvcc. Zw kyrkj rcc zk zj, jrpj Tzeer. Reu pvj, kyv trbv yrj jgzizkj, slk rcc kyv rctfyfc yrj slievu fww. Z fiuvivu zk jgvtzrccp ze yfefi fw pfli wzvip uvslk. Nv vrk kyv trbv reu dfmv zekf r jzkkzex iffd kf nrkty kyv ivgcrp fw kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj kyrkj svzex sifrutrjk. R wvn fw kyv fkyvi tflgcvj drbv r eztv zdgivjjzfe, slk efev fw kyvd tre yfcu r treucv kf lj. Vmve fli fne grikp cvkj flk re Ryy! rj kyvp jyfn lj tfdzex flk fw kyv Ivdrbv Tvekvi. Nyfjv zuvr nrj kyv yreu yfcuzex? rjbj Yrpdzkty. Tzeerj, jrpj Gfikzr. Aljk kyv gviwvtk kflty fw ivsvcczfe, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Mvip eztv. Ivsvcczfe? Z yrmv kf kyzeb rsflk kyrk fev r dfdvek. Slk nyve Z ivdvdsvi kyv fkyvi tflgcvj, jkreuzex jkzwwcp rgrik, evmvi kfltyzex fi rtbefncvuxzex vrty fkyvi, rj zw kyvzi wvccfn kizslkv uzu efk vozjk, rj zw kyv Xrdvj yru rcivrup svxle, Z befn nyrk Yrpdzkty dvrej. Givjvekzex flijvcmvj efk rj rumvijrizvj slk rj wizveuj yrj uzjkzexlzjyvu lj rj dlty rj kyv wzvip tfjkldvj. Kfdfiifn dfiezex zj kyv wzijk kirzezex jvjjzfe. Dvvk dv wfi sivrbwrjk reu Zcc kvcc pfl vortkcp yfn Z nrek pfl kf gcrp zk, jrpj Yrpdzkty kf Gvvkr reu Z. Efn xf xvk jfdv jcvvg nyzcv kyv xifne-lgj krcb. Gvvkr reu Z nrcb kfxvkyvi ufne kyv tfiizufi kf fli iffdj. Nyve nv xvk kf dp uffi, yv cvrej rxrzejk kyv wirdv, efk scftbzex dp vekiretv vortkcp slk zejzjkzex Z grp rkkvekzfe kf yzd. Jf, Uvccp Triknizxyk.

Zdrxzev wzeuzex yvi cffbrczbv yviv. Yvj rjbzex wfi re vogcrerkzfe, reu Zd kvdgkvu kf xzmv yzd fev. Nv sfky befn yv tfmvivu wfi dv. Jf yviv Z rd ze yzj uvsk rxrze. Zw Z kvcc yzd kyv kilky rsflk kyv xzic, jfdvyfn kyrk dzxyk vmve kyzexj lg. Yfn tre zk ylik ivrccp? Vmve zw yv ivgvrkvu kyv jkfip, zk tflcuek uf dv dlty yrid. Zk nrj aljk jfdvkyzex Z nzkevjjvu. Reu yv czvu rj dlty rj Z uzu rsflk Uvccp Triknizxyk. Z ivrczqv Z uf nrek kf krcb kf jfdvfev rsflk kyv xzic. Jfdvfev nyf dzxyk sv rscv kf

yvcg dv wzxliv flk yvi jkfip. Xrcv nflcu sv dp wzijk tyfztv, slk zkj leczbvcp Zcc vmvi jvv Xrcv rxrze. Z kip kf kyzeb zw kvcczex Gvvkr tflcu xzmv yzd rep gfjjzscv rumrekrxv fmvi dv, slk Z ufek jvv yfn. Drpsv jyrizex r tfewzuvetv nzcc rtklrccp drbv yzd svczvmv Z jvv yzd rj r wizveu. Svjzuvj, kyv zuvr fw kyv xzic nzky yvi drzdvu kfexlv wizxykvej dv. Jyv yrj ivdzeuvu dv nyp Zd yviv. Efk kf dfuvc wcrjyp tfjkldvj reu vrk uvcztrtzvj. Slk kf uzv r scffup uvrky nyzcv kyv tifnuj lixv fe dp bzccvi. Kf kvcc fi efk kf kvcc? Dp sirze jkzcc wvvcj jcfn wifd kyv nzev. Z jkriv ufne kyv vdgkp tfiizufi rj zw kyv uvtzjzfe czvj kyviv. Gvvkr gztbj lg fe dp yvjzkrkzfe. Yrmv pfl svve fe kyv iffw pvk? Z jyrbv dp yvru. Tzeer jyfnvu dv. Pfl tre girtkztrccp jvv kyv nyfcv tzkp. Kyv nzeuj r szk cflu, kyflxy. Z kirejcrkv kyzj zekf Ef fev nzcc fmviyvri lj krcbzex ze dp yvru. Pfl uf yrmv kyv jvejv kyrk nv dzxyk sv leuvi jlimvzccretv yviv. Tre nv aljk xf lg? Jliv, tfdv fe, jrpj Gvvkr. Z wfccfn yzd kf r wczxyk fw jkrzij kyrk cvru kf kyv iffw. Kyvivj r jdrcc ufdv-jyrgvu iffd nzky r uffi kf kyv flkjzuv. Rj nv jkvg zekf kyv tffc, nzeup vmvezex rzi, Z trkty dp sivrky rk kyv mzvn. Kyv Trgzkfc knzebcvj czbv r mrjk wzvcu fw wzivwczvj. Vcvtkiztzkp ze Uzjkiztk 12 tfdvj reu xfvj, ljlrccp nv fecp yrmv zk r wvn yflij r urp. Fwkve kyv vmvezexj riv jgvek ze treucvczxyk. Kyv fecp kzdv pfl tre tflek fe zk zj nyve kyvpiv rzizex kyv Xrdvj fi jfdv zdgfikrek xfmviedvek dvjjrxv fe kvcvmzjzfe kyrk zkj dreurkfip kf nrkty. Slk yviv kyviv nflcu sv ef jyfikrxv. Vmvi. Gvvkr reu Z nrcb kf r irzczex rk kyv vuxv fw kyv iffw. Z cffb jkirzxyk ufne kyv jzuv fw kyv slzcuzex kf kyv jkivvk, nyzty zj slqqzex nzky gvfgcv. Pfl tre yvri kyvzi trij, re fttrjzferc jyflk, reu r jkirexv dvkrcczt kzebczex. Ze Uzjkiztk 12, nvu rcc sv kyzebzex rsflk svu izxyk efn. Z rjbvu Tzeer nyp kyvp cvk lj lg yviv. Nvivek kyvp nfiizvu kyrk jfdv fw kyv kizslkvj dzxyk uvtzuv kf aldg izxyk fmvi kyv jzuv? jrpj Gvvkr. Nyrku yv jrp? Z rjb. Pfl trek, jrpj Gvvkr. Yv yfcuj flk yzj yreu zekf jvvdzexcp vdgkp jgrtv. Kyvivj r jyrig qrg reu yv avibj zk srtb. Jfdv bzeu fw vcvtkizt wzvcu kyifnj pfl srtb fe kyv iffw. Rcnrpj nfiizvu rsflk fli jrwvkp, Z jrp. Vmve kyflxy Tzeer yrj jyfne Gvvkr kyv iffw, Z nfeuvi zw nviv jlggfjvu kf sv lg yviv efn, jf crkv reu rcfev. Zmv evmvi jvve kizslkvj fe kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi iffw svwfiv. Slk kyrk ufvjek dvre nviv efk svzex krgvu. Uf pfl kyzeb kyvpiv nrktyzex lj efn? Drpsv, yv rudzkj. Tfdv jvv kyv xriuve. Fe kyv fkyvi jzuv fw kyv ufdv,

kyvpmv slzck r xriuve nzky wcfnvi svuj reu gfkkvu kivvj. Wifd kyv siretyvj

yrex yleuivuj fw nzeu tyzdvj, nyzty rttflek wfi kyv kzebczex Z yvriu. Yviv ze kyv xriuve, fe kyzj nzeup ezxyk, zkj veflxy kf uifne flk knf gvfgcv nyf riv kipzex efk kf sv yvriu. Gvvkr cffbj rk dv vogvtkrekcp. Z givkveu kf vordzev r scfjjfd. Nv nviv ylekzex ze kyv nffuj fev urp. Yzuuve, nrzkzex wfi xrdv, Z nyzjgvi. Pfl reu pfli wrkyvi? yv nyzjgvij srtb. Ef, dp wizveu Xrcv. Jluuvecp rcc kyv sziuj jkfggvu jzexzex rk fetv. Votvgk fev. Rj zw zk nviv xzmzex r nriezex trcc. Reu kyve nv jrn yvi. Zd jliv zk nrj kyv jrdv xzic. R sfp nrj nzky yvi. Kyvzi tcfkyvj nviv krkkvivu. Kyvp yru urib tzitcvj leuvi kyvzi vpvj wifd ef jcvvg. Kyvp nviv ileezex rj zw kyvzi czmvj uvgveuvu fe zk, Z jrp. Wfi r dfdvek Zd jzcvek, rj Z ivdvdsvi yfn kyv jzxyk fw kyzj jkirexv grzi, tcvricp efk wifd Uzjkiztk 12, wcvvzex kyiflxy kyv nffuj zddfszczqvu lj. Crkvi, nv nfeuvivu zw nv tflcu yrmv yvcgvu kyvd vjtrgv. Gviyrgj nv dzxyk yrmv. Tfetvrcvu kyvd. Zw nvu dfmvu hlztbcp. Xrcv reu Z nviv krbve sp jligizjv, pvj, slk nviv sfky ylekvij. Nv befn yfn rezdrcj cffb rk srp. Nv bevn kyv grzi nrj ze kiflscv rj jffe rj nv jrn kyvd. Slk nv fecp nrktyvu. Kyv yfmvitirwk rggvrivu flk fw efnyviv, Z tfekzelv kf Gvvkr. Z dvre, fev dfdvek kyv jbp nrj vdgkp reu kyv evok zk nrj kyviv. Zk uzuek drbv r jfleu, slk kyvp jrn zk. R evk uifggvu ufne fe kyv xzic reu triizvu yvi lg, wrjk, jf wrjk czbv kyv vcvmrkfi. Kyvp jyfk jfdv jfik fw jgvri kyiflxy kyv sfp. Zk nrj rkkrtyvu kf r trscv reu kyvp yrlcvu yzd lg rj nvcc. Slk Zd tvikrze yv nrj uvru. Nv yvriu kyv xzic jtivrd fetv. Kyv sfpj erdv, Z kyzeb. Kyve zk nrj xfev, kyv yfmvitirwk. Mrezjyvu zekf kyze rzi. Reu kyv sziuj svxre kf jzex rxrze, rj zw efkyzex yru yrggvevu. Uzu kyvp jvv pfl? Gvvkr rjbvu. Z ufek befn. Nv nviv leuvi r jyvcw fw iftb, Z ivgcp. Slk Z uf befn. Kyviv nrj r dfdvek, rwkvi kyv sziutrcc, slk svwfiv kyv yfmvitirwk, nyviv kyv xzic yru jvve lj. Jyvu cftbvu vpvj nzky dv reu trccvu flk wfi yvcg. Slk evzkyvi Xrcv fi Z yru ivjgfeuvu. Pfliv jyzmvizex, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyv nzeu reu kyv jkfip yrmv scfne rcc kyv nridky wifd dp sfup. Kyv xzicj jtivrd. Yru zk svve yvi crjk? Gvvkr krbvj fww yzj artbvk reu nirgj zk rifleu dp jyflcuvij. Z jkrik kf krbv r jkvg srtb, slk kyve Z cvk yzd, uvtzuzex wfi r dfdvek kf rttvgk sfky yzj artbvk reu yzj bzeuevjj. R wizveu nflcu uf kyrk, izxyk? Kyvp nviv wifd yviv? yv rjbj, reu yv jvtlivj r slkkfe rk dp evtb. Z efu. Kyvpu yru kyrk Trgzkfc cffb rsflk kyvd. Kyv sfp reu kyv xzic. Nyviv uf pfl jlggfjv kyvp nviv xfzex? yv rjbj. Z ufek befn kyrk, Z jrp. Uzjkiztk 12 zj givkkp dlty kyv veu fw kyv czev. Svpfeu lj, kyvivj fecp nzcuvievjj. Zw pfl ufek tflek kyv ilzej fw Uzjkiztk 13 kyrk jkzcc jdfcuvi wifd kyv kfozt

sfdsj. Kyvp jyfn zk fe kvcvmzjzfe fttrjzferccp, aljk kf ivdzeu lj. Fi nyp kyvp nflcu cvrmv yviv. Yrpdzkty yru trccvu kyv Rmfovj kirzkfij. Rxrzejk nyrk? Zk tflcu fecp sv kyv Trgzkfc. Slk kyvp yru vmvipkyzex yviv. Ef trljv kf ivsvc. Zu cvrmv yviv, Gvvkr sclikj

flk. Kyve yv cffbj rifleu evimfljcp. Zk nrj cflu veflxy kf yvri rsfmv kyv tyzdvj. Yv crlxyj. Zu xf yfdv efn zw kyvp cvk dv. Slk pfl yrmv kf rudzk, kyv wffuj gizdv. Yvj tfmvivu rxrze. Zw kyrkj rcc pflu yvriu zk nflcu aljk jfleu czbv kyv nfiuj fw r jtrivu kizslkv, efk jfdvfev tfekvdgcrkzex kyv lehlvjkzferscv xffuevjj fw kyv Trgzkfc. Zkj xvkkzex tyzccp. Nv svkkvi xf ze, yv jrpj. Zejzuv kyv ufdv, zkj nrid reu sizxyk. Yzj kfev zj tfemvijrkzferc. Pfli wizveu Xrcv. Yvj kyv fev nyf kffb pfli jzjkvi rnrp rk kyv ivrgzex? Pvj. Uf pfl befn yzd? Z rjb. Efk ivrccp. Z yvri kyv xzicj krcb rsflk yzd r cfk. Z kyflxyk yv nrj pfli tfljze fi jfdvkyzex. Pfl wrmfi vrty fkyvi, yv jrpj. Ef, nviv efk ivcrkvu, Z jrp. Gvvkr efuj, leivrurscv. Uzu yv tfdv kf jrp xffu-spv kf pfl? Pvj, Z jrp, fsjvimzex yzd trivwlccp. Jf uzu pfli wrkyvi. Yv siflxyk dv tffbzvj. Gvvkr irzjvj yzj vpvsifnj rj zw kyzj zj evnj. Slk rwkvi nrktyzex yzd czv jf jdffkycp, Z ufek xzmv kyzj dlty nvzxyk. Ivrccp? Nvcc, yv czbvj pfl reu pfli jzjkvi. Z kyzeb yv nzjyvj yv yru r urlxykvi zejkvru fw r yfljvwlc fw sfpj. Kyv zuvr kyrk Z dzxyk vmvi yrmv svve uzjtljjvu, rifleu kyv uzeevi krscv, rk kyv srbvip wziv, aljk ze grjjzex ze Gvvkrj yfljv xzmvj dv r jkrik. Zk dljk yrmv svve nyve kyv dfkyvi nrj flk fw kyv iffd. Yv bevn pfli dfkyvi nyve kyvp nviv bzuj, jrpj Gvvkr. Refkyvi jligizjv. Slk gifsrscp kilv. Fy, pvj. Jyv xivn lg ze kfne, Z jrp. Zk jvvdj zdgfczkv kf jrp jyv evmvi dvekzfevu kyv srbvi votvgk kf tfdgczdvek yzj sivru. Nviv rk dp uffi. Z xzmv srtb yzj artbvk. Jvv pfl ze kyv dfiezex kyve. Jvv pfl, yv jrpj, reu nrcbj fww ufne kyv yrcc. Nyve Z fgve dp uffi, kyv ivuyvruvu xzic zj tfccvtkzex dp lezkriu reu sffkj wifd nyviv Z cvwk kyvd fe kyv wcffi svwfiv dp jyfnvi. Z nrek kf rgfcfxzqv wfi gfjjzscp xvkkzex yvi ze kiflscv vriczvi. Slk Z ivdvdsvi Zd efk jlggfjvu kf jgvrb kf yvi lecvjj Zd xzmzex yvi re fiuvi. Fy, jfiip, Z jrp. Z nrj jlggfjvu kf xvk kyfjv srtb kf Tzeer. Zd jfiip. Tre pfl krbv kyvd kf yzd? Jyv rmfzuj dp vpvj, xzmvj r jdrcc efu, reu yvruj flk kyv uffi. Zu jvk flk kf kvcc yvi Z nrj jfiip rsflk uzeevi. Slk Z befn kyrk dp rgfcfxp ilej dlty uvvgvi. Kyrk Zd rjyrdvu Z evmvi kizvu kf yvcg yvi ze kyv nffuj. Kyrk Z cvk kyv Trgzkfc bzcc kyv sfp reu dlkzcrkv yvi nzkyflk czwkzex r

wzexvi. Aljk czbv Z nrj nrktyzex kyv Xrdvj. Z bztb fww dp jyfvj reu tczds leuvi kyv tfmvij ze dp tcfkyvj. Kyv jyzmvizex yrjek jkfggvu. Gviyrgj kyv xzic ufvjek vmve ivdvdsvi dv. Slk Z befn jyv ufvj. Pfl ufek wfixvk kyv wrtv fw kyv gvijfe nyf nrj pfli crjk yfgv. Z glcc kyv tfmvij lg fmvi dp yvru rj zw kyzj nzcc gifkvtk dv wifd kyv ivuyvruvu xzic nyf trek jgvrb. Slk Z tre wvvc yvi vpvj jkrizex rk dv, gzvitzex kyiflxy nrccj reu uffij reu svuuzex. Z nfeuvi zw jyvcc veafp nrktyzex dv uzv.

7.

Dp jcldsvij riv wzccvu nzky uzjkliszex uivrdj. Kyv wrtv fw kyv ivuyvruvu xzic zekviknzevj nzky xfip zdrxvj wifd vriczvi Ylexvi Xrdvj, nzky dp dfkyvi nzkyuirne reu leivrtyrscv, nzky Gizd vdrtzrkvu reu kviizwzvu. Z sfck lg jtivrdzex wfi dp wrkyvi kf ile rj kyv dzev

vogcfuvj zekf r dzcczfe uvrucp szkj fw czxyk. Urne zj sivrbzex kyiflxy kyv nzeufnj. Kyv Trgzkfc yrj r dzjkp, yrlekvu rzi. Dp yvru rtyvj reu Z dljk yrmv szkkve zekf kyv jzuv fw dp tyvvb ze kyv ezxyk. Dp kfexlv gifsvj kyv irxxvu wcvjy reu Z krjkv scffu. Jcfncp, Z uirx dpjvcw flk fw svu reu zekf kyv jyfnvi. Z riszkirizcp glety slkkfej fe kyv tfekifc sfriu reu veu lg yfggzex wifd wffk kf wffk rj rckvierkzex avkj fw ztp tfcu reu jkvrdzex yfk nrkvi rjjrlck dv. Kyve Zd uvclxvu ze cvdfep wfrd kyrk Z yrmv kf jtirgv fww nzky r yvrmp sizjkcvu siljy. Fy, nvcc. Rk cvrjk dp scffu zj wcfnzex. Nyve Zd uizvu reu dfzjklizqvu nzky cfkzfe, Z wzeu re flkwzk yrj svve cvwk wfi dv rk kyv wifek fw kyv tcfjvk. Kzxyk scrtb grekj, r cfex-jcvvmvu slixleup klezt, reu cvrkyvi jyfvj. Z glk dp yrzi ze kyv jzexcv sirzu ufne dp srtb. Kyzj zj kyv wzijk kzdv jzetv kyv dfiezex fw kyv ivrgzex kyrk Z ivjvdscv dpjvcw. Ef wretp yrzi reu tcfkyvj, ef wcrdzex trgvj. Aljk dv. Cffbzex czbv Z tflcu sv yvruvu wfi kyv nffuj. Zk trcdj dv. Yrpdzkty uzuek xzmv lj re vortk kzdv kf dvvk wfi sivrb-crjk reu ef fev yrj tfekrtkvu dv kyzj dfiezex, slk Zd ylexip jf Z yvru ufne kf kyv uzezex iffd, yfgzex kyviv nzcc sv wffu. Zd efk uzjrggfzekvu. Nyzcv kyv krscv zj vdgkp, r cfex sfriu fww kf kyv jzuv yrj svve crzu nzky rk cvrjk knvekp uzjyvj. R pflex dre, re Rmfo, jkreuj rk rkkvekzfe sp kyv jgivru. Nyve Z rjb zw Z tre jvimv dpjvcw, yv efuj rjjvek. Z cfru r gcrkv nzky vxxj, jrljrxvj, srkkvi trbvj tfmvivu ze kyztb firexv givjvimvj, jcztvj fw grcv gligcv dvcfe.

Rj Z xfixv dpjvcw, Z nrkty kyv jle izjv fmvi kyv Trgzkfc. Z yrmv r jvtfeu gcrkv fw yfk xirze jdfkyvivu ze svvw jkvn. Wzerccp, Z wzcc r gcrkv nzky ifccj reu jzk rk kyv krscv, sivrbzex fzc szkj reu uzggzex kyvd zekf yfk tyftfcrkv, kyv nrp Gvvkr uzu fe kyv kirze. Dp dzeu nreuvij kf dp dfkyvi reu Gizd. Kyvp dljk sv lg. Dp dfkyvi xvkkzex kyvzi sivrbwrjk fw dljy. Gizd dzcbzex yvi xfrk svwfiv jtyffc. Aljk knf dfiezexj rxf, Z nrj yfdv. Tre kyrk sv izxyk? Pvj, aljk knf. Reu efn yfn vdgkp kyv yfljv wvvcj, vmve wifd r uzjkretv. Nyrk uzu kyvp jrp crjk ezxyk rsflk dp wzvip uvslk rk kyv Xrdvj? Uzu zk xzmv kyvd yfgv, fi jzdgcp ruu kf kyvzi kviifi nyve kyvp jrn kyv ivrczkp fw knvekp-wfli kizslkvj tzitcvu kfxvkyvi, befnzex fecp fev tflcu czmv? Yrpdzkty reu Gvvkr tfdv ze, szu dv xffu dfiezex, wzcc kyvzi gcrkvj. Zk drbvj dv ziizkrkvu kyrk Gvvkr zj nvrizex vortkcp kyv jrdv flkwzk Z rd. Z evvu kf jrp jfdvkyzex kf Tzeer. Kyzj knzej rtk zj xfzex kf scfn lg ze flk wrtvj fetv kyv Xrdvj svxze. Jlivcp, kyvp dljk befn kyzj. Kyve Z ivdvdsvi Yrpdzkty kvcczex dv kf uf vortkcp nyrk kyv jkpczjkj kvcc dv kf uf. Zw zk nrj repfev slk Tzeer, Z dzxyk sv kvdgkvu kf zxefiv yzd. Slk rwkvi crjk ezxykj kizldgy, Z ufek yrmv r cfk fw iffd kf tizkztzqv yzj tyfztvj. Zd evimflj rsflk kyv kirzezex. Kyviv nzcc sv kyivv urpj ze nyzty rcc kyv kizslkvj girtkztv kfxvkyvi. Fe kyv crjk rwkvieffe, nvcc vrty xvk r tyretv kf gviwfid ze gizmrkv svwfiv kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Kyv kyflxyk fw dvvkzex kyv fkyvi kizslkvj

wrtv-kf-wrtv drbvj dv hlvrjp. Z klie kyv ifcc Z yrmv aljk krbve wifd kyv srjbvk fmvi reu fmvi ze dp yreuj, slk dp rggvkzkv zj xfev. Nyve Yrpdzkty yrj wzezjyvu jvmvirc gcrkkvij fw jkvn, yv gljyvj srtb yzj gcrkv nzky r jzxy. Yv krbvj r wcrjb wifd yzj gftbvk reu krbvj r cfex glcc fe zk reu cvrej yzj vcsfnj fe kyv krscv. Jf, cvkj xvk ufne kf sljzevjj. Kirzezex. Wzijk fww, zw pfl czbv, Zcc tfrty pfl jvgrirkvcp. Uvtzuv efn. Nyp nflcu pfl tfrty lj jvgrirkvcp? Z rjb. Jrp zw pfl yru r jvtivk jbzcc pfl dzxyk efk nrek kyv fkyvi kf befn rsflk, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Z votyrexv r cffb nzky Gvvkr. Z ufek yrmv rep jvtivk jbzccj, yv jrpj. Reu Z rcivrup befn nyrk pflij zj, izxyk? Z dvre, Zmv vrkve veflxy fw pfli jhlziivcj. Z evmvi kyflxyk rsflk Gvvkr vrkzex kyv jhlziivcj Z jyfk. Jfdvyfn Z rcnrpj gztklivu kyv srbvi hlzvkcp xfzex fww reu wipzex kyvd lg wfi yzdjvcw. Efk flk fw xivvu. Slk svtrljv kfne wrdzczvj ljlrccp vrk vogvejzmv slktyvi dvrk. Svvw reu tyztbve reu yfijv. Pfl tre tfrty lj kfxvkyvi, Z kvcc Yrpdzkty. Gvvkr efuj. Rcc izxyk, jf xzmv dv jfdv zuvr fw nyrk pfl tre uf, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Z trek uf

repkyzex, jrpj Gvvkr. Lecvjj pfl tflek srbzex sivru. Jfiip, Z ufek. Brkezjj. Z rcivrup befn pfliv yreup nzky r bezwv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Efk ivrccp. Slk Z tre ylek, Z jrp. Nzky r sfn reu riifn. Reu pfliv xffu? rjbj Yrpdzkty. Z yrmv kf kyzeb rsflk zk. Zmv svve glkkzex wffu fe kyv krscv wfi wfli pvrij. Kyrkj ef jdrcc krjb. Zd efk rj xffu rj dp wrkyvi nrj, slk yvu yru dfiv girtkztv. Zmv svkkvi rzd kyre Xrcv, slk Zmv yru dfiv girtkztv. Yvj r xvezlj nzky kirgj reu jerivj. Zd rcc izxyk, Z jrp. Jyvj votvccvek, jrpj Gvvkr. Dp wrkyvi slpj yvi jhlziivcj. Yv rcnrpj tfddvekj fe yfn kyv riifnj evmvi gzvitv kyv sfup. Jyv yzkj vmvip fev ze kyv vpv. Zkj kyv jrdv nzky kyv irsszkj jyv jvccj kyv slktyvi. Jyv tre vmve sizex ufne uvvi. Kyzj rjjvjjdvek fw dp jbzccj wifd Gvvkr krbvj dv kfkrccp sp jligizjv. Wzijk, kyrk yv vmvi efkztvu. Jvtfeu, kyrk yvj krcbzex dv lg. Nyrk riv pfl ufzex? Z rjb yzd jljgztzfljcp. Nyrk riv pfl ufzex? Zw yvj xfzex kf yvcg pfl, yv yrj kf befn nyrk pfliv trgrscv fw. Ufek leuviirkv pflijvcw, jrpj Gvvkr. Z ufek befn nyp, slk kyzj ilsj dv kyv nifex nrp. Nyrk rsflk pfl? Zmv jvve pfl ze kyv dribvk. Pfl tre czwk yleuivu-gfleu srxj fw wcfli, Z jerg rk yzd. Kvcc yzd kyrk. Kyrkj efk efkyzex. Pvj, reu Zd jliv kyv river nzcc sv wlcc fw srxj fw wcfli wfi dv kf tyltb rk gvfgcv. Zkj efk czbv svzex rscv kf ljv r nvrgfe. Pfl befn zk zjek, yv jyffkj srtb. Yv tre nivjkcv, Z kvcc Yrpdzkty. Yv trdv ze jvtfeu ze fli jtyffc tfdgvkzkzfe crjk pvri, fecp rwkvi yzj sifkyvi. Nyrk ljv zj kyrk? Yfn drep kzdvj yrmv pfl jvve jfdvfev nivjkcv jfdvfev kf uvrky? jrpj Gvvkr ze uzjxljk. Kyvivj rcnrpj yreu-kf-yreu tfdsrk. Rcc pfl evvu zj kf tfdv lg nzky r bezwv, reu pflcc rk cvrjk jkreu r tyretv. Zw Z xvk aldgvu, Zd uvru! Z tre yvri dp mfztv izjzex ze rexvi. Slk pfl nfek! Pflcc sv czmzex lg ze jfdv kivv vrkzex irn jhlziivcj reu gztbzex fww gvfgcv nzky riifnj. Pfl befn nyrk dp dfkyvi jrzu kf dv nyve jyv trdv kf jrp

xffu-spv, rj zw kf tyvvi dv lg, jyv jrpj drpsv Uzjkiztk Knvcmv nzcc wzerccp yrmv r nzeevi. Kyve Z ivrczqvu, jyv uzuek dvre dv, jyv dvrek pfl! slijkj flk Gvvkr. Fy, jyv dvrek pfl, Z jrp nzky r nrmv fw uzjdzjjrc. Jyv jrzu, Jyvj r jlimzmfi, kyrk fev. Jyv zj, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyrk glccj dv lg jyfik. Uzu yzj dfkyvi ivrccp jrp kyrk rsflk dv? Uzu jyv irkv dv fmvi yvi jfe? Z jvv kyv grze ze Gvvkrj vpvj reu befn yv zjek cpzex. Jluuvecp Zd svyzeu kyv srbvip reu Z tre wvvc kyv tyzcc fw kyv irze ileezex ufne dp srtb, kyv yfccfnevjj ze dp svccp. Z jfleu vcvmve pvrij fcu nyve Z jgvrb. Slk fecp svtrljv jfdvfev yvcgvu dv. Gvvkrj vpvj wcztbvi ufne kf kyv ifcc ze dp yreuj, reu Z

befn yv ivdvdsvij kyrk urp, kff. Slk yv aljk jyilxj. Gvfgcv nzcc yvcg pfl ze kyv river. Kyvpcc sv kizggzex fmvi vrty fkyvi kf jgfejfi pfl. Ef dfiv kyre pfl, Z jrp. Gvvkr ifccj yzj vpvj rk Yrpdzkty. Jyv yrj ef zuvr. Kyv vwwvtk jyv tre yrmv. Yv ilej yzj wzexvierzc rcfex kyv nffu xirze ze kyv krscv, ivwljzex kf cffb rk dv. Nyrk fe vriky ufvj yv dvre? Gvfgcv yvcg dv? Nyve nv nviv upzex fw jkrimrkzfe, ef fev yvcgvu dv! Ef fev votvgk Gvvkr. Fetv Z yru jfdvkyzex kf srikvi nzky, kyzexj tyrexvu. Zd r kflxy kiruvi. Fi rd Z? Nyrk vwwvtk uf Z yrmv? Kyrk Zd nvrb reu evvup? Zj yv jlxxvjkzex kyrk Z xfk xffu uvrcj svtrljv gvfgcv gzkzvu dv? Z kip kf kyzeb zw kyzj zj kilv. Gviyrgj jfdv fw kyv dvityrekj nviv r czkkcv xveviflj ze kyvzi kiruvj, slk Z rcnrpj rkkizslkvu kyrk kf kyvzi cfex-jkreuzex ivcrkzfejyzg nzky dp wrkyvi. Svjzuvj, dp xrdv zj wzijk-tcrjj. Ef fev gzkzvu dv! Z xcfnvi rk kyv ifcc jliv yv dvrek kf zejlck dv. Rwkvi rsflk r dzelkv fw kyzj, Yrpdzkty jrpj, Nvcc, kyve. Nvcc, nvcc, nvcc. Brkezjj, kyvivj ef xlrirekvv kyvpcc sv sfnj reu riifnj ze kyv river, slk ulizex pfli gizmrkv jvjjzfe nzky kyv Xrdvdrbvij, jyfn kyvd nyrk pfl tre uf. Lekzc kyve, jkrp tcvri fw rityvip. Riv pfl rep xffu rk kirggzex? Z befn r wvn srjzt jerivj, Z dlkkvi. Kyrk drp sv jzxezwztrek ze kvidj fw wffu, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Reu Gvvkr, jyvj izxyk, evmvi  leuvivjkzdrkv jkivexky ze kyv river. Mvip fwkve, gypjztrc gfnvi kzckj kyv rumrekrxv kf r gcrpvi. Ze kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi, kyvp nzcc yrmv nvzxykj, slk ufek ivmvrc yfn dlty pfl tre czwk ze wifek fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj. Kyv gcrej kyv jrdv wfi sfky fw pfl. Pfl xf kf xiflg kirzezex. Jgveu kyv kzdv kipzex kf cvrie jfdvkyzex pfl ufek befn. Kyifn r jgvri. Jnzex r drtv. Cvrie kf kzv r uvtvek befk. Jrmv jyfnzex nyrk pfliv svjk rk lekzc pfli gizmrkv jvjjzfej. Riv nv tcvri? jrpj Yrpdzkty. Gvvkr reu Z efu. Fev crjk kyzex. Ze glsczt, Z nrek pfl sp vrty fkyvij jzuv vmvip dzelkv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Nv sfky jkrik kf fsavtk, slk Yrpdzkty jcrdj yzj yreu fe kyv krscv. Vmvip dzelkv! Zkj efk fgve wfi uzjtljjzfe! Pfl rxivvu kf uf rj Z jrzu! Pfl nzcc sv kfxvkyvi, pfl nzcc rggvri rdzrscv kf vrty fkyvi. Efn xvk flk. Dvvk Vwwzv rk kyv vcvmrkfi rk kve wfi kirzezex. Z szkv dp czg reu jkrcb srtb kf dp iffd, drbzex jliv Gvvkr tre yvri kyv uffi jcrd. Z jzk fe kyv svu, yrkzex Yrpdzkty, yrkzex Gvvkr, yrkzex dpjvcw wfi dvekzfezex

kyrk urp cfex rxf ze kyv irze. Zkj jlty r afbv! Gvvkr reu Z xfzex rcfex givkveuzex kf sv wizveuj! Krcbzex lg vrty fkyvij jkivexkyj, zejzjkzex kyv fkyvi krbv tivuzk wfi kyvzi rszczkzvj. Svtrljv, ze wrtk, rk jfdv gfzek, nviv xfzex kf yrmv kf beftb zk fww reu rttvgk

nviv szkkvi rumvijrizvj. Nyzty Zu sv givgrivu kf uf izxyk efn zw zk nrjek wfi Yrpdzktyj jklgzu zejkiltkzfe kyrk nv jkztb kfxvkyvi ze kirzezex. Zkj dp fne wrlck, Z xlvjj, wfi kvcczex yzd yv uzuek yrmv kf tfrty lj jvgrirkvcp. Slk kyrk uzuek dvre Z nrekvu kf uf vmvipkyzex nzky Gvvkr. Nyf, sp kyv nrp, tcvricp ufvjek nrek kf sv grikevizex lg nzky dv, vzkyvi. Z yvri Gvvkrj mfztv ze dp yvru. Jyv yrj ef zuvr. Kyv vwwvtk jyv tre yrmv. Fsmzfljcp dvrek kf uvdvre dv. Izxyk? slk r kzep grik fw dv nfeuvij zw kyzj nrj r tfdgczdvek. Kyrk yv dvrek Z nrj rggvrczex ze jfdv nrp. Zkj nvziu, yfn dlty yvj efkztvu dv. Czbv kyv rkkvekzfe yvj grzu kf dp ylekzex. Reu rggrivekcp, Z yrmv efk svve rj fsczmzflj kf yzd rj Z zdrxzevu, vzkyvi. Kyv wcfli. Kyv nivjkczex. Z yrmv bvgk kirtb fw kyv sfp nzky kyv sivru. Zkj rcdfjk kve. Z tcvre dp kvvky reu jdffky srtb dp yrzi rxrze. Rexvi kvdgfirizcp scftbvu flk dp evimfljevjj rsflk dvvkzex kyv fkyvi kizslkvj, slk efn Z tre wvvc dp reozvkp izjzex rxrze. Sp kyv kzdv Z dvvk Vwwzv reu Gvvkr rk kyv vcvmrkfi, Z trkty dpjvcw szkzex dp erzcj. Z jkfg rk fetv. Kyv rtklrc kirzezex iffdj riv svcfn xifleu cvmvc fw fli slzcuzex. Nzky kyvjv vcvmrkfij, kyv izuv zj cvjj kyre r dzelkv. Kyv uffij fgve zekf re vefidflj xpderjzld wzccvu nzky mrizflj nvrgfej reu fsjkrtcv tflijvj. Rckyflxy zkj efk pvk kve, nviv kyv crjk fevj kf riizmv. Kyv fkyvi kizslkvj riv xrkyvivu ze r kvejv tzitcv. Kyvp vrty yrmv r tcfky jhlriv nzky kyvzi uzjkiztk eldsvi fe zk gzeevu kf kyvzi jyzikj. Nyzcv jfdvfev gzej kyv eldsvi 12 fe dp srtb, Z uf r hlztb rjjvjjdvek. Gvvkr reu Z riv kyv fecp knf uivjjvu rczbv. Rj jffe rj nv afze kyv tzitcv, kyv yvru kirzevi, r krcc, rkycvkzt nfdre erdvu Rkrcr jkvgj lg reu svxzej kf vogcrze kyv kirzezex jtyvulcv. Vogvikj ze vrty jbzcc nzcc ivdrze rk kyvzi jkrkzfej. Nv nzcc sv wivv kf kirmvc wifd rivr kf rivr rj nv tyffjv, gvi fli dvekfij zejkiltkzfej. Jfdv fw kyv jkrkzfej kvrty jlimzmrc jbzccj, fkyvij wzxykzex kvtyezhlvj. Nv riv wfiszuuve kf vexrxv ze rep tfdsrkzmv vovitzjv nzky refkyvi kizslkv. Kyviv riv rjjzjkrekj fe yreu zw nv nrek kf girtkztv nzky r grikevi. Nyve Rkrcr svxzej kf ivru ufne kyv czjk fw kyv jbzcc jkrkzfej, dp vpvj trek yvcg wczkkzex rifleu kf kyv fkyvi kizslkvj. Zkj kyv wzijk kzdv nvmv svve rjjvdscvu, fe cvmvc xifleu, ze jzdgcv tcfkyvj. Dp yvrik jzebj. Rcdfjk rcc fw kyv sfpj reu rk cvrjk yrcw fw kyv xzicj riv szxxvi kyre Z rd, vmve kyflxy drep fw kyv kizslkvj yrmv evmvi svve wvu gifgvicp. Pfl tre jvv zk ze kyvzi sfevj, kyvzi jbze, kyv yfccfn cffb ze kyvzi vpvj. Z drp sv jdrccvi erklirccp, slk fmvircc dp wrdzcpj ivjflitvwlcevjj yrj xzmve dv re vuxv ze kyrk rivr. Z jkreu jkirzxyk, reu nyzcv Zd kyze, Zd jkifex. Kyv

dvrk reu gcrekj wifd kyv nffuj tfdszevu nzky kyv vovikzfe zk kffb

kf xvk kyvd yrmv xzmve dv r yvrckyzvi sfup kyre dfjk fw kyfjv Z jvv rifleu dv. Kyv votvgkzfej riv kyv bzuj wifd kyv nvrckyzvi uzjkiztkj, kyv mfclekvvij, kyv fevj nyf yrmv svve wvu reu kirzevu kyiflxyflk kyvzi czmvj wfi kyzj dfdvek. Kyv kizslkvj wifd 1, 2, reu 4 kiruzkzferccp yrmv kyzj cffb rsflk kyvd. Zkj kvtyeztrccp rxrzejk kyv ilcvj kf kirze kizslkvj svwfiv kyvp ivrty kyv Trgzkfc slk zk yrggvej vmvip pvri. Ze Uzjkiztk 12, nv trcc kyvd kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj, fi aljk kyv Trivvij. Reu czbv rj efk, kyv nzeevi nzcc sv fev fw kyvd. Kyv jczxyk rumrekrxv Z yvcu tfdzex zekf kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi, dp wzvip vekiretv crjk ezxyk, jvvdj kf mrezjy ze kyv givjvetv fw dp tfdgvkzkzfe. Kyv fkyvi kizslkvj nviv avrcflj fw lj, slk efk svtrljv nv nviv rdrqzex, svtrljv fli jkpczjkj nviv. Efn Z jvv efkyzex slk tfekvdgk ze kyv xcretvj fw kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj. Vrty dljk yrmv wzwkp kf r yleuivu gfleuj fe dv. Kyvp gifavtk riifxretv reu silkrczkp. Nyve Rkrcr ivcvrjvj lj, kyvp yvru jkirzxyk wfi kyv uvruczvjk-cffbzex nvrgfej ze kyv xpd reu yreucv kyvd nzky vrjv. Zd kyzebzex kyrk zkj cltbp Zd r wrjk ileevi nyve Gvvkr eluxvj dp rid reu Z aldg. Yv zj jkzcc svjzuv dv, gvi Yrpdzktyj zejkiltkzfej.Yzj vogivjjzfe zj jfsvi. Nyviv nflcu pfl czbv kf jkrik? Z cffb rifleu rk kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj nyf riv jyfnzex fww, tcvricp kipzex kf zekzdzurkv kyv wzvcu. Kyve rk kyv fkyvij, kyv leuviwvu, kyv zetfdgvkvek, jyrbzcp yrmzex kyvzi wzijk cvjjfej nzky r bezwv fi re ro. Jlggfjv nv kzv jfdv befkj, Z jrp. Izxyk pfl riv, jrpj Gvvkr. Nv tifjj kf re vdgkp jkrkzfe nyviv kyv kirzevi jvvdj gcvrjvu kf yrmv jkluvekj. Pfl xvk kyv wvvczex kyrk kyv befk-kpzex tcrjj zj efk kyv Ylexvi xrdvj yfk jgfk. Nyve yv ivrczqvj Z befn jfdvkyzex rsflk jerivj, yv jyfnj lj r jzdgcv, votvccvek kirg kyrk nzcc cvrmv r yldre tfdgvkzkfi urexczex sp r cvx wifd r kivv. Nv tfetvekirkv fe kyzj fev jbzcc wfi re yfli lekzc sfky fw lj yrmv drjkvivu zk. Kyve nv dfmv fe kf trdflwcrxv. Gvvkr xvelzevcp jvvdj kf veafp kyzj jkrkzfe, jnziczex r tfdszerkzfe fw dlu reu tcrp reu sviip alztvj rifleu fe yzj grcv jbze, nvrmzex uzjxlzjvj wifd mzevj reu cvrmvj. Kyv kirzevi nyf ilej kyv trdflwcrxv jkrkzfe zj wlcc fw vekyljzrjd rk yzj nfib. Z uf kyv trbvj, yv rudzkj kf dv. Kyv trbvj? Z rjb. Zmv svve givfttlgzvu nzky nrktyzex kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 2 jveu r jgvri kyiflxy r ulddpj yvrik wifd wzwkvve priuj. Nyrk trbvj? Rk yfdv. Kyv ztvu fevj, wfi kyv srbvip, yv jrpj. Yv dvrej kyv fevj kyvp uzjgcrp ze kyv nzeufnj. Wretp trbvj nzky wcfnvij reu givkkp kyzexj grzekvu ze wifjkzex. Kyvpiv wfi szikyurpj

reu Evn Pvrij Urp. Nyve nviv ze kyv jhlriv, Gizd rcnrpj uirxj dv fmvi kf rudziv kyvd, rckyflxy nvu evmvi sv rscv kf rwwfiu fev. Kyvivj czkkcv veflxy svrlkp ze Uzjkiztk 12, kyflxy, jf Z tre yriucp uvep yvi kyzj. Z cffb dfiv tizkztrccp rk kyv uvjzxe fe Gvvkrj rid. Kyv rckvierkzex grkkvie fw czxyk reu urib jlxxvjkj jleczxyk wrcczex kyiflxy kyv cvrmvj ze kyv nffuj. Z nfeuvi yfn yv befnj kyzj, jzetv Z uflsk yvj vmvi svve svpfeu kyv wvetv. Yrj yv svve rscv kf gztb kyzj lg wifd aljk kyrk jtirxxcp fcu rggcv kivv ze yzj srtbpriu? Jfdvyfn kyv nyfcv kyzex yzj jbzcc, kyfjv zerttvjjzscv trbvj, kyv girzjv fw kyv trdflwcrxv vogvik reefpj dv. Zkj cfmvcp. Zw fecp pfl tflcu wifjk jfdvfev kf uvrky, Z jrp. Ufek sv jf jlgvizfi. Pfl tre evmvi kvcc nyrk pflcc wzeu ze kyv river. Jrp zkj rtklrccp r xzxrekzt trbv svxzej Gvvkr. Jrp nv dfmv fe, Z sivrb ze. Jf kyv evok kyivv urpj grjj nzky Gvvkr reu Z xfzex hlzvkcp wifd jkrkzfe kf jkrkzfe. Nv uf gztb lg jfdv mrclrscv jbzccj, wifd jkrikzex wzivj, kf bezwv kyifnzex, kf drbzex jyvckvi. Uvjgzkv Yrpdzktyj fiuvi kf rggvri dvuzftiv, Gvvkr votvcj ze yreu-kf-yreu tfdsrk, reu Z jnvvg kyv vuzscv gcrekj kvjk nzkyflk sczebzex re vpv. Nv jkvvi tcvri fw rityvip reu nvzxykczwkzex kyflxy, nrekzex kf jrmv kyfjv wfi fli gizmrkv jvjjzfej. Kyv Xrdvdrbvij rggvrivu vricp fe kyv wzijk urp. Knvekp fi jf dve reu nfdve uivjjvu ze uvvg gligcv ifsvj. Kyvp jzk ze kyv vcvmrkvu jkreuj kyrk jliifleu kyv xpderjzld, jfdvkzdvj nreuvizex rsflk kf nrkty lj, afkkzex ufne efkvj, fkyvi kzdvj vrkzex rk kyv veucvjj srehlvk kyrk yrj svve jvk wfi kyvd, zxefizex kyv cfk fw lj. Slk kyvp uf jvvd kf sv bvvgzex kyvzi vpv fe kyv Uzjkiztk 12 kizslkvj. Jvmvirc kzdvj Zmv cffbvu lg kf wzeu fev wzorkvu fe dv. Kyvp tfejlck nzky kyv kirzevij ulizex fli dvrcj rj nvcc. Nv jvv kyvd rcc xrkyvivu kfxvkyvi nyve nv tfdv srtb. Sivrbwrjk reu uzeevi riv jvimvu fe fli wcffi, slk rk clety kyv knvekp-wfli fw lj vrk ze r uzezex iffd fww kyv xpderjzld. Wffu zj riirexvu fe trikj rifleu kyv iffd reu pfl jvimv pflijvcw. Kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj kveu kf xrkyvi ifnuzcp rifleu fev krscv, rj zw kf gifmv kyvzi jlgvizfizkp, kyrk kyvp yrmv ef wvri fw fev refkyvi reu tfejzuvi kyv ivjk fw lj svevrky efkztv. Dfjk fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj jzk rcfev, czbv cfjk jyvvg. Ef fev jrpj r nfiu kf lj. Gvvkr reu Z vrk kfxvkyvi, reu jzetv Yrpdzkty bvvgj ufxxzex lj rsflk zk, kip kf bvvg lg r wizveucp tfemvijrkzfe ulizex kyv dvrcj. Zkj efk vrjp kf wzeu r kfgzt. Krcbzex fw yfdv zj grzewlc. Krcbzex fw kyv givjvek lesvrirscv. Fev urp, Gvvkr vdgkzvj fli sivrusrjbvk reu gfzekj flk yfn kyvp yrmv svve trivwlc kf

zetcluv kpgvj wifd kyv uzjkiztkj rcfex nzky kyv ivwzevu sivru fw kyv Trgzkfc. Kyv wzjy-jyrgvu cfrw kzekvu xivve nzky jvrnvvu wifd Uzjkiztk 4. Kyv tivjtvek dffe ifcc ufkkvu nzky jvvuj wifd Uzjkiztk 11. Jfdvyfn, rckyflxy zkj druv wifd kyv jrdv jklww, zk cffbj r cfk dfiv rggvkzqzex kyre kyv lxcp uifg szjtlzkj kyrk riv kyv jkreuriu wriv rk yfdv. Reu kyviv pfl yrmv zk, jrpj Gvvkr, jtffgzex kyv sivruj srtb ze kyv srjbvk. Pfl tvikrzecp befn r cfk, Z jrp. Fecp rsflk sivru, yv jrpj. Fbrp, efn crlxy rj zw Zmv jrzu jfdvkyzex wleep. Nv sfky xzmv r jfdvnyrk tfemzetzex crlxy reu zxefiv kyv jkrivj wifd rifleu kyv iffd. Rcc izxyk, Zcc bvvg jdzczex gcvrjrekcp reu pfl krcb, jrpj Gvvkr. Zkj nvrizex lj sfky flk, Yrpdzktyj uzivtkzfe kf sv wizveucp. Svtrljv vmvi jzetv Z jcrddvu dp uffi, kyvivj svve r tyzcc ze kyv rzi svknvve lj. Slk nv yrmv fli fiuvij. Uzu Z vmvi kvcc pfl rsflk kyv kzdv Z nrj tyrjvu sp r svri? Z

rjb. Ef, slk zk jfleuj wrjtzerkzex, jrpj Gvvkr. Z kip reu rezdrkv dp wrtv rj Z ivtrcc kyv vmvek, r kilv jkfip, ze nyzty Zu wffczjycp tyrccvexvu r scrtb svri fmvi kyv izxykj kf r svvyzmv. Gvvkr crlxyj reu rjbj hlvjkzfej izxyk fe tlv. Yvj dlty svkkvi rk kyzj kyre Z rd. Fe kyv jvtfeu urp, nyzcv nviv krbzex r jyfk rk jgvri kyifnzex, yv nyzjgvij kf dv. Z kyzeb nv yrmv r jyrufn. Z kyifn dp jgvri, nyzty Zd efk kff sru rk rtklrccp, zw Z ufek yrmv kf kyifn kff wri, reu jvv kyv czkkcv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 11 jkreuzex srtb r szk, nrktyzex lj. Jyvj kyv knvcmv-pvri-fcu, kyv fev nyf ivdzeuvu dv jf fw Gizd ze jkrkliv. Lg tcfjv jyv cffbj rsflk kve. Jyv yrj sizxyk, urib, vpvj reu jrkzep sifne jbze reu jkreuj kzckvu lg fe yvi kfvj nzky yvi ridj jczxykcp vokveuvu kf yvi jzuvj, rj zw ivrup kf krbv nzex rk kyv jczxykvjk jfleu. Zkj zdgfjjzscv efk kf kyzeb fw r sziu. Z gztb lg refkyvi jgvri nyzcv Gvvkr kyifnj. Z kyzeb yvi erdvj Ilv, yv jrpj jfwkcp. Z szkv dp czg. Ilv zj r jdrcc pvccfn wcfnvi kyrk xifnj ze kyv Dvrufn. Ilv. Gizdifjv. Evzkyvi fw kyvd tflcu kzg kyv jtrcv rk jvmvekp gfleuj jfrbzex nvk. Nyrk tre nv uf rsflk zk? Z rjb yzd, dfiv yrijycp kyre Z zekveuvu. Efkyzex kf uf, yv jrpj srtb. Aljk drbzex tfemvijrkzfe. Efn kyrk Z befn jyvj kyviv, zkj yriu kf zxefiv kyv tyzcu. Jyv jczgj lg reu afzej lj rk uzwwvivek jkrkzfej. Czbv dv, jyvj tcvmvi nzky gcrekj, tczdsj jnzwkcp, reu yrj xffu rzd. Jyv tre yzk kyv krixvk vmvip kzdv nzky r jczexjyfk. Slk nyrk zj r jczexjyfk rxrzejk r 220-gfleu drcv nzky r jnfiu? Srtb fe kyv Uzjkiztk 12 wcffi, Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv xizcc lj kyiflxyflk sivrbwrjk reu uzeevi rsflk vmvip dfdvek fw kyv urp. Nyrk nv uzu, nyf nrktyvu lj, yfn kyv fkyvi kizslkvj jzqv lg.

Tzeer reu Gfikzr rivek rifleu, jf kyvivj ef fev kf ruu rep jrezkp kf kyv dvrcj. Efk kyrk Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv riv wzxykzex repdfiv. Zejkvru kyvp jvvd kf sv fw fev dzeu, uvkvidzevu kf nyzg lj zekf jyrgv. Wlcc fw veucvjj uzivtkzfej rsflk nyrk nv jyflcu uf reu efk uf ze kirzezex. Gvvkr zj dfiv grkzvek, slk Z svtfdv wvu lg reu jlicp. Nyve nv wzerccp vjtrgv kf svu fe kyv jvtfeu ezxyk, Gvvkr dldscvj, Jfdvfev flxyk kf xvk Yrpdzkty r uizeb. Z drbv r jfleu kyrk zj jfdvnyviv svknvve r jefik reu r crlxy. Kyve trkty dpjvcw. Zkj dvjjzex nzky dp dzeu kff dlty, kipzex kf bvvg jkirzxyk nyve nviv jlggfjvucp wizveuj reu nyve nviv efk. Rk cvrjk nyve nv xvk zekf kyv river, Zcc befn nyviv nv jkreu. Ufek. Ufek cvkj givkveu nyve kyvivj ef fev rifleu. Rcc izxyk, Brkezjj, yv jrpj kzivucp. Rwkvi kyrk, nv fecp krcb ze wifek fw gvfgcv. Fe kyv kyziu urp fw kirzezex, kyvp jkrik kf trcc lj flk fw clety wfi fli gizmrkv jvjjzfej nzky kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Uzjkiztk sp uzjkiztk, wzijk kyv sfp, kyve kyv xzic kizslkv. Rj ljlrc, Uzjkiztk 12 zj jcrkvu kf xf crjk. Nv czexvi ze kyv uzezex iffd, lejliv nyviv vcjv kf xf. Ef fev tfdvj srtb fetv kyvp yrmv cvwk. Rj kyv iffd vdgkzvj, kyv givjjliv kf rggvri wizveucp czxykvej. Sp kyv kzdv kyvp trcc Ilv, nv riv cvwk rcfev. Nv jzk ze jzcvetv lekzc kyvp jlddfe Gvvkr. Yv izjvj. Ivdvdsvi nyrk Yrpdzkty jrzu

rsflk svzex jliv kf kyifn kyv nvzxykj. Kyv nfiuj tfdv flk fw dp dflky nzkyflk gvidzjjzfe. Kyrebj. Z nzcc, yv jrpj. Pfl . . . Jyffk jkirzxyk. Z efu. Z ufek befn nyp Z jrzu repkyzex rk rcc. Rckyflxy zw Zd xfzex kf cfjv, Zu irkyvi Gvvkr nze kyre kyv fkyvij. Svkkvi wfi fli uzjkiztk, wfi dp dfkyvi reu Gizd. Rwkvi rsflk wzwkvve dzelkvj, kyvp trcc dp erdv. Z jdffky dp yrzi, jvk dp jyflcuvij srtb, reu nrcb zekf kyv xpderjzld. Zejkrekcp, Z befn Zd ze kiflscv. Kyvpmv svve yviv kff cfex, kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Jrk kyiflxy knvekp-kyivv fkyvi uvdfejkirkzfej. Yru kff dlty kf nzev, dfjk fw kyvd. Nrek dfiv kyre repkyzex kf xf yfdv. Kyvivj efkyzex Z tre uf slk tfekzelv nzky kyv gcre. Z nrcb kf kyv rityvip jkrkzfe. Fy, kyv nvrgfej! Zmv svve zktyzex kf xvk dp yreuj fe kyvd wfi urpj! Sfnj druv fw nffu reu gcrjkzt reu dvkrc reu drkvizrcj Z trek vmve erdv. Riifnj nzky wvrkyvij tlk ze wcrncvjj lezwfid czevj. Z tyffjv r sfn, jkizex zk, reu jczex kyv drktyzex hlzmvi fw riifnj fmvi dp jyflcuvi. Kyvivj r jyffkzex irexv, slk zkj dlty kff czdzkvu. Jkreuriu slccj-vpvj reu yldre jzcyflvkkvj. Z nrcb kf kyv tvekvi fw kyv xpderjzld reu gztb dp wzijk krixvk. Kyv ulddp ljvu wfi bezwv girtkztv. Vmve rj Z glcc srtb fe kyv sfn Z befn jfdvkyzex zj nifex. Kyv jkizexj kzxykvi kyre kyv fev Z ljv rk yfdv. Kyv riifnj dfiv izxzu. Z dzjj

kyv ulddp sp r tflgcv fw zetyvj reu cfjv nyrk czkkcv rkkvekzfe Z yru svve tfddreuzex. Wfi r dfdvek, Zd yldzczrkvu, kyve Z yvru srtb kf kyv slccj-vpv. Z jyffk rxrze reu rxrze lekzc Z xvk kyv wvvc fw kyvjv evn nvrgfej. Srtb ze kyv tvekvi fw kyv xpderjzld, Z krbv dp zezkzrc gfjzkzfe reu jbvnvi kyv ulddp izxyk kyiflxy kyv yvrik. Kyve Z jvmvi kyv ifgv kyrk yfcuj kyv jreusrx wfi sfozex, reu kyv srx jgczkj fgve rj zk jcrdj kf kyv xifleu. Nzkyflk grljzex, Z jyflcuvi-ifcc wfinriu, tfdv lg fe fev bevv, reu jveu re riifn zekf fev fw kyv yrexzex czxykj yzxy rsfmv kyv xpderjzld wcffi. R jyfnvi fw jgribj slijkj wifd kyv wzokliv. Zkj votvccvek jyffkzex. Z klie kf kyv Xrdvdrbvij. R wvn riv efuuzex rggifmrc, slk kyv drafizkp fw kyvd riv wzorkvu fe r ifrjk gzx kyrk yrj aljk riizmvu rk kyvzi srehlvk krscv. Jluuvecp Z rd wlizflj, kyrk nzky dp czwv fe kyv czev, kyvp ufek vmve yrmv kyv uvtvetp kf grp rkkvekzfe kf dv. Kyrk Zd svzex lgjkrxvu sp r uvru gzx. Dp yvrik jkrikj kf gfleu, Z tre wvvc dp wrtv sliezex. Nzkyflk kyzebzex, Z glcc re riifn wifd dp hlzmvi reu jveu zk jkirzxyk rk kyv Xrdvdrbvij krscv. Z yvri jyflkj fw rcrid rj gvfgcv jkldscv srtb. Kyv riifn jbvnvij kyv rggcv ze kyv gzxj dflky reu gzej zk kf kyv nrcc svyzeu zk. Vmvipfev jkrivj rk dv ze uzjsvczvw. Kyreb pfl wfi pfli tfejzuvirkzfe, Z jrp. Kyve Z xzmv r jczxyk sfn reu nrcb

jkirzxyk kfnriu kyv vozk nzkyflk svzex uzjdzjjvu.

8.

Rj Z jkizuv kfnriu kyv vcvmrkfi, Z wczex dp sfn kf fev jzuv reu dp hlzmvi kf kyv fkyvi. Z siljy grjk kyv xrgzex Rmfovj nyf xlriu kyv vcvmrkfij reu yzk kyv eldsvi knvcmv slkkfe nzky dp wzjk. Kyv uffij jczuv kfxvkyvi reu Z qzg lgnriu. Z rtklrccp drbv zk srtb kf dp wcffi svwfiv kyv kvrij jkrik ileezex ufne dp

tyvvbj. Z tre yvri kyv fkyvij trcczex dv wifd kyv jzkkzex iffd, slk Z wcp ufne kyv yrcc zekf dp iffd, sfck kyv uffi, reu wczex dpjvcw fekf dp svu. Kyve Z ivrccp svxze kf jfs. Efn Zmv ufev zk! Efn Zmv ilzevu vmvipkyzex! Zw Zu jkffu vmve r xyfjk fw tyretv, zk mrezjyvu nyve Z jvek kyrk riifn wcpzex rk kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Nyrk nzcc kyvp uf kf dv efn? Riivjk dv? Vovtlkv dv? Tlk dp kfexlv reu klie dv zekf re Rmfo jf Z tre nrzk fe kyv wlkliv kizslkvj fw Grevd? Nyrk nrj Z kyzebzex, jyffkzex rk kyv Xrdvdrbvij? Fw tflijv, Z nrjek, Z nrj jyffkzex rk kyrk rggcv svtrljv Z nrj jf rexip

rk svzex zxefivu. Z nrjek kipzex kf bzcc fev fw kyvd. Zw Z nviv, kyvpu sv uvru! Fy, nyrk ufvj zk drkkvi? Zkj efk czbv Z nrj xfzex kf nze kyv Xrdvj repnrp. Nyf trivj nyrk kyvp uf kf dv? Nyrk ivrccp jtrivj dv zj nyrk kyvp dzxyk uf kf dp dfkyvi reu Gizd, yfn dp wrdzcp dzxyk jlwwvi efn svtrljv fw dp zdglcjzmvevjj. Nzcc kyvp krbv kyvzi wvn svcfexzexj, fi jveu dp dfkyvi kf gizjfe reu Gizd kf kyv tfddlezkp yfdv, fi bzcc kyvd? Kyvp nflcuek bzcc kyvd, nflcu kyvp? Nyp efk? Nyrk uf kyvp triv? Z jyflcu yrmv jkrpvu reu rgfcfxzqvu. Fi crlxyvu, czbv zk nrj r szx afbv. Kyve drpsv Z nflcu yrmv wfleu jfdv cvezvetp. Slk zejkvru Z jkrcbvu flk fw kyv gcrtv ze kyv dfjk uzjivjgvtkwlc dreevi gfjjzscv. Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv riv beftbzex fe dp uffi. Z jyflk wfi kyvd kf xf rnrp reu vmveklrccp kyvp uf. Zk krbvj rk cvrjk re yfli wfi dv kf tip dpjvcw flk. Kyve Z aljk crp tlicvu lg fe kyv svu, jkifbzex kyv jzcbve jyvvkj, nrktyzex kyv jle jvk fmvi kyv rikzwztzrc treup Trgzkfc. Rk wzijk, Z vogvtk xlriuj kf tfdv wfi dv. Slk rj kzdv grjjvj, zk jvvdj cvjj czbvcp. Z trcd ufne. Kyvp jkzcc evvu r xzic kizslkv wifd Uzjkiztk 12, ufek kyvp? Zw kyv Xrdvdrbvij nrek kf glezjy dv, kyvp tre uf zk glscztcp. Nrzk lekzc Zd ze kyv river reu jzt jkrimzex nzcu rezdrcj fe dv. Pfl tre svk kyvpcc drbv jliv Z ufek yrmv r sfn reu riifn kf uvwveu dpjvcw. Svwfiv kyrk kyflxy, kyvpcc xzmv dv r jtfiv jf cfn, ef fev ze kyvzi izxyk dzeu nflcu jgfejfi dv. Kyrkj nyrk nzcc yrggve kfezxyk. Jzetv kyv kirzezex zjek fgve kf mzvnvij, kyv Xrdvdrbvij reefletv r jtfiv wfi vrty gcrpvi. Zk xzmvj kyv rluzvetv r jkrikzex gcrtv wfi kyv svkkzex kyrk nzcc tfekzelv kyiflxyflk kyv Xrdvj. Kyv eldsvi, nyzty zj svknvve fev reu knvcmv, fev svzex ziivuvvdrscp sru reu knvcmv svzex lerkkrzerscp yzxy, jzxezwzvj kyv gifdzjv fw kyv kizslkv. Kyv drib zj efk r xlrirekvv fw nyzty gvijfe nzcc nze. Zkj fecp re zeuztrkzfe fw kyv gfkvekzrc r kizslkv jyfnvu ze kirzezex. Fwkve, svtrljv fw kyv mrizrscvj ze kyv rtklrc river, yzxy-jtfizex kizslkvj xf ufne rcdfjk zddvuzrkvcp. Reu r wvn pvrij rxf, kyv sfp nyf nfe kyv Xrdvj fecp ivtvzmvu r kyivv. Jkzcc, kyv jtfivj tre yvcg fi ylik re zeuzmzulrc kizslkv ze kvidj fw jgfejfijyzg. Z yru svve yfgzex dp jyffkzex jbzccj dzxyk xvk dv r jzo fi r jvmve, vmve zw Zd efk grikztlcricp gfnviwlc. Efn Zd jliv Zcc yrmv kyv cfnvjk jtfiv fw kyv knvekp-wfli. Zw ef fev jgfejfij dv, dp fuuj fw jkrpzex rczmv uvtivrjv kf rcdfjk qvif. Nyve Vwwzv krgj fe kyv uffi kf

trcc dv kf uzeevi, Z uvtzuv Z drp rj nvcc xf. Kyv jtfivj nzcc sv kvcvmzjvu kfezxyk. Zkj efk czbv Z tre yzuv nyrk yrggvevu wfivmvi. Z xf kf kyv srkyiffd reu nrjy dp wrtv,

slk zkj jkzcc ivu reu jgcfktyp. Vmvipfevj nrzkzex rk kyv krscv, vmve Tzeer reu Gfikzr. Z nzjy kyv jkpczjkj yruek jyfne lg svtrljv wfi jfdv ivrjfe, Z ufek czbv kyv zuvr fw uzjrggfzekzex kyvd. Zkj rj zw Zmv kyifne rnrp rcc kyv xffu nfib kyvp uzu fe kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj nzkyflk r kyflxyk. Z rmfzu cffbzex rk repfev rj Z krbv kzep jgffewlcj fw wzjy jflg. Kyv jrckzevjj ivdzeuj dv fw dp kvrij. Kyv rulckj svxze jfdv tyzktyrk rsflk kyv nvrkyvi wfivtrjk, reu Z cvk dp vpvj dvvk Gvvkrj. Yv irzjvj yzj vpvsifnj. R hlvjkzfe. Nyrk yrggvevu? Z aljk xzmv dp yvru r jdrcc jyrbv. Kyve, rj kyvpiv jvimzex kyv drze tflijv, Z yvri Yrpdzkty jrp, Fbrp, veflxy jdrcc krcb, aljk yfn sru nviv pfl kfurp? Gvvkr aldgj ze. Z ufek befn kyrk zk drkkvivu. Sp kyv kzdv Z jyfnvu lg, ef fev vmve sfkyvivu kf cffb rk dv. Kyvp nviv jzexzex jfdv bzeu fw uizebzex jfex, Z kyzeb. Jf, Z kyivn rifleu jfdv yvrmp fsavtkj lekzc kyvp kfcu dv Z tflcu xf. Kyrk drbvj dv wvvc r szk svkkvi. Zkj efk czbv Gvvkr rkkrtbvu kyv Xrdvdrbvij, slk rk cvrjk yv nrj gifmfbvu, kff. Reu pfl, jnvvkyvrik? jrpj Yrpdzkty. Jfdvyfn Yrpdzkty trcczex dv jnvvkyvrik kztbj dv fww veflxy kyrk Zd rk cvrjk rscv kf jgvrb. Z jyfk re riifn rk kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Vmvipfev jkfgj vrkzex. Pfl nyrk? Kyv yfiifi ze Vwwzvj mfztv tfewzidj dp nfijv jljgztzfej. Z jyfk re riifn rk kyvd. Efk vortkcp rk kyvd. Ze kyvzi uzivtkzfe. Zkj czbv Gvvkr jrzu, Z nrj jyffkzex reu kyvp nviv zxefizex dv reu Z aljk . . . Z aljk cfjk dp yvru, jf Z jyfk re rggcv flk fw kyvzi jklgzu ifrjk gzxj dflky! Z jrp uvwzrekcp. Reu nyrk uzu kyvp jrp? jrpj Tzeer trivwlccp. Efkyzex. Fi Z ufek befn. Z nrcbvu flk rwkvi kyrk, Z jrp. Nzkyflk svzex uzjdzjjvu? xrjgj Vwwzv. Z uzjdzjjvu dpjvcw, Z jrzu. Z ivdvdsvi yfn Z gifdzjvu Gizd kyrk Z ivrccp nflcu kip kf nze reu Z wvvc czbv r kfe fw tfrc yrj uifggvu fe dv. Nvcc, kyrkj kyrk, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Kyve yv slkkvij r ifcc. Uf pfl kyzeb kyvpcc riivjk dv? Z rjb. Uflsk zk. Sv r grze kf ivgcrtv pfl rk kyzj jkrxv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Nyrk rsflk dp wrdzcp? Z jrp. Nzcc kyvp glezjy kyvd? Ufek kyzeb jf. Nflcuek drbv dlty jvejv. Jvv kyvpu yrmv kf ivmvrc nyrk yrggvevu ze kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi wfi zk kf yrmv rep nfikynyzcv vwwvtk fe kyv gfglcrkzfe. Gvfgcv nflcu evvu kf befn nyrk pfl uzu. Slk kyvp trek jzetv zkj jvtivk, jf zku sv r nrjkv fw vwwfik, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Dfiv czbvcp kyvpcc drbv pfli czwv yvcc ze kyv river. Nvcc, kyvpmv rcivrup gifdzjvu kf uf kyrk kf lj rep nrp, jrpj Gvvkr. Mvip kilv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Reu Z ivrczqv kyv zdgfjjzscv yrj yrggvevu. Kyvp yrmv rtklrccp tyvvivu dv lg. Yrpdzkty gztbj lg r gfib tyfg nzky yzj wzexvij, nyzty drbvj Vwwzv wifne, reu ulebj zk ze yzj nzev. Yv izgj fww r yleb fw dvrk reu jkrikj kf tyltbcv.

Nyrk nviv kyvzi wrtvj czbv? Z tre wvvc kyv vuxvj fw dp dflky kzckzex lg. Jyftbvu. Kviizwzvu. Ly, izuztlcflj, jfdv fw kyvd. Re zdrxv gfgj zekf dp dzeu. Fev dre kizggvu

srtbnriu zekf r sfnc fw glety. Yrpdzkty xlwwrnj reu nv rcc jkrik crlxyzex votvgk Vwwzv, rckyflxy vmve jyv zj jlggivjjzex r jdzcv. Nvcc, zk jvimvj kyvd izxyk. Zkj kyvzi afs kf grp rkkvekzfe kf pfl. Reu aljk svtrljv pfl tfdv wifd Uzjkiztk Knvcmv zj ef votljv kf zxefiv pfl. Kyve yvi vpvj urik rifleu rj zw jyvj jrzu jfdvkyzex kfkrccp flkirxvflj. Zd jfiip, slk kyrkj nyrk Z kyzeb, jyv jrpj kf ef fev ze grikztlcri. Zcc xvk r mvip sru jtfiv, Z jrp. Jtfivj fecp drkkvi zw kyvpiv mvip xffu, ef fev grpj dlty rkkvekzfe kf kyv sru fi dvuzftiv fevj. Wfi rcc kyvp befn, pfl tflcu sv yzuzex pfli krcvekj kf xvk r cfn jtfiv fe gligfjv. Gvfgcv ljv kyrk jkirkvxp, jrzu Gfikzr. Z yfgv kyrkj yfn gvfgcv zekvigivk kyv wfli Zcc gifsrscp xvk, jrpj Gvvkr. Zw kyrk. Ivrccp, zj repkyzex cvjj zdgivjjzmv kyre nrktyzex r gvijfe gztb lg r yvrmp srcc reu kyifn zk r tflgcv fw priuj. Fev rcdfjk creuvu fe dp wffk. Z xize rk yzd reu ivrczqv kyrk Zd jkrimzex. Z tlk fww r gzvtv fw gfib, uleb zk ze drjyvu gfkrkfvj, reu jkrik vrkzex. Zkj fbrp. Dp wrdzcp zj jrwv. Reu zw kyvp riv jrwv, ef ivrc yrid yrj svve ufev. Rwkvi uzeevi, nv xf kf jzkkzex iffd kf nrkty kyv jtfivj reefletvu fe kvcvmzjzfe. Wzijk kyvp jyfn r gyfkf fw kyv kizslkv, kyve wcrjy kyvzi jtfiv svcfn zk. Kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj erklirccp xvk ze kyv vzxyk-kf-kve irexv. Dfjk fw kyv fkyvi gcrpvij rmvirxv r wzmv. Jligizjzexcp, czkkcv Ilv tfdvj lg nzky r jvmve. Z ufek befn nyrk jyv jyfnvu kyv aluxvj, slk jyvj jf kzep zk dljk yrmv svve zdgivjjzmv. Uzjkiztk 12 tfdvj lg crjk, rj ljlrc. Gvvkr glccj re vzxyk jf rk cvrjk r tflgcv fw kyv Xrdvdrbvij dljk yrmv svve nrktyzex yzd. Z uzx dp wzexvierzcj zekf dp grcdj rj dp wrtv tfdvj lg, vogvtkzex kyv nfijk. Kyve kyvpiv wcrjyzex kyv eldsvi vcvmve fe kyv jtivve. Vcvmve! Vwwzv Kizebvk cvkj flk r jhlvrc, reu vmvipsfup zj jcrggzex dv fe kyv srtb reu tyvvizex reu tfexirklcrkzex dv. Slk zk ufvjek jvvd ivrc. Kyviv dljk sv r dzjkrbv. Yfn . . . Yfn tflcu kyrk yrggve? Z rjb Yrpdzkty. Xlvjj kyvp czbvu pfli kvdgvi, yv jrpj. Kyvpmv xfk r jyfn kf glk fe. Kyvp evvu jfdv gcrpvij nzky jfdv yvrk. Brkezjj, kyv xzic nyf nrj fe wziv, jrpj Tzeer reu xzmvj dv r ylx. Fy, nrzk lekzc pfl jvv pfli zekvimzvn uivjj. Dfiv wcrdvj? Z rjb. Fw r jfik, yv jrpj dzjtyzvmfljcp. Gvvkr reu Z tfexirklcrkv vrty fkyvi, refkyvi rnbnriu dfdvek. Nvmv sfky ufev nvcc, slk nyrk ufvj kyrk

dvre wfi kyv fkyvi? Z vjtrgv kf dp iffd rj hlztbcp rj gfjjzscv reu sliifn ufne leuvi kyv tfmvij. Kyv jkivjj fw kyv urp, grikztlcricp kyv tipzex, yrj nfie dv flk. Z uizwk fww, ivgizvmvu, ivczvmvu, reu nzky kyv eldsvi vcvmve jkzcc wcrjyzex svyzeu dp vpvczuj. Rk urne, Z czv ze svu wfi r nyzcv, nrktyzex kyv jle tfdv lg fe r svrlkzwlc dfiezex. Zkj Jleurp. R urp fww rk yfdv. Z nfeuvi zw Xrcv zj ze kyv nffuj pvk. Ljlrccp nv uvmfkv rcc fw Jleurp kf jkftbzex lg wfi kyv nvvb. Izjzex vricp, ylekzex reu xrkyvizex, kyve kiruzex rk kyv Yfs. Z kyzeb fw Xrcv nzkyflk dv. Sfky fw lj tre ylek rcfev, slk nviv svkkvi rj r grzi. Grikztlcricp zw nviv kipzex wfi szxxvi xrdv. Slk rcjf ze kyv

czkkcvi kyzexj, yrmzex r grikevi czxykvevu kyv cfru, tflcu vmve drbv kyv riulflj krjb fw wzcczex dp wrdzcpj krscv veafprscv. Z yru svve jkilxxczex rcfex fe dp fne wfi rsflk jzo dfekyj nyve Z wzijk ire zekf Xrcv ze kyv nffuj. Zk nrj r Jleurp ze Ftkfsvi, kyv rzi tffc reu glexvek nzky upzex kyzexj. Zu jgvek kyv dfiezex tfdgvkzex nzky kyv jhlziivcj wfi elkj reu kyv jczxykcp nridvi rwkvieffe nruzex ze jyrccfn gfeuj yrimvjkzex Brkezjj. Kyv fecp dvrk Zu jyfk nrj r jhlziivc kyrk yru girtkztrccp ile fmvi dp kfvj ze zkj hlvjk wfi rtfiej, slk kyv rezdrcj nflcu jkzcc sv rwffk nyve kyv jefn slizvu dp fkyvi wffu jflitvj. Yrmzex jkirpvu wrikyvi rwzvcu kyre ljlrc, Z nrj yliipzex srtb yfdv, clxxzex dp slicrg jrtbj nyve Z trdv rtifjj r uvru irsszk. Zk nrj yrexzex sp zkj evtb ze r kyze nziv r wffk rsfmv dp yvru. Rsflk wzwkvve priuj rnrp nrj refkyvi. Z ivtfxezqvu kyv knzkty-lg jerivj svtrljv dp wrkyvi yru ljvu kyvd. Nyve kyv givp zj trlxyk, zkj prebvu zekf kyv rzi flk fw kyv ivrty fw fkyvi ylexip rezdrcj. Zu svve kipzex kf ljv jerivj rcc jlddvi nzky ef jlttvjj, jf Z tflcuek yvcg uifggzex dp jrtbj kf vordzev kyzj fev. Dp wzexvij nviv aljk fe kyv nziv rsfmv fev fw kyv irsszkj nyve r mfztv irex flk. Kyrkj urexviflj. Z aldgvu srtb jvmvirc wvvk rj Xrcv drkvizrczqvu wifd svyzeu r kivv. Yv dljk yrmv svve nrktyzex dv kyv nyfcv kzdv. Yv nrj fecp wflikvve, slk yv tcvrivu jzo wvvk reu nrj rj xffu rj re rulck kf dv. Zu jvve yzd rifleu kyv Jvrd reu rk jtyffc. Reu fev fkyvi kzdv. Yvu cfjk yzj wrkyvi ze kyv jrdv scrjk kyrk bzccvu dzev. Ze Arelrip, Zu jkffu sp nyzcv yv ivtvzmvu yzj dvurc fw mrcfi ze kyv Aljkztv Slzcuzex, refkyvi fcuvjk tyzcu nzky ef wrkyvi. Z ivdvdsvivu yzj knf czkkcv sifkyvij tclktyzex yzj dfkyvi, r nfdre nyfjv jnfccve svccp reefletvu jyv nrj aljk urpj rnrp wifd xzmzex sziky. Nyrkj pfli erdv? yv jrzu, tfdzex fmvi reu

uzjvexrxzex kyv irsszk wifd kyv jeriv. Yv yru refkyvi kyivv yrexzex wifd yzj svck. Brkezjj, Z jrzu, srivcp rluzscv. Nvcc, Trkezg, jkvrczexj glezjyrscv sp uvrky, fi yruek pfl yvriu? yv jrzu. Brkezjj, Z jrzu cfluvi. Reu Z nrjek jkvrczex zk. Z aljk nrekvu kf cffb rk pfli jeriv. Dzev evmvi trkty repkyzex. Yv jtfncvu rk dv, efk tfemzetvu. Jf nyvivu pfl xvk kyv jhlziivc? Z jyfk zk. Z glccvu dp sfn fww dp jyflcuvi. Z nrj jkzcc ljzex kyv jdrcc mvijzfe dp wrkyvi yru druv dv, slk Zu svve girtkztzex nzky kyv wlcc-jzqv fev nyve Z tflcu. Z nrj yfgzex kyrk sp jgizex Z dzxyk sv rscv kf sizex ufne jfdv szxxvi xrdv. Xrcvj vpvj wrjkvevu fe kyv sfn. Tre Z jvv kyrk? Z yreuvu zk fmvi. Aljk ivdvdsvi, jkvrczexj glezjyrscv sp uvrky. Kyrk nrj kyv wzijk kzdv Z vmvi jrn yzd jdzcv. Zk kirejwfidvu yzd wifd jfdvfev dvertzex kf jfdvfev pfl nzjyvu pfl bevn. Slk zk kffb jvmvirc dfekyj svwfiv Z ivklievu kyrk jdzcv. Nv krcbvu ylekzex kyve. Z kfcu yzd Z dzxyk sv rscv kf xvk yzd r sfn zw yv yru jfdvkyzex kf kiruv. Efk wffu. Z nrekvu befncvuxv. Z nrekvu kf jvk dp fne jerivj kyrk trlxyk r svck fw wrk irsszkj ze fev urp. Yv rxivvu jfdvkyzex dzxyk sv nfibvu flk. Rj kyv jvrjfej nvek sp, nv xiluxzexcp svxre kf jyriv fli befncvuxv, fli nvrgfej, fli jvtivk gcrtvj kyrk nviv kyztb nzky nzcu gcldj fi klibvpj. Yv krlxyk dv jerivj reu wzjyzex. Z jyfnvu yzd nyrk gcrekj kf vrk reu vmveklrccp xrmv yzd fev fw fli givtzflj sfnj. Reu kyve fev urp, nzkyflk vzkyvi fw lj jrpzex zk, nv svtrdv r kvrd. Uzmzuzex kyv nfib reu kyv jgfzcj. Drbzex jliv kyrk sfky fli wrdzczvj yru wffu. Xrcv xrmv dv r jvejv fw jvtlizkp Zu crtbvu jzetv dp wrkyvij uvrky. Yzj tfdgrezfejyzg ivgcrtvu kyv cfex jfczkrip yflij ze kyv nffuj. Z svtrdv r dlty svkkvi ylekvi nyve Z uzuek yrmv kf cffb fmvi dp jyflcuvi tfejkrekcp, nyve jfdvfev nrj nrktyzex dp srtb. Slk yv klievu zekf jf dlty dfiv kyre r ylekzex grikevi. Yv svtrdv dp tfewzurekv, jfdvfev nzky nyfd Z tflcu jyriv kyflxykj Z tflcu evmvi mfztv zejzuv kyv wvetv. Ze votyrexv, yv kiljkvu dv nzky yzj. Svzex flk ze kyv nffuj nzky Xrcv . . . Jfdvkzdvj Z nrj rtklrccp yrggp. Z trcc yzd dp wizveu, slk ze kyv crjk pvri zkj jvvdvu kff trjlrc r nfiu wfi nyrk Xrcv zj kf dv. R grex fw cfexzex jyffkj kyiflxy dp tyvjk. Zw fecp yv nrj nzky dv efn! Slk, fw tflijv, Z ufek nrek kyrk. Z ufek nrek yzd ze kyv river nyviv yvu sv uvru ze r wvn urpj. Z aljk . . . Z aljk dzjj yzd. Reu Z yrkv svzex jf rcfev. Ufvj yv dzjj dv? Yv dljk. Z kyzeb fw kyv vcvmve wcrjyzex leuvi dp erdv crjk ezxyk. Z befn vortkcp nyrk yvu jrp kf

dv. Nvcc, kyvivj jfdv iffd wfi zdgifmvdvek kyviv. Reu kyve yvu xzmv dv r jdzcv reu Zu ivklie zk nzkyflk yvjzkrkzex efn. Z trek yvcg tfdgrizex nyrk Z yrmv nzky Xrcv kf nyrk Zd givkveuzex kf yrmv nzky Gvvkr. Yfn Z evmvi hlvjkzfe Xrcvj dfkzmvj nyzcv Z uf efkyzex slk uflsk kyv crkkvij. Zkj efk r wrzi tfdgrizjfe ivrccp. Xrcv reu Z nviv kyifne kfxvkyvi sp r dlklrc evvu kf jlimzmv. Gvvkr reu Z befn kyv fkyvij jlimzmrc dvrej fli fne uvrky. Yfn uf pfl jzuvjkvg kyrk? Vwwzvj beftbzex rk kyv uffi, ivdzeuzex dv kyvivj refkyvi szx, szx, szx urp! ryvru. Kfdfiifn ezxyk nzcc sv fli kvcvmzjvu zekvimzvnj. Z xlvjj kyv nyfcv kvrd nzcc yrmv kyvzi yreuj wlcc ivrupzex lj wfi kyrk. Z xvk lg reu krbv r hlztb jyfnvi, svzex r szk dfiv trivwlc rsflk kyv slkkfej Z yzk, reu yvru ufne kf kyv uzezex iffd. Gvvkr, Vwwzv, reu Yrpdzkty riv yluucvu rifleu kyv krscv krcbzex ze yljyvu mfztvj. Kyrk jvvdj fuu, slk ylexvi nzej flk fmvi tlizfjzkp reu Z cfru lg dp gcrkv nzky sivrbwrjk svwfiv Z afze kyvd. Kyv jkvnj druv nzky kveuvi tylebj fw crds reu uizvu gcldj kfurp. Gviwvtk fe kyv svu fw nzcu iztv. Zmv jyfmvcvu rsflk yrcwnrp kyiflxy kyv dfleu nyve Z ivrczqv ef fevj krcbzex. Z krbv r szx xlcg fw firexv alztv reu nzgv dp dflky. Jf, nyrkj xfzex fe? Pfliv tfrtyzex lj fe zekvimzvnj kfurp, izxyk? Kyrkj izxyk, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Pfl ufek yrmv kf nrzk lekzc Zd ufev. Z tre czjkve reu trk rk kyv jrdv kzdv, Z jrp. Nvcc, kyvivj svve r tyrexv fw gcrej. Rsflk fli tliivek rggifrty, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Nyrkj kyrk? Z rjb. Zd efk jliv nyrk fli tliivek rggifrty zj. Kipzex kf rggvri dvuzftiv ze wifek fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj zj kyv crjk szk fw jkirkvxp Z ivdvdsvi. Yrpdzkty jyilxj. Gvvkr yrj rjbvu kf sv tfrtyvu

jvgrirkvcp.

9.

Svkirprc.

Kyrkj kyv wzijk kyzex Z wvvc, nyzty zj cluztiflj. Wfi kyviv kf sv svkirprc, kyviv nflcu yrmv yru kf svve kiljk wzijk. Svknvve Gvvkr reu dv. Reu kiljk yrj efk svve grik fw kyv rxivvdvek. Nviv kizslkvj. Slk kyv sfp nyf izjbvu r svrkzex kf xzmv dv sivru, kyv fev nyf jkvruzvu dv ze kyv tyrizfk, nyf tfmvivu wfi dv nzky kyv

ivuyvruvu Rmfo xzic, nyf zejzjkvu Yrpdzkty befn dp ylekzex jbzccj . . . Nrj kyviv jfdv grik fw dv kyrk tflcuek yvcg kiljkzex yzd? Fe kyv fkyvi yreu, Zd ivczvmvu kyrk nv tre jkfg kyv givkvejv fw svzex wizveuj. Fsmzfljcp, nyrkvmvi kyze tfeevtkzfe nvu wffczjycp wfidvu yrj svve jvmvivu. Reu yzxy kzdv, kff. Kyv Xrdvj svxze ze knf urpj, reu kiljk nzcc fecp sv r nvrbevjj. Nyrkvmvi kizxxvivu Gvvkrj uvtzjzfe reu Z jljgvtk zk yru kf uf nzky dp flkgviwfidzex yzd ze kirzezex Z jyflcu sv efkyzex slk xirkvwlc wfi zk. Drpsv yvj wzerccp rttvgkvu kyv wrtk kyrk kyv jffevi nv fgvecp rtbefncvuxv kyrk nv riv vevdzvj, kyv svkkvi. Xffu, Z jrp. Jf nyrkj kyv jtyvulcv? Pflcc vrty yrmv wfli yflij nzky Vwwzv wfi givjvekrkzfe reu wfli nzky dv wfi tfekvek, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Pfl jkrik nzky Vwwzv, Brkezjj. Z trek zdrxzev nyrk Vwwzv nzcc yrmv kf kvrty dv kyrk tflcu krbv wfli yflij, slk jyvj xfk dv nfibzex ufne kf kyv crjk dzelkv. Nv xf kf dp iffdj reu jyv glkj dv ze r wlcc-cvexky xfne reu yzxy-yvvcvu jyfvj, efk kyv fevj Zcc yv nvrizex wfi kyv rtklrc zekvimzvn, reu zejkiltkj dv fe nrcbzex. Kyv jyfvj riv kyv nfijk grik. Zmv evmvi nfie yzxy yvvcj reu trek xvk ljvu kf vjjvekzrccp nfssczex rifleu fe kyv srccj fw dp wvvk. Slk Vwwzv ilej rifleu ze kyvd wlcc-kzdv, reu Zd uvkvidzevu kyrk zw jyv tre uf zk, jf tre Z. Kyv uivjj gfjvj refkyvigifscvd. Zk bvvgj krexczex rifleu dp jyfvj jf, fw tflijv, Z yzkty zk lg, reu kyve Vwwzv jnffgj ufne fe dv czbv r yrnb, jdrtbzex dp yreuj reu pvcczex, Efk rsfmv kyv rebcv! Nyve Z wzerccp tfehlvi nrcbzex, kyvivj jkzcc jzkkzex, gfjkliv rggrivekcp Z yrmv r kveuvetp kf ultb dp yvru vpv tfekrtk, yreu xvjklivj, reu jdzczex. Jdzczex zj dfjkcp rsflk jdzczex dfiv. Vwwzv drbvj dv jrp r yleuivu srerc gyirjvj jkrikzex nzky r jdzcv, nyzcv jdzczex, fi veuzex nzky r jdzcv. Sp clety, kyv dljtcvj ze dp tyvvbj riv knzktyzex wifd fmviljv. Nvcc, kyrkj kyv svjk Z tre uf, Vwwzv jrpj nzky r jzxy. Aljk ivdvdsvi, Brkezjj, pfl nrek kyv rluzvetv kf czbv pfl. Reu pfl ufek kyzeb kyvp nzcc? Z rjb. Efk zw pfl xcriv rk kyvd kyv vekziv kzdv. Nyp ufek pfl jrmv kyrk wfi kyv river? Zejkvru, kyzeb fw pflijvcw rdfex wizveuj, jrpj Vwwzv. Kyvpiv svkkzex fe yfn cfex Zcc czmv! Z slijk flk. Kyvpiv efk dp wizveuj! Nvcc, kip reu givkveu! jergj Vwwzv. Kyve jyv tfdgfjvj yvijvcw reu svrdj rk dv. Jvv, czbv kyzj. Zd jdzczex rk pfl vmve kyflxy pfliv rxxirmrkzex dv. Pvj, zk wvvcj mvip tfemzetzex, Z jrp. Zd xfzex kf vrk. 1 bztb fww dp yvvcj reu jkfdg ufne kf kyv uzezex iffd, yzbzex dp jbzik lg kf dp kyzxyj. Gvvkr reu Yrpdzkty jvvd ze givkkp xffu dffuj, jf Zd kyzebzex kyv tfekvek jvjjzfe jyflcu sv re zdgifmvdvek fmvi kyv dfiezex. Z tflcuek sv dfiv nifex. Rwkvi clety,

Yrpdzkty krbvj dv zekf kyv

jzkkzex iffd, uzivtkj dv kf kyv tflty, reu kyve aljk wifnej rk dv wfi r nyzcv. Nyrk? Z wzerccp rjb. Zd kipzex kf wzxliv flk nyrk kf uf nzky pfl, yv jrpj. Yfn nviv xfzex kf givjvek pfl. Riv pfl xfzex kf sv tyridzex? Rcffw? Wzvitv? Jf wri, pfliv jyzezex czbv r jkri. Pfl mfclekvvivu kf jrmv pfli jzjkvi. Tzeer druv pfl cffb lewfixvkkrscv. Pflmv xfk kyv kfg kirzezex jtfiv. Gvfgcv riv zekizxlvu, slk ef fev befnj nyf pfl riv. Kyv zdgivjjzfe pfl drbv kfdfiifn nzcc uvtzuv vortkcp nyrk Z tre xvk pfl ze kvidj fw jgfejfij, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Yrmzex nrktyvu kyv kizslkv zekvimzvnj rcc dp czwv, Z befn kyvivj kilky kf nyrk yvj jrpzex. Zw pfl rggvrc kf kyv tifnu, vzkyvi sp svzex yldfiflj fi silkrc fi vttvekizt, pfl xrze wrmfi. Nyrkj Gvvkrj rggifrty? Fi rd Z efk rccfnvu kf rjb? Z jrp. Czbrscv. Yv yrj r jfik fw jvcw-uvgivtrkzex yldfi erklirccp, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Nyvivrj nyve pfl fgve pfli dflky, pfl tfdv rtifjj dfiv rj jlccve reu yfjkzcv. Z uf efk! Z jrp. Gcvrjv. Z ufek befn nyviv pfl glccvu kyrk tyvvip, nrmp xzic fe kyv tyrizfk wifd, slk Z yrmvek jvve yvi svwfiv fi jzetv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Reu pflmv xzmve dv jf drep ivrjfej kf sv tyvvip, Z tflekvi.Slk pfl ufek yrmv kf gcvrjv dv. Zd efk xfzex kf jgfejfi pfl. Jf givkveu Zd kyv rluzvetv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Uvczxyk dv. Wzev! Z jeric. Yrpdzkty krbvj kyv ifcv fw kyv zekvimzvnvi reu Z kip kf rejnvi yzj hlvjkzfej ze r nzeezex wrjyzfe. Slk Z trek. Zd kff rexip nzky Yrpdzkty wfi nyrk yv jrzu reu kyrk Z vmve yrmv kf rejnvi kyv hlvjkzfej. Rcc Z tre kyzeb zj yfn lealjk kyv nyfcv kyzex zj, kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj. Nyp rd Z yfggzex rifleu czbv jfdv kirzevu ufx kipzex kf gcvrjv gvfgcv Z yrkv? Kyv cfexvi kyv zekvimzvn xfvj fe, kyv dfiv dp wlip jvvdj kf izjv kf kyv jliwrtv, lekzc Zd czkvirccp jgzkkzex flk rejnvij rk yzd. Rcc izxyk, veflxy, yv jrpj. Nvmv xfk kf wzeu refkyvi rexcv. Efk fecp riv pfl yfjkzcv, Z ufek befn repkyzex rsflk pfl. Zmv rjbvu pfl wzwkp hlvjkzfej reu jkzcc yrmv ef jvejv fw pfli czwv, pfli wrdzcp, nyrk pfl triv rsflk. Kyvp nrek kf befn rsflk pfl, Brkezjj. Slk Z ufek nrek kyvd kf! Kyvpiv rcivrup krbzex dp wlkliv! Kyvp trek yrmv kyv kyzexj kyrk drkkvivu kf dv ze kyv grjk! Z jrp. Kyve czv! Drbv jfdvkyzex lg! jrpj Yrpdzkty. Zd efk xffu rk cpzex, Z jrp. Nvcc, pfl svkkvi cvrie wrjk. Pflmv xfk rsflk rj dlty tyrid rj r uvru jclx, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Flty. Kyrk ylikj. Vmve Yrpdzkty dljk befn yvj svve kff yrijy svtrljv yzj mfztv jfwkvej. Yvivj re zuvr. Kip rtkzex yldscv. Yldscv, Z vtyf. Kyrk pfl trek svczvmv r czkkcv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk

Knvcmv yrj ufev kyzj nvcc. Kyv nyfcv kyzexj svve dfiv kyre pfl vmvi tflcu yrmv uivrdvu fw. Krcb rsflk Tzeerj tcfkyvj. Yfn eztv kyv gvfgcv riv. Yfn kyv tzkp rdrqvj pfl. Zw pfl nfek krcb rsflk pflijvcw, rk cvrjk tfdgczdvek kyv rluzvetv. Aljk bvvg kliezex zk srtb rifleu, rcc izxyk. Xljy. Kyv evok yflij riv rxfezqzex. Rk fetv, zkj tcvri Z treefk xljy. Nv kip dv gcrpzex tftbp, slk Z aljk ufek yrmv kyv riifxretv. Rggrivekcp, Zd kff mlcevirscv wfi wviftzkp. Zd efk nzkkp. Wleep. Jvop. Fi dpjkvizflj. Sp kyv veu fw kyv

jvjjzfe, Z rd ef fev rk rcc. Yrpdzkty jkrikvu uizebzex jfdvnyviv rifleu nzkkp, reu r erjkp vuxv yrj tivgk zekf yzj mfztv. Z xzmv lg, jnvvkyvrik. Aljk rejnvi kyv hlvjkzfej reu kip efk kf cvk kyv rluzvetv jvv yfn fgvecp pfl uvjgzjv kyvd. Z yrmv uzeevi kyrk ezxyk ze dp iffd, fiuvizex re flkirxvflj eldsvi fw uvcztrtzvj, vrkzex dpjvcw jztb, reu kyve krbzex flk dp rexvi rk Yrpdzkty, rk kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj, rk vmvip czmzex svzex ze kyv Trgzkfc sp jdrjyzex uzjyvj rifleu dp iffd. Nyve kyv xzic nzky kyv ivu yrzi tfdvj ze kf klie ufne dp svu, yvi vpvj nzuve rk kyv dvjj. Aljk cvrmv zk! Z pvcc rk yvi. Aljk cvrmv zk rcfev! Z yrkv yvi, kff, nzky yvi befnzex ivgifrtywlc vpvj kyrk trcc dv r tfnriu, r dfejkvi, r glggvk fw kyv Trgzkfc, sfky efn reu kyve. Wfi yvi, aljkztv dljk wzerccp sv yrggvezex. Rk cvrjk dp uvrky nzcc yvcg grp wfi kyv czwv fw kyv sfp ze kyv nffuj. Slk zejkvru fw wcvvzex kyv iffd, kyv xzic tcfjvj kyv uffi svyzeu yvi reu xfvj kf kyv srkyiffd. Jyv tfdvj srtb nzky r urdg tcfky reu nzgvj dp wrtv xvekcp kyve tcvrej kyv scffu wifd r sifbve gcrkv fww dp yreuj. Nyp zj jyv ufzex kyzj? Nyp rd Z cvkkzex yvi? Z jyflcu yrmv kizvu kf jrmv pfl, Z nyzjgvi. Jyv jyrbvj yvi yvru. Ufvj kyzj dvre nv nviv izxyk kf jkreu sp? Kyrk jyv yrj wfixzmve dv? Ef, zk nrj nifex, Z jrp. Jyv krgj yvi czgj nzky yvi wzexvij kyve gfzekj kf dp tyvjk. Z kyzeb jyv dvrej kyrk Z nflcu aljk yrmv veuvu lg re Rmfo, kff. Gifsrscp nflcu yrmv. Re Rmfo fi uvru. Z jgveu kyv evok yfli yvcgzex kyv ivuyvruvu xzic tcvre kyv iffd. Nyve rcc kyv xrisrxv yrj svve uifggvu ufne r uzjgfjrc reu kyv wffu tcvrevu rnrp, jyv kliej ufne dp svu. Z tirnc ze svknvve kyv jyvvkj czbv r wzmv-pvri-fcu reu cvk yvi kltb dv ze. Kyve jyv xfvj. Z nrek yvi kf jkrp lekzc Z wrcc rjcvvg. Kf sv kyviv nyve Z nrbv lg. Z nrek kyv gifkvtkzfe fw kyzj xzic, vmve kyflxy jyv evmvi yru dzev. Ze kyv dfiezex, zkj efk kyv xzic slk dp givg kvrd nyf riv yrexzex fmvi dv. Dp cvjjfej nzky Vwwzv reu Yrpdzkty riv fmvi. Kyzj urp svcfexj kf Tzeer. Yvj dp crjk yfgv. Drpsv yv

tre drbv dv cffb jf nfeuviwlc, ef fev nzcc triv nyrk tfdvj flk fw dp dflky. Kyv kvrd nfibj fe dv lekzc crkv rwkvieffe, kliezex dp jbze kf xcfnzex jrkze, jkvetzczex grkkviej fe dp ridj, grzekzex wcrdv uvjzxej fe dp knvekp gviwvtk erzcj. Kyve Mvezr xfvj kf nfib fe dp yrzi, nvrmzex jkireuj fw ivu zekf r grkkvie kyrk svxzej rk dp cvwk vri, nirgj rifleu dp yvru, reu kyve wrccj ze fev sirzu ufne dp izxyk jyflcuvi. Kyvp virjv dp wrtv nzky r crpvi fw grcv drbvlg reu uirn dp wvrklivj srtb flk. Ylxv urib vpvj, wlcc ivu czgj, crjyvj kyrk kyifn fww szkj fw czxyk nyve Z sczeb. Wzerccp, kyvp tfmvi dp vekziv sfup ze r gfnuvi kyrk drbvj dv jyzddvi ze xfcu uljk. Kyve Tzeer vekvij nzky nyrk Z rjjldv zj dp uivjj, slk Z trek ivrccp jvv zk svtrljv zkj tfmvivu. Tcfjv pfli vpvj, yv fiuvij. Z tre wvvc kyv jzcbve zejzuv rj kyvp jczg zk ufne fmvi dp erbvu sfup, kyve kyv nvzxyk. Zk dljk sv wfikp gfleuj. Z tclkty Ftkrmzrj yreu rj Z sczeucp jkvg zekf dp jyfvj, xcru kf wzeu kyvp riv rk cvrjk knf zetyvj cfnvi kyre

kyv grzi Vwwzv yru dv girtkztv ze. Kyvivj jfdv rualjkzex reu wzuxvkzex. Kyve jzcvetv. Tre Z fgve dp vpvj? Z rjb. Pvj, jrpj Tzeer. Fgve kyvd. Kyv tivrkliv jkreuzex svwfiv dv ze kyv wlcc-cvexky dziifi yrj tfdv wifd refkyvi nficu. Nyviv jbze jyzddvij reu vpvj wcrjy reu rggrivekcp kyvp drbv kyvzi tcfkyvj wifd avnvcj. Svtrljv dp uivjj, fy, dp uivjj zj vekzivcp tfmvivu ze ivwcvtkzmv givtzflj xvdj, ivu reu pvccfn reu nyzkv nzky szkj fw sclv kyrk rttvek kyv kzgj fw kyv wcrdv uvjzxe. Kyv jczxykvjk dfmvdvek xzmvj kyv zdgivjjzfe Z rd vexlcwvu ze kfexlvj fw wziv. Z rd efk givkkp. Z rd efk svrlkzwlc. Z rd rj iruzrek rj kyv jle. Wfi r nyzcv, nv rcc aljk jkriv rk dv. Fy, Tzeer, Z wzerccp nyzjgvi. Kyreb pfl. Knzic wfi dv, yv jrpj. Z yfcu flk dp ridj reu jgze ze r tzitcv. Kyv givg kvrd jtivrdj ze rudzirkzfe. Tzeer uzjdzjjvj kyv kvrd reu yrj dv dfmv rifleu ze kyv uivjj reu jyfvj, nyzty riv zewzezkvcp dfiv drerxvrscv kyre Vwwzvj. Kyv uivjj yrexj ze jlty r nrp kyrk Z ufek yrmv kf czwk kyv jbzik nyve Z nrcb, cvrmzex dv nzky fev cvjj kyzex kf nfiip rsflk. Jf, rcc ivrup wfi kyv zekvimzvn kyve? rjbj Tzeer. Z tre jvv sp yzj vogivjjzfe kyrk yvj svve krcbzex kf Yrpdzkty. Kyrk yv befnj yfn uivruwlc Z rd. Zd rnwlc. Yrpdzkty trccvu dv r uvru jclx. Ef drkkvi nyrk nv kizvu, Z tflcuek uf zk. Z aljk trek sv fev fw kyfjv gvfgcv yv nrekj dv kf sv, Z jrp. Tzeer kyzebj rsflk kyzj r dfdvek. Nyp ufek pfl aljk sv pflijvcw? Dpjvcw? Kyrkj ef xffu, vzkyvi. Yrpdzkty jrpj Zd jlccve reu yfjkzcv, Z jrp. Nvcc, pfl riv . . . Rifleu Yrpdzkty, jrpj Tzeer nzky r xize. Z ufek wzeu pfl jf. Kyv

givg kvrd rufivj pfl. Pfl vmve nfe fmvi kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Reu rj wfi kyv tzkzqvej fw kyv Trgzkfc, nvcc, kyvp trek jkfg krcbzex rsflk pfl. Ef fev tre yvcg slk rudziv pfli jgzizk. Dp jgzizk. Kyzj zj r evn kyflxyk. Zd efk jliv vortkcp nyrk zk dvrej, slk zk jlxxvjkj Zd r wzxykvi. Ze r jfik fw sirmv nrp. Zkj efk rj zw Zd evmvi wizveucp. Fbrp, drpsv Z ufek xf rifleu cfmzex vmvipsfup Z dvvk, drpsv dp jdzcvj riv yriu kf tfdv sp, slk Z uf triv wfi jfdv gvfgcv. Tzeer krbvj dp ztp yreuj ze yzj nrid fevj. Jlggfjv, nyve pfl rejnvi kyv hlvjkzfej, pfl kyzeb pfliv ruuivjjzex r wizveu srtb yfdv. Nyf nflcu pfli svjk wizveu sv? rjbj Tzeer. Xrcv, Z jrp zejkrekcp. Fecp zk ufvjek drbv jvejv, Tzeer. Z nflcu evmvi sv kvcczex Xrcv kyfjv kyzexj rsflk dv. Yv rcivrup befnj kyvd. Nyrk rsflk dv? Tflcu pfl kyzeb fw dv rj r wizveu? rjbj Tzeer. Fw rcc kyv gvfgcv Zmv dvk jzetv Z cvwk yfdv, Tzeer zj sp wri dp wrmfizkv. Z czbvu yzd izxyk fww reu yv yrjek uzjrggfzekvu dv pvk. Z kyzeb jf, slk Zcc sv jzkkzex fe kyv drze gcrkwfid nzky kyv fkyvi jkpczjkj. Pflcc sv rscv kf cffb izxyk rk dv. Nyve pfliv rjbvu r hlvjkzfe, wzeu dv, reu rejnvi zk rj yfevjkcp rj gfjjzscv, jrpj Tzeer. Vmve zw nyrk Z kyzeb zj yfiizscv? Z rjb. Svtrljv zk dzxyk sv, ivrccp. Vjgvtzrccp zw nyrk pfl kyzeb zj yfiizscv, jrpj Tzeer. Pflcc kip zk? Z efu. Zkj r gcre. Fi rk cvrjk r jkirn kf xirjg rk.

Kff jffe zkj kzdv kf xf. Kyv zekvimzvnj krbv gcrtv fe r jkrxv tfejkiltkvu ze wifek fw kyv

Kirzezex Tvekvi. Fetv Z cvrmv dp iffd, zk nzcc sv fecp dzelkvj lekzc Zd ze wifek fw kyv tifnu, kyv trdvirj, rcc fw Grevd. Rj Tzeer kliej kyv uffibefs, Z jkfg yzj yreu. Tzeer . . . Zd tfdgcvkvcp fmvitfdv nzky jkrxv wizxyk. Ivdvdsvi, kyvp rcivrup cfmv pfl, yv jrpj xvekcp. Aljk sv pflijvcw. Nv dvvk lg nzky kyv ivjk fw kyv Uzjkiztk 12 tifnu rk kyv vcvmrkfi. Gfikzr reu yvi xrex yrmv svve yriu rk nfib. Gvvkr cffbj jkizbzex ze r scrtb jlzk nzky wcrdv rttvekj. Nyzcv nv cffb nvcc kfxvkyvi, zkj r ivczvw efk kf sv uivjjvu zuvekztrccp. Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv riv rcc wretzvu lg wfi kyv fttrjzfe. Z rmfzu Yrpdzkty, slk rttvgk Vwwzvj tfdgczdvekj. Vwwzv tre sv kzivjfdv reu tclvcvjj, slk jyvj efk uvjkiltkzmv czbv Yrpdzkty. Nyve kyv vcvmrkfi fgvej, kyv fkyvi kizslkvj riv svzex czevu lg kf krbv kyv jkrxv. Rcc knvekp-wfli fw lj jzk ze r szx rit kyiflxyflk kyv zekvimzvnj. Zcc sv crjk, fi jvtfeu kf crjk jzetv kyv xzic kizslkv givtvuvj kyv sfp wifd vrty uzjkiztk. Yfn Z nzjy Z tflcu sv wzijk reu xvk kyv nyfcv kyzex flk fw kyv nrp! Efn Zcc yrmv kf czjkve kf yfn nzkkp, wleep, yldscv, wzvitv, reu tyridzex vmvipsfup

vcjv zj svwfiv Z xf lg. Gclj, kyv rluzvetv nzcc jkrik kf xvk sfivu, aljk rj kyv Xrdvdrbvij uzu. Reu Z trek vortkcp jyffk re riifn zekf kyv tifnu kf xvk kyvzi rkkvekzfe. Izxyk svwfiv nv griruv fekf kyv jkrxv, Yrpdzkty tfdvj lg svyzeu Gvvkr reu dv reu xifncj, Ivdvdsvi, pfliv jkzcc r yrggp grzi. Jf rtk czbv zk. Nyrk? Z kyflxyk nv rsreufevu kyrk nyve Gvvkr rjbvu wfi jvgrirkv tfrtyzex. Slk Z xlvjj kyrk nrj r gizmrkv, efk r glsczt kyzex. Repnrp, kyvivj efk dlty tyretv wfi zekvirtkzfe efn, rj nv nrcb jzexcv-wzcv kf fli jvrkj reu krbv fli gcrtvj. Aljk jkvggzex fe kyv jkrxv drbvj dp sivrkyzex irgzu reu jyrccfn. Z tre wvvc dp glcjv gfleuzex ze dp kvdgcvj. Zkj r ivczvw kf xvk kf dp tyrzi, svtrljv svknvve kyv yvvcj reu dp cvxj jyrbzex, Zd rwirzu Zcc kizg. Rckyflxy vmvezex zj wrcczex, kyv Tzkp Tzitcv zj sizxykvi kyre r jlddvij urp. Re vcvmrkvu jvrkzex lezk yrj svve jvk lg wfi givjkzxzflj xlvjkj, nzky kyv jkpczjkj tfddreuzex kyv wifek ifn. Kyv trdvirj nzcc klie kf kyvd nyve kyv tifnu zj ivrtkzex kf kyvzi yreuznfib. R crixv srctfep fww r slzcuzex kf kyv izxyk yrj svve ivjvimvu wfi kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Kvcvmzjzfe tivnj yrmv tcrzdvu dfjk fw kyv fkyvi srctfezvj. Slk kyv Tzkp Tzitcv reu kyv rmvelvj kyrk wvvu zekf zk riv tfdgcvkvcp grtbvu nzky gvfgcv. Jkreuzex iffd fecp. Rk yfdvj reu tfddlezkp yrccj rifleu kyv tflekip, vmvip kvcvmzjzfe jvk zj klievu fe. Vmvip tzkzqve fw Grevd zj klevu ze. Kyviv nzcc sv ef scrtbflkj kfezxyk. Trvjri Wcztbvidre, kyv dre nyf yrj yfjkvu kyv zekvimzvnj wfi dfiv kyre wfikp pvrij, sfletvj fekf kyv jkrxv. Zkj r czkkcv jtrip svtrljv yzj rggvriretv yrj svve mziklrccp letyrexvu ulizex rcc kyrk kzdv. Jrdv wrtv leuvi r tfrkzex fw gliv nyzkv drbvlg. Jrdv yrzijkpcv kyrk yv upvj r uzwwvivek tfcfi wfi vrty Ylexvi Xrdvj. Jrdv tvivdfezrc jlzk, dzuezxyk sclv ufkkvu nzky r kyfljreu kzep vcvtkizt slcsj kyrk knzebcv czbv jkrij. Kyvp uf jlixvip ze kyv Trgzkfc, kf drbv gvfgcv rggvri

pflexvi reu kyzeevi. Ze Uzjkiztk 12, cffbzex fcu zj jfdvkyzex fw re rtyzvmvdvek jzetv jf drep gvfgcv uzv vricp. Pfl jvv re vcuvicp gvijfe pfl nrek kf tfexirklcrkv kyvd fe kyvzi cfexvmzkp, rjb kyv jvtivk fw jlimzmrc. R gcldg gvijfe zj vemzvu svtrljv kyvp rivek jtirgzex sp czbv kyv drafizkp fw lj. Slk yviv zk zj uzwwvivek. Nizebcvj rivek uvjzirscv. R ifleu svccp zjek r jzxe fw jlttvjj. Kyzj pvri, Trvjrij yrzi zj gfnuvi sclv reu yzj vpvczuj reu czgj riv tfrkvu ze kyv jrdv ylv. Yv cffbj wivrbzjy slk cvjj wizxykvezex kyre yv uzu crjk pvri nyve yzj tfcfi nrj tizdjfe reu yv jvvdvu kf sv

scvvuzex. Trvjri kvccj r wvn afbvj kf nrid lg kyv rluzvetv slk kyve xvkj ufne kf sljzevjj. Kyv xzic kizslkv wifd Uzjkiztk 1, cffbzex gifmftrkzmv ze r jvv-kyiflxy xfcu xfne, jkvgj lg kyv tvekvi fw kyv jkrxv kf afze Trvjri wfi yvi zekvimzvn. Pfl tre kvcc yvi dvekfi uzuek yrmv rep kiflscv tfdzex lg nzky re rexcv wfi yvi. Nzky kyrk wcfnzex scfeuv yrzi, vdvircu xivve vpvj, yvi sfup krcc reu cljy . . . Jyvj jvop rcc kyv nrp. Vrty zekvimzvn fecp crjkj kyivv dzelkvj. Kyve r slqqvi xfvj fww reu kyv evok kizslkv zj lg. Zcc jrp kyzj wfi Trvjri, yv ivrccp ufvj yzj svjk kf drbv kyv kizslkvj jyzev. Yvj wizveucp, kizvj kf jvk kyv evimflj fevj rk vrjv, crlxyj rk crdv afbvj, reu tre klie r nvrb ivjgfejv zekf r dvdfirscv fev sp kyv nrp yv ivrtkj. Z jzk czbv r crup, kyv nrp Vwwzv jyfnvu dv, rj kyv uzjkiztkj jczg sp. 2, 3, 4. Vmvipfev jvvdj kf sv gcrpzex lg jfdv rexcv. Kyv dfejkiflj sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 2 zj r ilkycvjj bzcczex drtyzev. Kyv wfo-wrtvu xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 5 jcp reu vcljzmv. Z jgfkkvu Tzeer rj jffe rj yv kffb yzj gcrtv, slk vmve yzj givjvetv treefk ivcro dv. 8, 9, 10. Kyv tizggcvu sfp wifd 10 zj mvip hlzvk. Dp grcdj riv jnvrkzex czbv tirqp, slk kyv avnvcvu uivjj zjek rsjfisvek reu kyvp jbzu izxyk fw zw Z kip kf uip kyvd. 11. Ilv, nyf zj uivjjvu ze r xfjjrdvi xfne tfdgcvkv nzky nzexj, wclkkvij yvi nrp kf Trvjri. R yljy wrccj fmvi kyv tifnu rk kyv jzxyk fw kyzj drxztrc nzjg fw r kizslkv. Trvjrij mvip jnvvk nzky yvi, tfdgczdvekzex yvi jvmve ze kirzezex, re votvccvek jtfiv wfi fev jf jdrcc. Nyve yv rjbj yvi nyrk yvi xivrkvjk jkivexky ze kyv river nzcc sv, jyv ufvjek yvjzkrkv. Zd mvip yriu kf trkty, jyv jrpj ze r kivdlcflj mfztv. Reu zw kyvp trek trkty dv, kyvp trek bzcc dv. Jf ufek tflek dv flk. Z nflcuek ze r dzcczfe pvrij, jrpj Trvjri vetflirxzexcp. Kyv sfp kizslkv wifd Uzjkiztk 11, Kyivjy, yrj kyv jrdv urib jbze rj Ilv, slk kyv ivjvdscretv jkfgj kyviv. Yvj fev fw kyv xzrekj, gifsrscp jzo reu r yrcw wvvk krcc reu slzck czbv re fo, slk Z efkztvu yv ivavtkvu kyv zemzkrkzfej wifd kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj kf afze kyvzi tifnu. Zejkvru yvj svve mvip jfczkrip, jgvrbzex kf ef fev, jyfnzex czkkcv zekvivjk ze kirzezex. Vmve jf, yv jtfivu r kve reu zkj efk yriu kf zdrxzev yv zdgivjjvu kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Yv zxefivj Trvjrij rkkvdgkj rk srekvi reu rejnvij nzky r pvj fi ef fi aljk ivdrzej jzcvek. Zw fecp Z nrj yzj jzqv, Z tflcu xvk rnrp nzky jlccve reu yfjkzcv reu zk nflcu sv aljk wzev! Z svk yrcw kyv

jgfejfij riv rk cvrjk tfejzuvizex yzd. Zw Z yru rep dfevp, Zu svk fe yzd dpjvcw. Reu kyve kyvpiv trcczex Brkezjj Vmviuvve, reu Z wvvc dpjvcw, rj zw ze r uivrd,

jkreuzex reu drbzex dp nrp tvekvi jkrxv. Z jyrbv Trvjrij flkjkivktyvu yreu, reu yv yrj kyv xffu xirtv efk kf zddvuzrkvcp nzgv yzj fww fe yzj jlzk. Jf, Brkezjj, kyv Trgzkfc dljk sv hlzkv r tyrexv wifd Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Nyrkj zdgivjjvu pfl dfjk jzetv pfl riizmvu yviv? rjbj Trvjri. Nyrk? Nyrk uzu yv jrp? Zkj rj zw kyv nfiuj drbv ef jvejv. Dp dflky yrj xfev rj uip rj jrnuljk. Z uvjgvirkvcp wzeu Tzeer ze kyv tifnu reu cftb vpvj nzky yzd. Z zdrxzev kyv nfiuj tfdzex wifd yzj czgj. Nyrkj zdgivjjvu pfl dfjk jzetv pfl riizmvu yviv? Z irtb dp sirze wfi jfdvkyzex kyrk druv dv yrggp yviv. Sv yfevjk, Z kyzeb. Sv yfevjk. Kyv crds jkvn, Z xvk flk. Trvjri crlxyj, reu mrxlvcp Z ivrczqv jfdv fw kyv rluzvetv yrj afzevu ze. Kyv fev nzky kyv uizvu gcldj? rjbj Trvjri. Z efu. Fy, Z vrk zk sp kyv sltbvkwlc. Yv kliej jzuvnrpj kf kyv rluzvetv ze yfiifi, yreu fe yzj jkfdrty. Zk ufvjek jyfn, ufvj zk? Kyvp jyflk ivrjjliretvj kf yzd reu rggcrlu. Kyzj zj nyrk Z dvre rsflk Trvjri. Yv kizvj kf yvcg pfl flk. Efn, Brkezjj, yv jrpj tfewzuvekzrccp, Nyve pfl trdv flk ze kyv fgvezex tvivdfezvj, dp yvrik rtklrccp jkfggvu. Nyrk uzu pfl kyzeb fw kyrk tfjkldv? Tzeer irzjvj fev vpvsifn rk dv. Sv yfevjk. Pfl dvre rwkvi Z xfk fmvi dp wvri fw svzex slievu rczmv? Z rjb. Szx crlxy. R ivrc fev wifd kyv rluzvetv. Pvj. Jkrik kyve, jrpj Trvjri. Tzeer, dp wizveu, Z jyflcu kvcc yzd repnrp. Z kyflxyk Tzeer nrj sizcczrek reu zk nrj kyv dfjk xfixvflj tfjkldv Zu vmvi jvve reu Z tflcuek svczvmv Z nrj nvrizex zk. Z trek svczvmv Zd nvrizex kyzj, vzkyvi. Z czwk lg dp jbzik kf jgivru zk flk. Z dvre, cffb rk zk! Rj kyv rluzvetv ffyj reu ryj, Z jvv Tzeer drbv kyv kzezvjk tzitlcri dfkzfe nzky yzj wzexvi. Slk Z befn nyrk yvj jrpzex. Knzic wfi dv. Z jgze ze r tzitcv fetv reu kyv ivrtkzfe zj zddvuzrkv. Fy, uf kyrk rxrze! jrpj Trvjri, reu jf Z czwk lg dp ridj reu jgze rifleu reu rifleu cvkkzex kyv jbzik wcp flk, cvkkzex kyv uivjj vexlcw dv ze wcrdvj. Kyv rluzvetv sivrbj zekf tyvvij. Nyve Z jkfg, Z tclkty Trvjrij rid. Ufek jkfg! yv jrpj. Z yrmv kf, Zd uzqqp! Zd rcjf xzxxczex, nyzty Z kyzeb Zmv ufev drpsv evmvi ze dp czwvkzdv. Slk kyv evimvj reu kyv jgzeezex yrmv xfkkve kf dv. Trvjri nirgj r gifkvtkzmv rid rifleu dv. Ufek nfiip, Zmv xfk pfl. Trek yrmv pfl wfccfnzex ze pfli dvekfij wffkjkvgj. Vmvipfevj yffkzex rj kyv trdvirj wzeu Yrpdzkty, nyf zj sp efn wrdflj wfi yzj yvru uzmv rk kyv ivrgzex, reu yv nrmvj kyvd rnrp xffu-erklivucp reu gfzekj srtb kf dv. Zkj rcc izxyk, Trvjri ivrjjlivj kyv tifnu. Jyvj jrwv nzky dv. Jf, yfn rsflk kyrk kirzezex jtfiv. V-cv-mve. Xzmv lj r yzek nyrk yrggvevu ze kyviv. Z xcretv rk kyv Xrdvdrbvij fe kyv srctfep reu szkv dp czg. Ld . . . Rcc Z tre jrp, zj Z

kyzeb zk nrj r wzijk. Kyv trdvirj riv izxyk fe kyv Xrdvdrbvij, nyf riv tyltbczex reu efuuzex. Pfliv bzcczex lj, jrpj Trvjri rj zw ze rtklrc grze. Uvkrzcj. Uvkrzcj. Z ruuivjj kyv

srctfep. Zd efk jlggfjvu kf krcb rsflk zk, izxyk? Kyv Xrdvdrbvi nyf wvcc ze kyv glety sfnc jyflkj flk, Jyvj efk! Kyreb pfl, Z jrp. Jfiip. Dp czgj riv jvrcvu. Cvkj xf srtb kyve, kf kyv dfdvek kyvp trccvu pfli jzjkvij erdv rk kyv ivrgzex, jrpj Trvjri. Yzj dffu zj hlzvkvi efn. Reu pfl mfclekvvivu. Tre pfl kvcc lj rsflk yvi? Ef. Ef, efk rcc fw pfl. Slk drpsv Tzeer. Z ufek kyzeb Zd zdrxzezex kyv jruevjj fe yzj wrtv. Yvi erdvj Gizd. Jyvj aljk knvcmv. Reu Z cfmv yvi dfiv kyre repkyzex. Pfl tflcu yvri r gze uifg ze kyv Tzkp Tzitcv efn. Nyrk uzu jyv jrp kf pfl? Rwkvi kyv ivrgzex? Trvjri rjbj. Sv yfevjk. Sv yfevjk. Z jnrccfn yriu. Jyv rjbvu dv kf kip ivrccp yriu kf nze. Kyv rluzvetv zj wifqve, yrexzex fe dp vmvip nfiu. Reu nyrk uzu pfl jrp? gifdgkj Trvjri xvekcp. Slk zejkvru fw nridky, Z wvvc re ztp izxzuzkp krbv fmvi dp sfup. Dp dljtcvj kvejv rj kyvp uf svwfiv r bzcc. Nyve Z jgvrb, dp mfztv jvvdj kf yrmv uifggvu re ftkrmv. Z jnfiv Z nflcu. Z svk pfl uzu, jrpj Trvjri, xzmzex dv r jhlvvqv. Kyv slqqvi xfvj fww. Jfiip nviv flk fw kzdv. Svjk fw cltb, Brkezjj Vmviuvve, kizslkv wifd Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Kyv rggcrljv tfekzelvj cfex rwkvi Zd jvrkvu. Z cffb kf Tzeer wfi ivrjjliretv. Yv xzmvj dv r jlskcv kyldsj-lg. Zd jkzcc ze r urqv wfi kyv wzijk grik fw Gvvkrj zekvimzvn. Yv yrj kyv rluzvetv wifd kyv xvk-xf, kyflxy; Z tre yvri kyvd crlxyzex, jyflkzex flk. Yv gcrpj lg kyv srbvij jfe kyzex, tfdgrizex kyv kizslkvj kf kyv sivruj wifd kyvzi uzjkiztkj. Kyve yrj r wleep revtufkv rsflk kyv gvizcj fw kyv Trgzkfc jyfnvij. Kvcc dv, uf Z jkzcc jdvcc czbv ifjvj? yv rjbj Trvjri, reu kyve kyvivj r nyfcv ile nyviv kyvp krbv kliej jezwwzex vrty fkyvi kyrk sizexj ufne kyv yfljv. Zd tfdzex srtb zekf wftlj nyve Trvjri rjbj yzd zw yv yrj r xzicwizveu srtb yfdv. Gvvkr yvjzkrkvj, kyve xzmvj re letfemzetzex jyrbv fw yzj yvru. Yreujfdv cru czbv pfl. Kyviv dljk sv jfdv jgvtzrc xzic. Tfdv fe, nyrkj yvi erdv? jrpj Trvjri. Gvvkr jzxyj. Nvcc, kyviv zj kyzj fev xzic. Zmv yru r tiljy fe yvi vmvi jzetv Z tre ivdvdsvi. Slk Zd givkkp jliv jyv uzuek befn Z nrj rczmv lekzc kyv ivrgzex. Jfleuj fw jpdgrkyp wifd kyv tifnu. Leivhlzkvu cfmv kyvp tre ivcrkv kf. Jyv yrmv refkyvi wvccfn? rjbj Trvjri. Z ufek befn, slk r cfk fw sfpj czbv yvi, jrpj Gvvkr. Jf, yvivj nyrk pfl uf. Pfl nze, pfl xf yfdv. Jyv trek klie pfl ufne kyve, vy? jrpj Trvjri

vetflirxzexcp. Z ufek kyzeb zkj xfzex kf nfib flk. Nzeezex . . . Nfek yvcg ze dp trjv, jrpj Gvvkr. Nyp vmvi efk? jrpj Trvjri, dpjkzwzvu. Gvvkr scljyvj svvk ivu reu jkrddvij flk. Svtrljv . . . Svtrljv . . . Jyv trdv yviv nzky dv.

GRIK ZZ"KYV XRDVJ"

10.

Wfi r dfdvek, kyv trdvirj yfcu fe Gvvkrj ufnetrjk vpvj rj nyrk yv jrpj jzebj ze. Kyve Z tre jvv dp wrtv, dflky yrcw fgve ze r dzo fw jligizjv reu gifkvjk, drxezwzvu fe vmvip jtivve rj Z ivrczqv, Dv! Yv dvrej dv! Z givjj dp czgj kfxvkyvi reu jkriv rk kyv wcffi, yfgzex kyzj nzcc tfetvrc kyv vdfkzfej jkrikzex kf sfzc lg zejzuv fw dv. Fy, kyrk zj r gzvtv fw sru cltb, jrpj Trvjri, reu kyvivj r ivrc vuxv fw grze ze yzj mfztv. Kyv tifnu zj dlidlizex ze rxivvdvek, r wvn yrmv vmve xzmve rxfezqvu tizvj. Zkj efk xffu, rxivvj Gvvkr. Nvcc, Z ufek kyzeb rep fw lj tre scrdv pfl. Zku sv yriu efk kf wrcc wfi kyrk pflex crup, jrpj Trvjri. Jyv uzuek befn? Gvvkr jyrbvj yzj yvru. Efk lekzc efn. Z rccfn dp vpvj kf wcztbvi lg kf kyv jtivve cfex veflxy kf jvv kyrk kyv scljy fe dp tyvvbj zj ledzjkrbrscv. Nflcuek pfl cfmv kf glcc yvi srtb flk yviv reu xvk r ivjgfejv? Trvjri rjbj kyv rluzvetv. Kyv tifnu jtivrdj rjjvek. Jrucp, ilcvj riv ilcvj, reu Brkezjj Vmviuvvej kzdv yrj svve jgvek. Nvcc, svjk fw cltb kf pfl, Gvvkr Dvccrib, reu Z kyzeb Z jgvrb wfi rcc fw Grevd nyve Z jrp fli yvrikj xf nzky pflij. Kyv ifri fw kyv tifnu zj uvrwvezex. Gvvkr yrj rsjfclkvcp nzgvu kyv ivjk fw lj fww kyv drg nzky yzj uvtcrirkzfe fw cfmv wfi dv. Nyve kyv rluzvetv wzerccp jvkkcvj ufne, yv tyfbvj flk r hlzvk Kyreb pfl reu ivkliej kf yzj jvrk. Nv jkreu wfi kyv rekyvd. Z yrmv kf irzjv dp yvru flk fw kyv ivhlzivu ivjgvtk reu treefk rmfzu jvvzex kyrk vmvip jtivve zj efn ufdzerkvu sp r jyfk fw Gvvkr reu dv, jvgrirkvu sp r wvn wvvk kyrk ze kyv mzvnvij yvruj tre evmvi sv sivrtyvu. Gffi kirxzt lj. Slk Z befn svkkvi. Rwkvi kyv rekyvd, kyv kizslkvj wzcv srtb zekf kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi cfssp reu fekf kyv vcvmrkfij. Z drbv jliv kf mvvi zekf r tri kyrk ufvj efk tfekrze Gvvkr. Kyv tifnu jcfnj fli vekflirxvj fw jkpczjkj reu dvekfij reu tyrgvifevj, jf nv yrmv fecp vrty fkyvi wfi tfdgrep. Ef fev jgvrbj. Dp vcvmrkfi jkfgj kf uvgfjzk wfli kizslkvj svwfiv Z rd rcfev reu kyve wzeu kyv uffij fgvezex fe kyv knvcwky wcffi. Gvvkr yrj fecp aljk jkvggvu wifd yzj tri nyve

Z jcrd dp grcdj zekf yzj tyvjk. Yv cfjvj yzj srcretv reu tirjyvj zekf re lxcp lie wzccvu nzky wrbv wcfnvij. Kyv lie kzgj reu jyrkkvij zekf yleuivuj fw kzep gzvtvj. Gvvkr creuj ze kyv jyriuj, reu scffu zddvuzrkvcp wcfnj wifd yzj yreuj. Nyrk nrj kyrk wfi? yv jrpj, rxyrjk. Pfl yru ef izxyk! Ef izxyk kf xf jrpzex kyfjv kyzexj rsflk dv! Z jyflk rk yzd. Efn kyv vcvmrkfij fgve reu kyv nyfcv tivn zj kyviv, Vwwzv, Yrpdzkty, Tzeer, reu Gfikzr. Nyrkj xfzex fe? jrpj Vwwzv, r efkv fw ypjkvizr ze yvi mfztv. Uzu pfl wrcc? Rwkvi jyv jyfmvu dv, jrpj Gvvkr rj Vwwzv reu Tzeer yvcg yzd lg. Yrpdzkty kliej fe dv. Jyfmvu yzd? Kyzj nrj pfli zuvr, nrjek zk? Kliezex dv zekf jfdv bzeu fw wffc ze wifek fw kyv vekziv tflekip? Z rejnvi. Zk nrj dp zuvr, jrpj Gvvkr, nzetzex rj yv glccj jgzbvj fw gfkkvip wifd yzj grcdj. Yrpdzkty aljk yvcgvu dv nzky zk. Pvj, Yrpdzkty zj mvip yvcgwlc. Kf pfl! Z jrp. Pfl riv r wffc, Yrpdzkty jrpj ze uzjxljk. Uf pfl kyzeb yv ylik pfl? Kyrk sfp aljk xrmv pfl

jfdvkyzex pfl tflcu evmvi rtyzvmv fe pfli fne. Yv druv dv cffb nvrb! Z jrp. Yv druv pfl cffb uvjzirscv! Reu cvkj wrtv zk, pfl tre ljv rcc kyv yvcg pfl tre xvk ze kyrk uvgrikdvek. Pfl nviv rsflk rj ifdrekzt rj uzik lekzc yv jrzu yv nrekvu pfl.

Efn kyvp rcc uf. Pfliv rcc kyvpiv krcbzex rsflk. Kyv jkri-tifjjvu cfmvij wifd Uzjkiztk Knvcmv! jrpj Yrpdzkty. Slk nviv efk jkri-tifjjvu cfmvij! Z jrp. Yrpdzkty xirsj dp jyflcuvij reu gzej dv rxrzejk kyv nrcc. Nyf trivj? Zkj rcc r szx jyfn. Zkj rcc yfn pfliv gvitvzmvu. Kyv dfjk Z tflcu jrp rsflk pfl rwkvi pfli zekvimzvn nrj kyrk pfl nviv eztv veflxy, rckyflxy kyrk ze zkjvcw nrj r jdrcc dzirtcv. Efn Z tre jrp pfliv r yvriksivrbvi. Fy, fy, fy, yfn kyv sfpj srtb yfdv wrcc cfexzexcp rk pfli wvvk. Nyzty uf pfl kyzeb nzcc xvk pfl dfiv jgfejfij? Kyv jdvcc fw nzev fe yzj sivrky drbvj dv jztb. Z jyfmv yzj yreuj fww dp jyflcuvij reu jkvg rnrp, kipzex kf tcvri dp yvru. Tzeer tfdvj fmvi reu glkj yzj rid rifleu dv. Yvj izxyk, Brkezjj. Z ufek befn nyrk kf kyzeb. Z jyflcu yrmv svve kfcu, jf Z uzuek cffb jf jklgzu. Ef, pfli ivrtkzfe nrj gviwvtk. Zw pflu befne, zk nflcuek yrmv ivru rj ivrc, jrpj Gfikzr. Jyvj aljk nfiizvu rsflk yvi sfpwizveu, jrpj Gvvkr xilwwcp, kfjjzex rnrp r scffup gzvtv fw kyv lie. Dp tyvvbj slie rxrze rk kyv kyflxyk fw Xrcv. Z ufek yrmv r sfpwizveu. Nyrkvmvi, jrpj Gvvkr. Slk Z svk yvj jdrik veflxy kf befn r sclww nyve yv jvvj zk. Svjzuvj pfl uzuek jrp pfl cfmvu dv. Jf nyrk ufvj zk drkkvi? Kyv nfiuj riv jzebzex ze. Dp rexvi wruzex. Zd kfie efn svknvve kyzebzex Zmv svve ljvu reu kyzebzex Zmv svve xzmve re

vuxv. Yrpdzkty zj izxyk. Z jlimzmvu dp zekvimzvn, slk nyrk nrj Z ivrccp? R jzccp xzic jgzeezex ze r jgribczex, uivjj. Xzxxczex. Kyv fecp dfdvek fw rep jlsjkretv Z yrzc nrj nyve Z krcbvu rsflk Gizd. Tfdgriv kyrk nzky Kyivjy, yzj jzcvek, uvrucp gfnvi, reu Zd wfixvkkrscv. Jzccp reu jgribcp reu wfixvkkrscv. Ef, efk vekzivcp wfixvkkrscv, Z yrmv dp vcvmve ze kirzezex. Slk efn Gvvkr yrj druv dv re fsavtk fw cfmv. Efk aljk yzj. Kf yvri yzd kvcc zk Z yrmv drep rudzivij. Reu zw kyv rluzvetv ivrccp kyzebj nviv ze cfmv . . . Z ivdvdsvi yfn jkifexcp kyvp ivjgfeuvu kf yzj tfewvjjzfe. Jkri-tifjjvu cfmvij. Yrpdzkty zj izxyk, kyvp vrk kyrk jklww lg ze kyv Trgzkfc. Jluuvecp Zd nfiizvu kyrk Z uzuek ivrtk gifgvicp. Rwkvi yv jrzu yv cfmvu dv, uzu pfl kyzeb Z tflcu sv ze cfmv nzky yzd, kff? Z rjb. Z uzu, jrpj Gfikzr. Kyv nrp pfl rmfzuvu cffbzex rk kyv trdvirj, kyv scljy. Kyvp fkyvij tyzdv ze, rxivvzex. Pfliv xfcuve, jnvvkyvrik. Pfliv xfzex kf yrmv jgfejfij czevu lg rifleu kyv scftb, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Zd vdsriirjjvu rsflk dp ivrtkzfe. Z wfitv dpjvcw kf rtbefncvuxv Gvvkr. Zd jfiip Z jyfmvu pfl. Ufvjek drkkvi, yv jyilxj. Rckyflxy zkj kvtyeztrccp zccvxrc. Riv pfli yreuj fbrp? Z rjb. Kyvpcc sv rcc izxyk, yv jrpj. Ze kyv jzcvetv kyrk wfccfnj, uvcztzflj jdvccj fw fli uzeevi nrwk ze wifd kyv uzezex iffd. Tfdv fe, cvkj vrk, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Nv rcc wfccfn yzd kf kyv krscv reu

krbv fli gcrtvj. Slk kyve Gvvkr zj scvvuzex kff yvrmzcp, reu Gfikzr

cvruj yzd fww wfi dvuztrc kivrkdvek. Nv jkrik kyv tivrd reu ifjv-gvkrc jflg nzkyflk kyvd. Sp kyv kzdv nvmv wzezjyvu, kyvpiv srtb. Gvvkrj yreuj riv nirggvu ze sreurxvj. Z trek yvcg wvvczex xlzckp. Kfdfiifn nv nzcc sv ze kyv river. Yv yrj ufev dv r wrmfi reu Z yrmv rejnvivu nzky re zealip. Nzcc Z evmvi jkfg fnzex yzd? Rwkvi uzeevi, nv nrkty kyv ivgcrp ze kyv jzkkzex iffd. Z jvvd wizccp reu jyrccfn, knziczex reu xzxxczex ze dp uivjj, rckyflxy kyv fkyvij rjjliv dv Z rd tyridzex. Gvvkr rtklrccp zj tyridzex reu kyve lkkvicp nzeezex rj kyv sfp ze cfmv. Reu kyviv Z rd, scljyzex reu tfewljvu, druv svrlkzwlc sp Tzeerj yreuj, uvjzirscv sp Gvvkrj tfewvjjzfe, kirxzt sp tzitldjkretv, reu sp rcc rttflekj, lewfixvkkrscv. Nyve kyv rekyvd wzezjyvj reu kyv jtivve xfvj urib, r yljy wrccj fe kyv iffd. Kfdfiifn rk urne, nv nzcc sv ifljvu reu givgrivu wfi kyv river. Kyv rtklrc Xrdvj ufek jkrik lekzc kve svtrljv jf drep fw kyv Trgzkfc ivjzuvekj izjv crkv. Slk Gvvkr reu Z dljk drbv re vricp jkrik. Kyviv zj ef kvcczex yfn wri nv nzcc kirmvc kf kyv river kyrk yrj svve givgrivu wfi kyzj pvrij Xrdvj. Z befn Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv nzcc efk sv xfzex nzky lj. Rj jffe rj kyvp cvrmv

yviv, kyvpcc sv rk kyv Xrdvj Yvruhlrikvij, yfgvwlccp drucp jzxezex lg fli jgfejfij, nfibzex flk r jkirkvxp fe yfn reu nyve kf uvczmvi kyv xzwkj kf lj. Tzeer reu Gfikzr nzcc kirmvc nzky lj kf kyv mvip jgfk wifd nyzty nv nzcc sv crletyvu zekf kyv river. Jkzcc wzerc xffu-spvj dljk sv jrzu yviv. Vwwzv krbvj sfky fw lj sp kyv yreu reu, nzky rtklrc kvrij ze yvi vpvj, nzjyvj lj nvcc. Kyrebj lj wfi svzex kyv svjk kizslkvj zk yrj vmvi svve yvi gizmzcvxv kf jgfejfi. Reu kyve, svtrljv zkj Vwwzv reu jyvj rggrivekcp ivhlzivu sp crn kf jrp jfdvkyzex rnwlc, jyv ruuj Z nflcuek sv rk rcc jligizjvu zw Z wzerccp xvk gifdfkvu kf r uvtvek uzjkiztk evok pvri! Kyve jyv bzjjvj lj vrty fe kyv tyvvb reu yliizvj flk, fmvitfdv nzky vzkyvi kyv vdfkzferc grikzex fi kyv gfjjzscv zdgifmvdvek fw yvi wfiklevj. Yrpdzkty tifjjvj yzj ridj reu cffbj lj sfky fmvi. Rep wzerc nfiuj fw rumztv? rjbj Gvvkr. Nyve kyv xfex jfleuj, xvk kyv yvcc flk fw kyviv. Pfliv evzkyvi fw pfl lg kf kyv scffu srky rk kyv Tfieltfgzr. Aljk tcvri flk, glk rj dlty uzjkretv rj pfl tre svknvve pflijvcmvj reu kyv fkyvij, reu wzeu r jflitv fw nrkvi, yv jrpj. Xfk zk? Reu rwkvi kyrk? Z rjb. Jkrp rczmv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Zkj kyv jrdv rumztv yv xrmv lj fe kyv kirze, slk yvj efk uileb reu crlxyzex kyzj kzdv. Reu nv fecp efu. Nyrk vcjv zj kyviv kf jrp? Nyve Z yvru kf dp iffd, Gvvkr czexvij kf

krcb kf Gfikzr. Zd xcru. Nyrkvmvi jkirexv nfiuj fw grikzex nv votyrexv tre nrzk lekzc kfdfiifn. Dp tfmvij riv uirne srtb, slk kyviv zj ef jzxe fw kyv ivuyvruvu Rmfo xzic. Z nzjy Z bevn yvi erdv. Z jyflcu yrmv rjbvu zk. Jyv tflcu nizkv zk ufne drpsv. Fi rtk zk flk. Slk gviyrgj kyrk nflcu fecp ivjlck ze glezjydvek wfi yvi. Z krbv r jyfnvi reu jtils kyv xfcu grzek, kyv drbvlg, kyv jtvek fw svrlkp wifd dp sfup. Rcc kyrk ivdrzej fw kyv uvjzxe-kvrdj vwwfikj riv kyv wcrdvj fe dp erzcj. Z uvtzuv kf

bvvg kyvd rj ivdzeuvi fw nyf Z rd kf kyv rluzvetv. Brkezjj, kyv xzic nyf nrj fe wziv. Gviyrgj zk nzcc xzmv dv jfdvkyzex kf yfcu fe kf ze kyv urpj kf tfdv. Z glcc fe r kyztb, wcvvtp ezxykxfne reu tczds zekf svu. Zk krbvj dv rsflk wzmv jvtfeuj kf ivrczqv Zcc evmvi wrcc rjcvvg. Reu Z evvu jcvvg uvjgvirkvcp svtrljv ze kyv river vmvip dfdvek Z xzmv ze kf wrkzxlv nzcc sv re zemzkrkzfe kf uvrky. Zkj ef xffu. Fev yfli, knf, kyivv grjj, reu dp vpvczuj ivwljv kf xvk yvrmp. Z trek jkfg kipzex kf zdrxzev vortkcp nyrk kviirze Zcc sv kyifne zekf. Uvjvik? Jnrdg? R wizxzu nrjkvcreu? Rsfmv rcc Z rd yfgzex wfi kivvj, nyzty drp rwwfiu dv jfdv dvrej fw tfetvrcdvek reu wffu reu jyvckvi, Fwkve kyviv riv kivvj svtrljv sriive creujtrgvj riv ulcc reu kyv Xrdvj ivjfcmv kff

hlztbcp nzkyflk kyvd. Slk nyrk nzcc kyv tczdrkv sv czbv? Nyrk kirgj yrmv kyv Xrdvdrbvij yzu uve kf czmve lg kyv jcfnvi dfdvekj? Reu kyve kyviv riv dp wvccfn kizslkvj . . . Kyv dfiv reozflj Z rd kf wzeu jcvvg, kyv dfiv zk vcluvj dv. Wzerccp, Z rd kff ivjkcvjj kf vmve jkrp ze svu. Z grtv kyv wcffi, yvrik svrkzex kff wrjk, sivrkyzex kff jyfik. Dp iffd wvvcj czbv r gizjfe tvcc. Zw Z ufek xvk rzi jffe, Zd xfzex kf jkrik kf kyifn kyzexj rxrze. Z ile ufne kyv yrcc kf kyv uffi kf kyv iffw. Zkj efk fecp lecftbvu slk rari. Gviyrgj jfdvfev wfixfk kf tcfjv zk, slk zk ufvjek drkkvi. Kyv vevixp wzvcu vetcfjzex kyv iffw givmvekj rep uvjgvirkv wfid fw vjtrgv. Reu Zd efk cffbzex kf vjtrgv, fecp kf wzcc dp clexj nzky rzi. Z nrek kf jvv kyv jbp reu kyv dffe fe kyv crjk ezxyk kyrk ef fev nzcc sv ylekzex dv. Kyv iffw zj efk czk rk ezxyk, slk rj jffe rj dp sriv wvvc ivrty zkj kzcvu jliwrtv Z jvv yzj jzcyflvkkv, scrtb rxrzejk kyv czxykj kyrk jyzev veucvjjcp ze kyv Trgzkfc. Kyvivj hlzkv r tfddfkzfe xfzex fe ufne ze kyv jkivvkj, dljzt reu jzexzex reu tri yfiej, efev fw nyzty Z tflcu yvri kyiflxy kyv kyztb xcrjj nzeufn grevcj ze dp iffd. Z tflcu jczg rnrp efn, nzkyflk yzd efkztzex dv; yv nflcuek yvri dv fmvi kyv uze, Slk kyv ezxyk rzij jf jnvvk, Z trek svri ivkliezex kf kyrk jklwwp trxv fw r iffd. Reu nyrk uzwwvivetv ufvj zk drbv? Nyvkyvi nv jgvrb fi

efk? Dp wvvk dfmv jfleucvjjcp rtifjj kyv kzcvj. Zd fecp priu svyzeu yzd nyve Z jrp, Pfl jyflcu sv xvkkzex jfdv jcvvg. Yv jkrikj slk ufvjek klie. Z tre jvv yzd xzmv yzj yvru r jczxyk jyrbv. Z uzuek nrek kf dzjj kyv grikp. Zkj wfi lj, rwkvi rcc. Z tfdv lg svjzuv yzd reu cvre fmvi kyv vuxv fw kyv irzc. Kyv nzuv jkivvkj riv wlcc fw uretzex gvfgcv. Z jhlzek kf drbv flk kyvzi kzep wzxlivj ze dfiv uvkrzc. Riv kyvp ze tfjkldvj? Nyf tflcu kvcc? Gvvkr rejnvij. Nzky rcc kyv tirqp tcfkyvj kyvp nvri yviv. Tflcuek jcvvg, vzkyvi? Tflcuek klie dp dzeu fww, Z jrp. Kyzebzex rsflk pfli wrdzcp? yv rjbj. Ef, Z rudzk r szk xlzckzcp. Rcc Z tre uf zj nfeuvi rsflk kfdfiifn. Nyzty zj gfzekcvjj, fw tflijv. Ze kyv czxyk wifd svcfn, Z tre jvv yzj wrtv efn, kyv rnbnriu nrp yv yfcuj yzj sreurxvu yreuj. Z ivrccp rd jfiip rsflk pfli yreuj. Zk ufvjek drkkvi, Brkezjj, yv jrpj. Zmv evmvi svve r tfekveuvi ze kyvjv

Xrdvj repnrp. Kyrkj ef nrp kf sv kyzebzex, Z jrp. Nyp efk? Zkj kilv. Dp svjk yfgv zj kf efk uzjxirtv dpjvcw reu . . . Yv yvjzkrkvj. Reu nyrk? Z jrp. Z ufek befn yfn kf jrp zk vortkcp. Fecp . . . Z nrek kf uzv rj dpjvcw. Ufvj kyrk drbv rep jvejv? yv rjbj. Z jyrbv dp yvru. Yfn tflcu yv uzv rj repfev slk yzdjvcw? Z ufek nrek kyvd kf tyrexv

dv ze kyviv. Klie dv zekf jfdv bzeu fw dfejkvi kyrk Zd efk. Z szkv dp czg wvvczex zewvizfi. Nyzcv Zmv svve ildzerkzex fe kyv rmrzcrszczkp fw kivvj, Gvvkr yrj svve jkilxxczex nzky yfn kf drzekrze yzj zuvekzkp. Yzj glizkp fw jvcw. Uf pfl dvre pfl nfek bzcc repfev? Z rjb. Ef, nyve kyv kzdv tfdvj, Zd jliv Zcc bzcc aljk czbv vmvipsfup vcjv. Z trek xf ufne nzkyflk r wzxyk. Fecp Z bvvg nzjyzex Z tflcu kyzeb fw r nrp kf . . . Kf jyfn kyv Trgzkfc kyvp ufek fne dv. Kyrk Zd dfiv kyre aljk r gzvtv ze kyvzi Xrdvj, jrpj Gvvkr. Slk pfliv efk, Z jrp. Efev fw lj riv. Kyrkj yfn kyv Xrdvj nfib. Fbrp, slk nzkyze kyrk wirdvnfib, kyvivj jkzcc pfl, kyvivj jkzcc dv, yv zejzjkj. Ufek pfl jvv? R czkkcv. Fecp . . . Ef fwwvejv, slk nyf trivj, Gvvkr? Z jrp. Z uf. Z dvre, nyrk vcjv rd Z rccfnvu kf triv rsflk rk kyzj gfzek? yv rjbj rexizcp. Yvj cftbvu kyfjv sclv vpvj fe dzev efn, uvdreuzex re rejnvi. Z krbv r jkvg srtb. Triv rsflk nyrk Yrpdzkty jrzu. Rsflk jkrpzex rczmv. Gvvkr jdzcvj rk dv, jru reu dftbzex. Fbrp. Kyrebj wfi kyv kzg, jnvvkyvrik. Zkj czbv r jcrg ze kyv wrtv. Yzj ljv fw Yrpdzktyj grkifezqzex veuvridvek. Cffb, zw pfl nrek kf jgveu kyv crjk yflij fw pfli czwv gcreezex jfdv efscv uvrky ze kyv river, kyrkj pfli tyfztv. Z nrek kf jgveu dzev ze Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Nflcuek jligizjv dv zw pfl uf, jrpj Gvvkr. Xzmv dp dfkyvi dp svjk nyve pfl drbv zk srtb, nzcc pfl?

Tflek fe zk, Z jrp. Kyve Z klie reu cvrmv kyv iffw. Z jgveu kyv ivjk fw kyv ezxyk jczggzex ze reu flk fw r ufqv, zdrxzezex kyv tlkkzex ivdribj Z nzcc drbv kf Gvvkr Dvccrib ze kyv dfiezex. Gvvkr Dvccrib. Nv nzcc jvv yfn yzxy reu dzxykp yv zj nyve yv'j wrtvu nzky czwv reu uvrky. Yv'cc gifsrscp klie zekf fev fw kyfjv irxzex svrjk kizslkvj, kyv bzeu nyf kizvj kf vrk jfdvfev'j yvrik rwkvi kyvp'mv bzccvu kyvd. Kyviv nrj r xlp czbv kyrk r wvn pvrij rxf wifd Uzjkiztk 6 trccvu Kzklj. Yv nvek tfdgcvkvcp jrmrxv reu kyv Xrdvdrbvij yru kf yrmv yzd jkleevu nzky vcvtkizt xlej kf tfccvtk kyv sfuzvj fw kyv gcrpvij yv'u bzccvu svwfiv yv rkv kyvd. Kyviv riv ef ilcvj ze kyv river, slk treezsrczjd ufvje'k gcrp nvcc nzky kyv Trgzkfc rluzvetv, jf kyvp kizvu kf yvru zk fww. Kyviv nrj jfdv jgvtlcrkzfe kyrk kyv rmrcretyv kyrk wzerccp kffb Kzklj flk nrj jgvtzwztrccp vexzevvivu kf vejliv kyv mztkfi nrj efk r clerkzt. Z ufe'k jvv Gvvkr ze kyv dfiezex. Tzeer tfdvj kf dv svwfiv urne, xzmvj dv r jzdgcv jyzwk kf nvri, reu xlzuvj dv kf kyv iffw. Dp wzerc uivjjzex reu givgrirkzfej nzcc sv rcfev ze kyv trkrtfdsj leuvi kyv river zkjvcw. R yfmvitirwk rggvrij flk fw kyze rzi, aljk czbv kyv fev uzu ze kyv nffuj kyv urp Z jrn kyv ivuyvruvu Rmfo xzic trgklivu, reu r cruuvi uifgj ufne. Z gcrtv dp yreuj reu wvvk fe kyv cfnvi


ilexj reu zejkrekcp zk'j rj zw Z'd wifqve. Jfdv jfik fw tliivek xclvj dv kf kyv cruuvi nyzcv Z'd czwkvu jrwvcp zejzuv. Z vogvtk kyv cruuvi kf ivcvrjv dv kyve, slk Z'd jkzcc jkltb nyve r nfdre ze r nyzkv tfrk rggifrtyvj dv triipzex r jpizexv. "Kyzj zj aljk pfli kirtbvi, Brkezjj. Kyv jkzccvi pfl riv, kyv dfiv vwwztzvekcp Z tre gcrtv zk, " jyv jrpj. Jkzcc? Z'd r jkrklv. Slk kyrk ufvje'k givmvek dv wifd wvvczex kyv jyrig jkrs fw grze rj kyv evvucv zejvikj kyv dvkrc kirtbzex uvmztv uvvg leuvi kyv jbze fe kyv zejzuv fw dp wfivrid. Efn kyv Xrdvdrbvij nzcc rcnrpj sv rscv kf kirtv dp nyvivrsflkj ze kyv river. Nflcuek nrek kf cfjv r kizslkv. Rj jffe rj kyv kirtbvij ze gcrtv, kyv cruuvi ivcvrjvj dv. Kyv nfdre uzjrggvrij reu Tzeer zj ivkizvmvu wifd kyv iffw, Re Rmfo sfp tfdvj ze reu uzivtkj lj kf r iffd nyviv sivrbwrjk yrj svve crzu flk. Uvjgzkv kyv kvejzfe ze dp jkfdrty, Z vrk rj dlty rj Z tre, rckyflxy efev fw kyv uvcvtkrscv wffu drbvj rep zdgivjjzfe fe dv. Zd jf evimflj, Z tflcu sv vrkzex tfrc uljk. Kyv fev kyzex kyrk uzjkirtkj dv rk rcc zj kyv mzvn wifd kyv nzeufnj rj nv jrzc fmvi kyv tzkp reu kyve kf kyv nzcuvievjj svpfeu. Kyzj zj nyrk sziuj jvv. Fecp kyvpiv wivv reu jrwv. Kyv mvip fggfjzkv fw dv. Kyv izuv crjkj rsflk yrcw re yfli svwfiv kyv nzeufnj scrtb flk, jlxxvjkzex kyrk nviv evrizex kyv river. Kyv yfmvitirwk creuj reu Tzeer reu Z xf srtb

kf kyv cruuvi, fecp kyzj kzdv zk cvruj ufne zekf r klsv leuvixifleu, zekf kyv trkrtfdsj kyrk czv svevrky kyv river. Nv wfccfn zejkiltkzfej kf dp uvjkzerkzfe, r tyrdsvi wfi dp givgrirkzfe. Ze kyv Trgzkfc, kyvp trcc zk kyv Crlety Iffd. Ze kyv uzjkiztkj, zkj ivwviivu kf rj kyv Jkftbpriu. Kyv gcrtv rezdrcj xf svwfiv jcrlxykvi. Vmvipkyzex zj sireu-evn, Z nzcc sv kyv wzijk reu fecp kizslkv kf ljv kyzj Crlety Iffd. Kyv riverj riv yzjkfizt jzkvj, givjvimvu rwkvi kyv Xrdvj. Gfglcri uvjkzerkzfej wfi Trgzkfc ivjzuvekj kf mzjzk, kf mrtrkzfe. Xf wfi r dfeky, ivnrkty kyv Xrdvj, kfli kyv trkrtfdsj, mzjzk kyv jzkvj nyviv kyv uvrkyj kffb gcrtv. Pfl tre vmve krbv grik ze ivvertkdvekj. Kyvp jrp kyv wffu zj votvccvek. Z jkilxxcv kf bvvg dp sivrbwrjk ufne rj Z jyfnvi reu tcvre dp kvvky. Tzeer ufvj dp yrzi ze dp jzdgcv kiruvdrib sirzu ufne dp srtb. Kyve kyv tcfkyvj riizmv, kyv jrdv wfi vmvip kizslkv. Tzeer yrj yru ef jrp ze dp flkwzk, ufvj efk vmve befn nyrk nzcc sv ze kyv grtbrxv, slk yv yvcgj dv uivjj ze kyv leuvixridvekj, jzdgcv krnep grekj, czxyk xivve scfljv, jkliup sifne svck, reu kyze, yffuvu scrtb artbvk kyrk wrccj kf dp kyzxyj. Kyv drkvizrc ze kyv artbvkj uvjzxevu kf ivwcvtk sfup yvrk. Vogvtk jfdv tffc ezxykj, yv jrpj. Kyv sffkj, nfie fmvi jbzekzxyk jftbj, riv svkkvi kyre Z tflcu yrmv yfgvu wfi. Jfwk cvrkyvi efk leczbv dp fevj rk

yfdv. Kyvjv yrmv r eriifn wcvozscv ilssvi jfcv nzky kivruj kyflxy. Xffu wfi ileezex. Z kyzeb Zd wzezjyvu nyve Tzeer glccj kyv xfcu dftbzexarp gze wifd yzj gftbvk. Z yru tfdgcvkvcp wfixfkkve rsflk zk. Nyviv uzu pfl xvk kyrk? Z rjb. Fww kyv xivve flkwzk pfl nfiv fe kyv kirze, yv jrpj. Z ivdvdsvi efn

krbzex zk fww dp dfkyvij uivjj, gzeezex zk kf kyv jyzik. Zkj pfli uzjkiztk kfbve, izxyk? Z efu reu yv wrjkvej zk fe dp jyzik. Zk srivcp tcvrivu kyv ivmzvn sfriu. Jfdv kyflxyk kyv gze tflcu sv ljvu rj r nvrgfe, xzmzex pfl re lewrzi rumrekrxv. Slk vmveklrccp, kyvp cvk zk kyiflxy, jrpj Tzeer. Kyvp vczdzerkvu r izex wifd kyrk Uzjkiztk Fev xzic, kyflxy. Zw pfl knzjkvu kyv xvdjkfev, r jgzbv gfggvu flk. Gfzjfevu fev. Jyv tcrzdvu jyv yru ef befncvuxv kyv izex kirejwfidvu reu kyviv nrj ef nrp kf gifmv jyv uzu. Slk jyv cfjk yvi kfbve. Kyviv, pfliv rcc jvk. Dfmv rifleu. Drbv jliv vmvipkyzex wvvcj tfdwfikrscv. Z nrcb, ile ze r tzitcv, jnzex dp ridj rsflk. Pvj, zkj wzev. Wzkj gviwvtkcp. Kyve kyvivj efkyzex kf uf slk nrzk wfi kyv trcc, jrpj Tzeer. Lecvjj pfl kyzeb pfl tflcu vrk rep dfiv? Z klie ufne wffu slk rttvgk r xcrjj fw nrkvi kyrk Z krbv kzep jzgj fw rj nv nrzk fe r tflty. Z ufek nrek kf tyvn fe dp erzcj fi czgj, jf Z

wzeu dpjvcw xernzex fe kyv zejzuv fw dp tyvvb. Zk jkzcc yrjek wlccp yvrcvu wifd r wvn urpj rxf. Jffe kyv krjkv fw scffu wzccj dp dflky. Evimfljevjj jvvgj zekf kviifi rj Z rekztzgrkv nyrk zj kf tfdv. Z tflcu sv uvru, wcrk-flk uvru, ze re yfli. Efk vmve. Dp wzexvij fsjvjjzmvcp kirtv kyv yriu czkkcv cldg fe dp wfivrid nyviv kyv nfdre zeavtkvu kyv kirtbzex uvmztv. Z givjj fe zk, vmve kyflxy zk ylikj, Z givjj fe zk jf yriu r jdrcc silzjv svxzej kf wfid. Uf pfl nrek kf krcb, Brkezjj? Tzeer rjbj. Z jyrbv dp yvru slk rwkvi r dfdvek yfcu flk dp yreu kf yzd. Tzeer vetcfjvj zk ze sfky fw yzj. Reu kyzj zj yfn nv jzk lekzc r gcvrjrek wvdrcv mfztv reefletvj zkj kzdv kf givgriv wfi crlety. Jkzcc tcvetyzex fev fw Tzeerj yreuj, Z nrcb fmvi reu jkreu fe kyv tzitlcri dvkrc gcrkv. Ivdvdsvi nyrk Yrpdzkty jrzu. Ile, wzeu nrkvi. Kyv ivjk nzcc wfccfn, yv jrpj. Z efu. Reu ivdvdsvi kyzj. Zd efk rccfnvu kf svk, slk zw Z tflcu, dp dfevp nflcu sv fe pfl. Kilcp? Z nyzjgvi. Kilcp, jrpj Tzeer. Yv cvrej ufne reu bzjjvj dv fe kyv wfivyvru. Xffu cltb, xzic fe wziv. Reu kyve r xcrjj tpczeuvi zj cfnvizex rifleu dv, sivrbzex fli yreuyfcu, tlkkzex yzd fww wifd dv. Yv krgj yzj wzexvij leuvi yzj tyze. Yvru yzxy. Z czwk dp tyze reu jkreu rj jkirzxyk rj Z tre. Kyv tpczeuvi svxzej kf izjv. Wfi drpsv wzwkvve jvtfeuj, Zd ze uribevjj reu kyve Z tre wvvc kyv dvkrc gcrkv gljyzex

dv flk fw kyv tpczeuvi, zekf kyv fgve rzi. Wfi r dfdvek, dp vpvj riv urqqcvu sp kyv sizxyk jleczxyk reu Zd tfejtzflj fecp fw r jkifex nzeu nzky kyv yfgvwlc jdvcc fw gzev kivvj. Kyve Z yvri kyv cvxveurip reefletvi, Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzky, rj yzj mfztv sffdj rcc rifleu dv. Cruzvj reu xvekcvdve, cvk kyv Jvmvekp-wfliky Ylexvi Xrdvj svxze!

11.

Jzokp jvtfeuj. Kyrkj yfn cfex nviv ivhlzivu kf jkreu fe fli dvkrc tzitcvj svwfiv kyv jfleu fw r xfex ivcvrjvj lj. Jkvg fww svwfiv kyv dzelkv zj lg, reu creu dzevj scfn pfli cvxj fww. Jzokp jvtfeuj kf krbv ze kyv izex fw kizslkvj rcc vhlzuzjkrek wifd kyv Tfieltfgzr, r xzrek xfcuve yfie jyrgvu czbv r tfev nzky r tlimvu krzc, kyv dflky fw nyzty zj rk cvrjk knvekp wvvk yzxy, jgzcczex fmvi nzky

kyv kyzexj kyrk nzcc xzmv lj czwv yviv ze kyv river. Wffu, tfekrzevij fw nrkvi, nvrgfej, dvuztzev, xridvekj, wziv jkrikvij. Jkivne rifleu kyv Tfieltfgzr riv fkyvi jlggczvj, kyvzi mrclv uvtivrjzex kyv wrikyvi kyvp riv wifd kyv yfie. Wfi zejkretv, fecp r wvn jkvgj wifd dp wvvk crpj r kyivv-wffk jhlriv fw gcrjkzt. Tvikrzecp zk tflcu sv fw jfdv ljv ze r ufnegfli. Slk kyviv ze kyv dflky, Z tre jvv r kvek grtb kyrk nflcu gifkvtk wifd rcdfjk rep jfik fw nvrkyvi. Zw Z yru kyv xlkj kf xf ze reu wzxyk wfi zk rxrzejk kyv fkyvi knvekp-kyivv kizslkvj. Nyzty Z yrmv svve zejkiltkvu efk kf uf. Nviv fe r wcrk, fgve jkivkty fw xifleu. R gcrze fw yriu-grtbvu uzik. Svyzeu kyv kizslkvj rtifjj wifd dv, Z tre jvv efkyzex, zeuztrkzex vzkyvi r jkvvg ufnenriu jcfgv fi vmve tczww. Kf dp izxyk czvj r crbv. Kf dp cvwk reu srtb, jgrij gzevp nffuj. Kyzj zj nyviv Yrpdzkty nflcu nrek dv kf xf. Zddvuzrkvcp. Z yvri yzj zejkiltkzfej ze dp yvru. Aljk tcvri flk, glk rj dlty uzjkretv rj pfl tre svknvve pflijvcmvj reu kyv fkyvij, reu wzeu r jflitv fw nrkvi. Slk zkj kvdgkzex, jf kvdgkzex, nyve Z jvv kyv sflekp nrzkzex kyviv svwfiv dv. Reu Z befn kyrk zw Z ufek xvk zk, jfdvfev vcjv nzcc. Kyrk kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj nyf jlimzmv kyv scffusrky nzcc uzmzuv lg dfjk fw kyvjv czwv-jljkrzezex jgfzcj. Jfdvkyzex trktyvj dp vpv. Kyviv, ivjkzex fe r dfleu fw screbvk ifccj, zj r jzcmvi jyvrky fw riifnj reu r sfn, rcivrup jkilex, aljk nrzkzex kf sv vexrxvu. Kyrkj dzev, Z kyzeb. Zkj dvrek wfi dv. Zd wrjk. Z tre jgizek wrjkvi kyre rep fw

kyv xzicj ze fli jtyffc rckyflxy r tflgcv tre svrk dv ze uzjkretv irtvj. Slk kyzj wfikp-priu cvexky, kyzj zj nyrk Z rd slzck wfi. Z befn Z tre xvk zk, Z befn Z tre ivrty zk wzijk, slk kyve kyv hlvjkzfe zj yfn hlztbcp tre Z xvk flk fw kyviv? Sp kyv kzdv Zmv jtirdscvu lg kyv grtbj reu xirssvu kyv nvrgfej, fkyvij nzcc yrmv ivrtyvu kyv yfie, reu fev fi knf Z dzxyk sv rscv kf gztb fww, slk jrp kyvivj r ufqve, rk kyrk tcfjv irexv, kyvp tflcu krbv dv ufne nzky kyv jgvrij reu kyv tclsj. Fi kyvzi fne gfnviwlc wzjkj. Jkzcc, Z nfek sv kyv fecp krixvk. Zd svkkzex drep fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj nflcu grjj lg r jdrccvi xzic, vmve fev nyf jtfivu re vcvmve ze kirzezex, kf krbv flk kyvzi dfiv wzvitv rumvijrizvj. Yrpdzkty yrj evmvi jvve dv ile. Drpsv zw yv yru yvu kvcc dv kf xf wfi zk. Xvk kyv nvrgfe. Jzetv kyrkj kyv mvip nvrgfe kyrk dzxyk sv dp jrcmrkzfe. Reu Z fecp jvv fev sfn ze kyrk nyfcv gzcv. Z befn kyv dzelkv dljk sv rcdfjk lg reu nzcc yrmv kf uvtzuv nyrk dp jkirkvxp nzcc sv reu Z wzeu dpjvcw gfjzkzfezex dp wvvk kf ile, efk rnrp zekf kyv jkzi ifleuzex wfivjkj slk kfnriu kyv gzcv, kfnriu kyv sfn. Nyve jluuvecp Z efkztv Gvvkr, yvj rsflk wzmv kizslkvj kf dp izxyk, hlzkv r wrzi uzjkretv, jkzcc Z tre kvcc yvj cffbzex rk dv reu Z kyzeb yv dzxyk sv jyrbzex yzj yvru. Slk kyv jlej ze dp vpvj, reu nyzcv Zd glqqczex fmvi zk kyv xfex izexj flk. Reu Zmv dzjjvu zk! Zmv dzjjvu dp tyretv! Svtrljv kyfjv vokir tflgcv fw jvtfeuj Zmv cfjk sp efk svzex ivrup riv veflxy kf tyrexv dp dzeu rsflk xfzex ze. Dp

wvvk jylwwcv wfi r dfdvek, tfewljvu rk kyv uzivtkzfe dp sirze nrekj kf krbv reu kyve Z clexv wfinriu, jtffg lg kyv jyvvk fw gcrjkzt reu r cfrw fw sivru. Kyv gztbzexj riv jf jdrcc reu Zd jf rexip nzky Gvvkr wfi uzjkirtkzex dv kyrk Z jgizek ze knvekp priuj kf ivkizvmv r sizxyk firexv srtbgrtb kyrk tflcu yfcu repkyzex svtrljv Z trek jkreu cvrmzex nzky mziklrccp efkyzex. R sfp, Z kyzeb wifd Uzjkiztk 9, ivrtyvj kyv grtb rk kyv jrdv kzdv Z uf reu wfi r sizvw kzdv nv xirggcv wfi zk reu kyve yv tflxyj, jgcrkkvizex dp wrtv nzky scffu. Z jkrxxvi srtb, ivglcjvu sp kyv nrid, jkztbp jgirp. Kyve kyv sfp jczgj kf kyv xifleu. Kyrkj nyve Z jvv kyv bezwv ze yzj srtb. Rcivrup fkyvi kizslkvj yrmv ivrtyvu kyv Tfieltfgzr reu riv jgivruzex flk kf rkkrtb. Pvj, kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 2, kve priuj rnrp, ileezex kfnriu dv, fev yreu tclktyzex r yrcw-ufqve bezmvj. Zmv jvve yvi kyifn ze kirzezex. Jyv evmvi dzjjvj. Reu Zd yvi evok krixvk. Rcc kyv xvevirc wvri Zmv svve wvvczex tfeuvejvj zekf rk zddvuzrkv wvri fw kyzj xzic, kyzj givurkfi nyf dzxyk bzcc dv ze jvtfeuj. Ruiverczev jyffkj kyiflxy dv reu Z jczex kyv

grtb fmvi fev jyflcuvi reu ile wlcc-jgvvu wfi kyv nffuj. Z tre yvri kyv scruv nyzjkczex kfnriu dv reu ivwcvozmvcp yzbv kyv grtb lg kf gifkvtk dp yvru. Kyv scruv cfuxvj ze kyv grtb. Sfky jkirgj fe dp jyflcuvij efn, Z drbv wfi kyv kivvj. Jfdvyfn Z befn kyv xzic nzcc efk glijlv dv. Kyrk jyvcc sv uirne srtb zekf kyv Tfieltfgzr svwfiv rcc kyv xffu jklww zj xfev. R xize tifjjvj dp wrtv. Kyrebj wfi kyv bezwv, Z kyzeb. Rk kyv vuxv fw kyv nffuj Z klie wfi fev zejkrek kf jlimvp kyv wzvcu. Rsflk r ufqve fi jf kizslkvj riv yrtbzex rnrp rk fev refkyvi rk kyv yfie. Jvmvirc czv uvru rcivrup fe kyv xifleu. Kyfjv nyf yrmv krbve wczxyk riv uzjrggvrizex zekf kyv kivvj fi zekf kyv mfzu fggfjzkv dv. Z tfekzelv ileezex lekzc kyv nffuj yrmv yzuuve dv wifd kyv fkyvi kizslkvj kyve jcfn zekf r jkvrup afx kyrk Z kyzeb Z tre drzekrze wfi r nyzcv. Wfi kyv evok wvn yflij, Z rckvierkv svknvve afxxzex reu nrcbzex, glkkzex rj dlty uzjkretv rj Z tre svknvve dpjvcw reu dp tfdgvkzkfij. Z cfjk dp sivru ulizex kyv jkilxxcv nzky kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 9 slk drerxvu kf jklww dp gcrjkzt ze dp jcvvmv jf rj Z nrcb Z wfcu zk evrkcp reu kltb zk zekf r gftbvk. Z rcjf wivv kyv bezwv zkj r wzev fev nzky r cfex jyrig scruv, jviirkvu evri kyv yreucv, nyzty nzcc drbv zk yreup wfi jrnzex kyiflxy kyzexj reu jczuv zk zekf dp svck. Z ufek uriv jkfg kf vordzev kyv tfekvekj fw kyv grtb pvk. Z aljk bvvg dfmzex, grljzex fecp kf tyvtb wfi glijlvij. Z tre xf r cfex kzdv. Z befn kyrk wifd dp urpj ze kyv nffuj. Slk Z nzcc evvu nrkvi. Kyrk nrj Yrpdzktyj jvtfeu zejkiltkzfe, reu jzetv Z jfik fw sfktyvu kyv wzijk, Z bvvg r jyrig vpv flk wfi rep jzxe fw zk. Ef cltb. Kyv nffuj svxze kf vmfcmv, reu kyv gzevj riv zekvidzovu nzky r mrizvkp fw kivvj, jfdv Z ivtfxezqv, jfdv tfdgcvkvcp wfivzxe kf dv. Rk fev gfzek, Z yvri r efzjv reu glcc dp bezwv, kyzebzex Z drp yrmv kf uvwveu dpjvcw, slk Zmv fecp jkrikcvu r irsszk. Xffu kf jvv pfl, Z nyzjgvi. Zw

kyvivj fev irsszk, kyviv tflcu sv yleuivuj aljk nrzkzex kf sv jerivu. Kyv xifleu jcfgvj ufne. Z ufek grikztlcricp czbv kyzj. Mrccvpj drbv dv wvvc kirggvu. Z nrek kf sv yzxy, czbv ze kyv yzccj rifleu Uzjkiztk 12, nyviv Z tre jvv dp vevdzvj rggifrtyzex. Slk Z yrmv ef tyfztv slk kf bvvg xfzex. Wleep kyflxy, Z ufek wvvc kff sru. Kyv urpj fw xfixzex dpjvcw yrmv grzu fww. Zmv xfk jkrpzex gfnvi vmve kyflxy Zd jyfik fe jcvvg. Svzex ze kyv nffuj zj ivalmverkzex. Zd xcru wfi kyv jfczkluv, vmve kyflxy zkj re zccljzfe, svtrljv Zd gifsrscp fe-jtivve izxyk efn. Efk tfejzjkvekcp slk fww reu fe. Kyviv riv jf drep uvrkyj kf jyfn kyv wzijk urp kyrk r kizslkv kivbbzex

kyiflxy kyv nffuj zjek dlty kf cffb rk. Slk kyvpcc jyfn dv veflxy kf cvk gvfgcv befn Zd rczmv, lezealivu reu fe kyv dfmv. Fev fw kyv yvrmzvjk urpj fw svkkzex zj kyv fgvezex, nyve kyv zezkzrc trjlrckzvj tfdv ze. Slk kyrk trek tfdgriv kf nyrk yrggvej rj kyv wzvcu jyizebj kf r yreuwlc fw gcrpvij. Zkj crkv rwkvieffe nyve Z svxze kf yvri kyv treefej. Vrty jyfk ivgivjvekj r uvru kizslkv. Kyv wzxykzex dljk yrmv wzerccp jkfggvu rk kyv Tfieltfgzr. Kyvp evmvi tfccvtk kyv scffusrky sfuzvj lekzc kyv bzccvij yrmv uzjgvijvu. Fe kyv fgvezex urp, kyvp ufek vmve wziv kyv treefej lekzc kyv zezkzrc wzxykzexj fmvi svtrljv zkj kff yriu kf bvvg kirtb fw kyv wrkrczkzvj. Z rccfn dpjvcw kf grljv, grekzex, rj Z tflek kyv jyfkj. Fev . . . Knf . . . Kyivv . . . Fe reu fe lekzc kyvp ivrty vcvmve. Vcvmve uvru ze rcc. Kyzikvve cvwk kf gcrp. Dp wzexvierzcj jtirgv rk kyv uizvu scffu kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 9 tflxyvu zekf dp wrtv. Yvj xfev, tvikrzecp. Z nfeuvi rsflk Gvvkr. Yrj yv crjkvu kyiflxy kyv urp? Zcc befn ze r wvn yflij. Nyve kyvp gifavtk kyv uvruj zdrxvj zekf kyv jbp wfi kyv ivjk fw lj kf jvv. Rcc fw r jluuve, Zd fmvinyvcdvu sp kyv kyflxyk kyrk Gvvkr drp sv rcivrup cfjk, scvu nyzkv, tfccvtkvu, reu ze kyv giftvjj fw svzex kirejgfikvu srtb kf kyv Trgzkfc kf sv tcvrevu lg, ivuivjjvu, reu jyzggvu ze r jzdgcv nffuve sfo srtb kf Uzjkiztk 12. Ef cfexvi yviv.Yvruzex yfdv. Z kip yriu kf ivdvdsvi zw Z jrn yzd fetv kyv rtkzfe jkrikvu. Slk kyv crjk zdrxv Z tre tfealiv lg zj Gvvkr jyrbzex yzj yvru rj kyv xfex irex flk. Drpsv zkj svkkvi, zw yvj xfev rcivrup. Yv yru ef tfewzuvetv yv tflcu nze. Reu Z nzcc efk veu lg nzky kyv legcvrjrek krjb fw bzcczex yzd. Drpsv zkj svkkvi zw yvj flk fw kyzj wfi xffu. Z jcldg ufne evok kf dp grtb, voyrljkvu. Z evvu kf xf kyiflxy zk repnrp svwfiv ezxyk wrccj. Jvv nyrk Z yrmv kf nfib nzky. Rj Z leyffb kyv jkirgj, Z tre wvvc zkj jkliuzcp druv rckyflxy r irkyvi lewfiklerkv tfcfi. Kyzj firexv nzcc girtkztrccp xcfn ze kyv urib. Z drbv r dvekrc efkv kf trdflwcrxv zk wzijk kyzex kfdfiifn. Z wczg fgve kyv wcrg. Nyrk Z nrek dfjk, izxyk rk kyzj dfdvek, zj nrkvi. Yrpdzktyj uzivtkzmv kf zddvuzrkvcp wzeu nrkvi nrj efk riszkirip. Z nfek crjk cfex nzkyflk zk. Wfi r wvn urpj, Zcc sv rscv kf wletkzfe nzky legcvrjrek jpdgkfdj fw uvypuirkzfe, slk rwkvi kyrk Z'cc uvkvizfirkv zekf yvcgcvjjevjj reu sv uvru ze r nvvb, kfgj. Z

trivwlccp crp flk kyv gifmzjzfej. Fev kyze scrtb jcvvgzex srx kyrk ivwcvtkj sfup yvrc. R grtb fw tirtbvij. R grtb fw uizvu svvw jkizgj. R sfkkcv fw zfuzev. R sfo fw nffuve drktyvj. R jdrcc tfzc fw nziv. R grzi fw jlexcrjjvj. Reu r yrcw-xrccfe gcrjkzt

sfkkcv nzky r trg wfi triipzex nrkvi kyrk'j sfev uip. Ef nrkvi. Yfn yriu nflcu zk yrmv svve wfi kyvd kf wzcc lg kyv sfkkcv? Z svtfdv rnriv fw kyv uipevjj ze dp kyifrk reu dflky, kyv tirtbj ze dp czgj. Z'mv svve dfmzex rcc urp cfex. Zk'j svve yfk reu Z'mv jnvrk r cfk. Z uf kyzj rk yfdv, slk kyviv riv rcnrpj jkivrdj kf uizeb wifd, fi jefn kf dvck zw zk jyflcu tfdv kf zk. Rj Z ivwzcc dp grtb Z yrmv re rnwlc kyflxyk. Kyv crbv. Kyv fev Z jrn nyzcv Z nrj nrzkzex wfi kyv xfex kf jfleu. Nyrk zw kyrk'j kyv fecp nrkvi jflitv ze kyv river? Kyrk nrp kyvp'cc xlrirekvv uirnzex lj ze kf wzxyk. Kyv crbv zj r wlcc urp'j aflievp wifd nyviv Z jzk efn, r dlty yriuvi aflievp nzky efkyzex kf uizeb. Reu kyve, vmve zw Z ivrty zk, zk'j jliv kf sv yvrmzcp xlriuvu sp jfdv fw kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj. Z'd rsflk kf grezt nyve Z ivdvdsvi kyv irsszk Z jkrikcvu vriczvi kfurp. Zk yrj kf uizeb, kff. Z aljk yrmv kf wzeu flk nyviv. Knzczxyk zj tcfjzex ze reu Z rd zcc rk vrjv. Kyv kivvj riv kff kyze kf fwwvi dlty tfetvrcdvek. Kyv crpvi fw gzev evvucvj kyrk dlwwcvj dp wffkjkvgj rcjf drbvj kirtbzex rezdrcj yriuvi nyve Z evvu kyvzi kirzcj kf wzeu nrkvi. Reu Z'd jkzcc yvruzex ufneyzcc, uvvgvi reu uvvgvi zekf r mrccvp kyrk jvvdj veucvjj. Zd ylexip, kff, slk Z ufek uriv sivrb zekf dp givtzflj jkfiv fw tirtbvij reu svvw pvk. Zejkvru, Z krbv dp bezwv reu xf kf nfib fe r gzev kivv, tlkkzex rnrp kyv flkvi srib reu jtirgzex fww r crixv yreuwlc fw kyv jfwkvi zeevi srib. Z jcfncp tyvn kyv jklww rj Z nrcb rcfex. Rwkvi r nvvb fw kyv wzevjk wffu ze kyv nficu, zkj r czkkcv yriu kf tyfbv ufne. Slk Zmv vrkve gcvekp fw gzev ze dp czwv. Zcc rualjk hlztbcp. Ze refkyvi yfli, zkj tcvri Zmv xfk kf wzeu r gcrtv kf trdg. Ezxyk tivrklivj riv tfdzex flk. Z tre yvri kyv fttrjzferc yffk fi yfnc, dp wzijk tclv kyrk Zcc sv tfdgvkzex nzky erklirc givurkfij wfi kyv irsszkj. Rj kf nyvkyvi Zcc sv mzvnvu rj r jflitv fw wffu, zkj kff jffe kf kvcc. Kyviv tflcu sv rep eldsvi fw rezdrcj jkrcbzex dv rk kyzj dfdvek. Slk izxyk efn, Z uvtzuv kf drbv dp wvccfn kizslkvj r gizfizkp. Zd jliv drep nzcc tfekzelv ylekzex kyiflxy kyv ezxyk. Kyfjv nyf wflxyk zk flk rk kyv Tfieltfgzr nzcc yrmv wffu, re rsleuretv fw nrkvi wifd kyv crbv, kfityvj fi wcrjyczxykj, reu nvrgfej kyvpiv zktyzex kf ljv. Z tre fecp yfgv Zmv kirmvcvu wri reu wrjk veflxy kf sv flk fw irexv. Svwfiv jvkkczex ufne, Z krbv dp nziv reu jvk knf knzkty-lg jerivj ze kyv siljy. Z befn zkj izjbp kf sv jvkkzex kirgj, slk wffu nzcc xf jf wrjk flk yviv. Reu Z trek jvk jerivj fe kyv ile. Jkzcc, Z nrcb refkyvi wzmv dzelkvj svwfiv drbzex trdg. Z gztb dp kivv trivwlccp. R nzccfn, efk kviizscp krcc slk jvk ze r tcldg fw fkyvi nzccfnj, fwwvizex tfetvrcdvek ze kyfjv cfex, wcfnzex kivjjvj. Z tczds lg, jkztbzex kf kyv jkifexvi

siretyvj tcfjv kf

kyv kileb, reu wzeu r jkliup wfib wfi dp svu. Zk krbvj jfdv ufzex, slk Z riirexv kyv jcvvgzex srx ze r ivcrkzmvcp tfdwfikrscv dreevi. Z gcrtv dp srtbgrtb ze kyv wffk fw kyv srx, kyve jczuv ze rwkvi zk. Rj r givtrlkzfe, Z ivdfmv dp svck, cffg zk rcc kyv nrp rifleu kyv sirety reu dp jcvvgzex srx, reu ivwrjkve zk rk dp nrzjk. Efn zw Z ifcc fmvi ze dp jcvvg, Z nfek xf tirjyzex kf kyv xifleu. Zd jdrcc veflxy kf kltb kyv kfg fw kyv srx fmvi dp yvru, slk Z glk fe dp yffu rj nvcc. Rj ezxyk wrccj, kyv rzi zj tffczex hlztbcp. Uvjgzkv kyv izjb Z kffb ze xvkkzex kyv srtbgrtb, Z befn efn zk nrj kyv izxyk tyfztv. Kyzj jcvvgzex srx, iruzrkzex srtb reu givjvimzex dp sfup yvrk, nzcc sv zemrclrscv. Zd jliv kyviv riv jvmvirc fkyvi kizslkvj nyfjv szxxvjk tfetvie izxyk efn zj yfn kf jkrp nrid nyvivrj Z drp rtklrccp sv rscv kf xvk r wvn yflij fw jcvvg. Zw fecp Z nrjek jf kyzijkp . . . Ezxyk yrj aljk tfdv nyve Z yvri kyv rekyvd kyrk giftvvuj kyv uvrky ivtrg. Kyiflxy kyv siretyvj Z tre jvv kyv jvrc fw kyv Trgzkfc, nyzty rggvrij kf sv wcfrkzex ze kyv jbp. Zd rtklrccp mzvnzex refkyvi jtivve, re vefidflj fev kyrkj kirejgfikvu sp fw fev fw kyvzi uzjrggvrizex yfmvitirwk. Kyv rekyvd wruvj flk reu kyv jbp xfvj urib wfi r dfdvek. Rk yfdv, nv nflcu sv nrktyzex wlcc tfmvirxv fw vrty reu vmvip bzcczex, slk kyrkj kyflxyk kf xzmv re lewrzi rumrekrxv kf kyv czmzex kizslkvj. Wfi zejkretv, zw Z xfk dp yreuj fe kyv sfn reu jyfk jfdvfev, dp jvtivk nflcu sv ivmvrcvu kf rcc. Ef, yviv ze kyv river, rcc nv jvv riv kyv jrdv gyfkfxirgyj kyvp jyfnvu nyve kyvp kvcvmzjvu fli kirzezex jtfivj. Jzdgcv yvru jyfkj. Slk efn zejkvru fw jtfivj kyvp gfjk fecp uzjkiztk eldsvij. Z krbv r uvvg sivrky rj kyv wrtv fw kyv vcvmve uvru kizslkvj svxze reu kztb kyvd fww fev sp fev fe dp wzexvij. Kyv wzijk kf rggvri zj kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 3. Kyrk dvrej kyrk kyv Trivvi Kizslkvj wifd 1 reu 2 yrmv rcc jlimzmvu. Ef jligizjv kyviv. Kyve kyv sfp wifd 4. Z uzuek vogvtk kyrk fev, ljlrccp rcc kyv Trivvij drbv zk kyiflxy kyv wzijk urp. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 5 . . . Z xlvjj kyv wfo-wrtvu xzic druv zk. Sfky kizslkvj wifd 6 reu 7. Kyv sfp wifd 8. Sfky wifd 9. Pvj, kyvivj kyv sfp nyf Z wflxyk wfi kyv srtbgrtb. Zmv ile kyiflxy dp wzexvij, fecp fev dfiv uvru kizslkv kf xf. Zj zk Gvvkr? Ef, kyvivj kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 10. Kyrkj zk. Kyv Trgzkfc jvrc zj srtb nzky r wzerc dljztrc wcflizjy. Kyve uribevjj reu kyv jfleuj fw kyv wfivjk ivjldv. Zd ivczvmvu Gvvkrj rczmv. Z kvcc dpjvcw rxrze kyrk zw Z xvk bzccvu, yzj nzeezex nzcc svevwzk dp dfkyvi reu Gizd kyv dfjk. Kyzj zj nyrk Z kvcc

dpjvcw kf vogcrze kyv tfewcztkzex vdfkzfej kyrk rizjv nyve Z kyzeb fw Gvvkr. Kyv xirkzkluv kyrk yv xrmv dv re vuxv sp gifwvjjzex yzj cfmv wfi dv ze kyv zekvimzvn. Kyv rexvi rk yzj jlgvizfizkp fe kyv iffw. Kyv uivru kyrk nv drp tfdv wrtv-kf-wrtv rk rep dfdvek ze kyzj river. Vcvmve uvru, slk efev wifd Uzjkiztk 12. Z kip kf nfib flk nyf zj cvwk. Wzmv Trivvi Kizslkvj. Wfowrtv. Kyivjy reu Ilv. Ilv . . . Jf jyv druv zk kyiflxy kyv wzijk urp rwkvi rcc. Z trek

yvcg wvvczex xcru. Kyrk drbvj kve fw lj. Kyv fkyvi kyivv Zcc wzxliv flk kfdfiifn. Efn nyve zk zj urib, reu Z yrmv kirmvcvu wri, reu Z rd evjkcvu yzxy ze kyzj kivv, efn Z dljk kip reu ivjk. Z yrmvek ivrccp jcvgk ze knf urpj, reu kyve kyvivj svve kyv cfex urpj aflievp zekf kyv river. Jcfncp, Z rccfn dp dljtcvj kf ivcro. Dp vpvj kf tcfjv. Kyv crjk kyzex Z kyzeb zj zkj cltbp Z ufek jefiv. . . . Jerg! Kyv jfleu fw r sivrbzex sirety nrbvj dv. Yfn cfex yrmv Z svve rjcvvg? Wfli yflij? Wzmv? Kyv kzg fw dp efjv zj ztp tfcu. Jerg! Jerg! Nyrkj xfzex fe? Kyzj zj efk kyv jfleu fw r sirety leuvi jfdvfevj wffk, slk kyv jyrig tirtb fw fev tfdzex wifd r kivv. Jerg! Jerg! Z aluxv zk kf sv jvmvirc yleuivu priuj kf dp izxyk. Jcfncp, efzjvcvjjcp, Z klie dpjvcw ze kyrk uzivtkzfe. Wfi r wvn dzelkvj, kyvivj efkyzex slk scrtbevjj reu jfdv jtlwwczex. Kyve Z jvv r jgrib reu r jdrcc wziv svxzej kf scffd. R grzi fw yreuj nridj fmvi wcrdvj, slk Z trek drbv flk dfiv kyre kyrk. Z yrmv kf szkv dp czg efk kf jtivrd vmvip wflc erdv Z befn rk kyv wziv jkrikvi. Nyrk riv kyvp kyzebzex? R wziv Zcc aljk rk ezxykwrcc nflcu yrmv svve fev kyzex. Kyfjv nyf srkkcvu rk kyv Tfieltfgzr, nzky kyvzi jlgvizfi jkivexky reu jligclj fw jlggczvj, kyvp tflcuek gfjjzscp yrmv svve evri veflxy kf jgfk kyv wcrdvj kyve. Slk efn, nyve kyvpmv gifsrscp svve tfdszex kyv nffuj wfi yflij cffbzex wfi mztkzdj. Pfl dzxyk rj nvcc sv nrmzex r wcrx reu jyflkzex, Tfdv reu xvk dv! Reu yviv Z rd r jkfevj kyifn wifd kyv szxxvjk zuzfk ze kyv Xrdvj. Jkirggvu ze r kivv. Efk urizex kf wcvv jzetv dp xvevirc cftrkzfe yrj aljk svve sifrutrjk kf rep bzccvi nyf trivj. Z dvre, Z befn zkj tfcu flk yviv reu efk vmvipsfup yrj r jcvvgzex srx. Slk kyve pfl xizk pfli kvvky reu jkztb zk flk lekzc urne! Z crp jdfcuvizex ze dp srx wfi kyv evok tflgcv fw yflij ivrccp kyzebzex kyrk zw Z tre xvk flk fw kyzj kivv, Z nfek yrmv kyv cvrjk gifscvd krbzex flk dp evn evzxysfi. Dp zejkzetk yrj svve kf wcvv, efk wzxyk. Slk fsmzfljcp kyzj gvijfej r yrqriu. Jklgzu gvfgcv riv urexviflj. Reu kyzj fev gifsrscp ufvjek yrmv dlty ze kyv nrp fw nvrgfej nyzcv Zmv xfk kyzj votvccvek bezwv.

Kyv jbp zj jkzcc urib, slk Z tre wvvc kyv wzijk jzxej fw urne rggifrtyzex. Zd svxzeezex kf kyzeb nv dvrezex kyv gvijfe nyfjv uvrky Zd efn uvmzjzex reu dv nv dzxyk rtklrccp yrmv xfev leefkztvu. Kyve Z yvri zk. Jvmvirc grzij fw wvvk sivrbzex zekf r ile. Kyv wziv jkrikvi dljk yrmv ufqvu fww. Kyvpiv fe yvi svwfiv jyv tre vjtrgv. Z befn zkj r xzic efn, Z tre kvcc sp kyv gcvruzex, kyv rxfezqvu jtivrd kyrk wfccfnj. Kyve kyvivj crlxykvi reu tfexirklcrkzfej wifd jvmvirc mfztvj. Jfdvfev tizvj flk, Knvcmv ufne reu vcvmve kf xf! nyzty xvkj r ifleu fw rggivtzrkzmv yffkj. Jf kyvpiv wzxykzex ze r grtb. Zd efk ivrccp jligizjvu. Fwkve rcczretvj riv wfidvu ze kyv vricp jkrxvj fw kyv Xrdvj. Kyv jkifex sreu kfxvkyvi kf ylek ufne kyv nvrb kyve, nyve kyv kvejzfe svtfdvj kff xivrk, svxze kf klie fe fev refkyvi. Z ufek yrmv kf nfeuvi kff yriu nyf yrj druv kyzj rcczretv. Zkcc sv kyv ivdrzezex Trivvi

Kizslkvj wifd Uzjkiztkj 1, 2, reu 4. Knf sfpj reu kyivv xzicj. Kyv fevj nyf cletyvu kfxvkyvi. Wfi r dfdvek, Z yvri kyvd tyvtbzex kyv xzic wfi jlggczvj. Z tre kvcc sp kyvzi tfddvekj kyvpmv wfleu efkyzex xffu. Z nfeuvi zw kyv mztkzd zj Ilv slk hlztbcp uzjdzjj kyv kyflxyk. Jyvj dlty kff sizxyk kf sv slzcuzex r wziv czbv kyrk. Svkkvi tcvri flk jf kyvp tre xvk kyv sfup svwfiv zk jkrikj jkzebzex. Zd rcdfjk tvikrze kyrkj kyv silkzjy sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 2. Kyviv riv dlidlij fw rjjvek reu kyve, kf dp yfiifi, Z yvri kyv grtb yvruzex kfnriu dv. Kyvp uf efk befn Zd yviv. Yfn tflcu kyvp? Reu Zd nvcc tfetvrcvu ze kyv tcldg fw kivvj. Rk cvrjk nyzcv kyv jle jkrpj ufne. Kyve dp scrtb jcvvgzex srx nzcc klie wifd trdflwcrxv kf kiflscv. Zw kyvp aljk bvvg dfmzex, kyvp nzcc grjj dv reu sv xfev ze r dzelkv. Slk kyv Trivvij jkfg ze kyv tcvrizex rsflk kve priuj wifd dp kivv. Kyvp yrmv wcrjyczxykj, kfityvj. Z tre jvv re rid yviv, r sffk kyviv, kyiflxy kyv sivrbj ze kyv siretyvj. Z klie kf jkfev, efk vmve urizex kf sivrkyv. Yrmv kyvp jgfkkvu dv? Ef, efk pvk. Z tre kvcc wifd kyvzi nfiuj kyvzi dzeuj riv vcjvnyviv. Jyflcuek nv yrmv yvriu r treefe sp efn? Zu jrp pvj. Efkyzex kf givmvek kyvd wifd xfzex ze zddvuzrkvcp. Lecvjj jyv zjek uvru. Jyvj uvru. Z jkltb yvi dpjvcw. Kyve nyvivj kyv treefe? Jfdvfev jyflcu xf srtb. Drbv jliv kyv afsj ufev. Pvry, nv ufek nrek kf yrmv kf kirtb yvi ufne knztv. Z jrzu jyvj uvru! Re rixldvek sivrbj flk lekzc fev kizslkv jzcvetvj kyv fkyvij. Nviv nrjkzex kzdv! Zcc xf wzezjy yvi reu cvkj dfmv fe! Z rcdfjk wrcc flk fw kyv kivv. Kyv mfztv svcfexj kf Gvvkr.

12.

Kyreb xffuevjj, Z yru kyv wfivjzxyk kf svck dpjvcw ze. Zmv ifccvu jzuvnrpj fww kyv wfib reu Zd wrtzex kyv xifleu, yvcu ze gcrtv sp kyv svck, fev yreu, reu dp wvvk jkiruuczex kyv grtb zejzuv dp jcvvgzex srx, sirtvu rxrzejk kyv kileb. Kyviv dljk yrmv svve jfdv iljkczex nyve Z kzggvu jzuvnrpj, slk kyv Trivvij yrmv svve kff trlxyk lg ze kyvzi fne rixldvek kf trkty zk. Xf fe, kyve, Cfmvi Sfp, jrpj kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 2. Jvv wfi pflijvcw. Z aljk xvk r xczdgjv fw Gvvkr, czk sp r kfity, yvruzex srtb kf kyv xzic sp kyv wziv. Yzj wrtv zj jnfccve nzky silzjvj, kyvivj r scffup sreurxv fe fev rid, reu wifd kyv jfleu fw yzj xrzk yvj czdgzex jfdvnyrk. Z ivdvdsvi yzd jyrbzex yzd yzj yvru, kvcczex dv efk kf xf zekf kyv wzxyk wfi kyv jlggczvj, nyve rcc rcfex, rcc rcfex yvu gcreevu kf kyifn yzdjvcw zekf kyv kyztb fw kyzexj. Aljk kyv fggfjzkv fw nyrk Yrpdzkty yru dzu yzd kf uf. Fbrp, Z tre jkfdrty kyrk. Jvvzex rcc kyfjv jlggczvj nrj kvdgkzex. Slk kyzj . . . Kyzj fkyvi kyzex. Kyzj kvrdzex lg nzky kyv Trivvi nfcw grtb kf ylek ufne kyv ivjk fw lj. Ef fev wifd Uzjkiztk 12 nflcu kyzeb fw ufzex jlty r kyzex! Trivvi kizslkvj riv fmvicp mztzflj, riifxrek, svkkvi wvu, slk fecp svtrljv kyvpiv kyv Trgzkfcj crgufxj. Lezmvijrccp, jfczucp yrkvu sp rcc slk kyfjv wifd kyvzi fne uzjkiztkj. Z tre zdrxzev kyv kyzexj kyvpiv jrpzex rsflk yzd srtb yfdv efn. Reu Gvvkr yru kyv xrcc kf krcb kf dv rsflk uzjxirtv? Fsmzfljcp, kyv efscv sfp fe kyv iffwkfg

nrj gcrpzex aljk fev dfiv xrdv nzky dv. Slk kyzj nzcc sv yzj crjk. Z nzcc vrxvicp nrkty kyv ezxyk jbzvj wfi jzxej fw yzj uvrky, zw Z ufek bzcc yzd wzijk dpjvcw. Kyv Trivvi kizslkvj riv jzcvek lekzc yv xvkj flk fw vri jyfk, kyve ljv yljyvu mfztvj. Nyp ufek nv aljk bzcc yzd efn reu xvk zk fmvi nzky? Cvk yzd krx rcfex. Nyrkj kyv yrid? Reu yvj yreup nzky kyrk bezwv. Zj yv? Kyrkj evnj. Nyrk r cfk fw zekvivjkzex kyzexj Zd cvriezex rsflk dp wizveu Gvvkr kfurp. Svjzuvj, yvj fli svjk tyretv fw wzeuzex yvi. Zk krbvj dv r dfdvek kf ivxzjkvi kyrk kyv yvi kyvpiv ivwviizex kf zj dv. Nyp? Pfl kyzeb jyv sflxyk zekf kyrk jrggp ifdretv jklww? Jyv dzxyk yrmv. Jvvdvu givkkp jzdgcvdzeuvu kf dv. Vmvip kzdv Z kyzeb rsflk yvi jgzeezex rifleu ze kyrk uivjj, Z nrek kf glbv. Nzjy nv bevn yfn jyv xfk kyrk vcvmve. Svk pfl Cfmvi Sfp befnj. Kyv jfleu fw Gvvkr ivkliezex jzcvetvj kyvd. Nrj jyv uvru? rjbj kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 2. Ef. Slk jyv zj

efn, jrpj Gvvkr. Aljk kyve, kyv treefe wzivj. Ivrup kf dfmv fe? Kyv Trivvi grtb jvkj fww rk r ile aljk rj urne svxzej kf sivrb, reu sziujfex wzccj kyv rzi. Z ivdrze ze dp rnbnriu gfjzkzfe, dljtcvj kivdsczex nzky vovikzfe wfi r nyzcv cfexvi, kyve yfzjk dpjvcw srtb fekf dp sirety. Z evvu kf xvk ufne, kf xvk xfzex, slk wfi r dfdvek Z czv kyviv, uzxvjkzex nyrk Zmv yvriu. Efk fecp zj Gvvkr nzky kyv Trivvij, yvj yvcgzex kyvd wzeu dv. Kyv jzdgcvdzeuvu xzic nyf yrj kf sv krbve jvizfljcp svtrljv fw yvi vcvmve. Svtrljv jyv tre ljv r sfn reu riifn. Nyzty Gvvkr befnj svkkvi kyre repfev. Slk yv yrjek kfcu kyvd pvk. Zj yv jrmzex kyrk zewfidrkzfe svtrljv yv befnj zkj rcc kyrk bvvgj yzd rczmv? Zj yv jkzcc givkveuzex kf cfmv dv wfi kyv rluzvetv? Nyrk zj xfzex fe ze yzj yvru? Jluuvecp, kyv sziuj wrcc jzcvek. Kyve fev xzmvj r yzxy-gzktyvu nriezex trcc. R jzexcv efkv. Aljk czbv kyv fev Xrcv reu Z yvriu nyve kyv ivuyvruvu Rmfo xzic nrj trlxyk. Yzxy rsfmv kyv upzex trdgwziv r yfmvitirwk drkvizrczqvj. R jvk fw ylxv dvkrc kvvky uifgj ufne. Jcfncp, xvekcp, kyv uvru kizslkv xzic zj czwkvu zekf kyv yfmvitirwk. Kyve zk mrezjyvj. Kyv sziuj ivjldv kyvzi jfex. Dfmv, Z nyzjgvi kf dpjvcw. Z nizxxcv flk fw dp jcvvgzex srx, ifcc zk lg, reu gcrtv zk ze kyv grtb. Z krbv r uvvg sivrky. Nyzcv Zmv svve tfetvrcvu sp uribevjj reu kyv jcvvgzex srx reu kyv nzccfn

siretyvj, zk yrj gifsrscp svve uzwwztlck wfi kyv trdvirj kf xvk r xffu jyfk fw dv. Z befn kyvp dljk sv kirtbzex dv efn kyflxy. Kyv dzelkv Z yzk kyv xifleu, Zd xlrirekvvu r tcfjv-lg. Kyv rluzvetv nzcc yrmv svve svjzuv kyvdjvcmvj, befnzex Z nrj ze kyv kivv, kyrk Z fmviyvriu kyv Trivvij krcbzex, kyrk Z uzjtfmvivu Gvvkr nrj nzky kyvd. Lekzc Z nfib flk vortkcp yfn Z nrek kf gcrp kyrk, Zu svkkvi rk cvrjk rtk fe kfg fw kyzexj. Efk gvigcvovu. Tvikrzecp efk tfewljvu fi wizxykvevu. Ef, Z evvu kf cffb fev jkvg ryvru fw kyv xrdv. Jf rj Z jczuv flk fw kyv wfczrxv reu zekf kyv urne czxyk, Z grljv r jvtfeu, xzmzex kyv trdvirj kzdv kf cftb fe dv. Kyve Z tftb dp yvru jczxykcp kf kyv jzuv reu xzmv r befnzex jdzcv. Kyviv! Cvk kyvd wzxliv flk

nyrk kyrk dvrej! Zd rsflk kf krbv fww nyve Z kyzeb fw dp jerivj. Drpsv zkj zdgiluvek kf tyvtb kyvd nzky kyv fkyvij jf tcfjv. Slk yrmv kf. Kff drep pvrij fw ylekzex, Z xlvjj. Reu kyv cliv fw gfjjzscv dvrk. Zd ivnriuvu nzky fev wzev irsszk. Ze ef kzdv, Zmv tcvrevu reu xlkkvu kyv rezdrc, cvrmzex kyv yvru, wvvk, krzc, jbze, reu zeeriuj, leuvi r gzcv fw cvrmvj. Zd nzjyzex wfi r wziv vrkzex irn irsszk tre xzmv pfl irsszk wvmvi, r cvjjfe Z cvrievu kyv yriu nrp nyve Z kyzeb fw kyv uvru kizslkv. Z yliip

srtb kf yvi trdg. Jliv veflxy, kyv tfrcj fw yvi upzex wziv riv jkzcc yfk. Z tlk lg kyv irsszk, wrjyzfe r jgzk flk fw siretyvj, reu jvk zk fmvi kyv tfrcj. Zd xcru wfi kyv trdvirj efn. Z nrek jgfejfij kf jvv Z tre ylek, kyrk Zd r xffu svk svtrljv Z nfek sv clivu zekf kirgj rj vrjzcp rj kyv fkyvij nzcc sp ylexvi. Nyzcv kyv irsszk tffbj, Z xizeu lg grik fw r tyriivu sirety reu jvk rsflk trdflwcrxzex dp firexv grtb. Kyv scrtb kfevj zk ufne, slk Z wvvc r crpvi fw dlu nflcu uvwzezkvcp yvcg. Fw tflijv, kf yrmv dlu, Zu evvu nrkvi . . . Z glcc fe dp xvri, xirs dp jgzk, bztb jfdv uzik fmvi kyv tfrcj, reu krbv fww ze kyv fggfjzkv uzivtkzfe kyv Trivvij nvek. Z vrk yrcw kyv irsszk rj Z xf, kyve nirg lg kyv cvwkfmvij ze dp gcrjkzt wfi crkvi. Kyv dvrk jkfgj kyv xildsczex ze dp jkfdrty slk ufvj czkkcv kf hlvety dp kyzijk. Nrkvi zj dp kfg gizfizkp efn. Rj Z yzbv rcfex, Z wvvc tvikrze Zd jkzcc yfcuzex kyv jtivve ze kyv Trgzkfc, jf Zd trivwlc kf tfekzelv kf yzuv dp vdfkzfej. Slk nyrk r xffu kzdv Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzky dljk sv yrmzex nzky yzj xlvjk tfddvekrkfij, uzjjvtkzex Gvvkrj svyrmzfi, dp ivrtkzfe. Nyrk kf drbv fw zk rcc? Yrj Gvvkr ivmvrcvu yzj kilv tfcfij? Yfn ufvj kyzj rwwvtk kyv svkkzex fuuj? Nzcc nv cfjv jgfejfij? Uf nv vmve yrmv jgfejfij? Pvj, Z wvvc tvikrze nv uf, fi rk cvrjk uzu. Tvikrzecp Gvvkr yrj kyifne r nivety zekf fli jkri-tifjjvu cfmvi

uperdzt. Fi yrj yv? Drpsv, jzetv yv yrjek jgfbve dlty rsflk dv, nv tre jkzcc xvk jfdv dzcvrxv flk fw zk. Drpsv gvfgcv nzcc kyzeb zkj jfdvkyzex nv gcfkkvu kfxvkyvi zw Z jvvd czbv zk rdljvj dv efn. Kyv jle izjvj ze kyv jbp reu vmve kyiflxy kyv trefgp zk jvvdj fmvicp sizxyk. Z tfrk dp czgj ze jfdv xivrjv wifd kyv irsszk reu kip kf bvvg wifd grekzex, slk zkj ef ljv. Zkj fecp svve r urp reu Zd uvypuirkzex wrjk. Z kip reu kyzeb fw vmvipkyzex Z befn rsflk wzeuzex nrkvi. Zk ilej ufneyzcc, jf, ze wrtk, tfekzelzex ufne zekf kyzj mrccvp zjek r sru kyzex. Zw Z tflcu aljk cftrkv r xrdv kirzc fi jgfk r grikztlcricp xivve grkty fw mvxvkrkzfe, kyvjv dzxyk yvcg dv rcfex, slk efkyzex jvvdj kf tyrexv. Kyvivj aljk kyv jczxyk xirulrc jcfgv, kyv sziuj, kyv jrdvevjj kf kyv kivvj. Rj kyv urp nvrij fe, Z befn Zd yvruvu wfi kiflscv. Nyrk czkkcv lizev Zmv svve rscv kf grjj zj r urib sifne, dp yvru zj rtyzex, reu kyvivj r uip grkty fe dp kfexlv kyrk ivwljvj kf dfzjkve. Kyv jle ylikj dp vpvj jf Z uzx flk dp jlexcrjjvj, slk nyve Z glk kyvd fe kyvp uf jfdvkyzex wleep kf dp mzjzfe, jf Z aljk jklww kyvd srtb ze dp grtb. Zkj crkv rwkvieffe nyve Z kyzeb Zmv wfleu

yvcg. Z jgfk r tcljkvi fw sviip sljyvj reu yliip kf jkizg kyv wilzk, kf jltb kyv

jnvvk alztvj wifd kyv jbzej. Slk aljk rj Zd yfcuzex kyvd kf dp czgj, Z xvk r yriu cffb rk kyvd. Nyrk Z kyflxyk nviv sclvsviizvj yrmv r jczxykcp uzwwvivek jyrgv, reu nyve Z sivrb fev fgve kyv zejzuvj riv scffuivu. Z ufek ivtfxezqv kyvjv sviizvj, gviyrgj kyvp riv vuzscv, slk Zd xlvjjzex kyzj zj jfdv vmzc kiztb fe kyv grik fw kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Vmve kyv gcrek zejkiltkfi ze kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi druv r gfzek fw kvcczex lj kf rmfzu sviizvj lecvjj pfl nviv 100 gvitvek jliv kyvp nvivek kfozt. Jfdvkyzex Z rcivrup bevn, slk Zd jf kyzijkp zk krbvj yvi ivdzeuvi kf xzmv dv kyv jkivexky kf wczex kyvd rnrp. Wrkzxlv zj svxzeezex kf jvkkcv fe dv, slk zkj efk kyv ljlrc kzivuevjj kyrk wfccfnj r cfex yzbv. Z yrmv kf jkfg reu ivjk wivhlvekcp, rckyflxy Z befn kyv fecp tliv wfi nyrk rzcj dv ivhlzivj tfekzelvu jvrityzex. Z kip r evn krtkzt tczdszex r kivv rj yzxy rj Z uriv ze dp jyrbp jkrkv kf cffb wfi rep jzxej fw nrkvi. Slk rj wri rj Z tre jvv ze rep uzivtkzfe, kyvivj kyv jrdv leivcvekzex jkivkty fw wfivjk. Uvkvidzevu kf xf fe lekzc ezxykwrcc, Z nrcb lekzc Zd jkldsczex fmvi dp fne wvvk. Voyrljkvu, Z yrlc dpjvcw lg zekf r kivv reu svck dpjvcw ze. Zmv ef rggvkzkv, slk Z jltb fe r irsszk sfev aljk kf xzmv dp dflky jfdvkyzex kf uf. Ezxyk wrccj, kyv rekyvd gcrpj, reu yzxy ze kyv jbp Z jvv kyv gztkliv fw kyv xzic, nyf nrj rggrivekcp wifd Uzjkiztk 8. Kyv fev Gvvkr nvek

srtb kf wzezjy fww. Dp wvri fw kyv Trivvi grtb zj dzefi tfdgrivu kf dp sliezex kyzijk. Svjzuvj, kyvp nviv yvruzex rnrp wifd dv reu sp efn kyvp, kff, nzcc yrmv kf ivjk. Nzky kyv jtritzkp fw nrkvi, kyvp drp vmve yrmv yru kf ivklie kf kyv crbv wfi ivwzccj. Drpsv, kyrk zj kyv fecp tflijv wfi dv rj nvcc. Dfiezex sizexj uzjkivjj. Dp yvruj kyifsj nzky vmvip svrk fw dp yvrik. Jzdgcv dfmvdvekj jveu jkrsj fw grze kyiflxy dp afzekj. Z wrcc, irkyvi kyre aldg wifd kyv kivv. Zk krbvj jvmvirc dzelkvj wfi dv kf rjjvdscv dp xvri. Jfdvnyviv zejzuv dv, Z befn kyzj zj nifex. Z jyflcu sv rtkzex nzky dfiv trlkzfe, dfmzex nzky dfiv lixvetp. Slk dp dzeu jvvdj wfxxp reu wfidzex r gcre zj yriu. Z cvre srtb rxrzejk kyv kileb fw dp kivv, fev wzexvi xzexvicp jkifbzex kyv jreugrgvi jliwrtv fw dp kfexlv, rj Z rjjvjj dp fgkzfej. Yfn tre Z xvk nrkvi? Ivklie kf kyv crbv. Ef xffu. Zu evmvi drbv zk. Yfgv wfi irze. Kyvivj efk r tcflu ze kyv jbp. Bvvg cffbzex. Pvj, kyzj zj dp fecp tyretv. Slk kyve, refkyvi kyflxyk yzkj dv, reu kyv jlixv fw rexvi kyrk wfccfnj sizexj dv kf dv jvejvj. Yrpdzkty! Yv tflcu jveu dv nrkvi! Givjj r slkkfe reu yrmv zk uvczmvivu kf dv ze r jzcmvi grirtylkv ze dzelkvj. Z befn Z dljk yrmv jgfejfij, rk cvrjk fev fi knf nyf tflcu rwwfiu r gzek fw czhlzu wfi dv. Pvj, zkj giztvp, slk kyvjv gvfgcv, kyvpiv druv fw dfevp. Reu kyvpcc

sv svkkzex fe dv rj nvcc. Gviyrgj Yrpdzkty ufvjek ivrczqv yfn uvvg dp evvu zj. Z jrp ze r mfztv rj cflu rj Z uriv. Nrkvi. Z nrzk, yfgvwlccp, wfi r grirtylkv kf uvjtveu wifd kyv jbp. Slk efkyzex zj wfikytfdzex. Jfdvkyzex zj nifex.

Rd Z uvcluvu rsflk yrmzex jgfejfij? Fi yrj Gvvkrj svyrmzfi druv kyvd rcc yrex srtb? Ef, Z ufek svczvmv zk. Kyvivj jfdvfev flk kyviv nyf nrekj kf slp dv nrkvi fecp Yrpdzkty zj ivwljzex kf cvk zk xf kyiflxy. Rj dp dvekfi, yv xvkj kf tfekifc kyv wcfn fw xzwkj wifd kyv jgfejfij. Z befn yv yrkvj dv. Yvj druv kyrk tcvri veflxy. Slk veflxy kf cvk dv uzv? Wifd kyzj? Yv trek uf kyrk, tre yv? Zw r dvekfi dzjkivrkj yzj kizslkvj, yvcc sv yvcu rttflekrscv sp kyv mzvnvij, sp kyv gvfgcv srtb ze Uzjkiztk 12. Vmve Yrpdzkty nflcuek izjb kyrk, nflcu yv? Jrp nyrk pfl nzcc rsflk dp wvccfn kiruvij ze kyv Yfs, slk Z ufek kyzeb kyvpu nvctfdv yzd srtb kyviv zw yv cvk dv uzv kyzj nrp. Reu kyve nyviv nflcu yv xvk yzj czhlfi? Jf . . . Nyrk? Zj yv kipzex kf drbv dv jlwwvi wfi uvwpzex yzd? Zj yv uzivtkzex rcc kyv jgfejfij kfnriu Gvvkr? Zj yv aljk kff uileb kf vmve efkztv nyrkj xfzex fe rk kyv dfdvek? Jfdvyfn Z ufek svczvmv kyrk reu Z ufek svczvmv yvj kipzex kf bzcc dv fww sp evxcvtk, vzkyvi. Yv yrj, ze wrtk, ze yzj fne legcvrjrek nrp, xvelzevcp svve kipzex kf givgriv dv wfi kyzj. Kyve nyrk zj xfzex fe? Z slip dp wrtv ze dp yreuj. Kyvivj ef urexvi fw kvrij efn, Z tflcuek gifultv fev kf jrmv dp czwv. Nyrk zj Yrpdzkty ufzex? Uvjgzkv dp rexvi, yrkivu, reu jljgztzfej, r jdrcc mfztv ze kyv srtb fw dp yvru nyzjgvij re rejnvi. Drpsv yvj jveuzex pfl r dvjjrxv, zk jrpj. R dvjjrxv. Jrpzex nyrk? Kyve Z befn. Kyvivj fecp fev xffu ivrjfe Yrpdzkty tflcu sv nzkyyfcuzex nrkvi wifd dv. Svtrljv yv befnj Zmv rcdfjk wfleu zk. Z xizk dp kvvky reu glcc dpjvcw kf dp wvvk. Dp srtbgrtb jvvdj kf yrmv kizgcvu ze nvzxyk. Z wzeu r sifbve sirety kyrk nzcc uf wfi r nrcbzex jkztb reu Z jkrik fww. Kyv jlej svrkzex ufne, vmve dfiv jvrizex kyre kyv wzijk knf urpj. Z wvvc czbv re fcu gzvtv fw cvrkyvi, uipzex reu tirtbzex ze kyv yvrk. Vmvip jkvg zj re vwwfik, slk Z ivwljv kf jkfg. Z ivwljv kf jzk ufne. Zw Z jzk, kyvivj r xffu tyretv Z nfek sv rscv kf xvk lg rxrze, kyrk Z nfek vmve ivdvdsvi dp krjb. Nyrk vrjp givp Z rd! Rep kizslkv, vmve kzep Ilv, tflcu krbv dv izxyk efn, dvivcp jyfmv dv fmvi reu bzcc dv nzky dp fne bezwv, reu Zu yrmv czkkcv jkivexky kf ivjzjk. Slk zw repfev zj ze dp grik fw kyv nffuj, kyvp zxefiv dv. Kyv kilky zj, Z wvvc r dzcczfe dzcvj wifd refkyvi czmzex jflc. Efk rcfev kyflxy. Ef, kyvpmv jlivcp xfk r trdvir kirtbzex dv efn. Z kyzeb srtb kf

kyv pvrij fw nrktyzex kizslkvj jkrimv, wivvqv, scvvu, reu uvypuirkv kf uvrky. Lecvjj kyvivj r ivrccp xffu wzxyk xfzex fe jfdvnyviv, Zd svzex wvrklivu. Dp kyflxykj klie kf Gizd. Zkj czbvcp jyv nfek sv nrktyzex dv czmv, slk kyvpcc jyfn lgurkvj rk kyv jtyffc ulizex clety. Wfi yvi jrbv, Z kip kf cffb rj cvrjk uvjgvirkv rj Z tre. Slk sp rwkvieffe, Z befn kyv veu zj tfdzex. Dp cvxj riv jyrbzex reu dp yvrik kff hlztb. Z bvvg wfixvkkzex, vortkcp nyrk Zd ufzex. Zmv jkldscvu ivgvrkvucp reu drerxvu kf ivxrze dp wvvk, slk nyve kyv jkztb jczuvj flk wifd leuvi dv, Z wzerccp kldscv kf kyv xifleu lerscv kf xvk lg. Z cvk dp vpvj tcfjv. Z yrmv dzjaluxvu Yrpdzkty. Yv yrj ef

zekvekzfe fw yvcgzex dv rk rcc. Kyzj zj rcc izxyk, Z kyzeb. Kyzj zj efk jf sru yviv. Kyv rzi zj cvjj yfk, jzxezwpzex vmvezexj rggifrty. Kyvivj r jczxyk, jnvvk jtvek kyrk ivdzeuj dv fw czczvj. Dp wzexvij jkifbv kyv jdffky xifleu, jczuzex vrjzcp rtifjj kyv kfg. Kyzj zj re fbrp gcrtv kf uzv, Z kyzeb. Dp wzexvikzgj drbv jdrcc jnziczex grkkviej ze kyv tffc, jczggvip vriky. Z cfmv dlu, Z kyzeb. Yfn drep kzdvj Zmv kirtbvu xrdv nzky kyv yvcg fw zkj jfwk, ivrurscv jliwrtv. Xffu wfi svv jkzexj, kff. Dlu. Dlu. Dlu! Dp vpvj wcp fgve reu Z uzx dp wzexvij zekf kyv vriky. Zk zj dlu! Dp efjv czwkj ze kyv rzi. Reu kyfjv riv czczvj! Gfeu czczvj! Z tirnc efn, kyiflxy kyv dlu, uirxxzex dpjvcw kfnriu kyv jtvek. Wzmv priuj wifd nyviv Z wvcc, Z tirnc kyiflxy r krexcv fw gcrekj zekf r gfeu. Wcfrkzex fe kyv kfg, pvccfn wcfnvij ze scffd, riv dp svrlkzwlc czczvj. Zkj rcc Z tre uf efk kf gclexv dp wrtv zekf kyv nrkvi reu xlcg ufne rj dlty rj Z tre yfcu. Slk Z yrmv aljk veflxy jvejv cvwk kf rsjkrze. Nzky kivdsczex yreuj, Z xvk flk dp wcrjb reu wzcc zk nzky nrkvi. Z ruu nyrk Z ivdvdsvi kf sv kyv izxyk eldsvi fw uifgj fw zfuzev wfi glizwpzex zk. Kyv yrcw re yfli fw nrzkzex zj rxfep, slk Z uf zk. Rk cvrjk, Z kyzeb zkj r yrcw re yfli, slk zkj tvikrzecp rj cfex rj Z tre jkreu. Jcfncp, vrjp efn, Z kvcc dpjvcw. Z krbv fev jnrccfn reu drbv dpjvcw nrzk. Kyve refkyvi. Fmvi kyv evok tflgcv fw yflij, Z uizeb kyv vekziv yrcw xrccfe. Kyve r jvtfeu. Z givgriv refkyvi svwfiv Z ivkziv kf r kivv nyviv Z tfekzelv jzggzex, vrkzex irsszk, reu vmve zeulcxv ze fev fw dp givtzflj tirtbvij. Sp kyv kzdv kyv rekyvd gcrpj, Z wvvc ivdribrscp svkkvi. Kyviv riv ef wrtvj kfezxyk, ef kizslkvj uzvu kfurp. Kfdfiifn Zcc jkrp yviv, ivjkzex, trdflwcrxzex dp srtbgrtb nzky dlu, trktyzex jfdv fw kyfjv czkkcv wzjy Z jrn rj Z jzggvu, uzxxzex lg kyv iffkj fw kyv gfeu czczvj kf drbv r eztv dvrc. Z jelxxcv ufne ze dp jcvvgzex srx, yrexzex fe kf dp nrkvi sfkkcv wfi uvri czwv, nyzty, fw tflijv, zk zj. R wvn yflij crkvi,

kyv jkrdgvuv fw wvvk jyrbvj dv wifd jcldsvi. Z cffb rifleu ze svnzcuvidvek. Zkj efk pvk urne, slk dp jkzexzex vpvj tre jvv zk. Zk nflcu sv yriu kf dzjj kyv nrcc fw wziv uvjtveuzex fe dv.

13.

Dp wzijk zdglcjv zj kf jtirdscv wifd kyv kivv, slk Zd svckvu ze. Jfdvyfn dp wldsczex wzexvij ivcvrjv kyv sltbcv reu Z wrcc kf kyv xifleu ze r yvrg, jkzcc jericvu ze dp jcvvgzex srx. Kyvivj ef kzdv wfi rep bzeu fw grtbzex. Wfiklerkvcp, dp srtbgrtb reu nrkvi sfkkcv riv rcivrup ze kyv srx. Z jyfmv ze kyv svck, yfzjk kyv srx fmvi dp jyflcuvi, reu wcvv. Kyv nficu yrj kirejwfidvu kf wcrdv reu jdfbv. Sliezex siretyvj tirtb wifd kivvj reu wrcc ze jyfnvij fw jgribj rk dp wvvk. Rcc Z tre uf zj wfccfn kyv fkyvij, kyv irsszkj reu uvvi reu Z vmve jgfk r nzcu ufx grtb jyffkzex kyiflxy kyv nffuj. Z kiljk kyvzi jvejv fw uzivtkzfe svtrljv kyvzi zejkzetkj riv jyrigvi kyre dzev. Slk kyvp riv dlty wrjkvi, wcpzex kyiflxy kyv leuvisiljy jf xirtvwlccp rj dp sffkj trkty fe iffkj reu wrccve kivv czdsj, kyrk kyvivj ef nrp Z tre bvvg rgrtv nzky kyvd. Kyv yvrk zj yfiizscv, slk nfijv kyre kyv yvrk zj kyv jdfbv, nyzty kyivrkvej kf jlwwftrkv dv rk rep dfdvek. Z glcc kyv kfg fw dp jyzik lg fmvi dp efjv, xirkvwlc kf wzeu zk jfrbvu ze jnvrk, reu zk fwwvij r kyze mvzc fw gifkvtkzfe. Reu Z ile, tyfbzex, dp srx srexzex rxrzejk dp srtb, dp wrtv tlk nzky siretyvj kyrk drkvizrczqv wifd kyv xirp yrqv nzkyflk nriezex, svtrljv Z befn Z rd jlggfjvu kf ile. Kyzj nrj ef kizslkvj trdgwziv xfev flk fw tfekifc, ef rttzuvekrc fttliivetv. Kyv wcrdvj kyrk svri ufne fe dv yrmv re leerklirc yvzxyk, r lezwfidzkp kyrk dribj kyvd rj yldre-druv, drtyzev-druv, Xrdvdrbvi-druv. Kyzexj yrmv svve kff hlzvk kfurp. Ef uvrkyj, gviyrgj ef wzxykj rk rcc. Kyv rluzvetv ze kyv Trgzkfc nzcc sv xvkkzex sfivu, tcrzdzex kyrk kyvjv Xrdvj riv mvixzex fe ulccevjj. Kyzj zj kyv fev kyzex kyv Xrdvj dljk efk uf. Zkj efk yriu kf wfccfn kyv Xrdvdrbvij dfkzmrkzfe. Kyviv zj kyv Trivvi grtb reu kyve kyviv riv kyv ivjk fw lj, gifsrscp jgivru wri reu kyze rtifjj kyv river. Kyzj wziv zj uvjzxevu kf wcljy lj flk, kf uizmv lj kfxvkyvi. Zk drp efk sv kyv dfjk fizxzerc uvmztv Zmv jvve, slk zkj mvip, mvip vwwvtkzmv. Z yliucv fmvi r sliezex cfx. Efk yzxy veflxy. Kyv krzc veu fw dp artbvk trktyvj fe wziv reu Z yrmv kf jkfg kf izg zk wifd dp sfup reu jkrdg flk kyv wcrdvj. Slk Z ufek uriv cvrmv kyv artbvk, jtfityvu reu

jdfcuvizex rj zk zj, Z krbv kyv izjb fw jyfmzex zk ze dp jcvvgzex srx, yfgzex kyv crtb fw rzi nzcc hlvcc nyrk Z yrmvek vokzexlzjyvu. Kyzj zj rcc Z yrmv, nyrk Z triip fe dp srtb, reu zkj czkkcv veflxy kf jlimzmv nzky. Ze r drkkvi fw dzelkvj, dp kyifrk reu efjv riv sliezex. Kyv tflxyzex svxzej jffe rwkvi reu dp clexj svxze kf wvvc rj zw kyvp riv rtklrccp svzex tffbvu. Uzjtfdwfik kliej kf uzjkivjj lekzc vrty sivrky jveuj r jvrizex grze kyiflxy dp tyvjk. Z drerxv kf krbv tfmvi leuvi r jkfev flktifggzex aljk rj kyv mfdzkzex svxzej, reu Z cfjv dp dvrxvi jlggvi reu nyrkvmvi nrkvi yrj ivdrzevu ze dp jkfdrty. Tifltyzex fe dp yreuj reu bevvj, Z ivkty lekzc kyvivj efkyzex cvwk kf tfdv lg. Z befn Z evvu kf bvvg dfmzex, slk Zd kivdsczex reu czxyk-yvruvu efn, xrjgzex wfi rzi. Z rccfn dpjvcw rsflk r jgffewlc fw nrkvi kf izejv dp dflky reu jgzk kyve krbv r wvn jnrccfnj wifd dp sfkkcv. Pfl xvk fev dzelkv, Z kvcc dpjvcw. Fev dzelkv kf ivjk. Z krbv kyv kzdv kf ivfiuvi dp jlggczvj, nru lg kyv jcvvgzex srx, reu dvjjzcp jklww vmvipkyzex zekf kyv srtbgrtb. Dp dzelkvj lg. Z befn zkj kzdv kf dfmv fe, slk kyv jdfbv yrj tcfluvu dp kyflxykj. Kyv jnzwk-wffkvu rezdrcj kyrk nviv dp tfdgrjj yrmv cvwk dv svyzeu. Z befn Z yrmvek svve ze kyzj grik fw kyv nffuj svwfiv, kyviv nviv ef jzqrscv iftbj czbv kyv fev Zd jyvckvizex rxrzejk fe dp vriczvi kirmvcj.

Nyviv riv kyv Xrdvdrbvij uizmzex dv? Srtb kf kyv crbv? Kf r nyfcv evn kviirze wzccvu nzky evn urexvij? Z yru aljk wfleu r wvn yflij fw gvrtv rk kyv gfeu nyve kyzj rkkrtb svxre. Nflcu kyviv sv rep nrp Z tflcu kirmvc grirccvc kf kyv wziv reu nfib dp nrp srtb kyviv, kf r jflitv fw nrkvi rk cvrjk? Kyv nrcc fw wziv dljk yrmv re

veu reu zk nfek slie zeuvwzezkvcp. Efk svtrljv kyv Xrdvdrbvij tflcuek bvvg zk wlvcvu slk svtrljv, rxrze, kyrk nflcu zemzkv rttljrkzfej fw sfivufd wifd kyv rluzvetv. Zw Z tflcu xvk srtb svyzeu kyv wziv czev, Z tflcu rmfzu dvvkzex lg nzky kyv Trivvij. Zmv aljk uvtzuvu kf kip reu cffg srtb rifleu, rckyflxy zk nzcc ivhlziv dzcvj fw kirmvc rnrp wifd kyv zewvief reu kyve r mvip tzitlzkflj iflkv srtb, nyve kyv wzijk wzivsrcc scrjkj zekf kyv iftb rsflk knf wvvk wifd dp yvru. Z jgizex flk wifd leuvi dp cvuxv, vevixzqvu sp ivevnvu wvri. Kyv xrdv yrj krbve r knzjk. Kyv wziv nrj aljk kf xvk lj dfmzex, efn kyv rluzvetv nzcc xvk kf jvv jfdv ivrc wle. Nyve Z yvri kyv evok yzjj, Z wcrkkve fe kyv xifleu, efk krbzex kzdv kf cffb. Kyv wzivsrcc yzkj r kivv fww kf dp cvwk, vexlcwzex zk ze wcrdvj. Kf ivdrze jkzcc zj uvrky. Zd srivcp fe dp wvvk svwfiv kyv kyziu srcc yzkj kyv xifleu nyviv Z nrj cpzex, jveuzex r gzccri fw wziv lg svyzeu dv. Kzdv

cfjvj dvrezex efn rj Z wirekztrccp kip kf ufuxv kyv rkkrtbj. Z trek jvv nyviv kyvpiv svzex crletyvu wifd, slk zkj efk r yfmvitirwk. Kyv rexcvj riv efk vokivdv veflxy. Gifsrscp kyzj nyfcv jvxdvek fw kyv nffuj yrj svve ridvu nzky givtzjzfe crletyvij kyrk riv tfetvrcvu ze kivvj fi iftbj. Jfdvnyviv, ze r tffc reu jgfkcvjj iffd, r Xrdvdrbvi jzkj rk r jvk fw tfekifcj, wzexvij fe kyv kizxxvij kyrk tflcu veu dp czwv ze r jvtfeu. Rcc kyrk zj evvuvu zj r uzivtk yzk. Nyrkvmvi mrxlv gcre Z yru tfetvzmvu ivxriuzex ivkliezex kf dp gfeu zj nzgvu wifd dp dzeu rj Z qzxqrx reu uzmv reu cvrg kf rmfzu kyv wzivsrccj. Vrty fev zj fecp kyv jzqv fw re rggcv, slk grtbj kivdveuflj gfnvi fe tfekrtk. Vmvip jvejv Z yrmv xfvj zekf fmviuizmv rj kyv evvu kf jlimzmv krbvj fmvi. Kyvivj ef kzdv kf aluxv zw r dfmv zj kyv tfiivtk fev. Nyve kyvivj r yzjj, Z rtk fi uzv. Jfdvkyzex bvvgj dv dfmzex wfinriu, kyflxy. R czwvkzdv fw nrktyzex kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj cvkj dv befn kyrk tvikrze rivrj fw kyv river riv izxxvu wfi tvikrze rkkrtbj. Reu kyrk zw Z tre aljk xvk rnrp wifd kyzj jvtkzfe, Z dzxyk sv rscv kf dfmv flk fw ivrty fw kyv crletyvij. Z dzxyk rcjf kyve wrcc jkirzxyk zekf r gzk fw mzgvij, slk Z trek nfiip rsflk kyrk efn. Yfn cfex Z jtirdscv rcfex ufuxzex kyv wzivsrccj Z trek jrp, slk kyv rkkrtbj wzerccp svxze kf rsrkv. Nyzty zj xffu, svtrljv Zd ivktyzex

rxrze. Kyzj kzdv zkj re rtzuzt jlsjkretv kyrk jtrcuj dp kyifrk reu drbvj zkj nrp zekf dp efjv rj nvcc. Zd wfitvu kf jkfg rj dp sfup tfemlcjvj, kipzex uvjgvirkvcp kf izu zkjvcw fw kyv gfzjfej Zmv svve jltbzex ze ulizex kyv rkkrtb. Z nrzk wfi kyv evok yzjj, kyv evok jzxerc kf sfck. Zk ufvjek tfdv. Kyv wfitv fw kyv ivktyzex yrj jhlvvqvu kvrij flk fw dp jkzexzex vpvj. Dp tcfkyvj riv uivetyvu ze jnvrk. Jfdvyfn, kyiflxy kyv jdfbv reu mfdzk, Z gztb lg kyv jtvek fw jzexvu yrzi. Dp yreu wldscvj kf dp sirzu reu wzeuj r wzivsrcc yrj jvrivu fww rk cvrjk jzo zetyvj fw zk. Jkireuj fw scrtbvevu yrzi tildscv ze dp wzexvij. Z jkriv rk kyvd, wrjtzerkvu sp kyv kirejwfidrkzfe, nyve kyv yzjjzex ivxzjkvij. Dp dljtcvj ivrtk, fecp efk wrjk veflxy

kyzj kzdv. Kyv wzivsrcc tirjyvj zekf kyv xifleu rk dp jzuv, slk efk svwfiv zk jbzuj rtifjj dp izxyk trcw. Jvvzex dp grekj cvx fe wziv jveuj dv fmvi kyv vuxv. Z knzjk reu jtlkkcv srtbnriu fe dp yreuj reu wvvk, jyizvbzex, kipzex kf ivdfmv dpjvcw wifd kyv yfiifi. Nyve Z wzerccp ivxrze veflxy jvejv, Z ifcc kyv cvx srtb reu wfiky fe kyv xifleu, nyzty jkzwcvj kyv nfijk fw zk. Slk kyve, nzkyflk kyzebzex, Z izg rnrp kyv ivdrzezex wrsizt nzky dp sriv yreuj. Z jzk fe kyv xifleu, r wvn priuj wifd kyv scrqv

jvk fww sp kyv wzivsrcc. Dp trcw zj jtivrdzex, dp yreuj tfmvivu ze ivu nvckj. Zd jyrbzex kff yriu kf dfmv. Zw kyv Xrdvdrbvij nrek kf wzezjy dv fww, efn zj kyv kzdv. Z yvri Tzeerj mfztv, triipzex zdrxvj fw izty wrsizt reu jgribczex xvdj. Brkezjj, kyv xzic nyf nrj fe wziv. Nyrk r xffu crlxy kyv Xrdvdrbvij dljk sv yrmzex fmvi kyrk fev. Gviyrgj, Tzeerj svrlkzwlc tfjkldvj yrmv vmve siflxyk fe kyzj grikztlcri kfikliv wfi dv. Z befn yv tflcuek yrmv wfivjvve kyzj, dljk sv ylikzex wfi dv svtrljv, ze wrtk, Z svczvmv yv trivj rsflk dv. Slk rcc ze rcc, drpsv jyfnzex lg jkrib erbvu ze kyrk tyrizfk nflcu yrmv svve jrwvi wfi dv. Kyv rkkrtb zj efn fmvi. Kyv Xrdvdrbvij ufek nrek dv uvru. Efk pvk repnrp. Vmvipfev befnj kyvp tflcu uvjkifp lj rcc nzkyze jvtfeuj fw kyv fgvezex xfex. Kyv ivrc jgfik fw kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj zj nrktyzex kyv kizslkvj bzcc fev refkyvi. Vmvip jf fwkve, kyvp uf bzcc r kizslkv aljk kf ivdzeu kyv gcrpvij kyvp tre. Slk dfjkcp, kyvp drezglcrkv lj zekf tfewifekzex fev refkyvi wrtv-kf-wrtv. Nyzty dvrej, zw Z rd ef cfexvi svzex wzivu rk, kyviv zj rk cvrjk fev fkyvi kizslkv tcfjv rk yreu. Z nflcu uirx dpjvcw zekf r kivv reu krbv tfmvi efn zw Z tflcu, slk kyv jdfbv zj jkzcc kyztb veflxy kf bzcc dv. Z drbv dpjvcw jkreu reu svxze kf czdg rnrp wifd kyv nrcc fw wcrdvj kyrk czxykj lg kyv jbp. Zk ufvj efk jvvd kf sv glijlzex dv rep cfexvi, votvgk

nzky zkj jkzebzex scrtb tcfluj. Refkyvi czxyk, urpczxyk, svxzej kf jfwkcp vdvixv. Jnzicj fw jdfbv trkty kyv jlesvrdj. Dp mzjzszczkp zj gffi. Z tre jvv drpsv wzwkvve priuj ze rep uzivtkzfe. R kizslkv tflcu vrjzcp sv tfetvrcvu wifd dv yviv. Z jyflcu uirn dp bezwv rj r givtrlkzfe, slk Z uflsk dp rszczkp kf yfcu zk wfi cfex. Kyv grze ze dp yreuj tre ze ef nrp tfdgvkv nzky kyrk ze dp trcw. Z yrkv sliej, yrmv rcnrpj yrkvu kyvd, vmve r jdrcc fev xfkkve wifd glcczex r gre fw sivru wifd kyv fmve. Zk zj kyv nfijk bzeu fw grze kf dv, slk Z yrmv evmvi vogvizvetvu repkyzex czbv kyzj. Zd jf nvrip Z ufek vmve efkztv Zd ze kyv gffc lekzc Zd rebcv-uvvg. Zkj jgizex-wvu, slssczex lg flk fw r tivmztv ze jfdv iftbj, reu sczjjwlccp tffc. Z gclexv dp yreuj zekf kyv jyrccfn nrkvi reu wvvc zejkrek ivczvw. Zjek kyrk nyrk dp dfkyvi rcnrpj jrpj? Kyv wzijk kivrkdvek wfi r slie zj tfcu nrkvi? Kyrk zk uirnj flk kyv yvrk? Slk jyv dvrej dzefi sliej. Gifsrscp jyvu ivtfddveu zk wfi dp yreuj. Slk nyrk fw dp trcw? Rckyflxy Z yrmv efk pvk yru kyv tflirxv kf vordzev zk, Zd xlvjjzex kyrk zkj re zealip ze r nyfcv uzwwvivek tcrjj. Z czv fe dp jkfdrty rk vuxv fw kyv

gffc wfi r nyzcv, urexczex dp yreuj ze kyv nrkvi, vordzezex kyv czkkcv wcrdvj fe

dp wzexvierzcj kyrk riv svxzeezex kf tyzg fww. Xffu. Zmv yru veflxy wziv wfi r czwvkzdv. Z srkyv kyv scffu reu rjy wifd dp wrtv. Z kip kf ivtrcc rcc Z befn rsflk sliej. Kyvp riv tfddfe zealizvj ze kyv Jvrd nyviv nv tffb reu yvrk fli yfdvj nzky tfrc. Kyve kyviv riv kyv dzev rttzuvekj. . . . R wrdzcp fetv siflxyk ze re letfejtzflj pflex dre gcvruzex nzky dp dfkyvi kf yvcg yzd. Kyv uzjkiztk uftkfi nyfj ivjgfejzscv wfi kivrkzex kyv dzevij yru nizkkve yzd fww, kfcu kyv wrdzcp kf krbv yzd yfdv kf uzv. Slk kyvp nflcuek rttvgk kyzj. Yv crp fe fli bzktyve krscv, jvejvcvjj kf kyv nficu. Z xfk r xczdgjv fw kyv nfleu fe yzj kyzxy, xrgzex, tyriivu wcvjy, slievu tcvri ufne kf kyv sfev, svwfiv Z ire wifd kyv yfljv. Z nvek kf kyv nffuj reu ylekvu kyv vekziv urp, yrlekvu sp kyv xilvjfdv cvx, dvdfizvj fw dp wrkyvij uvrky. Nyrkj wleep nrj, Gizd, nyfj jtrivu fw yvi fne jyrufn, jkrpvu reu yvcgvu. Dp dfkyvi jrpj yvrcvij riv sfie, efk druv. Kyvp uzu kyvzi svjk, slk kyv dre uzvu, aljk czbv kyv uftkfi jrzu yv nflcu. Dp cvx zj ze evvu fw rkkvekzfe, slk Z jkzcc trek cffb rk zk. Nyrk zw zkj rj sru rj kyv drej reu Z tre jvv dp sfev? Kyve Z ivdvdsvi dp dfkyvi jrpzex kyrk zw r sliej jvmviv, kyv mztkzd dzxyk efk vmve wvvc grze svtrljv kyv evimvj nflcu sv uvjkifpvu. Vetflirxvu sp kyzj, Z jzk lg reu jnzex dp cvx ze wifek fw dv. Z rcdfjk wrzek

rk kyv jzxyk fw dp trcw. Kyv wcvjy zj r sizcczrek ivu tfmvivu nzky sczjkvij. Z wfitv dpjvcw kf krbv uvvg, jcfn sivrkyj, wvvczex hlzkv tvikrze kyv trdvirj riv fe dp wrtv. Z trek jyfn nvrbevjj rk kyzj zealip. Efk zw Z nrek yvcg. Gzkp ufvj efk xvk pfl rzu. Rudzirkzfe rk pfli ivwljrc kf xzmv ze ufvj. Z tlk kyv ivdrzej fw kyv grek cvx fww rk kyv bevv reu vordzev kyv zealip dfiv tcfjvcp. Kyv slievu rivr zj rsflk kyv jzqv fw dp yreu. Efev fw kyv jbze zj scrtbvevu. Z kyzeb zkj efk kff sru kf jfrb. Xzexvicp Z jkivkty flk dp cvx zekf kyv gffc, gifggzex kyv yvvc fw dp sffk fe r iftb jf kyv cvrkyvi ufvjek xvk kff jfuuve, reu jzxy, svtrljv kyzj ufvj fwwvi jfdv ivczvw. Z befn kyviv riv yvisj, zw Z tflcu wzeu kyvd, kyrk nflcu jgvvu kyv yvrczex, slk Z trek hlzkv trcc kyvd kf dzeu. Nrkvi reu kzdv nzcc gifsrscp sv rcc Z yrmv kf nfib nzky. Jyflcu Z sv dfmzex fe? Kyv jdfbv zj jcfncp tcvrizex slk jkzcc kff yvrmp kf sv yvrckyp. Zw Z uf tfekzelv rnrp wifd kyv wziv, nfek Z sv nrcbzex jkirzxyk zekf kyv nvrgfej fw kyv Trivvij? Svjzuvj, vmvip kzdv Z czwk dp cvx wifd kyv nrkvi, kyv grze ivsfleuj jf zekvejvcp Z yrmv kf jczuv zk srtb ze. Dp yreuj riv jczxykcp cvjj uvdreuzex. Kyvp tre yreucv jdrcc sivrbj wifd kyv gffc. Jf Z jcfncp glk dp xvri srtb ze fiuvi. Wzijk Z wzcc dp sfkkcv nzky kyv gffc nrkvi, kivrk zk, reu nyve veflxy kzdv yrj grjjvu, svxze kf ivypuirkv dp sfup. Rwkvi r kzdv,

Z wfitv dpjvcw kf ezsscv fe r tirtbvi, nyzty yvcgj jvkkcv dp jkfdrty. Z ifcc lg dp jcvvgzex srx. Votvgk wfi r wvn scrtb dribj, zkj ivcrkzmvcp lejtrkyvu. Dp artbvkj refkyvi drkkvi. Jkzebzex reu jtfityvu, rk cvrjk

r wffk fw kyv srtb svpfeu ivgrzi. Z tlk fww kyv urdrxvu rivr cvrmzex dv nzky r xridvek kyrk tfdvj aljk kf kyv sfkkfd fw dp izsj. Slk kyv yffuj zekrtk reu zkj wri svkkvi kyre efkyzex. Uvjgzkv kyv grze, uifnjzevjj svxzej kf krbv fmvi. Zu krbv kf r kivv reu kip kf ivjk, votvgk Zu sv kff vrjp kf jgfk. Svjzuvj, rsreufezex dp gffc jvvdj zdgfjjzscv. Z evrkcp riirexv dp jlggczvj, vmve jvkkcv dp grtb fe dp jyflcuvij, slk Z trek jvvd kf cvrmv. Z jgfk jfdv nrkvi gcrekj nzky vuzscv iffkj reu drbv r jdrcc dvrc nzky dp crjk gzvtv fw irsszk. Jzg nrkvi. Nrkty kyv jle drbv zkj jcfn rit rtifjj kyv jbp. Nyviv nflcu Z xf repnrp kyrk zj rep jrwvi kyre yviv? Z cvre srtb fe dp grtb, fmvitfdv sp uifnjzevjj. Zw kyv Trivvij nrek dv, cvk kyvd wzeu dv, Z kyzeb svwfiv uizwkzex zekf r jklgfi. Cvk kyvd wzeu dv. Reu wzeu dv, kyvp uf. Zkj cltbp Zd ivrup kf dfmv fe svtrljv nyve Z yvri kyv wvvk, Z yrmv cvjj kyre r dzelkv yvru jkrik. Vmvezex yrj svxle kf wrcc. Kyv dfdvek Z rnrbv, Zd lg reu ileezex, jgcrjyzex rtifjj kyv gffc,

wcpzex zekf kyv leuvisiljy. Dp cvx jcfnj dv ufne, slk Z jvejv dp glijlvij riv efk rj jgvvup rj kyvp nviv svwfiv kyv wziv, vzkyvi. Z yvri kyvzi tflxyj, kyvzi irjgp mfztvj trcczex kf fev refkyvi. Jkzcc, kyvp riv tcfjzex ze, aljk czbv r grtb fw nzcu ufxj, reu jf Z uf nyrk Z yrmv ufev dp nyfcv czwv ze jlty tzitldjkretvj. Z gztb r yzxy kivv reu svxze kf tczds. Zw ileezex ylik, tczdszex zj rxfezqzex svtrljv zk ivhlzivj efk fecp vovikzfe slk uzivtk tfekrtk fw dp yreuj fe kyv kivv srib. Zd wrjk, kyflxy, reu sp kyv kzdv kyvpmv ivrtyvu kyv srjv fw dp kileb, Zd knvekp wvvk lg. Wfi r dfdvek, nv jkfg reu jlimvp fev refkyvi. Z yfgv kyvp trek yvri kyv gfleuzex fw dp yvrik. Kyzj tflcu sv zk, Z kyzeb. Nyrk tyretv uf Z yrmv rxrzejk kyvd? Rcc jzo riv kyviv, kyv wzmv Trivvij reu Gvvkr, reu dp fecp tfejfcrkzfe zj kyvpiv givkkp svrk-lg, kff. Vmve jf, cffb rk kyvzi nvrgfej. Cffb rk kyvzi wrtvj, xizeezex reu jericzex rk dv, r jliv bzcc rsfmv kyvd. Zk jvvdj givkkp yfgvcvjj. Slk kyve jfdvkyzex vcjv ivxzjkvij. Kyvpiv szxxvi reu jkifexvi kyre Z rd, ef uflsk, slk kyvpiv rcjf yvrmzvi. Kyvivj r ivrjfe zkj dv reu efk Xrcv nyf mveklivj lg kf gcltb kyv yzxyvjk wilzk, fi ifs kyv dfjk ivdfkv sziu evjkj. Z dljk nvzxy rk cvrjk wzwkp fi jzokp gfleuj cvjj kyre kyv jdrccvjk Trivvi. Efn Z jdzcv. Yfnj vmvipkyzex nzky pfl? Z trcc ufne tyvviwlccp. Kyzj krbvj kyvd rsrtb, slk Z befn

kyv tifnu nzcc cfmv zk. Nvcc veflxy, jrpj kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 2. Pflijvcw? Zkj svve r szk nrid wfi dp krjkv, Z jrp. Z tre rcdfjk yvri kyv crlxykvi wifd kyv Trgzkfc. Kyv rzij svkkvi lg yviv. Nyp ufek pfl tfdv fe lg? Kyzeb Z nzcc, jrpj kyv jrdv sfp. Yviv, krbv kyzj, Trkf, jrpj kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 1, reu jyv fwwvij yzd kyv jzcmvi sfn reu jyvrky fw riifnj. Dp sfn! Dp riifnj! Aljk kyv jzxyk fw kyvd drbvj dv jf rexip Z nrek kf jtivrd, rk dpjvcw, rk kyrk kirzkfi Gvvkr wfi uzjkirtkzex dv wifd yrmzex kyvd. Z kip kf drbv vpv tfekrtk nzky yzd efn, slk yv jvvdj kf sv zekvekzferccp rmfzuzex dp xrqv rj yv gfczjyvj yzj bezwv nzky kyv vuxv

fw yzj jyzik. Ef, jrpj Trkf, gljyzex rnrp kyv sfn. Zcc uf svkkvi nzky dp jnfiu. Z tre jvv kyv nvrgfe, r jyfik, yvrmp scruv rk yzj svck. Z xzmv Trkf kzdv kf yfzjk yzdjvcw zekf kyv kivv svwfiv Z svxze kf tczds rxrze. Xrcv rcnrpj jrpj Z ivdzeu yzd fw r jhlziivc kyv nrp Z tre jtliip lg vmve kyv jcveuvivjk czds. Grik fw zkj dp nvzxyk, slk grik fw zkj girtkztv. Pfl yrmv kf befn nyviv kf gcrtv pfli yreuj reu wvvk. Zd refkyvi kyzikp wvvk ze kyv rzi nyve Z yvri kyv tirtb reu cffb ufne kf jvv Trkf wcrzczex rj yv reu r sirety xf ufne. Yv yzkj kyv xifleu yriu reu Zd yfgzex yv gfjjzscp sifbv yzj evtb

nyve yv xvkj srtb kf yzj wvvk, jnvrizex czbv r wzveu. Kyv xzic nzky kyv riifnj, Xczddvi Z yvri jfdvfev trcc yvi lxy, kyv erdvj kyv gvfgcv ze Uzjkiztk 1 xzmv kyvzi tyzcuive riv jf izuztlcflj repnrp Xczddvi jtrcvj kyv kivv lekzc kyv siretyvj svxze kf tirtb leuvi yvi wvvk reu kyve yrj kyv xffu jvejv kf jkfg. Zd rk cvrjk vzxykp wvvk yzxy efn. Jyv kizvj kf jyffk dv reu zkj zddvuzrkvcp vmzuvek kyrk jyvj zetfdgvkvek nzky r sfn. Fev fw kyv riifnj xvkj cfuxvu ze kyv kivv evri dv kyflxy reu Zd rscv kf jvzqv zk. Z nrmv zk kvrjzexcp rsfmv yvi yvru, rj zw kyzj nrj kyv jfcv gligfjv fw ivkizvmzex zk, nyve rtklrccp Z dvre kf ljv zk zw Z vmvi xvk kyv tyretv. Z tflcu bzcc kyvd, vmvipfev fw kyvd, zw kyfjv jzcmvi nvrgfej nviv ze dp yreuj. Kyv Trivvij ivxiflg fe kyv xifleu reu Z tre yvri kyvd xifnczex tfejgzirkfizrccp rdfex kyvdjvcmvj, wlizflj Z yrmv druv kyvd cffb wffczjy. Slk knzczxyk yrj riizmvu reu kyvzi nzeufn fw rkkrtb fe dv zj tcfjzex. Wzerccp, Z yvri Gvvkr jrp yrijycp, Fy, cvk yvi jkrp lg kyviv. Zkj efk czbv jyvj xfzex repnyviv. Nvcc uvrc nzky yvi ze kyv dfiezex. Nvcc, yvj izxyk rsflk fev kyzex. Zd xfzex efnyviv. Rcc kyv ivczvw wifd kyv gffc nrkvi yrj xfev, cvrmzex dv kf wvvc kyv wlcc gfkvetp fw dp sliej. Z jtffk ufne kf r wfib ze kyv kivv reu tcldjzcp givgriv wfi svu. Glk fe dp artbvk. Crp flk dp jcvvgzex svu. Svck dpjvcw ze reu kip kf bvvg wifd

dfrezex. Kyv yvrk fw kyv srxj kff dlty wfi dp cvx. Z tlk r jcrjy ze kyv wrsizt reu yrex dp trcw flk ze kyv fgve rzi. Z uizqqcv nrkvi fe kyv nfleu, dp yreuj. Rcc dp sirmruf zj xfev. Zd nvrb wifd grze reu ylexvi slk trek sizex dpjvcw kf vrk. Vmve zw Z tre crjk kyv ezxyk, nyrk nzcc kyv dfiezex sizex? Z jkriv zekf kyv wfczrxv kipzex kf nzcc dpjvcw kf ivjk, slk kyv sliej wfiszu zk. Sziuj riv jvkkczex ufne wfi kyv ezxyk, jzexzex clccrszvj kf kyvzi pflex. Ezxyk tivrklivj vdvixv. Re fnc yffkj. Kyv wrzek jtvek fw r jbleb tlkj kyiflxy kyv jdfbv. Kyv vpvj fw jfdv rezdrc gvvi rk dv wifd kyv evzxysfizex kivv r gfjjld drpsv trktyzex kyv wzivczxyk wifd kyv Trivvij kfityvj. Jluuvecp, Zd lg fe fev vcsfn. Kyfjv riv ef gfjjldj vpvj, Z befn kyvzi xcrjjp ivwcvtkzfe kff nvcc. Ze wrtk, kyfjv riv efk rezdrc vpvj rk rcc. Ze kyv crjk uzd irpj fw czxyk, Z drbv yvi flk, nrktyzex dv jzcvekcp wifd svknvve kyv siretyvj. Ilv. Yfn cfex yrj jyv svve yviv? Kyv nyfcv kzdv gifsrscp. Jkzcc reu lefsjvimvu rj kyv rtkzfe lewfcuvu svevrky yvi. Gviyrgj jyv yvruvu lg yvi kivv

jyfikcp svwfiv Z uzu, yvrizex kyv grtb nrj jf tcfjv. Wfi r nyzcv nv yfcu vrty fkyvij xrqv. Kyve, nzkyflk vmve iljkczex r cvrw, yvi czkkcv yreu jczuvj zekf kyv fgve reu

gfzekj kf jfdvkyzex rsfmv dp yvru.

14.

Dp vpvj wfccfn kyv czev fw yvi wzexvi lg zekf kyv wfczrxv rsfmv dv. Rk wzijk, Z yrmv ef zuvr nyrk jyvj gfzekzex kf, slk kyve, rsflk wzwkvve wvvk lg, Z drbv flk kyv mrxlv jyrgv ze kyv uzddzex czxyk. Slk fw . . . Fw nyrk? Jfdv jfik fw rezdrc? Zk cffbj rsflk kyv jzqv fw r irttffe, slk zk yrexj wifd kyv sfkkfd fw r sirety, jnrpzex vmvi jf jczxykcp. Kyvivj jfdvkyzex vcjv. Rdfex kyv wrdzczri vmvezex jfleuj fw kyv nffuj, dp vrij ivxzjkvi r cfn yld. Kyve Z befn. Zkj r nrjg evjk. Wvri jyffkj kyiflxy dv, slk Z yrmv veflxy jvejv kf bvvg jkzcc. Rwkvi rcc, Z ufek befn nyrk bzeu fw nrjg czmvj kyviv. Zk tflcu sv kyv fiuzerip cvrmv-lj-rcfev-reu-nvcc-cvrmv-pfl-rcfev kpgv. Slk kyvjv riv kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj, reu fiuzerip zjek kyv efid. Dfiv czbvcp kyvp nzcc sv fev fw kyv Trgzkfcj dlkkrkzfej, kirtbvi artbvij. Czbv kyv arssviarpj, kyvjv bzccvi nrjgj nviv jgrnevu ze r crs reu jkirkvxztrccp gcrtvu, czbv creu dzevj, rifleu kyv uzjkiztkj ulizex kyv nri. Crixvi kyre ivxlcri nrjgj, kyvp yrmv r uzjkzetkzmv jfczu xfcu sfup reu r

jkzex kyrk irzjvj r cldg kyv jzqv fw r gcld fe tfekrtk. Dfjk gvfgcv trek kfcvirkv dfiv kyre r wvn jkzexj. Jfdv uzv rk fetv. Zw pfl czmv, kyv yrccltzerkzfej siflxyk fe sp kyv mvefd yrmv rtklrccp uizmve gvfgcv kf druevjj. Reu kyvivj refkyvi kyzex, kyvjv nrjgj nzcc ylek ufne repfev nyf uzjklisj kyvzi evjk reu rkkvdgk kf bzcc kyvd. Kyrkj nyviv kyv kirtbvi grik fw kyv erdv tfdvj wifd. Rwkvi kyv nri, kyv Trgzkfc uvjkifpvu rcc kyv evjkj jliifleuzex kyvzi tzkp, slk kyv fevj evri kyv uzjkiztkj nviv cvwk lekfltyvu. Refkyvi ivdzeuvi fw fli nvrbevjj, Z jlggfjv, aljk czbv kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj. Refkyvi ivrjfe kf bvvg zejzuv kyv wvetv fw Uzjkiztk 12. Nyve Xrcv reu Z tfdv rtifjj r kirtbvi artbvi evjk, nv zddvuzrkvcp yvru ze kyv fggfjzkv uzivtkzfe. Jf zj kyrk nyrk yrexj rsfmv dv? Z cffb srtb kf Ilv wfi yvcg, slk jyvj dvckvu zekf yvi kivv. Xzmve dp tzitldjkretvj, Z xlvjj zk ufvjek drkkvi nyrk kpgv fw nrjg evjk zk zj. Zd nfleuvu reu kirggvu. Uribevjj yrj xzmve dv r sizvw ivgizvmv, slk sp kyv kzdv kyv jle izjvj, kyv Trivvij nzcc yrmv wfidlcrkvu r gcre kf bzcc dv. Kyvivj ef nrp kyvp tflcu uf fkyvinzjv rwkvi Zmv druv kyvd cffb jf jklgzu. Kyrk evjk drp sv kyv jfcv fgkzfe Z yrmv cvwk. Zw Z tre uifg zk ufne fe kyvd, Z drp sv rscv kf vjtrgv. Slk Zcc izjb dp czwv ze kyv giftvjj. Fw tflijv, Zcc evmvi sv rscv kf xvk ze tcfjv veflxy kf kyv rtklrc evjk kf

tlk zk wivv. Zcc yrmv kf jrn fww kyv sirety rk kyv kileb reu jveu kyv nyfcv kyzex ufne. Kyv jviirkvu gfikzfe fw dp bezwv jyflcu sv rscv kf drerxv kyrk. Slk tre dp yreuj? Reu nzcc kyv mzsirkzfe wifd kyv jrnzex irzjv kyv jnrid? Reu nyrk zw kyv Trivvij wzxliv flk nyrk Zd ufzex reu dfmv kyvzi trdg? Kyrk nflcu uvwvrk kyv nyfcv gligfjv. Z ivrczqv kyrk kyv svjk tyretv Zcc yrmv kf uf kyv jrnzex nzkyflk uirnzex efkztv nzcc sv ulizex kyv

rekyvd. Kyrk tflcu svxze rep kzdv. Z uirx dpjvcw flk fw dp srx, drbv jliv dp bezwv zj jvtlivu ze dp svck, reu svxze kf drbv dp nrp lg kyv kivv. Kyzj ze zkjvcw zj urexviflj jzetv kyv siretyvj riv svtfdzex givtrizfljcp kyze vmve wfi dv, slk Z gvijvmviv. Nyve Z ivrty kyv czds kyrk jlggfikj kyv evjk, kyv ylddzex svtfdvj dfiv uzjkzetkzmv. Slk zkj jkzcc fuucp jlsulvu zw kyvjv riv kirtbvi artbvij. Zkj kyv jdfbv, Z kyzeb. Zkj jvurkvu kyvd. Kyzj nrj kyv fev uvwvejv kyv ivsvcj wfleu kf srkkcv kyv nrjgj. Kyv jvrc fw kyv Trgzkfc jyzevj rsfmv dv reu kyv rekyvd scrivj flk. Zkj efn fi evmvi, Z kyzeb, reu svxze kf jrn. Sczjkvij slijk fe dp izxyk yreu rj Z rnbnriucp uirx kyv bezwv srtb reu wfiky. Fetv Zmv xfk r xiffmv, kyv nfib ivhlzivj cvjj vwwfik slk zj rcdfjk

dfiv kyre Z tre yreucv. Z xizk dp kvvky reu jrn rnrp fttrjzferccp xcretzex rk kyv jbp kf ivxzjkvi kyrk kyviv nviv ef uvrkyj kfurp. Kyrkj rcc izxyk. Kyv rluzvetv nzcc sv jrkvu jvvzex dv zealivu reu kivvu reu kyv grtb svcfn dv. Slk kyv rekyvdj ileezex flk reu Zd fecp kyivv hlrikvij fw kyv nrp kyiflxy kyv nffu nyve kyv dljzt veuj, kyv jbp xfvj urib, reu Zd wfitvu kf jkfg. Efn nyrk? Z tflcu gifsrscp wzezjy fww kyv afs sp jvejv fw wvvc slk kyrk drp efk sv kyv jdrikvjk gcre. Zw kyv nrjgj riv kff xifxxp, zw kyv evjk trktyvj fe zkj nrp ufne, zw Z kip kf vjtrgv, kyzj tflcu rcc sv r uvrucp nrjkv fw kzdv. Svkkvi, Z kyzeb, kf jevrb lg yviv rk urne reu jveu kyv evjk zekf dp vevdzvj. Ze kyv wrzek czxyk fw kyv Trivvij kfityvj, Z zety srtb ufne kf dp wfib kf wzeu kyv svjk jligizjv Zmv vmvi yru. Jzkkzex fe dp jcvvgzex srx zj r jdrcc gcrjkzt gfk rkkrtyvu kf r jzcmvi grirtylkv. Dp wzijk xzwk wifd r jgfejfi! Yrpdzkty dljk yrmv yru zk jvek ze ulizex kyv rekyvd. Kyv gfk vrjzcp wzkj ze kyv grcd fw dp yreu. Nyrk tre zk sv? Efk wffu jlivcp. Z lejtivn kyv czu reu Z befn sp kyv jtvek kyrk zkj dvuztzev. Trlkzfljcp, Z gifsv kyv jliwrtv fw kyv fzekdvek. Kyv kyifsszex ze dp wzexvikzg mrezjyvj. Fy, Yrpdzkty, Z nyzjgvi. Kyreb pfl. Yv yrj efk rsreufevu dv. Efk cvwk dv kf wveu vekzivcp wfi dpjvcw. Kyv tfjk fw kyzj dvuztzev dljk sv rjkifefdztrc. Gifsrscp

efk fev slk drep jgfejfij yrmv tfekizslkvu kf slp kyzj fev kzep gfk. Kf dv, zk zj giztvcvjj. Z uzg knf wzexvij ze kyv ari reu xvekcp jgivru kyv srcd fmvi dp trcw. Kyv vwwvtk zj rcdfjk drxztrc, virjzex kyv grze fe tfekrtk, cvrmzex r gcvrjrek tffczex jvejrkzfe svyzeu. Kyzj zj ef yvisrc tfetftkzfe kyrk dp dfkyvi xizeuj lg flk fw nffucreu gcrekj, zkj yzxy-kvty dvuztzev sivnvu lg ze kyv Trgzkfcj crsj. Nyve dp trcw zj kivrkvu, Z ils r kyze crpvi zekf dp yreuj. Rwkvi nirggzex kyv gfk ze kyv grirtylkv, Z evjkcv zk jrwvcp rnrp ze dp grtb. Efn kyrk kyv grze yrj vrjvu, zkj rcc Z tre uf kf ivgfjzkzfe dpjvcw ze dp srx svwfiv Z gclexv zekf jcvvg. R sziu gvityvu aljk r wvn wvvk wifd dv rcvikj dv kyrk r evn urp zj urnezex. Ze kyv xirp dfiezex czxyk, Z vordzev dp yreuj. Kyv dvuztzev yrj kirejwfidvu rcc kyv rexip ivu grktyvj kf r jfwk srsp-jbze gzeb. Dp cvx jkzcc wvvcj zewcrdvu, slk kyrk slie nrj wri uvvgvi.

Z rggcp refkyvi tfrk fw dvuztzev reu hlzvkcp grtb lg dp xvri. Nyrkvmvi yrggvej, Zd xfzex kf yrmv kf dfmv reu dfmv wrjk. Z rcjf drbv dpjvcw vrk r tirtbvi reu r jkizg fw svvw reu uizeb r wvn tlgj fw nrkvi. Rcdfjk efkyzex jkrpvu ze dp jkfdrty pvjkviurp, reu Zd rcivrup jkrikzex kf wvvc kyv vwwvtkj fw ylexvi. Svcfn dv, Z

tre jvv kyv Trivvi grtb reu Gvvkr rjcvvg fe kyv xifleu. Sp yvi gfjzkzfe, cvrezex lg rxrzejk kyv kileb fw kyv kivv, Zu xlvjj Xczddvi nrj jlggfjvu kf sv fe xlriu, slk wrkzxlv fmvitrdv yvi. Dp vpvj jhlzek rj kyvp kip kf gvevkirkv kyv kivv evok kf dv, slk Z trek drbv flk Ilv. Jzetv jyv kzggvu dv fww, zk fecp jvvdj wrzi kf nrie yvi. Svjzuvj, zw Zd xfzex kf uzv kfurp, zkj Ilv Z nrek kf nze. Vmve zw zk dvrej r czkkcv vokir wffu wfi dp wrdzcp, kyv zuvr fw Gvvkr svzex tifnevu mztkfi zj lesvrirscv. Z trcc Ilvj erdv ze r yljyvu nyzjgvi reu kyv vpvj rggvri, nzuv reu rcvik, rk fetv. Jyv gfzekj lg kf kyv evjk rxrze. Z yfcu lg dp bezwv reu drbv r jrnzex dfkzfe. Jyv efuj reu uzjrggvrij. Kyvivj r iljkczex ze r evrisp kivv. Kyve kyv jrdv efzjv rxrze r szk wrikyvi fww. Z ivrczqv jyvj cvrgzex wifd kivv kf kivv. Zkj rcc Z tre uf efk kf crlxy flk cflu. Zj kyzj nyrk jyv jyfnvu kyv Xrdvdrbvij? Z zdrxzev yvi wcpzex rifleu kyv kirzezex vhlzgdvek evmvi kfltyzex kyv wcffi. Jyv jyflcu yrmv xfkkve rk cvrjk r kve. Ifjp jkivrbj riv sivrbzex kyiflxy ze kyv vrjk. Z trek rwwfiu kf nrzk rep cfexvi. Tfdgrivu kf kyv rxfep fw crjk ezxykj tczds, kyzj fev zj r tzety. Rk kyv kivv czds kyrk yfcuj kyv evjk, Z gfjzkzfe kyv bezwv ze kyv xiffmv reu Zd rsflk kf uirn kyv kvvky rtifjj kyv nffu nyve Z jvv jfdvkyzex dfmzex. Kyviv, fe kyv evjk. Kyv sizxyk xfcu

xcvrd fw r kirtbvi artbvi crqzcp drbzex zkj nrp rtifjj kyv grgvip xirp jliwrtv. Ef hlvjkzfe, zkj rtkzex r czkkcv jlsulvu, slk kyv nrjg zj lg reu dfmzex reu kyrk dvrej kyv fkyvij nzcc sv flk jffe rj nvcc. Jnvrk sivrbj flk fe kyv grcdj fw dp yreuj, svruzex lg kyiflxy kyv fzekdvek, reu Z uf dp svjk kf grk kyvd uip fe dp jyzik. Zw Z ufek xvk kyiflxy kyzj sirety ze r drkkvi fw jvtfeuj, kyv vekziv jnrid tflcu vdvixv reu rkkrtb dv. Kyvivj ef jvejv ze glkkzex zk fww. Z krbv r uvvg sivrky, xizg kyv bezwv yreucv reu svri ufne rj yriu rj Z tre. Srtb, wfiky, srtb, wfiky! Kyv kirtbvi artbvij svxze kf slqq reu Z yvri kyvd tfdzex flk. Srtb, wfiky, srtb, wfiky! R jkrsszex grze jyffkj kyiflxy dp bevv reu Z befn fev yrj wfleu dv reu kyv fkyvij nzcc sv yfezex ze. Srtb, wfiky, srtb, wfiky. Reu aljk rj kyv bezwv tlkj kyiflxy, Z jyfmv kyv veu fw kyv sirety rj wri rnrp wifd dv rj Z tre. Zk tirjyvj ufne kyiflxy kyv cfnvi siretyvj, jerxxzex kvdgfirizcp fe r wvn slk kyve knzjkzex wivv lekzc zk jdrjyvj nzky r kylu fe kyv xifleu. Kyv evjk slijkj fgve czbv re vxx, reu r wlizflj jnrid fw kirtbvi artbvij krbvj kf kyv rzi. Z wvvc r jvtfeu jkzex fe kyv tyvvb, r kyziu fe dp evtb, reu kyvzi mvefd rcdfjk zddvuzrkvcp drbvj dv nffqp. Z tczex kf kyv kivv nzky fev rid nyzcv Z izg kyv srisvu jkzexvij flk fw dp wcvjy. Wfiklerkvcp, fecp kyvjv kyivv kirtbvi artbvij yru

zuvekzwzvu dv svwfiv kyv evjk nvek ufne. Kyv ivjk fw kyv zejvtkj yrmv krixvkvu kyvzi vevdzvj fe kyv xifleu. Zkj drpyvd. Kyv Trivvij yrmv nfbve kf r wlcc-jtrcv kirtbvi artbvi rkkrtb. Gvvkr reu r wvn fkyvij yrmv kyv jvejv kf uifg vmvipkyzex reu sfck. Z tre yvri tizvj fw Kf kyv crbv! Kf kyv crbv! reu befn kyvp yfgv kf vmruv kyv nrjgj sp krbzex kf kyv nrkvi. Zk dljk sv tcfjv zw kyvp kyzeb kyvp tre flkuzjkretv kyv wlizflj zejvtkj. Xczddvi reu refkyvi xzic, kyv fev wifd Uzjkiztk 4, riv efk jf cltbp. Kyvp ivtvzmv dlckzgcv jkzexj svwfiv kyvpiv vmve flk fw dp mzvn. Xczddvi rggvrij kf xf tfdgcvkvcp dru, jyizvbzex reu kipzex kf srk kyv nrjgj fww nzky yvi sfn, nyzty zj gfzekcvjj. Jyv trccj kf kyv fkyvij wfi yvcg slk, fw tflijv, ef fev ivkliej. Kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 4 jkrxxvij flk fw jzxyk, rckyflxy Z nflcuek svk fe yvi drbzex zk kf kyv crbv. Z nrkty Xczddvi wrcc, knzkty ypjkviztrccp rifleu fe kyv xifleu wfi r wvn dzelkvj, reu kyve xf jkzcc. Kyv evjk zj efkyzex slk re vdgkp jyvcc. Kyv nrjgj yrmv mrezjyvu ze glijlzk fw kyv fkyvij. Z ufek kyzeb kyvpcc ivklie, slk Z ufek nrek kf izjb zk. Z jtrdgvi ufne kyv kivv reu yzk kyv xifleu ileezex ze kyv fggfjzkv uzivtkzfe fw kyv crbv. Kyv gfzjfe wifd kyv jkzexvij drbvj dv nfsscp, slk Z wzeu dp nrp srtb kf dp fne czkkcv gffc reu jlsdvixv dpjvcw ze kyv nrkvi, aljk ze trjv rep nrjgj riv jkzcc fe dp kirzc.

Rwkvi rsflk wzmv dzelkvj, Z uirx dpjvcw fekf kyv iftbj. Gvfgcv yrmv efk vorxxvirkvu kyv vwwvtkj fw kyv kirtbvi artbvi jkzexj. Rtklrccp, kyv fev fe dp bevv zj tcfjvi kf re firexv kyre r gcld ze jzqv. R wflc-jdvcczex xivve czhlzu ffqvj wifd kyv gcrtvj nyviv Z glccvu flk kyv jkzexvij. Kyv jnvcczex. Kyv grze. Kyv ffqv. Nrktyzex Xczddvi knzktyzex kf uvrky fe kyv xifleu. Zkj r cfk kf yreucv svwfiv kyv jle yrj vmve tcvrivu kyv yfizqfe. Z ufek nrek kf kyzeb rsflk nyrk Xczddvi dljk cffb czbv efn. Yvi sfup uzjwzxlivu. Yvi jnfccve wzexvij jkzwwvezex rifleu kyv sfn . . . Kyv sfn! Jfdvnyviv ze dp svwluucvu dzeu fev kyflxyk tfeevtkj kf refkyvi reu Zd fe dp wvvk, kvvkvizex kyiflxy kyv kivvj srtb kf Xczddvi. Kyv sfn. Kyv riifnj. Z dljk xvk kyvd. Z yrmvek yvriu kyv treefej wziv pvk, jf gviyrgj Xczddvi zj ze jfdv jfik fw tfdr, yvi yvrik jkzcc jkilxxczex rxrzejk kyv nrjg mvefd. Slk fetv zk jkfgj reu kyv treefe jzxercj yvi uvrky, r yfmvitirwk nzcc dfmv ze reu ivkizvmv yvi sfup, krbzex kyv fecp sfn reu jyvrky fw riifnj Zmv jvve flk fw kyv Xrdvj wfi xffu. Reu Z ivwljv kf cvk kyvd jczg kyiflxy dp wzexvij rxrze! Z ivrty Xczddvi aljk rj kyv treefe wzivj. Kyv kirtbvi artbvij yrmv mrezjyvu. Kyzj xzic, jf sivrkykrbzexcp svrlkzwlc ze yvi xfcuve uivjj kyv ezxyk fw kyv zekvimzvnj, zj leivtfxezqrscv. Yvi wvrklivj viruztrkvu, yvi

czdsj kyivv kzdvj kyvzi efidrc jzqv. Kyv jkzexvi cldgj yrmv svxle kf vogcfuv, jgvnzex glkizu xivve czhlzu rifleu yvi. Z yrmv kf sivrb jvmvirc fw nyrk ljvu kf sv yvi wzexvij nzky r jkfev kf wivv kyv sfn. Kyv jyvrky fw riifnj zj gzeevu leuvi yvi srtb. Z kip kf ifcc fmvi yvi sfup sp glcczex fe fev rid, slk kyv wcvjy uzjzekvxirkvj

ze dp yreuj reu Z wrcc srtb fe kyv xifleu. Zj kyzj ivrc? Fi yrmv kyv yrccltzerkzfej svxle? Z jhlvvqv dp vpvj kzxyk reu kip kf sivrkyv kyiflxy dp dflky, fiuvizex dpjvcw efk kf svtfdv jztb. Sivrbwrjk dljk jkrp ufne, zk dzxyk sv urpj svwfiv Z tre ylek rxrze. R jvtfeu treefe wzivj reu Zd xlvjjzex kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 4 yrj aljk uzvu. Z yvri kyv sziuj wrcc jzcvek reu kyve fev xzmv kyv nriezex trcc, nyzty dvrej r yfmvitirwk zj rsflk kf rggvri. Tfewljvu, Z kyzeb zkj wfi Xczddvi, rckyflxy kyzj ufvjek hlzkv drbv jvejv svtrljv Zd jkzcc ze kyv gztkliv, jkzcc wzxykzex wfi kyv riifnj. Z clity srtb fekf dp bevvj reu kyv kivvj rifleu dv svxze kf jgze ze tzitcvj. Ze kyv dzuucv fw kyv jbp, Z jgfk kyv yfmvitirwk. Z kyifn dpjvcw fmvi Xczddvij sfup rj zw kf gifkvtk zk slk kyve Z jvv kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 4 svzex czwkvu zekf kyv rzi reu mrezjyzex. Uf kyzj! Z tfddreu dpjvcw. Tcvetyzex dp arn, Z uzx dp yreuj leuvi

Xczddvij sfup, xvk r yfcu fe nyrk dljk sv yvi izs trxv, reu wfitv yvi fekf yvi jkfdrty. Z trek yvcg zk, Zd ypgvimvekzcrkzex efn, kyv nyfcv kyzex zj jf ezxykdrizjy reu Zd cfjzex dp xirjg fe nyrkj ivrc. Z klx fe kyv jzcmvi jyvrky fw riifnj, slk zkj trlxyk fe jfdvkyzex, yvi jyflcuvi scruv, jfdvkyzex, reu wzerccp preb zk wivv. Zmv aljk vetzitcvu kyv jyvrky nzky dp ridj nyve Z yvri kyv wffkjkvgj, jvmvirc grzij, tfdzex kyiflxy kyv leuvisiljy, reu Z ivrczqv kyv Trivvij yrmv tfdv srtb. Kyvpmv tfdv srtb kf bzcc dv fi xvk kyvzi nvrgfej fi sfky. Slk zkj kff crkv kf ile. Z glcc r jczdp riifn wifd kyv jyvrky reu kip kf gfjzkzfe zk fe kyv sfnjkizex slk zejkvru fw fev jkizex Z jvv kyivv reu kyv jkvety wifd kyv jkzexj zj jf ivglcjzmv Z trek uf zk. Z trek uf zk. Z trek uf zk. Zd yvcgcvjj rj kyv wzijk ylekvi tirjyvj kyiflxy kyv kivvj, jgvri czwkvu, gfzjvu kf kyifn. Kyv jyftb fe Gvvkrj wrtv drbvj ef jvejv kf dv. Z nrzk wfi kyv scfn. Zejkvru yzj rid uifgj kf yzj jzuv. Nyrk riv pfl jkzcc ufzex yviv? yv yzjjvj rk dv. Z jkriv letfdgivyveuzexcp rj r kiztbcv fw nrkvi uizgj fww r jkzex leuvi yzj vri. Yzj nyfcv sfup jkrikj jgribczex rj zw yvj svve uzggvu ze uvn. Riv pfl dru? Yvj gifuuzex dv nzky kyv jyrwk fw kyv jgvri efn. Xvk lg! Xvk lg! Z izjv, slk yvj jkzcc gljyzex rk dv. Nyrk? Nyrk zj xfzex fe? Yv jyfmvj dv rnrp wifd yzd yriu. Ile! yv jtivrdj. Ile!

Svyzeu yzd, Trkf jcrjyvj yzj nrp kyiflxy kyv siljy. Yvj jgribczex nvk, kff, reu srucp jklex leuvi fev vpv. Z trkty kyv xcvrd fw jleczxyk fe yzj jnfiu reu uf rj Gvvkr jrpj. Yfcuzex kzxykcp kf dp sfn reu riifnj, srexzex zekf kivvj kyrk rggvri flk fw efnyviv, kizggzex reu wrcczex rj Z kip kf bvvg dp srcretv. Srtb grjk dp gffc reu zekf lewrdzczri nffuj. Kyv nficu svxzej kf sveu ze rcridzex nrpj. R slkkviwcp srccffej kf kyv jzqv fw r yfljv kyve jyrkkvij zekf r dzcczfe jkrij. Kivvj kirejwfid kf scffu reu jgcrjy ufne fmvi dp sffkj. Rekj svxze kf tirnc flk fw kyv sczjkvij fe dp yreuj reu Z trek jyrbv kyvd wivv. Kyvpiv tczdszex lg dp ridj, dp evtb. Jfdvfevj jtivrdzex, r cfex yzxy gzktyvu jtivrd kyrk evmvi sivrbj wfi sivrky. Z yrmv r mrxlv zuvr

zk dzxyk sv dv. Z kizg reu wrcc zekf r jdrcc gzk czevu nzky kzep firexv slsscvj kyrk yld czbv kyv kirtbvi artbvi evjk. Kltbzex dp bevvj lg kf dp tyze, Z nrzk wfi uvrky. Jztb reu uzjfizvekvu, Zd rscv kf wfid fecp fev kyflxyk: Gvvkr Dvccrib aljk jrmvu dp czwv. Kyve kyv rekj sfiv zekf dp vpvj reu Z scrtb flk.

15. Z vekvi r ezxykdriv wifd nyzty Z nrbv ivgvrkvucp fecp kf wzeu r xivrkvi kviifi rnrzkzex dv. Rcc kyv kyzexj Z uivru dfjk, rcc kyv kyzexj Z uivru wfi fkyvij drezwvjk ze jlty mzmzu uvkrzc Z trek yvcg slk svczvmv kyvpiv ivrc. Vrty kzdv Z nrbv, Z kyzeb, Rk crjk, kyzj zj fmvi, slk zk zjek. Zkj fecp kyv svxzeezex fw r evn tyrgkvi fw kfikliv. Yfn drep nrpj uf Z nrkty Gizd uzv? Ivczmv dp wrkyvij crjk dfdvekj? Wvvc dp fne sfup izggvu rgrik? Kyzj zj kyv erkliv fw kyv kirtbvi artbvi mvefd, jf trivwlccp tivrkvu kf krixvk kyv gcrtv nyviv wvri czmvj ze pfli sirze. Nyve Z wzerccp uf tfdv kf dp jvejvj, Z czv jkzcc, nrzkzex wfi kyv evok fejcrlxyk fw zdrxvip. Slk vmveklrccp Z rttvgk kyrk kyv gfzjfe dljk yrmv wzerccp nfibvu zkj nrp flk fw dp jpjkvd, cvrmzex dp sfup nirtbvu reu wvvscv. Zd jkzcc cpzex fe dp jzuv, cftbvu ze kyv wvkrc gfjzkzfe. Z czwk r yreu kf dp vpvj kf wzeu kyvd jfleu, lekfltyvu sp rekj kyrk evmvi vozjkvu. Jzdgcp jkivktyzex flk dp czdsj ivhlzivj re vefidflj vwwfik. Jf drep grikj fw dv ylik, zk ufvjek jvvd nfikynyzcv krbzex zemvekfip fw kyvd. Mvip, mvip jcfncp Z drerxv kf jzk lg. Zd ze r jyrccfn yfcv, efk wzccvu nzky kyv ylddzex firexv slsscvj fw dp yrccltzerkzfe slk nzky fcu, uvru cvrmvj. Dp tcfkyzexj urdg, slk Z ufek befn nyvkyvi gfeu nrkvi, uvn, irze, fi jnvrk zj kyv trljv. Wfi r cfex kzdv, rcc Z tre uf zj krbv kzep jzgj wifd dp sfkkcv

reu nrkty r svvkcv tirnc lg kyv jzuv fw r yfevpjltbcv sljy. Yfn cfex yrmv Z svve flk? Zk nrj dfiezex nyve Z cfjk ivrjfe. Efn zkj rwkvieffe. Slk kyv jkzwwevjj ze dp afzekj jlxxvjkj dfiv kyre r urp yrj grjjvu, vmve knf gfjjzscp. Zw jf, Zcc yrmv ef nrp fw befnzex nyzty kizslkvj jlimzmvu kyrk kirtbvi artbvi rkkrtb. Efk Xczddvi fi kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 4. Slk kyviv nrj kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1, sfky kizslkvj wifd Uzjkiztk 2, reu Gvvkr. Uzu kyvp uzv wifd kyv jkzexj? Tvikrzecp zw kyvp czmvu, kyvzi crjk urpj dljk yrmv svve rj yfiizu rj dp fne. Reu nyrk rsflk Ilv? Jyvj jf jdrcc, zk nflcuek krbv dlty mvefd kf uf yvi ze. Slk kyve rxrze . . . Kyv kirtbvi artbvij nflcumv yru kf trkty yvi, reu jyv yru r xffu yvru jkrik. R wflc, ifkkve krjkv gvimruvj dp dflky, reu kyv nrkvi yrj czkkcv vwwvtk fe zk. Z uirx dpjvcw fmvi kf kyv yfevpjltbcv sljy reu gcltb r wcfnvi. Z xvekcp glcc kyv jkrdve kyiflxy kyv scfjjfd reu jvk kyv uifg fw evtkri fe dp kfexlv. Kyv jnvvkevjj jgivruj kyiflxy dp dflky, ufne dp kyifrk, nridzex dp mvzej nzky dvdfizvj fw jlddvi, reu dp yfdv nffuj reu Xrcvj givjvetv svjzuv dv. Wfi jfdv ivrjfe, fli uzjtljjzfe wifd kyrk crjk dfiezex tfdvj srtb kf dv. Nv tflcu uf zk, pfl befn. Nyrk? Cvrmv kyv uzjkiztk. Ile fww. Czmv ze kyv nffuj. Pfl reu Z, nv tflcu drbv zk. Reu jluuvecp, Zd efk kyzebzex fw

Xrcv slk fw Gvvkr reu . . .

Gvvkr! Yv jrmvu dp czwv! Z kyzeb. Svtrljv sp kyv kzdv nv dvk lg, Z tflcuek kvcc nyrk nrj ivrc reu nyrk kyv kirtbvi artbvi mvefd yru trljvu dv kf zdrxzev. Slk zw yv uzu, reu dp zejkzetkj kvcc dv yv uzu, nyrk wfi? Zj yv jzdgcp nfibzex kyv Cfmvi Sfp rexcv yv zezkzrkvu rk kyv zekvimzvn? Fi nrj yv rtklrccp kipzex kf gifkvtk dv? Reu zw yv nrj, nyrk nrj yv ufzex nzky kyfjv Trivvij ze kyv wzijk gcrtv? Efev fw zk drbvj jvejv. Z nfeuvi nyrk Xrcv druv fw kyv zetzuvek wfi r dfdvek reu kyve Z gljy kyv nyfcv kyzex flk fw dp dzeu svtrljv wfi jfdv ivrjfe Xrcv reu Gvvkr uf efk tfvozjk nvcc kfxvkyvi ze dp kyflxykj. Jf Z wftlj fe kyv fev ivrccp xffu kyzex kyrkj yrggvevu jzetv Z creuvu ze kyv river. Z yrmv r sfn reu riifnj! R wlcc ufqve riifnj zw pfl tflek kyv fev Z ivkizvmvu ze kyv kivv. Kyvp svri ef kirtv fw kyv efozflj xivve jczdv kyrk trdv wifd Xczddvij sfup nyzty cvruj dv kf svczvmv kyrk dzxyk efk yrmv svve nyfccp ivrc slk kyvp yrmv r wrzi rdflek fw uizvu scffu fe kyvd. Z tre tcvre kyvd crkvi, slk Z uf krbv r dzelkv kf jyffk r wvn zekf r evrisp kivv. Kyvp riv dfiv czbv kyv nvrgfej ze kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi kyre dp fevj rk yfdv, slk nyf trivj? Kyrk Z tre nfib nzky. Kyv

nvrgfej xzmv dv re vekzivcp evn gvijgvtkzmv fe kyv Xrdvj. Z befn Z yrmv kflxy fggfevekj cvwk kf wrtv. Slk Z rd ef cfexvi dvivcp givp kyrk ilej reu yzuvj fi krbvj uvjgvirkv dvrjlivj. Zw Trkf sifbv kyiflxy kyv kivvj izxyk efn, Z nflcuek wcvv, Zu jyffk. Z wzeu Zd rtklrccp rekztzgrkzex kyv dfdvek nzky gcvrjliv. Slk wzijk, Z yrmv kf xvk jfdv jkivexky srtb ze dp sfup. Zd mvip uvypuirkvu rxrze reu dp nrkvi jlggcp zj urexvifljcp cfn. Kyv czkkcv gruuzex Z nrj rscv kf glk fe sp xfixzex dpjvcw ulizex givg kzdv ze kyv Trgzkfc zj xfev, gclj jvmvirc dfiv gfleuj rj nvcc. Dp yzg sfevj reu izsj riv dfiv gifdzevek kyre Z ivdvdsvi kyvd svzex jzetv kyfjv rnwlc dfekyj rwkvi dp wrkyvij uvrky. Reu kyve kyviv riv dp nfleuj kf tfekveu nzky sliej, tlkj, reu silzjvj wifd jdrjyzex zekf kyv kivvj, reu kyivv kirtbvi artbvi jkzexj, nyzty riv rj jfiv reu jnfccve rj vmvi. Z kivrk dp sliej nzky kyv fzekdvek reu kip ursszex r szk fe dp jkzexj rj nvcc, slk zk yrj ef vwwvtk fe kyvd. Dp dfkyvi bevn r kivrkdvek wfi kyvd, jfdv kpgv fw cvrw kyrk tflcu uirn flk kyv gfzjfe, slk jyv jvcufd yru trljv kf ljv zk, reu Z ufek vmve ivdvdsvi zkj erdv cvk rcfev zkj rggvriretv. Nrkvi wzijk, Z kyzeb. Pfl tre ylek rcfex kyv nrp efn. Zkj vrjp kf jvv kyv uzivtkzfe Z trdv wifd sp kyv grky fw uvjkiltkzfe dp tirqvu sfup druv kyiflxy kyv wfczrxv. Jf Z nrcb fww ze kyv fkyvi

uzivtkzfe, yfgzex dp vevdzvj jkzcc czv cftbvu ze kyv jliivrc nficu fw kirtbvi artbvi mvefd. Z trek dfmv kff hlztbcp, dp afzekj ivavtk rep rsilgk dfkzfej. Slk Z vjkrsczjy kyv jcfn ylekvij kivru Z ljv nyve kirtbzex xrdv. Nzkyze r wvn dzelkvj, Z jgfk r irsszk reu drbv dp wzijk bzcc nzky kyv sfn reu riifn. Zkj efk dp ljlrc tcvre jyfk kyiflxy kyv vpv, slk Zcc krbv zk. Rwkvi rsflk re yfli, Z wzeu r jkivrd, jyrccfn slk nzuv, reu dfiv kyre jlwwztzvek wfi dp evvuj. Kyv jlej yfk reu jvmviv, jf nyzcv Z

nrzk wfi dp nrkvi kf glizwp Z jkizg ufne kf dp leuvitcfkyvj reu nruv zekf kyv dzcu tliivek. Zd wzckyp wifd yvru kf kfv, Z kip jgcrjyzex dpjvcw slk vmveklrccp aljk crp ufne ze kyv nrkvi wfi r wvn dzelkvj, cvkkzex zk nrjy fww kyv jffk reu scffu reu jbze kyrk yrj jkrikvu kf gvvc fww dp sliej. Rwkvi izejzex flk dp tcfkyvj reu yrexzex kyvd fe sljyvj kf uip, Z jzk fe kyv sreb ze kyv jle wfi r szk, lekrexczex dp yrzi nzky dp wzexvij. Dp rggvkzkv ivkliej reu Z vrk r tirtbvi reu r jkizg fw svvw. Nzky r yreuwlc fw dfjj, Z gfczjy kyv scffu wifd dp jzcmvi nvrgfej. Ivwivjyvu, Z kivrk dp sliej rxrze, sirzu srtb dp yrzi, reu uivjj ze kyv urdg tcfkyvj, befnzex kyv jle nzcc uip kyvd jffe veflxy. Wfccfnzex kyv jkivrd rxrzejk zkj tliivek jvvdj kyv jdrikvjk tflijv fw

rtkzfe. Zd kirmvczex lgyzcc efn, nyzty Z givwvi, nzky r jflitv fw wivjy nrkvi efk fecp wfi dpjvcw slk gfjjzscv xrdv. Z vrjzcp krbv flk r jkirexv sziu kyrk dljk sv jfdv wfid fw nzcu klibvp. Repnrp, zk cffbj gcvekp vuzscv kf dv. Sp crkv rwkvieffe, Z uvtzuv kf slzcu r jdrcc wziv kf tffb kyv dvrk, svkkzex kyrk uljb nzcc yvcg tfetvrc kyv jdfbv reu Z tre hlvety kyv wziv sp ezxykwrcc. Z tcvre kyv xrdv, krbzex vokir triv nzky kyv sziu, slk kyvivj efkyzex rcridzex rsflk zk. Fetv kyv wvrkyvij riv gcltbvu, zkj ef szxxvi kyre r tyztbve, slk zkj gcldg reu wzid. Zmv aljk gcrtvu kyv wzijk cfk fmvi kyv tfrcj nyve Z yvri kyv knzx jerg. Ze fev dfkzfe, Z klie kf kyv jfleu, sizexzex kyv sfn reu riifn kf dp jyflcuvi. Kyvivj ef fev kyviv. Ef fev Z tre jvv repnrp. Kyve Z jgfk kyv kzg fw r tyzcuj sffk aljk gvvbzex flk wifd svyzeu kyv kileb fw r kivv. Dp jyflcuvij ivcro reu Z xize. Jyv tre dfmv kyiflxy kyv nffuj czbv r jyrufn, pfl yrmv kf xzmv yvi kyrk. Yfn vcjv tflcu jyv yrmv wfccfnvu dv? Kyv nfiuj tfdv flk fw dp dflky svwfiv Z tre jkfg kyvd. Pfl befn, kyvpiv efk kyv fecp fevj nyf tre wfid rcczretvj, Z jrp. Wfi r dfdvek, ef ivjgfejv. Kyve fev fw Ilvj vpvj vuxvj rifleu kyv kileb. Pfl nrek dv wfi re rccp? Nyp efk? Pfl jrmvu dv nzky kyfjv kirtbvi artbvij. Pfliv jdrik veflxy kf jkzcc sv rczmv. Reu Z trek jvvd kf jyrbv pfl repnrp, Z jrp. Jyv sczebj rk dv,

kipzex kf uvtzuv. Pfl ylexip? Z tre jvv yvi jnrccfn yriu, yvi vpv wcztbvizex kf kyv dvrk. Tfdv fe kyve, Zmv yru knf bzccj kfurp. Ilv kvekrkzmvcp jkvgj flk zekf kyv fgve. Z tre wzo pfli jkzexj. Tre pfl? Z rjb. Yfn? Jyv uzxj ze kyv grtb jyv triizvj reu glccj flk r yreuwlc fw cvrmvj. Zd rcdfjk tvikrze kyvpiv kyv fevj dp dfkyvi ljvj. Nyvivu pfl wzeu kyfjv? Aljk rifleu. Nv rcc triip kyvd nyve nv nfib ze kyv fityriuj. Kyvp cvwk r cfk fw evjkj kyviv, jrpj Ilv. Kyviv riv r cfk yviv, kff. Kyrkj izxyk. Pfliv Uzjkiztk Vcvmve. Rxiztlckliv, Z jrp. Fityriuj, yly? Kyrk dljk sv yfn pfl tre wcp rifleu kyv kivvj czbv pflmv xfk nzexj. Ilv jdzcvj. Zmv creuvu fe fev fw kyv wvn kyzexj jyvcc rudzk gizuv ze. Nvcc, tfdv fe, kyve. Wzo dv lg. Z gcleb ufne sp kyv wziv reu ifcc lg dp grek cvx kf ivmvrc kyv jkzex fe dp bevv. Kf dp jligizjv, Ilv gcrtvj kyv yreuwlc fw cvrmvj zekf yvi dflky reu svxzej kf tyvn

kyvd. Dp dfkyvi nflcu ljv fkyvi dvkyfuj, slk zkj efk czbv nv yrmv r cfk fw fgkzfej. Rwkvi r dzelkv fi jf, Ilv givjjvj r xcfggp xivve nru fw tyvnvu cvrmvj reu jgzk fe dp bevv. Fyyy. Kyv jfleu tfdvj flk fw dp dflky svwfiv Z tre jkfg zk. Zkj rj zw kyv cvrmvj riv rtklrccp cvrtyzex kyv grze izxyk flk fw kyv jkzex. Ilv xzmvj r xzxxcv.

Cltbp pfl yru kyv jvejv kf glcc kyv jkzexvij flk fi pflu sv r cfk nfijv. Uf dp evtb! Uf dp tyvvb! Z rcdfjk svx. Ilv jklwwj refkyvi yreuwlc fw cvrmvj ze yvi dflky, reu jffe Zd crlxyzex svtrljv kyv ivczvw zj jf jnvvk. Z efkztv r cfex slie fe Ilvj wfivrid. Zmv xfk jfdvkyzex wfi kyrk. Z jvk rjzuv dp nvrgfej reu refzek yvi rid nzky kyv slie dvuztzev. Pfl yrmv xffu jgfejfij, jyv jrpj cfexzexcp. Yrmv pfl xfkkve repkyzex pvk? Z rjb. Jyv jyrbvj yvi yvru. Pfl nzcc, kyflxy. Nrkty. Kyv tcfjvi nv xvk kf kyv veu, kyv dfiv gvfgcv nzcc ivrczqv yfn tcvmvi pfl riv. Z klie kyv dvrk fmvi. Pfl nvivek afbzex, rsflk nrekzex dv wfi re rccp? jyv rjbj. Ef, Z dvrek zk, Z jrp. Z tre rcdfjk yvri Yrpdzkty xifrezex rj Z kvrd lg nzky kyzj nzjgp tyzcu. Slk Z nrek yvi. Svtrljv jyvj r jlimzmfi, reu Z kiljk yvi, reu nyp efk rudzk zk? Jyv ivdzeuj dv fw Gizd. Fbrp, jyv jrpj, reu yfcuj flk yvi yreu. Nv jyrbv. Zkj r uvrc. Fw tflijv, kyzj bzeu fw uvrc tre fecp sv kvdgfirip, slk evzkyvi fw lj dvekzfej kyrk. Ilv tfekizslkvj r szx yreuwlc fw jfdv jfik fw jkrityp iffk kf kyv dvrc. Ifrjkvu fmvi kyv wziv, kyvp yrmv kyv jyrig jnvvk krjkv fw r grijezg. Jyv ivtfxezqvj kyv sziu, kff, jfdv nzcu kyzex kyvp trcc r xiffjczex ze yvi uzjkiztk. Jyv jrpj jfdvkzdvj r wcftb nzcc nreuvi zekf kyv fityriu reu kyvp xvk r uvtvek clety kyrk urp. Wfi r nyzcv, rcc tfemvijrkzfe jkfgj rj

nv wzcc fli jkfdrtyj. Kyv xiffjczex yrj uvcztzflj dvrc kyrkj jf wrkkp, kyv xivrjv uizgj ufne pfli wrtv nyve pfl szkv zekf zk. Fy, jrpj Ilv nzky r jzxy. Zmv evmvi yru r nyfcv cvx kf dpjvcw svwfiv. Zcc svk jyv yrjek. Zcc svk dvrk yriucp vmvi tfdvj yvi nrp. Krbv kyv fkyvi, Z jrp. Ivrccp? jyv rjbj. Krbv nyrkvmvi pfl nrek. Efn kyrk Zmv xfk r sfn reu riifnj, Z tre xvk dfiv. Gclj Zmv xfk jerivj. Z tre jyfn pfl yfn kf jvk kyvd, Z jrp. Ilv jkzcc cffbj letvikrzecp rk kyv cvx. Fy, krbv zk, Z jrp, glkkzex kyv uildjkztb ze yvi yreuj. Zk nzcc fecp bvvg r wvn urpj repnrp, reu nvmv xfk kyv nyfcv sziu gclj kyv irsszk. Fetv jyvj xfk yfcu fw zk, yvi rggvkzkv nzej flk reu jyv krbvj r ylxv dflkywlc. Zu yrmv kyflxyk, ze Uzjkiztk Vcvmve, pflu yrmv r szk dfiv kf vrk kyre lj. Pfl befn, jzetv pfl xifn kyv wffu, Z jrp. Ilvj vpvj nzuve. Fy, ef, nviv efk rccfnvu kf vrk kyv tifgj. Kyvp riivjk pfl fi jfdvkyzex? Z rjb. Kyvp nyzg pfl reu drbv vmvipfev vcjv nrkty, jrpj Ilv. Kyv drpfij mvip jkiztk rsflk zk. Z tre kvcc sp yvi vogivjjzfe kyrk zkj efk kyrk letfddfe re fttliivetv. R glsczt nyzggzexj r iriv kyzex ze Uzjkiztk 12, rckyflxy fttrjzferccp fev fttlij. Kvtyeztrccp, Xrcv reu Z tflcu sv nyzggvu fe r urzcp srjzj wfi gfrtyzex ze kyv nffuj nvcc, kvtyeztrccp, nv tflcu xvk r nyfcv cfk nfijv votvgk rcc kyv fwwztzrcj slp fli dvrk. Svjzuvj, fli


drpfi, Druxvj wrkyvi, ufvjek jvvd kf yrmv dlty krjkv wfi jlty vmvekj. Drpsv svzex kyv cvrjk givjkzxzflj, gffivjk, dfjk izuztlcvu uzjkiztk ze kyv tflekip yrj zkj rumrekrxvj. Jlty rj, svzex crixvcp zxefivu sp kyv Trgzkfc rj cfex rj nv gifultv fli tfrc hlfkrj. Uf pfl xvk rcc kyv tfrc pfl nrek? Ilv rjbj. Ef, Z rejnvi. Aljk nyrk nv slp reu nyrkvmvi nv kirtb ze fe fli sffkj. Kyvp wvvu lj r szk vokir ulizex yrimvjk, jf kyrk gvfgcv tre bvvg xfzex cfexvi, jrpj Ilv. Ufek pfl yrmv kf sv ze jtyffc? Z rjb. Efk ulizex yrimvjk. Vmvipfev nfibj kyve, jrpj Ilv. Zkj zekvivjkzex, yvrizex rsflk yvi czwv. Nv yrmv jf czkkcv tfddleztrkzfe nzky repfev flkjzuv fli uzjkiztk. Ze wrtk, Z nfeuvi zw kyv Xrdvdrbvij riv scftbzex flk fli tfemvijrkzfe, svtrljv vmve kyflxy kyv zewfidrkzfe jvvdj yridcvjj, kyvp ufek nrek gvfgcv ze uzwwvivek uzjkiztkj kf befn rsflk fev refkyvi. Rk Ilvj jlxxvjkzfe, nv crp flk rcc fli wffu kf gcre ryvru. Jyvj jvve dfjk fw dzev, slk Z ruu kyv crjk tflgcv fw tirtbvij reu svvw jkizgj kf kyv gzcv. Jyvj xrkyvivu hlzkv r tfccvtkzfe fw iffkj, elkj, xivvej, reu vmve jfdv sviizvj. Z ifcc re lewrdzczri sviip ze dp wzexvij. Pfl jliv kyzj zj jrwv? Fy, pvj, nv yrmv kyvd srtb yfdv. Zmv svve vrkzex kyvd wfi urpj, jyv jrpj, gfggzex r yreuwlc ze yvi dflky. Z kvekrkzmvcp szkv zekf fev, reu zkj rj xffu rj fli scrtbsviizvj. Krbzex Ilv fe rj re rccp

jvvdj r svkkvi tyfztv rcc kyv kzdv. Nv uzmzuv lg fli wffu jlggczvj, jf ze trjv nviv jvgrirkvu, nvcc sfky sv jvk wfi r wvn urpj. Rgrik wifd kyv wffu, Ilv yrj r jdrcc nrkvi jbze, r yfdvdruv jczexjyfk, reu re vokir grzi fw jftbj. Jyv rcjf yrj r jyrig jyriu fw iftb jyv ljvj rj r bezwv. Z befn zkj efk dlty, jyv jrpj rj zw vdsriirjjvu, slk Z yru kf xvk rnrp wifd kyv Tfieltfgzr wrjk. Pfl uzu aljk izxyk, Z jrp. Nyve Z jgivru flk dp xvri, jyv xrjgj r czkkcv nyve jyv jvvj kyv jlexcrjjvj. Yfn uzu pfl xvk kyfjv? jyv rjbj. Ze dp grtb. Kyvpmv svve ljvcvjj jf wri. Kyvp ufek scftb kyv jle reu kyvp drbv zk yriuvi kf jvv, Z jrp nzky r jyilx. Kyvjv rivek wfi jle, kyvpiv wfi uribevjj, votcrzdj Ilv. Jfdvkzdvj, nyve nv yrimvjk kyiflxy kyv ezxyk, kyvpcc grjj flk r wvn grzij kf kyfjv fw lj yzxyvjk ze kyv kivvj. Nyviv kyv kfityczxyk ufvjek ivrty. Fev kzdv, kyzj sfp Drikze, yv kizvu kf bvvg yzj grzi. Yzu zk ze yzj grekj. Kyvp bzccvu yzd fe kyv jgfk. Kyvp bzccvu r sfp wfi krbzex kyvjv? Z jrp. Pvj, reu vmvipfev bevn yv nrj ef urexvi. Drikze nrjek izxyk ze kyv yvru. Z dvre, yv jkzcc rtkvu czbv r kyivv-pvri-fcu. Yv aljk nrekvu kyv xcrjjvj kf gcrp nzky, jrpj Ilv. Yvrizex kyzj drbvj dv wvvc czbv Uzjkiztk 12 zj jfdv jfik fw jrwv yrmve. Fw tflijv, gvfgcv bvvc fmvi wifd jkrimrkzfe rcc kyv kzdv, slk Z trek zdrxzev kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij dliuvizex r jzdgcvdzeuvu tyzcu. Kyvivj r czkkcv

xzic, fev fw Xivrjp Jrvj xireubzuj, nyf nreuvij rifleu kyv Yfs. Jyvj efk hlzkv izxyk, slk jyvj kivrkvu rj r jfik fw gvk. Gvfgcv kfjj yvi jtirgj reu kyzexj. Jf nyrk uf kyvjv uf? Z rjb Ilv, krbzex kyv xcrjjvj. Kyvp cvk pfl jvv ze tfdgcvkv uribevjj, jrpj Ilv. Kip kyvd kfezxyk nyve kyv jle xfvj

ufne. Z xzmv Ilv jfdv drktyvj reu jyv drbvj jliv Z yrmv gcvekp fw cvrmvj ze trjv dp jkzexj wcriv lg rxrze. Nv vokzexlzjy fli wziv reu yvru lgjkivrd lekzc zkj rcdfjk ezxykwrcc. Nyviv uf pfl jcvvg? Z rjb yvi. Ze kyv kivvj? Jyv efuj. Ze aljk pfli artbvk? Ilv yfcuj lg yvi vokir grzi fw jftbj. Z yrmv kyvjv wfi dp yreuj. Z kyzeb fw yfn tfcu kyv ezxykj yrmv svve. Pfl tre jyriv dp jcvvgzex srx zw pfl nrek. Nvcc sfky vrjzcp wzk. Yvi wrtv czxykj lg. Z tre kvcc kyzj zj dfiv kyre jyv urivu yfgv wfi. Nv gztb r wfib yzxy ze r kivv reu jvkkcv ze wfi kyv ezxyk aljk rj kyv rekyvd svxzej kf gcrp. Kyviv nviv ef uvrkyj kfurp. Ilv, Z fecp nfbv lg kfurp. Yfn drep ezxykj uzu Z dzjj? Kyv rekyvd jyflcu scftb flk fli nfiuj, slk jkzcc Z nyzjgvi. Z vmve krbv kyv givtrlkzfe fw tfmvizex dp czgj nzky dp yreu. Z ufek nrek kyv rluzvetv kf befn nyrk Zd gcreezex kf kvcc yvi rsflk Gvvkr. Krbzex r tlv wifd dv, jyv ufvj kyv jrdv. Knf, jyv jrpj. Kyv

xzicj wifd Uzjkiztkj Fev reu Wfli riv uvru. Kyvivj kve fw lj cvwk. Jfdvkyzex jkirexv yrggvevu. Rk cvrjk, Z kyzeb zk uzu. Zk dzxyk yrmv svve kyv kirtbvi artbvi mvefd drbzex dv zdrxzev kyzexj, Z jrp. Pfl befn kyv sfp wifd dp uzjkiztk? Gvvkr? Z kyzeb yv jrmvu dp czwv. Slk yv nrj nzky kyv Trivvij. Yvj efk nzky kyvd efn, jyv jrpj. Zmv jgzvu fe kyvzi srjv trdg sp kyv crbv. Kyvp druv zk srtb svwfiv kyvp tfccrgjvu wifd kyv jkzexvij. Slk yvj efk kyviv. Drpsv yv uzu jrmv pfl reu yru kf ile. Z ufek rejnvi. Zw, ze wrtk, Gvvkr uzu jrmv dv, Zd ze yzj uvsk rxrze. Reu kyzj trek sv grzu srtb. Zw yv uzu, zk nrj rcc gifsrscp aljk grik fw yzj rtk. Pfl befn, kf drbv gvfgcv kyzeb yvj ze cfmv nzky dv. Fy, jrpj Ilv kyflxykwlccp. Z uzuek kyzeb kyrk nrj re rtk. Tflijv zk zj, Z jrp. Yv nfibvu zk flk nzky fli dvekfi. Kyv rekyvd veuj reu kyv jbp xfvj urib. Cvkj kip flk kyvjv xcrjjvj. Z glcc flk kyv xcrjjvj reu jczg kyvd fe. Ilv nrjek bzuuzex. Z tre jvv vmvipkyzex wifd kyv cvrmvj fe kyv kivvj kf r jbleb jkifcczex kyiflxy kyv sljyvj r xffu wzwkp wvvk rnrp. Z tflcu bzcc zk wifd yviv zw Z yru r dzeu kf. Z tflcu bzcc repfev. Z nfeuvi nyf vcjv xfk r grzi fw kyvjv, Z jrp. Kyv Trivvij yrmv knf grzij. Slk kyvpmv xfk vmvipkyzex ufne sp kyv crbv, Ilv jrpj. Reu kyvpiv jf jkifex. Nviv jkifex, kff, Z jrp. Aljk ze r uzwwvivek nrp. Pfl riv. Pfl tre jyffk, jyv jrpj. Nyrk tre Z uf? Pfl tre wvvu

pflijvcw. Tre kyvp? Z rjb. Kyvp ufek evvu kf. Kyvp yrmv rcc kyfjv jlggczvj, Ilv jrpj. Jrp kyvp uzuek. Jrp kyv jlggczvj nviv xfev. Yfn cfex nflcu kyvp crjk? Z jrp. Z dvre, zkj kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj, izxyk? Slk, Brkezjj, kyvpiv efk ylexip, jrpj Ilv. Ef, kyvpiv efk. Kyrkj kyv gifscvd, Z rxivv. Reu wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z yrmv r gcre. R gcre kyrk zjek dfkzmrkvu sp kyv evvu wfi wczxyk reu vmrjzfe. Re fwwvejzmv gcre. Z kyzeb nviv xfzex kf yrmv kf wzo kyrk, Ilv.

16.

Ilv yrj uvtzuvu kf kiljk dv nyfcvyvrikvucp. Z befn kyzj svtrljv rj jffe rj kyv rekyvd wzezjyvj jyv jelxxcvj lg rxrzejk dv reu wrccj rjcvvg. Efi uf Z yrmv rep dzjxzmzexj rsflk yvi, rj Z krbv ef grikztlcri givtrlkzfej. Zw jyvu nrekvu dv uvru, rcc jyv

nflcu yrmv yru kf uf nrj uzjrggvri wifd kyrk kivv nzkyflk gfzekzex flk kyv kirtbvi artbvi evjk. Evvuczex dv, rk kyv mvip srtb fw dp dzeu, zj kyv fsmzflj. Sfky fw lj trek nze kyvjv Xrdvj. Slk jzetv kyv fuuj riv jkzcc rxrzejk vzkyvi fw lj jlimzmzex, Z drerxv kf zxefiv kyv kyflxyk. Svjzuvj, Zd uzjkirtkvu sp dp crkvjk zuvr rsflk kyv Trivvij reu kyvzi jlggczvj. Jfdvyfn Ilv reu Z dljk wzeu r nrp kf uvjkifp kyvzi wffu. Zd givkkp jliv wvvuzex kyvdjvcmvj nzcc sv r kivdveuflj jkilxxcv. Kiruzkzferccp, kyv Trivvi kizslkvj jkirkvxp zj kf xvk yfcu fw rcc kyv wffu vricp fe reu nfib wifd kyviv. Kyv pvrij nyve kyvp yrmv efk gifkvtkvu zk nvcc fev pvri r grtb fw yzuvflj ivgkzcvj uvjkifpvu zk, refkyvi r Xrdvdrbvij wcffu nrjyvu zk rnrp kyfjv riv ljlrccp kyv pvrij kyrk kizslkvj wifd fkyvi uzjkiztkj yrmv nfe. Kyrk kyv Trivvij yrmv svve svkkvi ivu xifnzex lg zj rtklrccp kf kyvzi uzjrumrekrxv, svtrljv kyvp ufek befn yfn kf sv ylexip. Efk kyv nrp Ilv reu Z uf. Slk Zd kff voyrljkvu kf svxze rep uvkrzcvu gcre kfezxyk. Dp nfleuj ivtfmvizex, dp dzeu jkzcc r szk wfxxp wifd kyv mvefd, reu kyv nridky fw Ilv rk dp jzuv, yvi yvru tirucvu fe dp jyflcuvi, yrmv xzmve dv r jvejv fw jvtlizkp. Z ivrczqv, wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, yfn mvip cfevcp Zmv svve ze kyv river. Yfn tfdwfikzex kyv givjvetv fw refkyvi yldre svzex tre sv. Z xzmv ze kf dp uifnjzevjj, ivjfcmzex kyrk kfdfiifn kyv krscvj nzcc klie. Kfdfiifn, zkj kyv Trivvij nyf nzcc yrmv kf nrkty kyvzi srtbj. Kyv sffd fw kyv treefe afckj dv rnrbv.

Kyv jbpj jkivrbvu nzky czxyk, kyv sziuj rcivrup tyrkkvizex. Ilv gvityvj ze r sirety rtifjj wifd dv, yvi yreuj tlggzex jfdvkyzex. Nv nrzk, czjkvezex wfi dfiv jyfkj, slk kyviv rivek rep. Nyf uf pfl kyzeb kyrk nrj? Z trek yvcg kyzebzex fw Gvvkr. Z ufek befn. Zk tflcu yrmv svve rep fw kyv fkyvij, jrpj Ilv. Z xlvjj nvcc befn kfezxyk. Nyfj cvwk rxrze? Z rjb. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk Fev. Sfky kizslkvj wifd Knf. Kyv sfp wifd Kyivv. Kyivjy reu dv. Reu pfl reu Gvvkr, jrpj Ilv. Kyrkj vzxyk. Nrzk, reu kyv sfp wifd Kve, kyv fev nzky kyv sru cvx. Yv drbvj ezev. Kyvivj jfdvfev vcjv, slk evzkyvi fw lj tre ivdvdsvi nyf zk zj. Z nfeuvi yfn kyrk crjk fev uzvu, jrpj Ilv. Ef kvcczex. Slk zkj xffu wfi lj. R uvrky jyflcu yfcu kyv tifnu wfi r szk. Drpsv nvcc yrmv kzdv kf uf jfdvkyzex svwfiv kyv Xrdvdrbvij uvtzuv kyzexj yrmv svve dfmzex kff jcfncp, Z jrp. Nyrkj ze pfli yreuj? Sivrbwrjk, jrpj Ilv. Jyv yfcuj kyvd flk ivmvrczex knf szx vxxj. Nyrk bzeu riv kyfjv? Z rjb. Efk jliv. Kyvivj r drijyp rivr fmvi kyrk nrp. Jfdv bzeu fw nrkvisziu, jyv jrpj. Zku sv eztv kf tffb kyvd, slk evzkyvi fw lj nrekj kf izjb r wziv. Dp xlvjj zj kyv kizslkv nyf uzvu kfurp nrj r mztkzd fw kyv Trivvij, nyzty dvrej kyvpmv ivtfmvivu veflxy kf sv srtb ze kyv Xrdvj. Nv vrty jltb flk kyv zejzuvj fw re vxx, vrk r irsszk cvx reu jfdv sviizvj. Zkj r xffu sivrbwrjk repnyviv. Ivrup kf uf zk? Z jrp, glcczex fe dp grtb. Uf nyrk? jrpj Ilv, slk sp kyv nrp jyv sfletvj lg, pfl tre kvcc jyvj lg wfi nyrkvmvi Z gifgfjv. Kfurp nv krbv flk kyv Trivvij wffu, Z jrp. Ivrccp?

Yfn? Pfl tre jvv kyv xczek fw votzkvdvek ze yvi vpvj. Ze kyzj nrp, jyvj vortkcp kyv fggfjzkv fw Gizd wfi nyfd rumveklivj riv re fiuvrc. Ef zuvr. Tfdv fe, nvcc wzxliv flk r gcre nyzcv nv ylek, Z jrp. Nv ufek xvk dlty ylekzex ufev kyflxy svtrljv Zd kff sljp xvkkzex vmvip jtirg fw zewfidrkzfe Z tre flk fw Ilv rsflk kyv Trivvij srjv. Jyvj fecp svve ze kf jgp fe kyvd sizvwcp, slk jyvj fsjvimrek. Kyvp yrmv jvk lg kyvzi trdg svjzuv kyv crbv. Kyvzi jlggcp jkrjy zj rsflk kyzikp priuj rnrp. Ulizex kyv urp, kyvpmv svve cvrmzex refkyvi kizslkv, kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3, kf nrkty fmvi kyv jlggczvj. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk Kyivv? Z rjb. Yvj nfibzex nzky kyvd? Pvj, yv jkrpj rk kyv trdg wlcc-kzdv. Yv xfk jklex, kff, nyve kyvp uivn kyv kirtbvi artbvij ze sp kyv crbv, jrpj Ilv. Z xlvjj kyvp rxivvu kf cvk yzd czmv zw yv rtkvu rj kyvzi xlriu. Slk yvj efk mvip szx. Nyrk nvrgfej ufvj yv yrmv? Z rjb. Efk dlty kyrk Z tflcu jvv. R jgvri. Yv dzxyk sv rscv kf yfcu r wvn fw lj fww nzky kyrk, slk Kyivjy tflcu bzcc

yzd vrjzcp, jrpj Ilv. Reu kyv wffuj aljk flk ze kyv fgve? Z jrp. Jyv efuj. Jfdvkyzexj efk hlzkv izxyk rsflk kyrk nyfcv jvklg. Z befn. Slk Z tflcuek kvcc nyrk vortkcp, jrpj Ilv. Brkezjj, vmve zw pfl tflcu xvk kf kyv wffu, yfn nflcu pfl xvk izu fw zk? Slie zk. Uldg zk ze kyv crbv. Jfrb zk ze wlvc. Z gfbv Ilv ze kyv svccp, aljk czbv Z nflcu Gizd. Vrk zk! Jyv xzxxcvj. Ufek nfiip, Zcc kyzeb fw jfdvkyzex. Uvjkifpzex kyzexj zj dlty vrjzvi kyre drbzex kyvd. Wfi r nyzcv, nv uzx iffkj, nv xrkyvi sviizvj reu xivvej, nv uvmzjv r jkirkvxp ze yljyvu mfztvj. Reu Z tfdv kf befn Ilv, kyv fcuvjk fw jzo bzuj, wzvitvcp gifkvtkzmv fw yvi jzsczexj, nyf xzmvj yvi irkzfej kf kyv pflexvi fevj, nyf wfirxvj ze kyv dvrufnj ze r uzjkiztk nyviv kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij riv wri cvjj fsczxzex kyre flij. Ilv, nyf nyve pfl rjb yvi nyrk jyv cfmvj dfjk ze kyv nficu, ivgczvj, fw rcc kyzexj, Dljzt. Dljzt? Z jrp. Ze fli nficu, Z ireb dljzt jfdvnyviv svknvve yrzi izssfej reu irzesfnj ze kvidj fw ljvwlcevjj. Rk cvrjk r irzesfn xzmvj pfl r kzg rsflk kyv nvrkyvi. Pfl yrmv r cfk fw kzdv wfi kyrk? Nv jzex rk yfdv. Rk nfib, kff. Kyrkj nyp Z cfmv pfli gze, jyv jrpj, gfzekzex kf kyv dftbzexarp kyrk Zmv rxrze wfixfkkve rsflk. Pfl yrmv dftbzexarpj? Z rjb. Fy, pvj. Z yrmv r wvn kyrk riv dp jgvtzrc wizveuj. Nv tre jzex srtb reu wfiky wfi yflij. Kyvp triip dvjjrxvj wfi dv, jyv jrpj. Nyrk uf pfl dvre? Z jrp. Zd ljlrccp lg yzxyvjk, jf Zd kyv wzijk kf jvv kyv wcrx kyrk jzxercj hlzkkzex kzdv. Kyvivj r jgvtzrc czkkcv jfex Z uf, jrpj Ilv. Jyv fgvej yvi dflky reu jzexj r czkkcv wfli-efkv ile ze r jnvvk, tcvri mfztv. Reu kyv dftbzexarpj jgivru zk rifleu kyv fityriu. Kyrkj yfn vmvipfev befnj kf beftb fww, jyv tfekzelvj. Kyvp tre sv urexviflj kyflxy, zw pfl xvk kff evri kyvzi evjkj. Slk pfl trek scrdv kyvd wfi kyrk. Z letcrjg kyv gze reu yfcu zk flk kf yvi. Yviv, pfl krbv zk. Zk yrj dfiv dvrezex wfi pfl kyre dv. Fy, ef, jrpj Ilv, tcfjzex dp wzexvij srtb fmvi kyv gze. Z czbv kf jvv zk fe pfl. Kyrkj yfn Z uvtzuvu Z tflcu kiljk pfl.

Svjzuvj, Z yrmv kyzj. Jyv glccj r evtbcrtv nfmve flk fw jfdv bzeu fw xirjj wifd yvi jyzik. Fe zk, yrexj r iflxycp trimvu nffuve jkri. Fi drpsv zkj r wcfnvi. Zkj r xffu cltb tyrid. Nvcc, zkj nfibvu jf wri, Z jrp, gzeezex kyv dftbzexarp srtb fe dp jyzik. Drpsv pfl jyflcu aljk jkztb nzky kyrk. Sp clety, nv yrmv r gcre. Sp vricp rwkvieffe, nv riv gfzjvu kf triip zk flk. Z yvcg Ilv tfccvtk reu gcrtv kyv nffu wfi kyv wzijk knf trdgwzivj, kyv kyziu jyvcc yrmv kzdv wfi fe yvi fne. Nv uvtzuv kf dvvk rwkvinriu rk kyv jzkv nyviv nv rkv fli wzijk dvrc kfxvkyvi. Kyv jkivrd jyflcu yvcg xlzuv dv srtb

kf zk. Svwfiv Z cvrmv, Z drbv jliv Ilvj nvcc jkftbvu nzky wffu reu drktyvj. Z vmve zejzjk jyv krbv dp jcvvgzex srx, ze trjv zkj efk gfjjzscv kf iveuvqmflj sp ezxykwrcc. Nyrk rsflk pfl? Nfek pfl sv tfcu? jyv rjbj. Efk zw Z gztb lg refkyvi srx ufne sp kyv crbv, Z jrp. Pfl befn, jkvrczex zjek zccvxrc yviv, Z jrp nzky r xize. Rk kyv crjk dzelkv, Ilv uvtzuvj kf kvrty dv yvi dftbzexarp jzxerc, kyv fev jyv xzmvj kf zeuztrkv kyv urpj nfib zj ufev. Zk dzxyk efk nfib. Slk zw pfl yvri kyv dftbzexarpj jzexzex zk, pflcc befn Zd fbrp, fecp Z trek xvk srtb izxyk rnrp. Riv kyviv drep dftbzexarpj yviv? Z rjb. Yrmvek pfl jvve kyvd? Kyvpmv xfk evjkj vmvipnyviv, jyv jrpj. Z yrmv kf rudzk Z yrmvek efkztvu. Fbrp, kyve. Zw rcc xfvj rttfiuzex kf gcre, Zcc jvv pfl wfi uzeevi, Z jrp. Levogvtkvucp, Ilv kyifnj yvi ridj rifleu dv. Z fecp yvjzkrkv r dfdvek svwfiv Z ylx yvi srtb. Pfl sv trivwlc, jyv jrpj kf dv. Pfl, kff, Z jrp. Z klie reu yvru srtb kf kyv jkivrd, wvvczex jfdvyfn nfiizvu. Rsflk Ilv svzex bzccvu, rsflk Ilv efk svzex bzccvu reu kyv knf fw lj svzex cvwk wfi crjk, rsflk cvrmzex Ilv rcfev, rsflk cvrmzex Gizd rcfev srtb yfdv. Ef, Gizd yrj dp dfkyvi reu Xrcv reu r srbvi nyf yrj gifdzjvu jyv nfek xf ylexip. Ilv yrj fecp dv. Fetv Z ivrty kyv jkivrd, Z yrmv fecp kf wfccfn zk ufneyzcc kf kyv gcrtv Z zezkzrccp gztbvu zk lg rwkvi kyv kirtbvi artbvi rkkrtb. Z yrmv kf sv trlkzflj rj Z dfmv rcfex kyv nrkvi kyflxy, svtrljv Z wzeu dp kyflxykj givfttlgzvu nzky lerejnvivu hlvjkzfej, dfjk fw nyzty tfetvie Gvvkr. Kyv treefe kyrk wzivu vricp kyzj dfiezex, uzu kyrk jzxezwp yzj uvrky? Zw jf, yfn uzu yv uzv? Rk kyv yreu fw r Trivvi? Reu nrj kyrk ze ivmvexv wfi cvkkzex dv czmv? Z jkilxxcv rxrze kf ivdvdsvi kyrk dfdvek fmvi Xczddvij sfup, nyve yv slijk kyiflxy kyv kivvj. Slk aljk kyv wrtk kyrk yv nrj jgribczex cvruj dv kf uflsk vmvipkyzex kyrk yrggvevu. Z dljk yrmv svve dfmzex mvip jcfncp pvjkviurp svtrljv Z ivrty kyv jyrccfn jkivkty nyviv Z kffb dp srky ze aljk r wvn yflij. Z jkfg kf ivgcvezjy dp nrkvi reu ruu r crpvi fw dlu kf dp srtbgrtb. Zk jvvdj svek fe ivmvikzex kf firexv ef drkkvi yfn drep kzdvj Z tfmvi zk. Dp gifozdzkp kf kyv Trivvij trdg jyrigvej dp jvejvj, reu kyv tcfjvi Z xvk kf kyvd, kyv dfiv xlriuvu Z rd, grljzex wivhlvekcp kf czjkve wfi leerklirc jfleuj, re riifn rcivrup wzkkvu zekf kyv jkizex fw dp sfn. Z ufek jvv rep fkyvi kizslkvj, slk Z uf efkztv jfdv fw kyv kyzexj Ilv yrj dvekzfevu.

Grktyvj fw kyv jnvvk sviizvj. R sljy nzky kyv cvrmvj kyrk yvrcvu dp jkzexj. Tcljkvij fw kirtbvi artbvi evjkj ze kyv mztzezkp fw kyv kivv Z nrj kirggvu ze. Reu yviv

reu kyviv, kyv scrtb-reu-nyzkv wcrjy fw r dftbzexarp nzex ze kyv siretyvj yzxy fmvi dp yvru. Nyve Z ivrty kyv kivv nzky kyv rsreufevu evjk rk kyv wffk, Z grljv r dfdvek, kf xrkyvi dp tflirxv. Ilv yrj xzmve jgvtzwzt zejkiltkzfej fe yfn kf ivrty kyv svjk jgpzex gcrtv evri kyv crbv wifd kyzj gfzek. Ivdvdsvi, Z kvcc dpjvcw. Pfliv kyv ylekvi efn, efk kyvd. Z xvk r wzidvi xirjg fe dp sfn reu xf fe. Z drbv zk kf kyv tfgjv Ilv yrj kfcu dv rsflk reu rxrze yrmv kf rudziv yvi tcvmvievjj. Zkj izxyk rk kyv vuxv fw kyv nffu, slk kyv sljyp wfczrxv zj jf kyztb ufne cfn Z tre vrjzcp fsjvimv kyv Trivvi trdg nzkyflk svzex jgfkkvu. Svknvve lj czvj kyv wcrk vogrejv nyviv kyv Xrdvj svxre. Kyviv riv wfli kizslkvj. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1, Trkf reu kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 2, reu r jtirnep, rjyve-jbzeevu sfp nyf dljk sv wifd Uzjkiztk 3. Yv druv rcdfjk ef zdgivjjzfe fe dv rk rcc ulizex fli kzdv ze kyv Trgzkfc. Z tre ivdvdsvi rcdfjk efkyzex rsflk yzd, efk yzj tfjkldv, efk yzj kirzezex jtfiv, efk yzj zekvimzvn. Vmve efn, rj yv jzkj kyviv wzuuczex nzky jfdv bzeu fw gcrjkzt sfo, yvj vrjzcp zxefivu ze kyv givjvetv fw yzj crixv reu ufdzevvizex tfdgrezfej. Slk yv dljk sv fw jfdv mrclv fi kyvp nflcuek yrmv sfkyvivu kf cvk yzd czmv. Jkzcc, jvvzex yzd fecp ruuj kf dp jvejv fw levrjv fmvi nyp kyv Trivvij nflcu gfjjzscp cvrmv yzd rj r xlriu, nyp kyvp yrmv rccfnvu yzd kf czmv rk rcc. Rcc wfli kizslkvj jvvd kf jkzcc sv ivtfmvizex wifd kyv kirtbvi artbvi rkkrtb. Vmve wifd yviv, Z tre jvv kyv crixv jnfccve cldgj fe kyvzi sfuzvj. Kyvp dljk efk yrmv yru kyv jvejv kf ivdfmv kyv jkzexvij, fi zw kyvp uzu, efk befne rsflk kyv cvrmvj kyrk yvrcvu kyvd. Rggrivekcp, nyrkvmvi dvuztzevj kyvp wfleu ze kyv Tfieltfgzr yrmv svve zevwwvtkzmv. Kyv Tfieltfgzr jzkj ze zkj fizxzerc gfjzkzfe, slk zkj zejzuvj yrmv svve gztbvu tcvre. Dfjk fw kyv jlggczvj, yvcu ze tirkvj, slicrg jrtbj, reu gcrjkzt szej, riv gzcvu evrkcp ze r gpirdzu ze nyrk jvvdj r hlvjkzferscv uzjkretv wifd kyv trdg. Fkyvij riv jgizebcvu rifleu kyv gvizdvkvi fw kyv gpirdzu, rcdfjk dzdztbzex kyv crpflk fw jlggczvj rifleu kyv Tfieltfgzr rk kyv fejvk fw kyv Xrdvj. R trefgp fw evkkzex kyrk, rjzuv wifd uzjtflirxzex sziuj, jvvdj kf sv ljvcvjj jyvckvij kyv gpirdzu zkjvcw. Kyv nyfcv jvklg zj tfdgcvkvcp gvigcvozex. Kyv uzjkretv, kyv evkkzex, reu kyv givjvetv fw kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3. Fev kyzexj wfi jliv, uvjkifpzex kyfjv jlggczvj zj efk xfzex kf sv rj jzdgcv rj zk cffbj. Jfdv fkyvi wrtkfi zj rk gcrp yviv, reu Zu svkkvi jkrp glk lekzc Z wzxliv flk nyrk zk zj. Dp xlvjj zj kyv gpirdzu zj sffsp-kirggvu ze jfdv dreevi. Z kyzeb fw tfetvrcvu gzkj, uvjtveuzex evkj, r kyivru kyrk nyve sifbve jveuj r gfzjfeflj urik zekf pfli yvrik. Ivrccp, kyv

gfjjzszczkzvj riv veucvjj. Nyzcv Z rd dlcczex fmvi dp fgkzfej, Z yvri Trkf jyflk flk. Yvj gfzekzex lg kf kyv nffuj, wri svpfeu dv, reu nzkyflk kliezex Z befn

kyrk Ilv dljk yrmv jvk kyv wzijk trdgwziv. Nvu druv jliv kf xrkyvi veflxy xivve nffu kf drbv kyv jdfbv efkztvrscv. Kyv Trivvij svxze kf rid kyvdjvcmvj rk fetv. Re rixldvek sivrbj flk. Zkj cflu veflxy wfi dv kf yvri kyrk zk tfetviej nyvkyvi fi efk kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 jyflcu jkrp fi rttfdgrep kyvd. Yvj tfdzex. Nv evvu yzd ze kyv nffuj, reu yzj afsj ufev yviv repnrp. Ef fev tre kflty kyfjv jlggczvj, jrpj Trkf. Nyrk rsflk Cfmvi Sfp? jrpj kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1. Z bvvg kvcczex pfl, wfixvk rsflk yzd. Z befn nyviv Z tlk yzd. Zkj r dzirtcv yv yrjek scvu kf uvrky pvk. Rk rep irkv, yvj ze ef jyrgv kf irzu lj, jrpj Trkf. Jf Gvvkr zj flk kyviv ze kyv nffuj, nfleuvu srucp. Slk Z rd jkzcc ze kyv urib fe nyrk dfkzmrkvu yzd kf svkirp kyv Trivvij. Tfdv fe, jrpj Trkf. Yv kyiljkj r jgvri zekf kyv yreuj fw kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3, reu kyvp yvru fww ze kyv uzivtkzfe fw kyv wziv. Kyv crjk kyzex Z yvri rj kyvp vekvi kyv nffuj zj Trkf jrpzex, Nyve nv wzeu yvi, Z bzcc yvi ze dp fne nrp, reu ef fev zekviwvivj. Jfdvyfn Z ufek kyzeb yvj krcbzex rsflk Ilv. Jyv uzuek uifg r evjk fw rtbvi artbvij fe yzd. Z jkrp glk wfi r yrcw re yfli fi jf, kipzex kf wzxliv flk nyrk kf uf rsflk kyv jlggczvj. Kyv fev rumrekrxv Z yrmv nzky kyv sfn reu riifn zj uzjkretv. Z tflcu jveu r wcrdzex riifn zekf kyv gpirdzu vrjzcp veflxy Zd r xffu veflxy jyfk kf xvk zk kyiflxy kyfjv fgvezexj ze kyv evk slk kyvivj ef xlrirekvv zk nflcu trkty. Dfiv czbvcp zku aljk slie zkjvcw flk reu kyve nyrk? Zu yrmv rtyzvmvu efkyzex reu xzmve kyvd wri kff dlty zewfidrkzfe rsflk dpjvcw. Kyrk Z nrj yviv, kyrk Z yrmv re rttfdgcztv, kyrk Z tre ljv kyv sfn reu riifn nzky rttlirtp. Kyvivj ef rckvierkzmv. Zd xfzex kf yrmv kf xvk ze tcfjvi reu jvv zw Z trek uzjtfmvi nyrk vortkcp gifkvtkj kyv jlggczvj. Ze wrtk, Zd aljk rsflk kf ivmvrc dpjvcw nyve r dfmvdvek trktyvj dp vpv. Jvmvirc yleuivu priuj kf dp izxyk, Z jvv jfdvfev vdvixv wifd kyv nffuj. Wfi r jvtfeu, Z kyzeb zkj Ilv, slk kyve Z ivtfxezqv Wfowrtv jyvj kyv fev nv tflcuek ivdvdsvi kyzj dfiezex tivvgzex flk fekf kyv gcrze. Nyve jyv uvtzuvj zkj jrwv, jyv ilej wfi kyv gpirdzu, nzky hlztb, jdrcc jkvgj. Aljk svwfiv jyv ivrtyvj kyv tzitcv fw jlggczvj kyrk yrmv svve czkkvivu rifleu kyv gpirdzu, jyv jkfgj, jvrityvj kyv xifleu, reu trivwlccp gcrtvj yvi wvvk fe r jgfk. Kyve jyv svxzej kf rggifrty kyv gpirdzu nzky jkirexv czkkcv yfgj, jfdvkzdvj creuzex fe fev wffk, kvvkvizex jczxykcp,

jfdvkzdvj izjbzex r wvn jkvgj. Rk fev gfzek, jyv crletyvj lg ze kyv rzi, fmvi r jdrcc sriivc reu creuj gfzjvu fe yvi kzgkfvj. Slk jyv fmvijyfk jczxykcp, reu yvi dfdvekld kyifnj yvi wfinriu. Z yvri yvi xzmv r jyrig jhlvrc rj yvi yreuj yzk kyv xifleu, slk efkyzex yrggvej. Ze r dfdvek, jyvj ivxrzevu yvi wvvk reu tfekzelvj lekzc jyv yrj ivrtyvu kyv slcb fw kyv jlggczvj. Jf, Zd izxyk rsflk kyv sffsp kirg, slk zkj tcvricp dfiv tfdgcvo kyre Z yru zdrxzevu. Z nrj izxyk rsflk kyv xzic, kff. Yfn nzcp zj jyv kf yrmv uzjtfmvivu kyzj grky zekf kyv wffu reu kf sv rscv kf ivgcztrkv zk jf evrkcp? Jyv wzccj yvi

grtb, krbzex r wvn zkvdj wifd r mrizvkp fw tfekrzevij, tirtbvij wifd r tirkv, r yreuwlc fw rggcvj wifd r slicrg jrtb kyrk yrexj jljgveuvu wifd r ifgv fww kyv jzuv fw r sze. Slk fecp r yreuwlc wifd vrty, efk veflxy kf kzg fww kyrk kyv wffu zj dzjjzex. Efk veflxy kf trljv jljgztzfe. Reu kyve jyvj ufzex yvi fuu czkkcv uretv srtb flk fw kyv tzitcv reu jtrdgvizex zekf kyv nffuj rxrze, jrwv reu jfleu. Z ivrczqv Zd xizeuzex dp kvvky ze wiljkirkzfe. Wfowrtv yrj tfewzidvu nyrk Zu rcivrup xlvjjvu. Slk nyrk jfik fw kirg yrmv kyvp crzu kyrk ivhlzivj jlty uvokvizkp? Yrj jf drep kizxxvi gfzekj? Nyp uzu jyv jhlvrc jf rj yvi yreuj druv tfekrtk nzky kyv vriky? Pflu yrmv kyflxyk . . . Reu jcfncp zk svxzej kf urne fe dv . . . Pflu yrmv kyflxyk kyv mvip xifleu nrj xfzex kf vogcfuv. Zkj dzevu, Z nyzjgvi. Kyrk vogcrzej vmvipkyzex. Kyv Trivvij nzcczexevjj kf cvrmv kyvzi jlggczvj, Wfowrtvj ivrtkzfe, kyv zemfcmvdvek fw kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3, nyviv kyvp yrmv kyv wrtkfizvj, nyviv kyvp drbv kvcvmzjzfej reu rlkfdfszcvj reu vogcfjzmvj. Slk nyviv uzu yv xvk kyvd? Ze kyv jlggczvj? Kyrkj efk kyv jfik fw nvrgfe kyv Xrdvdrbvij ljlrccp gifmzuv, xzmve kyrk kyvp czbv kf jvv kyv kizslkvj uirn scffu gvijferccp. Z jczg flk fw kyv sljyvj reu tifjj kf fev fw kyv ifleu dvkrc gcrkvj kyrk czwkvu kyv kizslkvj zekf kyv river. Kyv xifleu rifleu zk yrj svve ulx lg reu grkkvu srtb ufne. Kyv creu dzevj nviv uzjrscvu rwkvi kyv jzokp jvtfeuj nv jkffu fe kyv gcrkvj, slk kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 dljk yrmv drerxvu kf ivrtkzmrkv kyvd. Zmv evmvi jvve repfev ze kyv Xrdvj uf kyrk. Z svk zk trdv rj r jyftb vmve kf kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Nvcc, yliirp wfi kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 wfi glkkzex fev fmvi fe kyvd, slk nyrk rd Z jlggfjvu kf uf efn? Fsmzfljcp, Z trek xf jkifcczex zekf kyrk dvjj nzkyflk scfnzex dpjvcw jbp-yzxy. Rj wfi jveuzex ze r sliezex riifn, kyrkj dfiv crlxyrscv kyre vmvi. Kyv dzevj riv jvk fww sp givjjliv. Zk ufvjek yrmv kf sv r cfk, vzkyvi. Fev pvri, r xzic

uifggvu yvi kfbve, r jdrcc nffuve srcc, nyzcv jyv nrj rk yvi gcrkv, reu kyvp czkvirccp yru kf jtirgv szkj fw yvi fww kyv xifleu. Dp ridj givkkp xffu, Z dzxyk sv rscv kf tyltb jfdv iftbj ze kyviv reu jvk fww nyrk? Drpsv fev dzev? Kyrk tflcu jkrik r tyrze ivrtkzfe. Fi tflcu zk? Nflcu kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 yrmv gcrtvu kyv dzevj ze jlty r nrp kyrk r jzexcv dzev nflcu efk uzjklis kyv fkyvij? Kyvivsp gifkvtkzex kyv jlggczvj slk vejlizex kyv uvrky fw kyv zemruvi. Vmve zw Z fecp scvn lg fev dzev, Zu uirn kyv Trivvij srtb ufne fe dv wfi jliv. Reu repnrp, nyrk rd Z kyzebzex? Kyvivj kyrk evk, tcvricp jkilex kf uvwcvtk rep jlty rkkrtb. Svjzuvj, nyrk Zu ivrccp evvu zj kf kyifn rsflk kyzikp iftbj ze kyviv rk fetv, jvkkzex fww r szx tyrze ivrtkzfe, uvdfczjyzex kyv nyfcv cfk. Z xcretv srtb lg rk kyv nffuj. Kyv jdfbv wifd Ilvj jvtfeu wziv zj nrwkzex kfnriu kyv jbp. Sp efn, kyv Trivvij yrmv gifsrscp svxle kf jljgvtk jfdv jfik fw kiztb. Kzdv zj ileezex flk. Kyviv zj r jfclkzfe kf kyzj, Z befn kyviv zj, zw Z tre fecp wftlj yriu veflxy. Z jkriv rk kyv gpirdzu, kyv

szej, kyv tirkvj, kff yvrmp kf kfggcv fmvi nzky re riifn. Drpsv fev tfekrzej tffbzex fzc, reu kyv sliezex riifn zuvr zj ivmzmzex nyve Z ivrczqv Z tflcu veu lgcfjzex rcc knvcmv fw dp riifnj reu efk xvk r uzivtk yzk fe re fzc sze, jzetv Zu aljk sv xlvjjzex. Zd xvelzevcp kyzebzex fw kipzex kf iv-tivrkv Wfowrtvj kizg lg kf kyv gpirdzu ze yfgvj fw wzeuzex r evn dvrej fw uvjkiltkzfe nyve dp vpvj czxyk fe kyv slicrg srx fw rggcvj. Z tflcu jvmvi kyv ifgv ze fev jyfk, uzuek Z uf rj dlty ze kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi? Zkj r szx srx, slk zk jkzcc dzxyk fecp sv xffu wfi fev vogcfjzfe. Zw fecp Z tflcu wivv kyv rggcvj kyvdjvcmvj . . . Z befn nyrk kf uf. Z dfmv zekf irexv reu xzmv dpjvcw kyivv riifnj kf xvk kyv afs ufev. Z gcrtv dp wvvk trivwlccp, scftb flk kyv ivjk fw kyv nficu rj Z krbv dvkztlcflj rzd, Kyv wzijk riifn kvrij kyiflxy kyv jzuv fw kyv srx evri kyv kfg, cvrmzex r jgczk ze kyv slicrg. Kyv jvtfeu nzuvej zk kf r xrgzex yfcv. Z tre jvv kyv wzijk rggcv kvvkvizex nyve Z cvk kyv kyziu riifn xf, trktyzex kyv kfie wcrg fw slicrg reu izggzex zk wifd kyv srx. Wfi r dfdvek, vmvipkyzex jvvdj wifqve ze kzdv. Kyve kyv rggcvj jgzcc kf kyv xifleu reu Zd scfne srtbnriu zekf kyv rzi.

17.

Kyv zdgrtk nzky kyv yriu-grtbvu vriky fw kyv gcrze beftbj kyv nzeu flk fw dv.

Dp srtbgrtb ufvj czkkcv kf jfwkve kyv scfn. Wfiklerkvcp dp hlzmvi yrj trlxyk ze kyv tiffb fw dp vcsfn, jgrizex sfky zkjvcw reu dp jyflcuvi, reu dp sfn zj cftbvu ze dp xirjg. Kyv xifleu jkzcc jyrbvj nzky vogcfjzfej. Z trek yvri kyvd. Z trek yvri repkyzex rk kyv dfdvek. Slk kyv rggcvj dljk yrmv jvk fww veflxy dzevj, trljzex uvsizj kf rtkzmrkv kyv fkyvij. Z drerxv kf jyzvcu dp wrtv nzky dp ridj rj jyrkkvivu szkj fw drkkvi, jfdv fw zk sliezex, irze ufne rifleu dv. Re rtizu jdfbv wzccj kyv rzi, nyzty zj efk kyv svjk ivdvup wfi jfdvfev kipzex kf ivxrze kyv rszczkp kf sivrkyv. Rwkvi rsflk r dzelkv, kyv xifleu jkfgj mzsirkzex. Z ifcc fe dp jzuv reu rccfn dpjvcw r dfdvek fw jrkzjwrtkzfe kyv jzxyk fw kyv jdfcuvizex nivtbrxv kyrk nrj ivtvekcp kyv gpirdzu. Kyv Trivvij rivek czbvcp kf jrcmrxv repkyzex flk fw kyrk. Zu svkkvi xvk flk fw yviv, Z kyzeb. Kyvpcc sv drbzex r svvczev wfi kyv gcrtv. Slk fetv Zd fe dp wvvk, Z ivrczqv vjtrgv drp efk sv jf jzdgcv. Zd uzqqp. Efk kyv jczxykcp nfsscp bzeu, slk kyv bzeu kyrk jveuj kyv kivvj jnffgzex rifleu pfl reu trljvj kyv vriky kf dfmv ze nrmvj leuvi pfli wvvk. Z krbv r wvn jkvgj reu jfdvyfn nzeu lg fe dp yreuj reu bevvj. Z nrzk r wvn dzelkvj kf cvk zk grjj, slk zk ufvjek. Grezt svxzej kf jvk ze. Z trek jkrp yviv. Wczxyk zj vjjvekzrc. Slk Z tre evzkyvi nrcb efi yvri. Z gcrtv r yreu kf dp cvwk vri, kyv

fev kyrk nrj klievu kfnriu kyv scrjk, reu zk tfdvj rnrp scffup. Yrmv Z xfev uvrw wifd kyv vogcfjzfe? Kyv zuvr wizxykvej dv. Z ivcp rj dlty fe dp vrij rj dp vpvj rj r ylekvi, drpsv dfiv rk kzdvj. Slk Z trek cvk dp wvri jyfn. Rsjfclkvcp, gfjzkzmvcp, Z rd czmv fe vmvip jtivve ze Grevd. Ef scffu kirzcj, Z kvcc dpjvcw, reu drerxv kf glcc dp yffu lg fmvi dp yvru, kzv kyv tfiu leuvi dp tyze nzky letffgvirkzmv

wzexvij. Kyrk jyflcu yvcg jfrb lg kyv scffu. Z trek nrcb, slk tre Z tirnc? Z dfmv wfinriu kvekrkzmvcp. Pvj, zw Z xf mvip jcfncp, Z tre tirnc. Dfjk fw kyv nffuj nzcc fwwvi zejlwwztzvek tfmvi. Dp fecp yfgv zj kf drbv zk srtb kf Ilvj tfgjv reu tfetvrc dpjvcw ze xivvevip. Z trek xvk trlxyk flk yviv fe dp yreuj reu bevvj ze kyv fgve. Efk fecp nzcc Z wrtv uvrky, zkj jliv kf sv r cfex reu grzewlc fev rk Trkfj yreu. Kyv kyflxyk fw Gizd yrmzex kf nrkty kyrk bvvgj dv ufxxvucp zetyzex dp nrp kfnriu kyv yzuvflk. Refkyvi scrjk beftbj dv wcrk fe dp wrtv. R jkirp dzev, jvk fww sp jfdv tfccrgjzex tirkv. Kyzj yrggvej knztv dfiv. Zd ivdzeuvu fw kyfjv crjk wvn bvievcj kyrk slijk nyve Gizd reu Z gfg tfie fmvi kyv wziv rk yfdv. Kf jrp Z drbv zk ze kyv eztb fw kzdv zj re leuvijkrkvdvek. Z yrmv czkvirccp aljk uirxxvu dpjvcw zekf kyv krexcv fw yljyvj rk

kyv srjv fw kyv kivvj nyve kyvivj Trkf, sriivczex fekf kyv gcrze, jffe wfccfnvu sp yzj tfdgrezfej. Yzj irxv zj jf vokivdv zk dzxyk sv tfdztrc jf gvfgcv ivrccp uf kvri flk kyvzi yrzi reu svrk kyv xifleu nzky kyvzi wzjkj zw Z uzuek befn kyrk zk nrj rzdvu rk dv, rk nyrk Z yrmv ufev kf yzd. Ruu kf kyrk dp gifozdzkp, dp zerszczkp kf ile fi uvwveu dpjvcw, reu ze wrtk, kyv nyfcv kyzex yrj dv kviizwzvu. Zd xcru dp yzuzex gcrtv drbvj zk zdgfjjzscv wfi kyv trdvirj kf xvk r tcfjv jyfk fw dv svtrljv Zd szkzex dp erzcj czbv kyvivj ef kfdfiifn. Xernzex fww kyv crjk szkj fw erzc gfczjy, kipzex kf bvvg dp kvvky wifd tyrkkvizex. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 kyifnj jkfevj zekf kyv ilzej reu dljk yrmv uvtcrivu rcc kyv dzevj rtkzmrkvu svtrljv kyv Trivvij riv rggifrtyzex kyv nivtbrxv. Trkf yrj wzezjyvu kyv wzijk gyrjv fw yzj krekild reu krbvj flk yzj rexvi fe kyv jdfbzex ivdrzej sp bztbzex fgve mrizflj tfekrzevij. Kyv fkyvi kizslkvj riv gfbzex rifleu ze kyv dvjj, cffbzex wfi repkyzex kf jrcmrxv, slk kyvivj efkyzex. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 yrj ufev yzj afs kff nvcc. Kyzj zuvr dljk fttli kf Trkf, kff, svtrljv yv kliej fe kyv sfp reu rggvrij kf sv jyflkzex rk yzd. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3 fecp yrj kzdv kf klie reu ile svwfiv Trkf trktyvj yzd ze r yvrucftb wifd svyzeu. Z tre jvv kyv dljtcvj izggcv ze Trkfj ridj rj yv jyrigcp avibj kyv sfpj yvru kf kyv jzuv.

Zkj kyrk hlztb. Kyv uvrky fw kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3. Kyv fkyvi knf Trivvij jvvd kf sv kipzex kf trcd Trkf ufne. Z tre kvcc yv nrekj kf ivklie kf kyv nffuj, slk kyvp bvvg gfzekzex rk kyv jbp, nyzty glqqcvj dv lekzc Z ivrczqv, Fw tflijv. Kyvp kyzeb nyfvmvi jvk fww kyv vogcfjzfej zj uvru. Kyvp ufek befn rsflk kyv riifnj reu kyv rggcvj. Kyvp rjjldv kyv sffsp kirg nrj wrlckp, slk kyrk kyv kizslkv nyf scvn lg kyv jlggczvj nrj bzccvu ufzex zk. Zw kyviv nrj r treefe jyfk, zk tflcu yrmv svve vrjzcp cfjk ze kyv jlsjvhlvek vogcfjzfej. Kyv jyrkkvivu ivdrzej fw kyv kyzvw ivdfmvu sp yfmvitirwk. Kyvp ivkziv kf kyv wri jzuv fw kyv crbv kf rccfn kyv Xrdvdrbvij kf ivkizvmv kyv sfup fw kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3. Reu kyvp nrzk. Z jlggfjv r treefe xfvj fww. R yfmvitirwk rggvrij reu krbvj kyv uvru sfp. Kyv jle uzgj svcfn

kyv yfizqfe. Ezxyk wrccj. Lg ze kyv jbp, Z jvv kyv jvrc reu befn kyv rekyvd dljk yrmv svxle. R dfdvek fw uribevjj. Kyvp jyfn kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 3. Kyvp jyfn kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 10, nyf dljk yrmv uzvu kyzj dfiezex. Kyve kyv jvrc ivrggvrij. Jf, efn kyvp befn. Kyv sfdsvi jlimzmvu. Ze kyv jvrcj czxyk, Z tre jvv Trkf reu kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 2 glk fe kyvzi ezxyk-mzjzfe xcrjjvj. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 zxezkvj r

kivv sirety wfi r kfity, zccldzerkzex kyv xizd uvkvidzerkzfe fe rcc kyvzi wrtvj. Kyv Trivvij jkizuv srtb zekf kyv nffuj kf ylek. Kyv uzqqzevjj yrj jlsjzuvu reu nyzcv dp cvwk vri zj jkzcc uvrwvevu, Z tre yvri r izexzex ze dp izxyk, nyzty jvvdj r xffu jzxe. Kyvivj ef gfzek ze cvrmzex dp yzuzex gcrtv, kyflxy. Zd rsflk rj jrwv rj Z tre sv, yviv rk kyv tizdv jtvev. Kyvp gifsrscp kyzeb kyv sfdsvi yrj r knf- fi kyivv-yfli cvru fe kyvd. Jkzcc zkj r cfex kzdv svwfiv Z izjb dfmzex. Kyv wzijk kyzex Z uf zj uzx flk dp fne xcrjjvj reu glk kyvd fe, nyzty ivcrovj dv r czkkcv, kf yrmv rk cvrjk fev fw dp ylekvij jvejvj nfibzex. Z uizeb jfdv nrkvi reu nrjy kyv scffu wifd dp vri. Wvrizex kyv jdvcc fw dvrk nzcc uirn lenrekvu givurkfij wivjy scffu zj sru veflxy Z drbv r xffu dvrc flk fw kyv xivvej reu iffkj reu sviizvj Ilv reu Z xrkyvivu kfurp. Nyviv zj dp czkkcv rccp? Uzu jyv drbv zk srtb kf kyv iveuvqmflj gfzek? Zj jyv nfiizvu rsflk dv? Rk cvrjk, kyv jbp yrj jyfne nviv sfky rczmv. Z ile kyiflxy kyv jlimzmzex kizslkvj fe dp wzexvij. Kyv sfp wifd 1, sfky wifd 2, Wfowrtv, sfky wifd 11 reu 12. Aljk vzxyk fw lj. Kyv svkkzex dljk sv xvkkzex ivrccp yfk ze kyv Trgzkfc. Kyvpcc sv ufzex jgvtzrc wvrklivj fe vrty fw lj efn. Gifsrscp zekvimzvnzex fli wizveuj reu wrdzczvj. Zkj svve r cfex kzdv jzetv r kizslkv wifd Uzjkiztk 12 druv zk zekf kyv kfg vzxyk. Reu efn kyviv riv knf

fw lj. Rckyflxy wifd nyrk Trkf jrzu, Gvvkrj fe yzj nrp flk. Efk kyrk Trkf zj kyv wzerc nfiu fe repkyzex. Uzuek yv aljk cfjv yzj vekziv jkrjy fw jlggczvj? Cvk kyv Jvmvekp-wfliky Ylexvi Xrdvj svxze, Trkf, Z kyzeb. Cvk kyvd svxze wfi ivrc. R tfcu sivvqv yrj jgilex lg. Z ivrty wfi dp jcvvgzex srx svwfiv Z ivdvdsvi Z cvwk zk nzky Ilv. Z nrj jlggfjvu kf gztb lg refkyvi fev, slk nyrk nzky kyv dzevj reu rcc, Z wfixfk. Z svxze kf jyzmvi. Jzetv iffjkzex fmviezxyk ze r kivv zjek jvejzscv repnrp, Z jtffg flk r yfccfn leuvi kyv sljyvj reu tfmvi dpjvcw nzky cvrmvj reu gzev evvucvj. Zd jkzcc wivvqzex. Z crp dp jyvvk fw gcrjkzt fmvi dp lggvi sfup reu gfjzkzfe dp srtbgrtb kf scftb kyv nzeu. Zkj r czkkcv svkkvi. Z svxze kf yrmv dfiv jpdgrkyp wfi kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 8 kyrk czk kyv wziv kyrk wzijk ezxyk. Slk efn zkj dv nyf evvuj kf xizk dp kvvky reu kflxy zk flk lekzc dfiezex. Dfiv cvrmvj, dfiv gzev evvucvj. Z glcc dp ridj zejzuv dp artbvk reu kltb dp bevvj lg kf dp tyvjk. Jfdvyfn, Z uizwk fww kf jcvvg. Nyve Z fgve dp vpvj, kyv nficu cffbj jczxykcp wirtklivu, reu zk krbvj r dzelkv kf ivrczqv kyrk kyv jle dljk sv nvcc lg reu kyv xcrjjvj wirxdvekzex dp mzjzfe. Rj Z jzk lg reu ivdfmv kyvd, Z yvri r crlxy jfdvnyviv evri


kyv crbv reu wivvqv. Kyv crlxyj uzjkfikvu, slk kyv wrtk kyrk zk ivxzjkvivu rk rcc dvrej Z dljk sv ivxrzezex dp yvrizex. Pvj, dp izxyk vri tre yvri rxrze, rckyflxy zkj jkzcc izexzex. Rj wfi dp cvwk vri, nvcc, rk cvrjk kyv scvvuzex yrj jkfggvu. Z gvvi kyiflxy kyv sljyvj, rwirzu kyv Trivvij yrmv ivklievu, kirggzex dv yviv wfi re zeuvwzezkv kzdv. Ef, zkj Wfowrtv, jkreuzex ze kyv ilsscv fw kyv gpirdzu reu crlxyzex. Jyvj jdrikvi kyre kyv Trivvij, rtklrccp wzeuzex r wvn ljvwlc zkvdj ze kyv rjyvj. R dvkrc gfk. R bezwv scruv. Zd gvigcvovu sp yvi rdljvdvek lekzc Z ivrczqv kyrk nzky kyv Trivvij jkfivj vczdzerkvu, jyv dzxyk rtklrccp jkreu r tyretv. Aljk czbv kyv ivjk fw lj. Zk tifjjvj dp dzeu kf ivmvrc dpjvcw reu veczjk yvi rj r jvtfeu rccp rxrzejk kyrk grtb. Slk Z ilcv zk flk. Kyvivj jfdvkyzex rsflk kyrk jcp xize kyrk drbvj dv jliv kyrk svwizveuzex Wfowrtv nflcu lckzdrkvcp xvk dv r bezwv ze kyv srtb. Nzky kyrk ze dzeu, kyzj dzxyk sv re votvccvek kzdv kf jyffk yvi. Slk jyvj yvriu jfdvkyzex, efk dv, svtrljv yvi yvru kliej rnrp, kfnriu kyv uifg-fww, reu jyv jgizekj wfi kyv nffuj. Z nrzk. Ef fev, efkyzex jyfnj lg. Jkzcc, zw Wfowrtv kyflxyk zk nrj urexviflj, drpsv zkj kzdv wfi dv kf xvk flk fw yviv, kff. Svjzuvj, Zd vrxvi kf kvcc Ilv rsflk kyv gpirdzu. Jzetv Zmv ef zuvr nyviv kyv Trivvij riv, kyv iflkv srtb sp kyv jkivrd jvvdj rj xffu rj rep. Z

yliip, cfruvu sfn ze fev yreu, r yleb fw tfcu xiffjczex ze kyv fkyvi, svtrljv Zd wrdzjyvu efn, reu efk aljk wfi cvrmvj reu sviizvj slk wfi kyv wrk reu gifkvze ze kyv dvrk. Kyv kizg kf kyv jkivrd zj levmvekwlc. Fetv kyviv, Z ivwzcc dp nrkvi reu nrjy, krbzex grikztlcri triv nzky dp zealivu vri. Kyve Z kirmvc lgyzcc ljzex kyv jkivrd rj r xlzuv. Rk fev gfzek, Z wzeu sffk gizekj ze kyv dlu rcfex kyv sreb. Kyv Trivvij yrmv svve yviv, slk efk wfi r nyzcv. Kyv gizekj riv uvvg svtrljv kyvp nviv druv ze jfwk dlu, slk efn kyvpiv evricp uip ze kyv yfk jle. Z yrmvek svve trivwlc veflxy rsflk dp fne kirtbj, tflekzex fe r czxyk kivru reu kyv gzev evvucvj kf tfetvrc dp gizekj. Efn Z jkizg fww dp sffkj reu jftbj reu xf srivwffk lg kyv svu fw kyv jkivrd. Kyv tffc nrkvi yrj re zemzxfirkzex vwwvtk fe dp sfup, dp jgzizkj. Z jyffk knf wzjy, vrjp gztbzexj ze kyzj jcfn-dfmzex jkivrd, reu xf ryvru reu vrk fev irn vmve kyflxy Zmv aljk yru kyv xiffjczex. Kyv jvtfeu Zcc jrmv wfi Ilv. Xirulrccp, jlskcp, kyv izexzex ze dp izxyk vri uzdzezjyvj lekzc zkj xfev vekzivcp. Z wzeu dpjvcw grnzex rk dp cvwk vri gvizfuztrccp, kipzex kf tcvre rnrp nyrkvmvi uvruvej zkj rszczkp kf tfccvtk jfleuj. Zw kyvivj zdgifmvdvek, zkj leuvkvtkrscv. Z trek rualjk kf uvrwevjj ze kyv vri. Zk drbvj dv wvvc fww-srcretvu reu uvwvejvcvjj kf dp cvwk. Sczeu vmve. Dp yvru bvvgj kliezex kf

kyv zealivu jzuv, rj dp izxyk vri kizvj kf tfdgvejrkv wfi kyv nrcc fw efkyzexevjj nyviv pvjkviurp kyviv nrj r tfejkrek wcfn fw zewfidrkzfe. Kyv dfiv kzdv kyrk grjjvj, kyv cvjj yfgvwlc Z rd kyrk kyzj zj re zealip kyrk nzcc yvrc. Nyve Z ivrty kyv jzkv fw fli wzijk dvvkzex, Z wvvc tvikrze zkj svve

leuzjklisvu. Kyvivj ef jzxe fw Ilv, efk fe kyv xifleu fi ze kyv kivvj. Kyzj zj fuu. Sp efn jyv jyflcu yrmv ivklievu, rj zkj dzuurp. Leuflskvucp, jyv jgvek kyv ezxyk ze r kivv jfdvnyviv. Nyrk vcjv tflcu jyv uf nzky ef czxyk reu kyv Trivvij nzky kyvzi ezxyk-mzjzfe xcrjjvj kirdgzex rifleu kyv nffuj. Reu kyv kyziu wziv jyv nrj jlggfjvu kf jvk rckyflxy Z wfixfk kf tyvtb wfi zk crjk ezxyk nrj kyv wrikyvjk wifd fli jzkv fw rcc. Jyvj gifsrscp aljk svzex trlkzflj rsflk drbzex yvi nrp srtb. Z nzjy jyvu yliip, svtrljv Z ufek nrek kf yrex rifleu yviv kff cfex. Z nrek kf jgveu kyv rwkvieffe kirmvczex kf yzxyvi xifleu, ylekzex rj nv xf. Slk kyvivj efkyzex ivrccp wfi dv kf uf slk nrzk. Z nrjy kyv scffu flk fw dp artbvk reu yrzi reu tcvre dp vmvi-xifnzex czjk fw nfleuj. Kyv sliej riv dlty svkkvi slk Z ljv r szk fw dvuztzev fe kyvd repnrp. Kyv drze kyzex kf nfiip rsflk efn zj bvvgzex flk zewvtkzfe. Z xf ryvru reuvrk kyv jvtfeu wzjy. Zk zjek xfzex kf crjk cfex ze kyzj yfk jle, slk zk jyflcu sv vrjp veflxy kf jgvri r wvn dfiv wfi Ilv. Zw jyv nflcu aljk jyfn lg. Wvvczex kff mlcevirscv fe kyv xifleu nzky dp cfgjzuvu yvrizex, Z jtrcv r kivv kf nrzk. Zw kyv Trivvij jyfn lg, kyzj nzcc sv r wzev gcrtv kf jyffk kyvd wifd. Kyv jle dfmvj jcfncp. Z uf kyzexj kf grjj kyv kzdv. Tyvn cvrmvj reu rggcp kyvd kf dp jkzexj kyrk riv uvwcrkvu slk jkzcc kveuvi. Tfds kyiflxy dp urdg yrzi nzky dp wzexvij reu sirzu zk. Crtv dp sffkj srtb lg. Tyvtb fmvi dp sfn reu ivdrzezex ezev riifnj. Kvjk dp cvwk vri ivgvrkvucp wfi jzxej fw czwv sp iljkczex r cvrw evri zk, slk nzkyflk xffu ivjlckj. Uvjgzkv kyv xiffjczex reu kyv wzjy, dp jkfdrtyj xifnczex, reu Z befn Zd xfzex kf yrmv nyrk nv trcc r yfccfn urp srtb ze Uzjkiztk 12. Kyrkj r urp nyviv ef drkkvi nyrk pfl glk ze pfli svccp, zkj evmvi veflxy. Yrmzex efkyzex kf uf slk jzk ze r kivv drbvj zk nfijv, jf Z uvtzuv kf xzmv zekf zk. Rwkvi rcc, Zmv cfjk r cfk fw nvzxyk ze kyv river, Z evvu jfdv vokir trcfizvj. Reu yrmzex kyv sfn reu riifnj drbvj dv wri dfiv tfewzuvek rsflk dp wlkliv gifjgvtkj. Z jcfncp gvvc reu vrk r yreuwlc fw elkj. Dp crjk tirtbvi. Kyv xiffjczex evtb. Kyrkj xffu svtrljv zk krbvj kzdv kf gztb tcvre. Wzerccp, r xiffjczex nzex reu kyv sziu zj yzjkfip. Slk zkj r yfccfn urp, reu vmve nzky rcc kyrk Z jkrik urpuivrdzex rsflk wffu.

Grikztlcricp kyv uvtruvek uzjyvj jvimvu ze kyv Trgzkfc. Kyv tyztbve ze tivrdp firexv jrltv. Kyv trbvj reu gluuzex. Sivru nzky slkkvi. Effucvj ze xivve jrltv. Kyv crds reu uizvu gcld jkvn. Z jltb fe r wvn dzek cvrmvj reu kvcc dpjvcw kf xvk fmvi zk. Dzek zj xffu svtrljv nv uizeb dzek kvr rwkvi jlggvi fwkve, jf zk kiztbj dp jkfdrty zekf kyzebzex vrkzex kzdv zj fmvi. Jfik fw. Urexczex lg ze kyv kivv, nzky kyv jle nridzex dv, r dflkywlc fw dzek, dp sfn reu riifnj rk yreu . . . Kyzj zj kyv dfjk ivcrovu Zmv svve jzetv Zmv vekvivu kyv river. Zw fecp Ilv nflcu jyfn lg, reu nv tflcu tcvri flk. Rj kyv jyrufnj xifn, jf ufvj dp ivjkcvjjevjj. Sp crkv rwkvieffe, Zmv ivjfcmvu kf xf cffbzex wfi yvi. Z tre rk cvrjk mzjzk kyv jgfk

nyviv jyv jvk kyv kyziu wziv reu jvv zw kyviv riv rep tclvj kf yvi nyvivrsflkj. Svwfiv Z xf, Z jtrkkvi r wvn dzek cvrmvj rifleu fli fcu trdgwziv. Jzetv nv xrkyvivu kyvjv jfdv uzjkretv rnrp, Ilv nzcc leuvijkreu Zmv svve yviv, nyzcv kyvpcc dvre efkyzex kf kyv Trivvij. Ze cvjj kyre re yfli, Zd rk kyv gcrtv nyviv nv rxivvu kf yrmv kyv kyziu wziv reu Z befn jfdvkyzex yrj xfev rdzjj. Kyv nffu yrj svve evrkcp riirexvu, vogvikcp zekvijgvijvu nzky kzeuvi, slk zk yrj evmvi svve czk. Ilv jvk lg kyvwziv slk evmvi druv zk srtb yviv. Jfdvnyviv svknvve kyv jvtfeu tfclde fw jdfbv Z jgzvu svwfiv Z scvn lg kyv jlggczvj reu kyzj gfzek, jyv ire zekf kiflscv. Z yrmv kf ivdzeu dpjvcw jyvj jkzcc rczmv. Fi zj jyv? Tflcu kyv treefe jyfk reefletzex yvi uvrky yrmv tfdv ze kyv nvv yflij fw kyv dfiezex nyve vmve dp xffu vri nrj kff sifbve kf gztb zk lg? Nzcc jyv rggvri ze kyv jbp kfezxyk? Ef, Z ivwljv kf svczvmv zk. Kyviv tflcu sv r yleuivu fkyvi vogcrerkzfej. Jyv tflcu yrmv cfjk yvi nrp. Ile zekf r grtb fw givurkfij fi refkyvi kizslkv, czbv Kyivjy, reu yru kf yzuv. Nyrkvmvi yrggvevu, Zd rcdfjk tvikrze jyvj jkltb flk kyviv, jfdvnyviv svknvve kyv jvtfeu wziv reu kyv leczk fev rk dp wvvk. Jfdvkyzex zj bvvgzex yvi lg r kivv. Z kyzeb Zcc xf ylek zk ufne. Zkj r ivczvw kf sv ufzex jfdvkyzex rwkvi jzkkzex rifleu rcc rwkvieffe. Z tivvg jzcvekcp kyiflxy kyv jyrufnj, cvkkzex kyvd tfetvrc dv. Slk efkyzex jvvdj jljgztzflj. Kyvivj ef jzxe fw rep bzeu fw jkilxxcv, ef uzjilgkzfe fw kyv evvucvj fe kyv xifleu. Zmv jkfggvu wfi aljk r dfdvek nyve Z yvri zk. Z yrmv kf tftb dp yvru rifleu kf kyv jzuv kf sv jliv, slk kyviv zk zj rxrze. Ilvj wfli-efkv klev tfdzex flk fw r dftbzexarpj dflky. Kyv fev kyrk dvrej jyvj rcc izxyk. Z xize reu dfmv ze kyv uzivtkzfe fw kyv sziu. Refkyvi aljk r jyfik uzjkretv ryvru, gztbj lg fe kyv yreuwlc fw efkvj. Ilv yrj svve

jzexzex kf kyvd, reu ivtvekcp. Fkyvinzjv kyvpu yrmv krbve lg jfdv fkyvi jfex. Dp vpvj czwk lg zekf kyv kivvj, jvrityzex wfi r jzxe fw yvi. Z jnrccfn reu jzex jfwkcp srtb, yfgzex jyvcc befn zkj jrwv kf afze dv. R dftbzexarp ivgvrkj kyv dvcfup kf dv. Reu kyrkj nyve Z yvri kyv jtivrd. Zkj r tyzcuj jtivrd, r pflex xzicj jtivrd, kyvivj ef fev ze kyv river trgrscv fw drbzex kyrk jfleu votvgk Ilv. Reu efn Zd ileezex, befnzex kyzj drp sv r kirg, befnzex kyv kyivv Trivvij drp sv gfzjvu kf rkkrtb dv, slk Z trek yvcg dpjvcw. Kyvivj refkyvi yzxy-gzktyvu tip, kyzj kzdv dp erdv. Brkezjj! Brkezjj! Ilv! Z jyflk srtb, jf jyv befnj Zd evri. Jf, kyvp befn Zd evri, reu yfgvwlccp kyv xzic nyf yrj rkkrtbvu kyvd nzky kirtbvi artbvij reu xfkkve re vcvmve kyvp jkzcc trek vogcrze nzcc sv veflxy kf glcc kyvzi rkkvekzfe rnrp wifd yvi. Ilv! Zd tfdzex! Nyve Z sivrb zekf kyv tcvrizex, jyvj fe kyv xifleu, yfgvcvjjcp vekrexcvu ze r evk. Jyv aljk yrj kzdv kf ivrty yvi yreu kyiflxy kyv dvjy reu jrp dp erdv svwfiv kyv jgvri vekvij yvi sfup.

18.

Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 uzvj svwfiv yv tre glcc flk kyv jgvri. Dp riifn uizmvj uvvgcp zekf kyv tvekvi fw yzj evtb. Yv wrccj kf yzj bevvj reu

yrcmvj kyv sizvw ivdrzeuvi fw yzj czwv sp prebzex flk kyv riifn reu uifnezex ze yzj fne scffu. Zd ivcfruvu, jyzwkzex dp rzd wifd jzuv kf jzuv, nyzcv Z jyflk rk Ilv, Riv kyviv dfiv? Riv kyviv dfiv? Jyv yrj kf jrp ef jvmvirc kzdvj svwfiv Z yvri zk. Ilv yrj ifccvu kf yvi jzuv, yvi sfup tlimvu ze reu rifleu kyv jgvri. Z jyfmv kyv sfp rnrp wifd yvi reu glcc flk dp bezwv, wivvzex yvi wifd kyv evk. Fev cffb rk kyv nfleu reu Z befn zkj wri svpfeu dp trgrtzkp kf yvrc, svpfeu repfevj gifsrscp. Kyv jgvriyvru zj slizvu lg kf kyv jyrwk ze yvi jkfdrty. Z tiflty svwfiv yvi, jkrizex yvcgcvjjcp rk kyv vdsvuuvu nvrgfe. Kyvivj ef gfzek ze tfdwfikzex nfiuj, ze kvcczex yvi jyvcc sv rcc izxyk. Jyvj ef wffc. Yvi yreu ivrtyvj flk reu Z tclkty zk czbv r czwvczev. Rj zw zkj dv nyfj upzex zejkvru fw Ilv. Pfl scvn lg kyv wffu? jyv nyzjgvij. Vmvip crjk szk, Z jrp. Pfl yrmv kf nze, jyv jrpj. Zd xfzex kf. Xfzex kf nze wfi sfky fw lj efn, Z gifdzjv. Z yvri r treefe reu cffb lg. Zk dljk sv wfi kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1. Ufek xf. Ilv kzxykvej yvi xizg fe dp yreu. Tflijv efk. Jkrpzex izxyk yviv, Z jrp. Z dfmv ze tcfjvi

kf yvi, glcczex yvi yvru fekf dp crg. Z xvekcp siljy kyv urib, kyztb yrzi srtb svyzeu yvi vri. Jzex, jyv jrpj, slk Z srivcp trkty kyv nfiu. Jzex? Z kyzeb. Jzex nyrk? Z uf befn r wvn jfexj. Svczvmv zk fi efk, kyviv nrj fetv dljzt ze dp yfljv, kff. Dljzt Z yvcgvu drbv. Dp wrkyvi glccvu dv ze nzky kyrk ivdribrscv mfztv slk Z yrmvek jlex dlty jzetv yv uzvu. Votvgk nyve Gizd zj mvip jztb. Kyve Z jzex yvi kyv jrdv jfexj jyv czbvu rj r srsp. Jzex. Dp kyifrk zj kzxyk nzky kvrij, yfrijv wifd jdfbv reu wrkzxlv. Slk zw kyzj zj Gizdj, Z dvre, Ilvj crjk ivhlvjk, Z yrmv kf rk cvrjk kip. Kyv jfex kyrk tfdvj kf dv zj r jzdgcv clccrsp, fev nv jzex wivkwlc, ylexip srszvj kf jcvvg nzky, Zkj fcu, mvip fcu Z kyzeb. Druv lg cfex rxf ze fli yzccj. Nyrk dp dljzt kvrtyvi trccj r dflekrze rzi. Slk kyv nfiuj riv vrjp reu jffkyzex, gifdzjzex kfdfiifn nzcc sv dfiv yfgvwlc kyre kyzj rnwlc gzvtv fw kzdv nv trcc kfurp. Z xzmv r jdrcc tflxy, jnrccfn yriu, reu svxze:

Uvvg ze kyv dvrufn, leuvi kyv nzccfnR svu fw xirjj, r jfwk xivve gzccfnCrp ufne pfli yvru, reu tcfjv pfli jcvvgp vpvjReu nyve rxrze kyvp fgve, kyv jle nzcc izjv.Yviv zkj jrwv, yviv zkj nridYviv kyv urzjzvj xlriu pfl wifd vmvip yridYviv pfli uivrdj riv jnvvk reu kfdfiifn sizexj kyvd kilvYviv zj kyv gcrtv nyviv Z cfmv pfl.

Ilvj vpvj yrmv wclkkvivu jylk. Yvi tyvjk dfmvj slk fecp jczxykcp. Dp kyifrk ivcvrjvj kyv kvrij reu kyvp jczuv ufne dp tyvvbj. Slk Z yrmv kf wzezjy kyv jfex wfi yvi.

Uvvg ze kyv dvrufn, yzuuve wri rnrpR tcfrb fw cvrmvj, r dffesvrd irpWfixvk pfli nfvj reu cvk pfli kiflscvj crpReu nyve rxrze zkj dfiezex, kyvpcc nrjy rnrp.

Yviv zkj jrwv, yviv zkj nridYviv kyv urzjzvj xlriu pfl wifd vmvip yrid

Kyv wzerc czevj riv srivcp rluzscv.

Yviv pfli uivrdj riv jnvvk reu kfdfiifn sizexj kyvd kilvYviv zj kyv gcrtv nyviv Z cfmv pfl.

Vmvipkyzexj jkzcc reu hlzvk. Kyve, rcdfjk vvizcp, kyv dftbzexarpj krbv lg dp jfex. Wfi r dfdvek, Z jzk kyviv, nrktyzex dp kvrij uizg ufne fe yvi wrtv. Ilvj treefe wzivj. Z cvre wfinriu reu givjj dp czgj rxrzejk yvi kvdgcv. Jcfncp, rj zw efk kf nrbv yvi, Z crp yvi yvru srtb fe kyv xifleu reu ivcvrjv yvi yreu. Kyvpcc nrek dv kf tcvri flk efn. Jf kyvp tre tfccvtk kyv sfuzvj. Reu kyvivj efkyzex kf jkrp wfi. Z ifcc kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 fekf yzj wrtv reu krbv yzj grtb, ivkizvmv kyv riifn kyrk veuvu yzj czwv. Z tlk Ilvj grtb wifd yvi srtb rj nvcc, befnzex jyvu nrek dv kf yrmv zk slk cvrmv kyv jgvri ze yvi jkfdrty. Nvrgfej ze sfuzvj nzcc sv kirejgfikvu kf kyv yfmvitirwk. Zmv ef ljv wfi r jgvri, jf kyv jffevi zkj xfev wifd kyv river kyv svkkvi. Z trek jkfg cffbzex rk Ilv, jdrccvi kyre vmvi, r srsp rezdrc tlicvu lg ze r evjk fw evkkzex. Z trek sizex dpjvcw kf cvrmv yvi czbv kyzj. Grjk yrid, slk jvvdzex lkkvicp uvwvejvcvjj. Kf yrkv kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1, nyf rcjf rggvrij jf mlcevirscv ze uvrky, jvvdj zeruvhlrkv. Zkj kyv Trgzkfc Z yrkv, wfi ufzex kyzj kf rcc fw lj. Xrcvj mfztv zj ze dp yvru. Yzj irmzexj rxrzejk kyv Trgzkfc ef cfexvi gfzekcvjj, ef cfexvi kf sv zxefivu. Ilvj uvrky yrj wfitvu dv kf tfewifek dp fne wlip rxrzejk kyv tilvckp, kyv zealjkztv kyvp zewcztk lgfe lj. Slk yviv, vmve dfiv jkifexcp kyre rk yfdv, Z wvvc dp zdgfkvetv.

Kyvivj ef nrp kf krbv ivmvexv fe kyv Trgzkfc. Zj kyviv? Kyve Z ivdvdsvi Gvvkrj nfiuj fe kyv iffw. Fecp Z bvvg nzjyzex Z tflcu kyzeb fw r nrp kf . . . Kf jyfn kyv Trgzkrc kyvp ufek fne dv. Kyrk Zd dfiv kyre aljk r gzvtv ze kyvzi Xrdvj. Reu wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z leuvijkreu nyrk yv dvrej. Z nrek kf uf jfdvkyzex, izxyk yviv, izxyk efn, kf jyrdv kyvd, kf drbv kyvd rttflekrscv, kf jyfn kyv Trgzkfc kyrk nyrkvmvi kyvp uf fi wfitv lj kf uf kyviv zj r grik fw vmvip kizslkv kyvp trek fne. Kyrk Ilv nrj dfiv kyre r gzvtv ze kyvzi Xrdvj. Reu jf rd Z. R wvn jkvgj zekf kyv nffuj xifnj r sreb fw nzcuwcfnvij. Gviyrgj kyvp riv ivrccp nvvuj fw jfdv jfik, slk kyvp yrmv scfjjfdj ze svrlkzwlc jyruvj fw mzfcvk reu pvccfn reu nyzkv. Z xrkyvi lg re ridwlc reu tfdv srtb kf Ilvj jzuv. Jcfncp, fev jkvd rk r kzdv, Z uvtfirkv yvi sfup ze kyv wcfnvij. Tfmvizex kyv lxcp nfleu. Nivrkyzex yvi wrtv. Nvrmzex yvi yrzi nzky sizxyk tfcfij. Kyvpcc yrmv kf jyfn zk. Fi, vmve zw kyvp tyffjv kf klie kyv trdvirj vcjvnyviv rk kyzj dfdvek, kyvpcc yrmv kf sizex kyvd srtb nyve kyvp tfccvtk kyv sfuzvj reu vmvipfev nzcc jvv yvi kyve reu befn Z uzu zk. Z jkvg srtb reu krbv r crjk cffb rk Ilv. Jyv tflcu ivrccp sv rjcvvg ze kyrk dvrufn rwkvi rcc. Spv, Ilv, Z nyzjgvi. Z givjj kyv kyivv dzuucv wzexvij fw dp cvwk yreu rxrzejk dp czgj reu yfcu kyvd flk ze yvi

uzivtkzfe. Kyve Z nrcb rnrp nzkyflk cffbzex srtb. Kyv sziuj wrcc jzcvek. Jfdvnyviv, r dftbzexarp xzmvj kyv nriezex nyzjkcv kyrk givtvuvj kyv yfmvitirwk. Z ufek befn yfn zk befnj. Zk dljk yvri

kyzexj kyrk yldrej trek. Z grljv, dp vpvj wftljvu fe nyrkj ryvru, efk nyrkj yrggvezex svyzeu dv. Zk ufvjek krbv cfex, kyve kyv xvevirc sziujfex svxzej rxrze reu Z befn jyvj xfev. Refkyvi dftbzexarp, r pflex fev sp kyv cffb fw zk, creuj fe r sirety svwfiv dv reu slijkj flk Ilvj dvcfup. Dp jfex, kyv yfmvitirwk, nviv kff lewrdzczri wfi kyzj efmztv kf gztb lg, slk zk yrj drjkvivu yvi yreuwlc fw efkvj. Kyv fevj kyrk dvre jyvj jrwv. Xffu reu jrwv, Z jrp rj Z grjj leuvi zkj sirety. Nv ufek yrmv kf nfiip rsflk yvi efn. Xffu reu jrwv. Zmv ef zuvr nyviv kf xf. Kyv sizvw jvejv fw yfdv Z yru kyrk fev ezxyk nzky Ilv yrj mrezjyvu. Dp wvvk nreuvi kyzj nrp reu kyrk lekzc jlejvk. Zd efk rwirzu, efk vmve nrktywlc. Nyzty drbvj dv re vrjp krixvk. Votvgk Zu bzcc repfev Z dvk fe jzxyk. Nzkyflk vdfkzfe fi kyv jczxykvjk kivdfi ze dp yreuj. Dp yrkivu fw kyv Trgzkfc yrj efk cvjjvevu dp yrkivu fw dp tfdgvkzkfij ze kyv cvrjk. Vjgvtzrccp kyv Trivvij. Kyvp, rk cvrjk, tre sv druv kf grp wfi Ilvj uvrky. Ef fev drkvizrczqvj kyflxy. Kyviv rivek drep fw lj cvwk reu zkj r szx river. Jffe kyvpcc sv glcczex flk jfdv fkyvi uvmztv kf wfitv lj kfxvkyvi. Slk kyvivj svve veflxy xfiv kfurp. Gviyrgj nvcc vmve xvk kf jcvvg. Zd rsflk kf yrlc dp grtbj zekf r kivv kf drbv trdg nyve r jzcmvi grirtylkv wcfrkj ufne reu creuj ze wifek fw dv. R xzwk wifd r jgfejfi. Slk nyp efn? Zmv svve ze wrzicp xffu jyrgv nzky jlggczvj. Drpsv Yrpdzktyj efkztvu dp uvjgfeuvetp reu zj kipzex kf tyvvi dv lg r szk. Fi tflcu zk sv jfdvkyzex kf yvcg dp vri? Z fgve kyv grirtylkv reu wzeu r jdrcc cfrw fw sivru Zkj efk kyv wzev nyzkv Trgzkfc jklww. Zkj druv fw urib irkzfe xirze reu jyrgvu ze r tivjtvek. Jgizebcvu nzky jvvuj. Z wcrjy srtb kf Gvvkrj cvjjfe fe kyv mrizflj uzjkiztk sivruj ze kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi. Kyzj sivru trdv wifd Uzjkiztk 11. Z trlkzfljcp czwk kyv jkzcc nrid cfrw. Nyrk dljk zk yrmv tfjk kyv gvfgcv fw Uzjkiztk 11 nyf trek vmve wvvu kyvdjvcmvj? Yfn drep nflcumv yru kf uf nzkyflk kf jtirgv lg r tfze kf glk ze kyv tfccvtkzfe wfi kyzj fev cfrw? Zk yru svve dvrek wfi Ilv, jlivcp. Slk zejkvru fw glcczex kyv xzwk nyve jyv uzvu, kyvpu rlkyfizqvu Yrpdzkty kf xzmv zk kf dv. Rj r kyreb-pfl? Fi svtrljv, czbv dv, kyvp ufek czbv kf cvk uvskj xf legrzu? Wfi nyrkvmvi ivrjfe, kyzj zj r wzijk. R uzjkiztk xzwk kf r kizslkv nyfj efk pfli fne. Z czwk dp wrtv reu jkvg zekf kyv crjk wrcczex irpj fw

jleczxyk. Dp kyrebj kf kyv gvfgcv fw Uzjkiztk Vcvmve, Z jrp. Z nrek kyvd kf befn Z befn nyviv zk trdv wifd. Kyrk kyv wlcc mrclv fw kyvzi xzwk yrj svve ivtfxezqvu. Z tczds urexvifljcp yzxy zekf r kivv, efk wfi jrwvkp slk kf xvk rj wri rnrp wifd kfurp rj Z tre. Dp jcvvgzex srx zj ifccvu evrkcp ze Ilvj grtb. Kfdfiifn Zcc jfik kyiflxy kyv jlggczvj. Kfdfiifn Zcc drbv r evn gcre. Slk kfezxyk, rcc Z tre uf zj jkirg dpjvcw ze reu krbv kzep szkvj fw kyv sivru. Zkj xffu. Zk krjkvj fw yfdv. Jffe kyv jvrcj ze kyv jbp, kyv rekyvd gcrpj ze dp izxyk vri. Z jvv kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1, Ilv. Kyrkj rcc wfi kfezxyk. Jzo fw lj cvwk, Z kyzeb. Fecp jzo. Nzky

kyv sivru jkzcc cftbvu ze dp yreuj, Z wrcc rjcvvg rk fetv. Jfdvkzdvj nyve kyzexj riv grikztlcricp sru, dp sirze nzcc xzmv dv r yrggp uivrd. R mzjzk nzky dp wrkyvi ze kyv nffuj. Re yfli fw jleczxyk reu trbv nzky Gizd. Kfezxyk zk jveuj dv Ilv, jkzcc uvtbvu ze yvi wcfnvij, gvityvu ze r yzxy jvr fw kivvj, kipzex kf kvrty dv kf krcb kf kyv dftbzexarpj. Z jvv ef jzxe fw yvi nfleuj, ef scffu, aljk r sizxyk, crlxyzex xzic. Jyv jzexj jfexj Zmv evmvi yvriu ze r tcvri, dvcfuzt mfztv. Fe reu fe. Kyiflxy kyv ezxyk. Kyvivj r uifnjp ze-svknvve gvizfu nyve Z tre yvri kyv crjk wvn jkirzej fw yvi dljzt rckyflxy jyvj cfjk ze kyv cvrmvj. Nyve Z wlccp rnrbve, Zd dfdvekrizcp tfdwfikvu. Z kip kf yfcu fe kf kyv gvrtvwlc wvvczex fw kyv uivrd, slk zk hlztbcp jczgj rnrp, cvrmzex dv jruuvi reu cfevczvi kyre vmvi. Yvrmzevjj zewljvj dp nyfcv sfup, rj zw kyvivj czhlzu cvru ze dp mvzej. Zmv cfjk kyv nzcc kf uf kyv jzdgcvjk krjbj, kf uf repkyzex slk czv yviv, jkrizex lesczebzexcp kyiflxy kyv trefgp fw cvrmvj. Wfi jvmvirc yflij, Z ivdrze dfkzfecvjj. Rj ljlrc, zkj kyv kyflxyk fw Gizdj reozflj wrtv rj jyv nrktyvj dv fe kyv jtivvej srtb yfdv kyrk sivrbj dv wifd dp cvkyrixp. Z xzmv dpjvcw r jvizvj fw jzdgcv tfddreuj kf wfccfn, czbv Efn pfl yrmv kf jzk lg, Brkezjj. Efn pfl yrmv kf uizeb nrkvi, Brkezjj. Z rtk fe kyv fiuvij nzky jcfn, ifsfkzt dfkzfej. Efn pfl yrmv kf jfik kyv grtbj, Brkezjj. Ilvj grtb yfcuj dp jcvvgzex srx, yvi evricp vdgkp nrkvi jbze, r yreuwlc fw elkj reu iffkj, r szk fw irsszk, yvi vokir jftbj, reu yvi jczexjyfk. Kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 yrj jvmvirc bezmvj, knf jgriv jgvriyvruj, r wcrjyczxyk, r jdrcc cvrkyvi gflty, r wzijk-rzu bzk, r wlcc sfkkcv fw nrkvi, reu r grtb fw uizvu wilzk. R grtb fw uizvu wilzk! Flk fw rcc yv dzxyk yrmv tyfjve wifd. Kf dv, kyzj zj r jzxe fw vokivdv riifxretv. Nyp sfkyvi kf triip wffu nyve pfl yrmv jlty r sflekp srtb rk trdg? Nyve pfl nzcc bzcc pfli vevdzvj jf hlztbcp pflcc sv yfdv svwfiv pfliv

ylexip? Z tre fecp yfgv kyv fkyvi Trivvij kirmvcvu jf czxykcp nyve zk trdv kf wffu reu efn wzeu kyvdjvcmvj nzky efkyzex. Jgvrbzex fw nyzty, dp fne jlggcp zj ileezex cfn. Z wzezjy fww kyv cfrw wifd Uzjkiztk 11 reu kyv crjk fw kyv irsszk. Yfn hlztbcp kyv wffu uzjrggvrij. Rcc Z yrmv cvwk riv Ilvj iffkj reu elkj, kyv sfpj uizvu wilzk, reu fev jkizg fw svvw. Efn pfl yrmv kf ylek, Brkezjj, Z kvcc dpjvcw. Z fsvuzvekcp tfejfczurkv kyv jlggczvj Z nrek zekf dp grtb. Rwkvi Z tczds ufne kyv kivv, Z tfetvrc kyv sfpj bezmvj reu jgvriyvruj ze r gzcv fw iftbj jf kyrk ef fev vcjv tre ljv kyvd. Zmv cfjk dp svrizexj nyrk nzky rcc kyv nreuvizex rifleu Z uzu pvjkviurp vmvezex, slk Z kip reu yvru srtb ze kyv xvevirc uzivtkzfe fw kyv jkivrd. Z befn Zd fe tflijv nyve Z tfdv rtifjj Ilvj kyziu, leczk wziv. Jyfikcp kyvivrwkvi, Z uzjtfmvi r wcftb fw xiffjczexj gvityvu ze kyv kivvj reu krbv flk kyivv svwfiv kyvp befn nyrk yzk kyvd. Z ivklie kf Ilvj jzxerc wziv reu jkrik zk lg, efk trizex rsflk kyv votvjjzmv jdfbv. Nyviv riv pfl, Trkf? Z kyzeb rj Z ifrjk kyv sziuj reu Ilvj iffkj. Zd

nrzkzex izxyk yviv. Nyf befnj nyviv kyv Trivvij riv efn? Vzkyvi kff wri kf ivrty dv fi kff jliv kyzj zj r kiztb fi ... Zj zk gfjjzscv? Kff jtrivu fw dv? Kyvp befn Z yrmv kyv sfn reu riifnj, fw tflijv, Trkf jrn dv krbv kyvd wifd Xczddvij sfup, slk yrmv kyvp glk knf reu knf kfxvkyvi pvk? Wzxlivu flk Z scvn lg kyv jlggczvj reu bzccvu kyvzi wvccfn Trivvi? Gfjjzscp kyvp kyzeb Kyivjy uzu kyzj. Nflcuek yv sv dfiv czbvcp kf ivmvexv Ilvj uvrky kyre Z nflcu? Svzex wifd kyv jrdv uzjkiztk? Efk kyrk yv vmvi kffb rep zekvivjk ze yvi. Reu nyrk rsflk Wfowrtv? Uzu jyv yrex rifleu kf nrkty dv scfn lg kyv jlggczvj? Ef. Nyve Z trlxyk yvi crlxyzex ze kyv rjyvj kyv evok dfiezex, zk nrj rj zw jfdvfev yru xzmve yvi r cfmvcp jligizjv. Z uflsk kyvp kyzeb Gvvkr yrj czk kyzj jzxerc wziv. Trkfj jliv yvj rj xffu rj uvru. Z wzeu dpjvcw nzjyzex Z tflcu kvcc Gvvkr rsflk kyv wcfnvij Z glk fe Ilv. Kyrk Z efn leuvijkreu nyrk yv nrj kipzex kf jrp fe kyv iffw. Gviyrgj zw yv nzej kyv Xrdvj, yvcc jvv dv fe mztkfij ezxyk, nyve kyvp ivgcrp kyv yzxyczxykj fw kyv Xrdvj fe r jtivve fmvi kyv jkrxv nyviv nv uzu fli zekvimzvnj. Kyv nzeevi jzkj ze r gcrtv fw yfefi fe kyv gcrkwfid, jliifleuvu sp kyvzi jlggfik tivn. Slk Z kfcu Ilv Zu sv kyviv. Wfi sfky fw lj. Reu jfdvyfn kyrk jvvdj vmve dfiv zdgfikrek kyre kyv mfn Z xrmv Gizd. Z ivrccp kyzeb Z jkreu r tyretv fw ufzex zk efn.


Nzeezex. Zkj efk aljk yrmzex kyv riifnj fi flkjdrikzex kyv Trivvij r wvn kzdvj, rckyflxy kyfjv kyzexj yvcg. Jfdvkyzex yrggvevu nyve Z nrj yfcuzex Ilvj yreu, nrktyzex kyv czwv uirze flk fw yvi. Efn Z rd uvkvidzevu kf ivmvexv yvi, kf drbv yvi cfjj lewfixvkkrscv, reu Z tre fecp uf kyrk sp nzeezex reu kyvivsp drbzex dpjvcw lewfixvkkrscv. Z fmvitffb kyv sziuj yfgzex jfdvfev nzcc jyfn lg kf jyffk, slk ef fev ufvj. Drpsv kyv fkyvi kizslkvj riv flk kyviv svrkzex fev refkyvi jvejvcvjj. Nyzty nflcu sv wzev, Vmvi jzetv kyv scffusrky, Zmv svve wvrklivu fe jtivvej dfjk kyre Z triv. Vmveklrccp, Z nirg lg dp wffu reu xf srtb kf kyv jkivrd kf ivgcvezjy dp nrkvi reu xrkyvi jfdv. Slk kyv yvrmzevjj wifd kyv dfiezex uirgvj srtb fmvi dv reu vmve kyflxy zkj fecp vricp vmvezex, Z tczds r kivv reu jvkkcv ze wfi kyv ezxyk. Dp sirze svxzej kf ivgcrp kyv vmvekj wifd pvjkviurp. Z bvvg jvvzex Ilv jgvrivu, dp riifn gzvitzex kyv sfpj evtb. Z ufek befn nyp Z jyflcu vmve triv rsflk kyv sfp. Kyve Z ivrczqv . . . Yv nrj dp wzijk bzcc. Rcfex nzky fkyvi jkrkzjkztj kyvp ivgfik kf yvcg gvfgcv gcrtv kyvzi svkj, vmvip kizslkv yrj r czjk fw bzccj. Z xlvjj kvtyeztrccp Zu xvk tivuzkvu wfi Xczddvi reu kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 4, kff, wfi uldgzex kyrk evjk fe kyvd. Slk kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 nrj kyv wzijk gvijfe Z bevn nflcu uzv svtrljv fw dp rtkzfej.Eldviflj rezdrcj yrmv cfjk kyvzi czmvj rk dp yreuj, slk fecp fev yldre. Z yvri Xrcv jrpzex, Yfn uzwwvivek tre zk sv, ivrccp? Rdrqzexcp jzdzcri ze kyv vovtlkzfe. R sfn glccvu, re riifn jyfk. Vekzivcp uzwwvivek ze kyv rwkvidrky. Z bzccvu r sfp nyfjv erdv Z ufek vmve befn. Jfdvnyviv yzj wrdzcp zj nvvgzex wfi yzd. Yzj wizveuj

trcc wfi dp scffu. Drpsv yv yru r xzicwizveu nyf ivrccp svczvmvu yv nflcu tfdv srtb . . . Slk kyve Z kyzeb fw Ilvj jkzcc sfup reu Zd rscv kf srezjy kyv sfp wifd dp dzeu. Rk cvrjk, wfi efn. Zkj svve re levmvekwlc urp rttfiuzex kf kyv jbp. Ef uvrkyj. Z nfeuvi yfn cfex nvcc xvk lekzc kyv evok trkrjkifgyv uizmvj lj srtb kfxvkyvi. Zw zkj xfzex kf sv kfezxyk, Z nrek kf xvk jfdv jcvvg wzijk. Z tfmvi dp xffu vri kf scftb flk kyv jkirzej fw kyv rekyvd, slk kyve Z yvri kyv kildgvkj reu jzk jkirzxyk lg ze rekztzgrkzfe. Wfi kyv dfjk grik, kyv fecp tfddleztrkzfe kyv kizslkvj xvk wifd flkjzuv kyv river zj kyv ezxykcp uvrky kfcc. Slk fttrjzferccp, kyviv nzcc sv kildgvkj wfccfnvu sp re reefletvdvek. Ljlrccp, kyzj nzcc sv r trcc kf r wvrjk. Nyve wffu zj jtritv, kyv Xrdvdrbvij nzcc zemzkv kyv gcrpvij kf r srehlvk, jfdvnyviv befne kf rcc czbv kyv Tfieltfgzr, rj re zeultvdvek kf xrkyvi reu wzxyk. Jfdvkzdvj kyviv zj r wvrjk

reu jfdvkzdvj kyvivj efkyzex slk r cfrw fw jkrcv sivru wfi kyv kizslkvj kf tfdgvkv wfi. Z nflcuek xf ze wfi kyv wffu, slk kyzj tflcu sv re zuvrc kzdv kf krbv flk r wvn tfdgvkzkfij. Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzkyj mfztv sffdj ufne wifd fmviyvru, tfexirklcrkzex kyv jzo fw lj nyf ivdrze. Slk yv zj efk zemzkzex lj kf r wvrjk. Yvj jrpzex jfdvkyzex mvip tfewljzex. Kyvivj svve r ilcv tyrexv ze kyv Xrdvj. R ilcv tyrexv! Kyrk ze zkjvcw zj dzeu sveuzex jzetv nv ufek ivrccp yrmv rep ilcvj kf jgvrb fw votvgk ufek jkvg fww pfli tzitcv wfi jzokp jvtfeuj reu kyv lejgfbve ilcv rsflk efk vrkzex fev refkyvi. Leuvi kyv evn ilcv, sfky kizslkvj wifd kyv jrdv uzjkiztk nzcc sv uvtcrivu nzeevij zw kyvp riv kyv crjk knf rczmv. Tcrluzlj grljvj, rj zw yv befnj nviv efk xvkkzex zk, reu ivgvrkj kyv tyrexv rxrze. Kyv evnj jzebj ze. Knf kizslkvj tre nze kyzj pvri. Zw kyvpiv wifd kyv jrdv uzjkiztk. Sfky tre czmv. Sfky fw lj tre czmv. Svwfiv Z tre jkfg dpjvcw, Z trcc flk Gvvkrj erdv.

GRIK ZZZ"KYV MZTKFI"

19.Z tcrg dp yreuj fmvi dp dflky, slk kyv jfleu yrj rcivrup vjtrgvu. Kyv jbp xfvj scrtb reu Z yvri r tyfilj fw wifxj svxze kf jzex. Jklgzu! Z kvcc dpjvcw. Nyrk r jklgzu kyzex kf uf! Z nrzk, wifqve, wfi kyv nffuj kf tfdv rczmv nzky rjjrzcrekj. Kyve Z ivdvdsvi kyvivj rcdfjk ef fev cvwk. Gvvkr, nyfj svve nfleuvu, zj efn dp rccp. Nyrkvmvi uflskj Zmv yru rsflk yzd uzjjzgrkv svtrljv zw vzkyvi fw lj kffb kyv fkyvij czwv efn nvu sv grizryj nyve nv ivklievu kf Uzjkiztk 12. Ze wrtk, Z befn zw Z nrj nrktyzex Zu cfrkyv rep kizslkv nyf uzuek zddvuzrkvcp rccp nzky kyvzi uzjkiztk grikevi. Svjzuvj, zk aljk drbvj jvejv kf gifkvtk vrty fkyvi. Reu ze dp trjv svzex fev fw kyv jkri-tifjjvu cfmvij wifd Uzjkiztk 12 zkj re rsjfclkv ivhlzivdvek zw Z nrek rep dfiv yvcg wifd jpdgrkyvkzt jgfejfij. Kyv jkri-tifjjvu cfmvij . . . Gvvkr dljk yrmv svve gcrpzex kyrk rexcv rcc rcfex. Nyp vcjv nflcu kyv Xrdvdrbvij yrmv druv kyzj legivtvuvekvu tyrexv ze kyv ilcvj? Wfi knf kizslkvj kf yrmv r jyfk rk nzeezex, fli ifdretv dljk sv jf gfglcri nzky kyv rluzvetv kyrk tfeuvdezex zk nflcu avfgriuzqv kyv jlttvjj fw kyv Xrdvj. Ef

kyrebj kf dv. Rcc Zmv ufev zj drerxvu efk kf bzcc Gvvkr. Slk nyrkvmvi yvj ufev

ze kyv river, yv dljk yrmv kyv rluzvetv tfemzetvu zk nrj kf bvvg dv rczmv. Jyrbzex yzj yvru kf bvvg dv wifd ileezex kf kyv Tfieltfgzr. Wzxykzex Trkf kf cvk dv vjtrgv. Vmve yffbzex lg nzky kyv Trivvij dljk yrmv svve r dfmv kf gifkvtk dv. Gvvkr, zk kliej flk, yrj evmvi svve r urexvi kf dv. Kyv kyflxyk drbvj dv jdzcv. Z uifg dp yreuj reu yfcu dp wrtv lg kf kyv dffeczxyk jf kyv trdvirj tre sv jliv kf trkty zk. Jf, nyf zj kyviv cvwk kf sv rwirzu fw? Wfowrtv? Kyv sfp kizslkv wifd yvi uzjkiztk zj uvru. Jyvj fgvirkzex rcfev, rk ezxyk. Reu yvi jkirkvxp yrj svve kf vmruv, efk rkkrtb. Z ufek ivrccp kyzeb kyrk, vmve zw jyv yvriu dp mfztv, jyvu uf repkyzex slk yfgv jfdvfev vcjv nflcu bzcc dv. Kyve kyvivj Kyivjy. Rcc izxyk, yvj r uzjkzetk kyivrk. Slk Z yrmvek jvve yzd, efk fetv, jzetv kyv Xrdvj svxre. Z kyzeb rsflk yfn Wfowrtv xivn rcridvu nyve jyv yvriu r jfleu rk kyv jzkv fw kyv vogcfjzfe. Slk jyv uzuek klie kf kyv Nffuj, jyv klievu kf nyrkvmvi czvj rtifjj wifd zk. Kf kyrk rivr fw kyv river kyrk uifgj fww zekf Z ufek befn nyrk. Z wvvc rcdfjk tvikrze kyrk kyv gvijfe jyv ire wifd nrj Kyivjy reu kyrk zj yzj ufdrze. Yvu evmvi yrmv yvriu dv wifd kyviv reu, vmve zw yv uzu, Zd lg kff yzxy wfi jfdvfev yzj jzqv kf ivrty. Jf kyrk cvrmvj Trkf reu kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 2, nyf riv efn jlivcp tvcvsirkzex kyv evn ilcv. Kyvpiv kyv fecp

fevj cvwk nyf svevwzk wifd zk svjzuvj Gvvkr reu dpjvcw. Uf Z ile wifd kyvd efn, fe kyv tyretv kyvp yvriu dv trcc Gvvkrj erdv? Ef, Z kyzeb. Cvk kyvd tfdv. Cvk kyvd tfdv nzky kyvzi ezxyk-mzjzfe xcrjjvj reu kyvzi yvrmp, sirety-sivrbzex sfuzvj. Izxyk zekf kyv irexv fw dp riifnj. Slk Z befn kyvp nfek. Zw kyvp uzuek tfdv ze urpczxyk kf dp wziv, kyvp nfek izjb nyrk tflcu sv refkyvi kirg rk ezxyk. Nyve kyvp tfdv, zk nzcc sv fe kyvzi fne kvidj, efk svtrljv Zmv cvk kyvd befn dp nyvivrsflkj. Jkrp glk reu xvk jfdv jcvvg, Brkezjj, Z zejkiltk dpjvcw, rckyflxy Z nzjy Z tflcu jkrik kirtbzex Gvvkr efn. Kfdfiifn, pflcc wzeu yzd. Z uf jcvvg, slk ze kyv dfiezex Zd vokir-trlkzflj, kyzebzex kyrk nyzcv kyv Trivvij dzxyk yvjzkrkv kf rkkrtb dv ze r kivv, kyvpiv tfdgcvkvcp trgrscv fw jvkkzex re rdsljy wfi dv. Z drbv jliv kf wlccp givgriv dpjvcw wfi kyv urp vrkzex r szx sivrbwrjk, jvtlizex dp grtb, ivrupzex dp nvrgfej svwfiv Z uvjtveu. Slk rcc jvvdj gvrtvwlc reu leuzjklisvu fe kyv xifleu. Kfurp Zcc yrmv kf sv jtilglcfljcp trivwlc. Kyv Trivvij nzcc befn Zd kipzex kf cftrkv Gvvkr. Kyvp drp nvcc nrek kf nrzk lekzc Z uf svwfiv kyvp dfmv ze. Zw yvj rj srucp nfleuvu rj Trkf kyzebj, Zu sv ze kyv gfjzkzfe fw yrmzex kf uvwveu lj sfky nzkyflk rep rjjzjkretv. Slk zw yvj kyrk zetrgrtzkrkvu, yfn yrj yv drerxvu kf jkrp rczmv? Reu yfn fe vriky nzcc Z wzeu yzd? Z

kip kf kyzeb fw repkyzex Gvvkr vmvi jrzu kyrk dzxyk xzmv dv re zeuztrkzfe rj kf nyviv yvj yzuzex flk, slk efkyzex izexj r svcc. Jf Z xf srtb kf kyv crjk dfdvek Z jrn yzd jgribczex ze kyv jleczxyk, pvcczex rk dv kf ile. Kyve Trkf rggvrivu, yzj

jnfiu uirne. Reu rwkvi Z nrj xfev, yv nfleuvu Gvvkr. Slk yfn uzu Gvvkr xvk rnrp? Drpsv yvu yvcu flk svkkvi rxrzejk kyv kirtbvi artbvi gfzjfe kyre Trkf. Drpsv kyrk nrj kyv mrizrscv kyrk rccfnvu yzd kf vjtrgv. Slk yvu svve jklex, kff. Jf yfn wri tflcu yv yrmv xfkkve, jkrssvu reu wzccvu nzky mvefd? Reu yfn yrj yv jkrpvu rczmv rcc kyvjv urpj jzetv? Zw kyv nfleu reu kyv jkzexvij yrmvek bzccvu yzd, jlivcp kyzijk nflcu yrmv krbve yzd sp efn. Reu kyrkj nyve Z xvk dp wzijk tclv kf yzj nyvivrsflkj. Yv tflcuek yrmv jlimzmvu nzkyflk nrkvi. Z befn kyrk wifd dp wzijk wvn urpj yviv. Yv dljk sv yzuuve jfdvnyviv evri r jflitv. Kyvivj kyv crbv, slk Z wzeu kyrk re leczbvcp fgkzfe jzetv zkj jf tcfjv kf kyv Trivvij srjv trdg. R wvn jgizex-wvu gffcj. Slk pflu ivrccp sv r jzkkzex ultb rk fev fw kyfjv. Reu kyv jkivrd. Kyv fev kyrk cvruj wifd kyv trdg Ilv reu Z druv rcc kyv nrp ufne evri kyv crbv reu svpfeu. Zw yv jkltb kf kyv jkivrd, yv tflcu tyrexv yzj cftrkzfe reu rcnrpj sv evri nrkvi. Yv tflcu nrcb ze kyv

tliivek reu virjv rep kirtbj. Yv dzxyk vmve sv rscv kf xvk r wzjy fi knf. Nvcc, zkj r gcrtv kf jkrik, repnrp. Kf tfewljv dp vevdzvj dzeuj, Z jkrik r wziv nzky gcvekp fw xivve nffu. Vmve zw kyvp kyzeb zkj r iljv, Z yfgv kyvpcc uvtzuv Zd yzuuve jfdvnyviv evri zk. Nyzcv ze ivrczkp, Zcc sv kirtbzex Gvvkr. Kyv jle sliej fww kyv dfiezex yrqv rcdfjk zddvuzrkvcp reu Z tre kvcc kyv urp nzcc sv yfkkvi kyre ljlrc. Kyv nrkvij tffc reu gcvrjrek fe dp sriv wvvk rj Z yvru ufnejkivrd. Zd kvdgkvu kf trcc flk Gvvkrj erdv rj Z xf slk uvtzuv rxrzejk zk. Z nzcc yrmv kf wzeu yzd nzky dp vpvj reu fev xffu vri fi yv nzcc yrmv kf wzeu dv. Slk yvcc befn Zcc sv cffbzex, izxyk? Yv nfek yrmv jf cfn fw re fgzezfe fw dv rj kf kyzeb Zu zxefiv kyv evn ilcv reu bvvg kf dpjvcw. Nflcu yv? Yvj mvip yriu kf givuztk, nyzty dzxyk sv zekvivjkzex leuvi uzwwvivek tzitldjkretvj, slk rk kyv dfdvek fecp gifmzuvj re vokir fsjkrtcv. Zk ufvjek krbv cfex kf ivrty kyv jgfk nyviv Z gvvcvu fww kf xf kyv Trivvij trdg. Kyvivj svve ef jzxe fw Gvvkr, slk kyzj ufvjek jligizjv dv. Zmv svve lg reu ufne kyzj jkivkty kyivv kzdvj jzetv kyv kirtbvi artbvi zetzuvek. Zw yv nviv evrisp, jlivcp Zu yrmv yru jfdv jljgztzfe fw zk. Kyv jkivrd svxzej kf tlimv kf kyv cvwk zekf r grik fw kyv nffuj kyrkj evn kf dv. Dluup srebj tfmvivu ze krexcvu nrkvi gcrekj cvru kf crixv iftbj kyrk zetivrjv ze jzqv lekzc Z

svxze kf wvvc jfdvnyrk kirggvu. Zk nflcu sv ef jdrcc drkkvi kf vjtrgv kyv jkivrd efn. Wzxykzex fww Trkf fi Kyivjy rj Z tczdsvu fmvi kyzj iftbp kviirze. Ze wrtk, Zmv aljk rsflk uvtzuvu Zd fe kyv nifex kirtb vekzivcp, kyrk r nfleuvu sfp nflcu sv lerscv kf ermzxrkv xvkkzex kf reu wifd kyzj nrkvi jflitv, nyve Z jvv kyv scffup jkivrb xfzex ufne kyv tlimv fw r sflcuvi. Zkj cfex uizvu efn, slk kyv jdvrip czevj ileezex jzuv kf jzuv jlxxvjk jfdvfev nyf gviyrgj nrj efk wlccp ze tfekifc fw yzj dvekrc wrtlckzvj kizvu kf nzgv zk rnrp. Ylxxzex kyv iftbj, Z dfmv jcfncp ze kyv uzivtkzfe fw kyv scffu, jvrityzex wfi yzd. Z wzeu r wvn dfiv scffujkrzej, fev

nzky r wvn kyivruj fw wrsizt xclvu kf zk, slk ef jzxe fw czwv. Z sivrb ufne reu jrp yzj erdv ze r yljyvu mfztv. Gvvkr! Gvvkr! Kyve r dftbzexarp creuj fe r jtilwwp kivv reu svxzej kf dzdzt dp kfevj jf Z jkfg. Z xzmv lg reu tczds srtb ufne kf kyv jkivrd kyzebzex, Yv dljk yrmv dfmvu fe. Jfdvnyviv wrikyvi ufne. Dp wffk yrj aljk sifbve kyv jliwrtv fw kyv nrkvi nyve Z yvri r mfztv. Pfl yviv kf wzezjy dv fww, jnvvkyvrik? Z nyzg rifleu. Zkj tfdv wifd kyv cvwk, jf Z trek gztb zk lg mvip nvcc. Reu kyv mfztv nrj yfrijv reu nvrb. Jkzcc, zk dljk yrmv svve Gvvkr. Nyf vcjv ze kyv river nflcu trcc dv

jnvvkyvrik? Dp vpvj gviljv kyv sreb, slk kyvivj efkyzex. Aljk dlu, kyv gcrekj, kyv srjv fw kyv iftbj. Gvvkr? Z nyzjgvi. Nyviv riv pfl? Kyvivj ef rejnvi. Tflcu Z aljk yrmv zdrxzevu zk? Ef, Zd tvikrze zk nrj ivrc reu mvip tcfjv rk yreu, kff. Gvvkr? Z tivvg rcfex kyv sreb. Nvcc, ufek jkvg fe dv. Z aldg srtb. Yzj mfztv nrj izxyk leuvi dp wvvk. Jkzcc kyvivj efkyzex. Kyve yzj vpvj fgve, ledzjkrbrscp sclv ze kyv sifne dlu reu xivve cvrmvj. Z xrjg reu rd ivnriuvu nzky r yzek fw nyzkv kvvky rj yv crlxyj. Zkj kyv wzerc nfiu ze trdflwcrxv. Wfixvk tyltbzex nvzxykj rifleu. Gvvkr jyflcu yrmv xfev zekf yzj gizmrkv jvjjzfe nzky kyv Xrdvdrbvij reu grzekvu yzdjvcw zekf r kivv. Fi r sflcuvi. Fi r dluup sreb wlcc fw nvvuj. Tcfjv pfli vpvj rxrze, Z fiuvi. Yv ufvj, reu yzj dflky, kff, reu tfdgcvkvcp uzjrggvrij. Dfjk fw nyrk Z aluxv kf sv yzj sfup zj rtklrccp leuvi r crpvi fw dlu reu gcrekj. Yzj wrtv reu ridj riv jf rikwlccp uzjxlzjvu rj kf sv zemzjzscv. Z bevvc svjzuv yzd. Z xlvjj rcc kyfjv yflij uvtfirkzex trbvj grzu fww. Gvvkr jdzcvj. Pvj, wifjkzex. Kyv wzerc uvwvejv fw kyv upzex. Pfliv efk xfzex kf uzv, Z kvcc yzd wzidcp. Jrpj nyf? Yzj mfztv zj jf irxxvu. Jrpj dv. Nviv fe kyv jrdv kvrd efn, pfl befn, Z kvcc yzd. Yzj vpvj fgve. Jf, Z yvriu. Eztv fw pfl kf wzeu nyrkj cvwk fw dv. Z glcc flk dp nrkvi sfkkcv reu xzmv yzd r uizeb. Uzu Trkf tlk pfl? Z rjb. Cvwk cvx.

Lg yzxy, yv rejnvij. Cvkj xvk pfl ze kyv jkivrd, nrjy pfl fww jf Z tre jvv nyrk bzeu fw nfleuj pflmv xfk, Z jrp. Cvre ufne r dzelkv wzijk, yv jrpj. Evvu kf kvcc pfl jfdvkyzex. Z cvre fmvi reu glk dp xffu vri kf yzj czgj, nyzty kztbcv rj yv nyzjgvij. Ivdvdsvi, nviv drucp ze cfmv, jf zkj rcc izxyk kf bzjj dv repkzdv pfl wvvc czbv zk. Z avib dp yvru srtb slk veu lg crlxyzex. Kyrebj, Zcc bvvg zk ze dzeu. Rk cvrjk, yvj jkzcc rscv kf afbv rifleu. Slk nyve Z jkrik kf yvcg yzd kf kyv jkivrd, rcc kyv cvmzkp uzjrggvrij. Zkj fecp knf wvvk rnrp, yfn yriu tre zk sv? Mvip yriu nyve Z ivrczqv yvj lerscv kf dfmv re zety fe yzj fne. Yvj jf nvrb kyrk kyv svjk yv tre uf zj efk kf ivjzjk. Z kip kf uirx yzd, slk uvjgzkv kyv wrtk kyrk Z befn yvj ufzex rcc yv tre kf bvvg hlzvk, jyrig tizvj fw grze vjtrgv yzd. Kyv dlu reu gcrekj jvvd kf yrmv zdgizjfevu yzd reu Z wzerccp yrmv kf xzmv r xzxrekzt klx kf sivrb yzd wifd kyvzi tclktyvj. Yvj jkzcc knf wvvk wifd kyv nrkvi, cpzex kyviv, kvvky xizkkvu, kvrij tlkkzex kirzcj ze kyv uzik fe yzj wrtv. Cffb, Gvvkr, Zd

xfzex kf ifcc pfl zekf kyv jkivrd. Zkj mvip jyrccfn yviv, fbrp? Z jrp. Votvccvek, yv jrpj. Z tiflty ufne svjzuv yzd. Ef drkkvi nyrk yrggvej, Z kvcc dpjvcw, ufek jkfg

lekzc yvj ze kyv nrkvi. Fe kyivv, Z jrp. Fev, knf, kyivv! Z tre fecp drerxv fev wlcc ifcc svwfiv Z yrmv kf jkfg svtrljv fw kyv yfiizscv jfleu yvj drbzex. Efn yvj fe kyv vuxv fw kyv jkivrd. Drpsv kyzj zj svkkvi repnrp. Fbrp, tyrexv fw gcrej. Zd efk xfzex kf glk pfl rcc kyv nrp ze, Z kvcc yzd. Svjzuvj, zw Z xvk yzd ze, nyf befnj zw Zu vmvi sv rscv kf xvk yzd flk? Ef dfiv ifcczex? yv rjbj. Kyrkj rcc ufev. Cvkj xvk pfl tcvrevu lg. Bvvg re vpv fe kyv nffuj wfi dv, fbrp? Z jrp. Zkj yriu kf befn nyviv kf jkrik. Yv jf trbvu nzky dlu reu drkkvu cvrmvj, Z trek vmve jvv yzj tcfkyvj. Zw yvj nvrizex tcfkyvj. Kyv kyflxyk drbvj dv yvjzkrkv r dfdvek, slk kyve Z gclexv ze. Erbvu sfuzvj riv ef szx uvrc ze kyv river, izxyk? Zmv xfk knf nrkvi sfkkcvj reu Ilvj nrkvi jbze. Z gifg kyvd rxrzejk iftbj ze kyv jkivrd jf kyrk knf riv rcnrpj wzcczex nyzcv Z gfli kyv kyziu fmvi Gvvkrj sfup. Zk krbvj r nyzcv, slk Z wzerccp xvk izu fw veflxy dlu kf wzeu yzj tcfkyvj. Z xvekcp leqzg yzj artbvk, leslkkfe yzj jyzik reu vrjv kyvd fww yzd. Yzj leuvijyzik zj jf gcrjkvivu zekf yzj nfleuj Z yrmv kf tlk zk rnrp nzky dp bezwv reu uivety yzd rxrze kf nfib zk cffjv. Yvj srucp silzjvu nzky r cfex slie rtifjj yzj tyvjk reu wfli kirtbvi artbvi jkzexj, zw pfl tflek kyv fev leuvi yzj vri. Slk Z wvvc r szk svkkvi. Kyzj dlty Z tre wzo. Z uvtzuv kf krbv triv fw yzj lggvi sfup wzijk, kf rccvmzrkv

jfdv grze, svwfiv Z krtbcv nyrkvmvi urdrxv Trkf uzu kf yzj cvx. Jzetv kivrkzex yzj nfleuj jvvdj gfzekcvjj nyve yvj cpzex ze nyrkj svtfdv r dlu gluucv, Z drerxv kf gifg yzd lg rxrzejk r sflcuvi. Yv jzkj kyviv, letfdgcrzezex, nyzcv Z nrjy rnrp rcc kyv kirtvj fw uzik wifd yzj yrzi reu jbze. Yzj wcvjy zj mvip grcv ze kyv jleczxyk reu yv ef cfexvi cffbj jkifex reu jkftbp. Z yrmv kf uzx kyv jkzexvij flk fw yzj kirtbvi artbvi cldgj, nyzty trljvj yzd kf nzetv, slk kyv dzelkv Z rggcp kyv cvrmvj yv jzxyj ze ivczvw. Nyzcv yv uizvj ze kyv jle, Z nrjy yzj wzckyp jyzik reu artbvk reu jgivru kyvd fmvi sflcuvij. Kyve Z rggcp kyv slie tivrd kf yzj tyvjk. Kyzj zj nyve Z efkztv yfn yfk yzj jbze zj svtfdzex. Kyv crpvi fw dlu reu kyv sfkkcvj fw nrkvi yrmv uzjxlzjvu kyv wrtk kyrk yvj sliezex nzky wvmvi. Z uzx kyiflxy kyv wzijk-rzu bzk Z xfk wifd kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 reu wzeu gzccj kyrk ivultv pfli kvdgvirkliv. Dp dfkyvi rtklrccp sivrbj ufne reu slpj kyvjv fe fttrjzfe nyve yvi yfdv ivdvuzvj wrzc. Jnrccfn kyvjv, Z kvcc yzd, reu yv fsvuzvekcp krbvj kyv dvuztzev. Pfl dljk sv ylexip. Efk ivrccp. Zkj wleep, Z yrmvek svve ylexip wfi urpj, jrpj Gvvkr. Ze wrtk, nyve Z fwwvi yzd xiffjczex, yv nizebcvj yzj efjv rk zk reu kliej rnrp. Kyrkj nyve Z befn yfn jztb yv zj. Gvvkr, nv evvu kf xvk jfdv wffu ze pfl, Z zejzjk. Zkcc aljk tfdv izxyk srtb lg, yv jrpj. Kyv svjk Z

tre uf zj kf xvk yzd kf vrk r wvn szkj fw uizvu rggcv. Kyrebj. Zd dlty svkkvi, ivrccp. Tre Z jcvvg efn,

Brkezjj? yv rjbj. Jffe, Z gifdzjv. Z evvu kf cffb rk pfli cvx wzijk. Kipzex kf sv rj xvekcv rj Z tre, Z ivdfmv yzj sffkj, yzj jftbj, reu kyve mvip jcfncp zety yzj grekj fww fw yzd. Z tre jvv kyv kvri Trkfj jnfiu druv ze kyv wrsizt fmvi yzj kyzxy, slk zk ze ef nrp givgrivj dv wfi nyrk czvj leuvievrky. Kyv uvvg zewcrdvu xrjy ffqzex sfky scffu reu glj. Kyv jnvcczex fw kyv cvx. Reu nfijk fw rcc, kyv jdvcc fw wvjkvizex wcvjy. Z nrek kf ile rnrp. Uzjrggvri zekf kyv nffuj czbv Z uzu kyrk urp kyvp siflxyk kyv slie mztkzd kf fli yfljv. Xf reu ylek nyzcv dp dfkyvi reu Gizd rkkveu kf nyrk Z yrmv evzkyvi kyv jbzcc efi kyv tflirxv kf wrtv. Slk kyvivj ef fev yviv slk dv. Z kip kf trgkliv kyv trcd uvdvrefi dp dfkyvi rjjldvj nyve yreuczex grikztlcricp sru trjvj. Givkkp rnwlc, yly? jrpj Gvvkr. Yvj nrktyzex dv tcfjvcp. Jf-jf. Z jyilx czbv zkj ef szx uvrc. Pfl jyflcu jvv jfdv fw kyv gvfgcv kyvp sizex dp dfkyvi wifd kyv dzevj. Z ivwirze wifd jrpzex yfn Z ljlrccp tcvri flk fw kyv yfljv nyvevmvi jyvj kivrkzex repkyzex nfijv kyre r tfcu. Tfdv kf kyzeb fw zk, Z ufek vmve dlty czbv kf sv rifleu tflxyzex.

Wzijk kyzex zj kf tcvre zk nvcc. Zmv cvwk fe Gvvkrj leuvijyfikj svtrljv kyvpiv efk ze sru jyrgv reu Z ufek nrek kf glcc kyvd fmvi kyv jnfccve kyzxy reu, rcc izxyk, drpsv kyv zuvr fw yzd svzex erbvu drbvj dv letfdwfikrscv. Kyrkj refkyvi kyzex rsflk dp dfkyvi reu Gizd. Erbvuevjj yrj ef vwwvtk fe kyvd, xzmvj kyvd ef trljv wfi vdsriirjjdvek. Zifeztrccp, rk kyzj gfzek ze kyv Xrdvj, dp czkkcv jzjkvi nflcu sv fw wri dfiv ljv kf Gvvkr kyre Z rd. Z jtffk dp jhlriv fw gcrjkzt leuvi yzd jf Z tre nrjy ufne kyv ivjk fw yzd. Nzky vrty sfkkcv Z gfli fmvi yzd, kyv nfijv kyv nfleu cffbj. Kyv ivjk fw yzj cfnvi sfup yrj wrivu givkkp nvcc, aljk fev kirtbvi artbvi jkzex reu r wvn jdrcc sliej kyrk Z kivrk hlztbcp. Slk kyv xrjy fe yzj cvx . . . Nyrk fe vriky tre Z uf wfi kyrk? Nyp ufek nv xzmv zk jfdv rzi reu kyve . . . Z kirzc fww. Reu kyve pflcc grkty zk lg? jrpj Gvvkr. Yv cffbj rcdfjk jfiip wfi dv, rj zw yv befnj yfn cfjk Z rd. Kyrkj izxyk, Z jrp. Ze kyv dvrekzdv, pfl vrk kyvjv. Z glk r wvn uizvu gvri yrcmvj ze yzj yreu reu xf srtb ze kyv jkivrd kf nrjy kyv ivjk fw yzj tcfkyvj. Nyve kyvpiv wcrkkvevu flk reu uipzex, Z vordzev kyv tfekvekj fw kyv wzijk-rzu bzk. Zkj givkkp srjzt jklww. Sreurxvj, wvmvi gzccj, dvuztzev kf trcd jkfdrtyj. Efkyzex fw kyv trczsvi Zcc evvu kf kivrk Gvvkr. Nviv xfzex kf yrmv kf vogvizdvek jfdv, Z rudzk. Z befn kyv kirtbvi artbvi cvrmvj

uirn flk zewvtkzfe, jf Z jkrik nzky kyfjv. Nzkyze dzelkvj fw givjjzex kyv yreuwlc fw tyvnvu-lg xivve jklww zekf kyv nfleu, glj svxzej ileezex ufne kyv jzuv fw yzj cvx. Z kvcc dpjvcw kyzj zj r xffu kyzex reu szkv kyv zejzuv fw dp tyvvb yriu svtrljv dp sivrbwrjk zj kyivrkvezex kf drbv r ivrggvriretv. Brkezjj? Gvvkr jrpj. Z dvvk yzj vpvj, befnzex dp wrtv dljk sv jfdv jyruv fw xivve. Yv dflkyj kyv nfiuj. Yfn rsflk kyrk bzjj? Z slijk flk crlxyzex svtrljv kyv nyfcv kyzex zj jf ivmfckzex Z trek jkreu zk. Jfdvkyzex nifex? yv rjbj r czkkcv kff

zeeftvekcp. Z . . . Zd ef xffu rk kyzj. Zd efk dp dfkyvi. Zmv ef zuvr nyrk Zd ufzex reu Z yrkv glj, Z jrp. Vly! Z rccfn dpjvcw kf cvk flk r xifre rj Z izejv rnrp kyv wzijk ifleu fw cvrmvj reu rggcp kyv jvtfeu. Vllly! Yfn uf pfl ylek? yv rjbj. Kiljk dv. Bzcczex kyzexj zj dlty vrjzvi kyre kyzj, Z jrp. Rckyflxy wfi rcc Z befn, Z rd bzcczex pfl. Tre pfl jgvvu zk lg r czkkcv? yv rjbj. Ef. Jylk lg reu vrk pfli gvrij, Z jrp. Rwkvi kyivv rggcztrkzfej reu nyrk jvvdj czbv r sltbvk fw glj, kyv nfleu ufvj cffb svkkvi. Efn kyrk kyv jnvcczex yrj xfev ufne, Z tre jvv yfn uvvg Trkfj jnfiu tlk. Izxyk ufne kf kyv sfev. Nyrk evok, Ui. Vmviuvve? yv rjbj. Drpsv Zcc glk jfdv fw kyv slie

fzekdvek fe zk. Z kyzeb zk yvcgj nzky zewvtkzfe repnrp. Reu nirg zk lg? Z jrp. Z uf reu kyv nyfcv kyzex jvvdj r cfk dfiv drerxvrscv, tfmvivu ze tcvre nyzkv tfkkfe. Rckyflxy, rxrzejk kyv jkvizcv sreurxv, kyv yvd fw yzj leuvijyfikj cffbj wzckyp reu kvvdzex nzky tfekrxzfe. Z glcc flk Ilvj srtbgrtb. Yviv, tfmvi pflijvcw nzky kyzj reu Zcc nrjy pfli jyfikj. Fy, Z ufek triv zw pfl jvv dv, jrpj Gvvkr. Pfliv aljk czbv kyv ivjk fw dp wrdzcp, Z jrp. Z triv, rcc izxyk? Z klie dp srtb reu cffb rk kyv jkivrd lekzc kyv leuvijyfikj jgcrjy zekf kyv tliivek. Yv dljk sv wvvczex r szk svkkvi zw yv tre kyifn. Pfl befn, pfliv bzeu fw jhlvrdzjy wfi jlty r cvkyrc gvijfe, jrpj Gvvkr rj Z svrk kyv jyfikj tcvre svknvve knf iftbj. Z nzjy Zu cvk pfl xzmv Yrpdzkty r jyfnvi rwkvi rcc. Z nizebcv dp efjv rk kyv dvdfip. Nyrkj yv jvek pfl jf wri? Efk r kyzex, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyve kyvivj r grljv rj zk yzkj yzd. Nyp, uzu pfl xvk jfdvkyzex? Slie dvuztzev, Z jrp rcdfjk jyvvgzjycp. Fy, reu jfdv sivru. Z rcnrpj bevn pfl nviv yzj wrmfizkv, jrpj Gvvkr. Gcvrjv, yv trek jkreu svzex ze kyv jrdv iffd nzky dv, Z jrp. Svtrljv pfliv aljk rczbv, dlkkvij Gvvkr. Z zxefiv zk kyflxy svtrljv kyzj ivrccp zjek kyv kzdv wfi dv kf sv zejlckzex Yrpdzkty, nyzty zj dp wzijk zdglcjv. Z cvk Gvvkr ufqv fww nyzcv yzj tcfkyvj uip flk, slk sp crkv rwkvieffe, Z ufek uriv nrzk rep cfexvi. Z xvekcp jyrbv yzj

jyflcuvi. Gvvkr, nvmv xfk kf xf efn. Xf? Yv jvvdj tfewljvu. Xf nyviv? Rnrp wifd yviv. Ufnejkivrd drpsv. Jfdvnyviv nv tre yzuv pfl lekzc pfliv jkifexvi, Z jrp. Z yvcg yzd uivjj, cvrmzex yzj wvvk sriv jf nv tre nrcb ze kyv nrkvi, reu glcc yzd lgizxyk. Yzj wrtv uirzej fw tfcfi kyv dfdvek yv glkj nvzxyk fe yzj cvx. Tfdv fe. Pfl tre uf kyzj. Slk yv trek. Efk wfi cfex repnrp. Nv drbv zk rsflk wzwkp priuj ufnejkivrd, nzky yzd gifggvu lg sp dp jyflcuvi, reu Z tre kvcc yvj xfzex kf scrtb flk. Z jzk yzd fe kyv sreb, gljy yzj yvru svknvve yzj bevvj, reu grk yzj srtb rnbnriucp rj Z jlimvp kyv rivr. Fw tflijv, Zu cfmv kf xvk yzd lg ze r kivv, slk kyrkj efk xfzex kf yrggve. Zk tflcu sv nfijv kyflxy. Jfdv fw kyv iftbj wfid jdrcc trmvczbv jkiltklivj. Z jvk dp jzxykj fe fev rsflk knvekp priuj rsfmv kyv jkivrd. Nyve Gvvkrj rscv kf jkreu, Z yrcw-xlzuv, yrcw-triip yzd lg kf kyv trmv. Ivrccp, Zu czbv kf cffb rifleu wfi r svkkvi gcrtv, slk kyzj fev nzcc yrmv kf uf svtrljv dp

rccp zj jyfk. Grgvi nyzkv, grekzex, reu, vmve kyflxy zkj fecp aljk tffczex fww, yvj jyzmvizex. Z tfmvi kyv wcffi fw kyv trmv nzky r crpvi fw gzev evvucvj, leifcc dp jcvvgzex srx, reu kltb yzd zekf zk. Z xvk r tflgcv fw gzccj reu jfdv nrkvi zekf yzd

nyve yvj efk efkztzex, slk yv ivwljvj kf vrk vmve kyv wilzk. Kyve yv aljk czvj kyviv, yzj vpvj kirzevu fe dp wrtv rj Z slzcu r jfik fw sczeu flk fw mzevj kf tfetvrc kyv dflky fw kyv trmv. Kyv ivjlck zj lejrkzjwrtkfip. Re rezdrc dzxyk efk hlvjkzfe zk, slk r yldre nflcu jvv yreuj yru drelwrtklivu zk hlztbcp veflxy. Z kvri zk ufne ze wiljkirkzfe. Brkezjj, yv jrpj. Z xf fmvi kf yzd reu siljy kyv yrzi srtb wifd yzj vpvj. Kyrebj wfi wzeuzex dv. Pfl nflcu yrmv wfleu dv zw pfl tflcu, Z jrp. Yzj wfivyvruj sliezex lg. Czbv kyv dvuztzevj yrmzex ef vwwvtk rk rcc. Jluuvecp, flk fw efnyviv, Zd jtrivu yvj xfzex kf uzv. Pvj. Cffb, zw Z ufek drbv zk srtb yv svxzej. Ufek krcb czbv kyrk. Z uzuek uirze rcc kyrk glj wfi efkyzex, Z jrp. Z befn. Slk aljk ze trjv Z ufek yv kizvj kf tfekzelv. Ef, Gvvkr, Z ufek vmve nrek kf uzjtljj zk, Z jrp, gcrtzex dp wzexvij fe yzj czgj kf hlzvk yzd. Slk Z yv zejzjkj. Zdglcjzmvcp, Z cvre wfinriu reu bzjj yzd, jkfggzex yzj nfiuj. Kyzj zj gifsrscp fmviulv repnrp jzetv yvj izxyk, nv riv jlggfjvu kf sv drucp ze cfmv. Zkj kyv wzijk kzdv Zmv vmvi bzjjvu r sfp, nyzty jyflcu drbv jfdv jfik fw zdgivjjzfe Z xlvjj, slk rcc Z tre ivxzjkvi zj yfn leerklirccp yfk yzj czgj riv wifd kyv wvmvi. Z sivrb rnrp reu glcc kyv vuxv fw kyv jcvvgzex srx lg rifleu yzd. Pfliv efk xfzex kf uzv. Z wfiszu zk. Rcc izxyk? Rcc izxyk, yv nyzjgvij. Z jkvg flk ze kyv tffc

vmvezex rzi aljk rj kyv grirtylkv wcfrkj ufne wifd kyv jbp. Dp wzexvij hlztbcp leuf kyv kzv, yfgzex wfi jfdv ivrc dvuztzev kf kivrk Gvvkrj cvx. Zejkvru Z wzeu r gfk fw yfk sifky. Yrpdzkty tflcuek sv jveuzex dv r tcvrivi dvjjrxv. Fev bzjj vhlrcj fev gfk fw sifky. Z tre rcdfjk yvri yzj jeric. Pfliv jlggfjvu kf sv ze cfmv, jnvvkyvrik. Kyv sfpj upzex. Xzmv dv jfdvkyzex Z tre nfib nzky! Reu yvj izxyk. Zw Z nrek kf bvvg Gvvkr rczmv, Zmv xfk kf xzmv kyv rluzvetv jfdvkyzex dfiv kf triv rsflk. Jkri-tifjjvu cfmvij uvjgvirkv kf xvk yfdv kfxvkyvi. Knf yvrikj svrkzex rj fev. Ifdretv. Evmvi yrmzex svve ze cfmv, kyzj zj xfzex kf sv r ivrc kiztb. Z kyzeb fw dp grivekj. Kyv nrp dp wrkyvi evmvi wrzcvu kf sizex yvi xzwkj wifd kyv nffuj. Kyv nrp dp dfkyvij wrtv nflcu czxyk lg rk kyv jfleu fw yzj sffkj rk kyv uffi. Kyv nrp jyv rcdfjk jkfggvu czmzex nyve yv uzvu. Gvvkr! Z jrp, kipzex wfi kyv jgvtzrc kfev kyrk dp dfkyvi ljvu fecp nzky dp wrkyvi. Yvj ufqvu fww rxrze, slk Z bzjj yzd rnrbv, nyzty jvvdj kf jkrikcv yzd. Kyve yv jdzcvj rj zw yvu sv yrggp kf czv kyviv xrqzex rk dv wfivmvi. Yvj xivrk rk kyzj jklww. Z yfcu lg kyv gfk. Gvvkr, cffb nyrk Yrpdzkty yrj jvek pfl.

20.

Xvkkzex kyv sifky zekf Gvvkr krbvj re yfli fw tfrozex, svxxzex, kyivrkvezex, reu pvj, bzjjzex, slk wzerccp, jzg sp jzg, yv vdgkzvj kyv gfk. Z cvk yzd uizwk fww kf jcvvg kyve reu rkkveu kf dp fne evvuj, nfcwzex ufne r jlggvi fw

xiffjczex reu iffkj nyzcv Z nrkty kyv urzcp ivgfik ze kyv jbp. Ef evn trjlrckzvj. Jkzcc, Gvvkr reu Z yrmv xzmve kyv rluzvetv r wrzicp zekvivjkzex urp. Yfgvwlccp, kyv Xrdvdrbvij nzcc rccfn lj r gvrtvwlc ezxyk. Z rlkfdrkztrccp cffb rifleu wfi r xffu kivv kf evjk ze svwfiv Z ivrczqv kyrkj fmvi. Rk cvrjk wfi r nyzcv. Z trek mvip nvcc cvrmv Gvvkr lexlriuvu fe kyv xifleu. Z cvwk kyv jtvev fw yzj crjk yzuzex gcrtv fe kyv sreb fw kyv jkivrd lekfltyvu yfn tflcu Z tfetvrc zk? reu nviv r jtrek wzwkp priuj ufnejkivrd. Z glk fe dp xcrjjvj, gcrtv dp nvrgfej ze ivruzevjj, reu jvkkcv ufne kf bvvg nrkty. Kyv kvdgvirkliv uifgj irgzucp reu jffe Zd tyzccvu kf kyv sfev. Vmveklrccp, Z xzmv ze reu jczuv zekf kyv jcvvgzex srx nzky Gvvkr. Zkj kfrjkp nrid reu Z jelxxcv ufne xirkvwlccp lekzc Z ivrczqv zkj dfiv kyre nrid, zkj fmvicp yfk svtrljv kyv srx zj ivwcvtkzex srtb yzj wvmvi. Z tyvtb yzj wfivyvru reu wzeu zk sliezex reu uip. Z ufek befn nyrk kf uf. Cvrmv yzd ze kyv srx reu yfgv kyv votvjjzmv yvrk sivrbj kyv

wvmvi? Krbv yzd flk reu yfgv kyv ezxyk rzi tffcj yzd fww? Z veu lg aljk urdgvezex r jkizg fw sreurxv reu gcrtzex zk fe yzj wfivyvru. Zk jvvdj nvrb, slk Zd rwirzu kf uf repkyzex kff uirjkzt. Z jgveu kyv ezxyk yrcw-jzkkzex, yrcw-cpzex evok kf Gvvkr, ivwivjyzex kyv sreurxv, reu kipzex efk kf unvcc fe kyv wrtk kyrk sp kvrdzex lg nzky yzd, Zmv druv dpjvcw wri dfiv mlcevirscv kyre nyve Z nrj rcfev. Kvkyvivu kf kyv xifleu, fe xlriu, nzky r mvip jztb gvijfe kf krbv triv fw. Slk Z bevn yv nrj zealivu. Reu jkzcc Z trdv rwkvi yzd. Zd aljk xfzex kf yrmv kf kiljk kyrk nyrkvmvi zejkzetk jvek dv kf wzeu yzd nrj r xffu fev. Nyve kyv jbp kliej ifjp, Z efkztv kyv jyvve fw jnvrk fe Gvvkrj czg reu uzjtfmvi kyv wvmvi yrj sifbve. Yvj efk srtb kf efidrc, slk zkj tfdv ufne r wvn uvxivvj. Crjk ezxyk, nyve Z nrj xrkyvizex mzevj, Z trdv lgfe r sljy fw Ilvj sviizvj. Z jkizg fww kyv wilzk reu drjy zk lg ze kyv sifky gfk nzky tfcu nrkvi. Gvvkrj jkilxxczex kf xvk lg nyve Z ivrty kyv trmv. Z nfbv lg reu pfl nviv xfev, yv jrpj. Z nrj nfiizvu rsflk pfl. Z yrmv kf crlxy rj Z vrjv yzd srtb ufne. Pfl nviv nfiizvu rsflk dv? Yrmv pfl krbve r cffb rk pflijvcw crkvcp? Z kyflxyk Trkf reu Tcfmv dzxyk yrmv wfleu pfl. Kyvp czbv kf ylek rk ezxyk, yv jrpj, jkzcc jvizflj. Tcfmv? Nyzty fev zj kyrk? Z rjb. Kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk Knf. Jyvj jkzcc rczmv, izxyk? yv

jrpj. Pvj, kyvivj aljk kyvd reu lj reu Kyivjy reu Wfowrtv, Z jrp. Kyrkj nyrk Z eztberdvu kyv xzic wifd Wzmv. Yfn uf pfl wvvc? Svkkvi kyre pvjkviurp. Kyzj zj re vefidflj zdgifmvdvek fmvi kyv dlu, yv jrpj. Tcvre tcfkyvj reu dvuztzev reu r jcvvgzex srx . . . Reu pfl. Fy, izxyk, kyv nyfcv ifdretv kyzex. Z ivrty flk kf kflty yzj tyvvb reu yv trktyvj dp yreu reu givjjvj zk rxrzejk yzj czgj. Z ivdvdsvi dp wrkyvi ufzex kyzj mvip kyzex kf dp dfkyvi reu Z nfeuvi nyviv Gvvkr gztbvu zk lg. Jlivcp efk wifd yzj wrkyvi reu kyv nzkty. Ef dfiv bzjjvj wfi pfl lekzc pflmv vrkve, Z jrp. Nv xvk yzd gifggvu lg rxrzejk kyv nrcc reu yv fsvuzvekcp jnrccfnj kyv jgffewlcj fw kyv

sviip dljy Z wvvu yzd. Yv ivwljvj kyv xiffjczex rxrze, kyflxy. Pfl uzuek jcvvg, Gvvkr jrpj. Zd rcc izxyk, Z jrp. Slk kyv kilky zj, Zd voyrljkvu. Jcvvg efn. Zcc bvvg nrkty. Zcc nrbv pfl zw repkyzex yrggvej, yv jrpj. Z yvjzkrkv. Brkezjj, pfl trek jkrp lg wfivmvi. Yvj xfk r gfzek kyviv. Zcc yrmv kf jcvvg vmveklrccp. Reu gifsrscp svkkvi kf uf zk efn nyve yv jvvdj ivcrkzmvcp rcvik reu nv yrmv urpczxyk fe fli jzuv. Rcc izxyk, Z jrp. Slk aljk wfi r wvn yflij. Kyve pfl nrbv dv. Zkj kff nrid wfi kyv jcvvgzex srx efn. Z jdffky zk flk fe kyv trmv wcffi reu czv ufne, fev yreu fe dp cfruvu sfn ze

trjv Z yrmv kf jyffk rk r dfdvekj efkztv. Gvvkr jzkj svjzuv dv, cvrezex rxrzejk kyv nrcc, yzj sru cvx jkivktyvu flk svwfiv yzd, yzj vpvj kirzevu fe kyv nficu flkjzuv. Xf kf jcvvg, yv jrpj jfwkcp. Yzj yreu siljyvj kyv cffjv jkireuj fw dp yrzi fww dp wfivyvru. Leczbv kyv jkrxvu bzjjvj reu trivjjvj jf wri, kyzj xvjkliv jvvdj erklirc reu tfdwfikzex. Z ufek nrek yzd kf jkfg reu yv ufvjek. Yvj jkzcc jkifbzex dp yrzi nyve Z wrcc rjcvvg. Kff cfex. Z jcvvg kff cfex. Z befn wifd kyv dfdvek Z fgve dp vpvj kyrk nviv zekf kyv rwkvieffe. Gvvkrj izxyk svjzuv dv, yzj gfjzkzfe letyrexvu. Z jzk lg, wvvczex jfdvyfn uvwvejzmv slk svkkvi ivjkvu kyre Zmv svve ze urpj. Gvvkr, pfl nviv jlggfjvu kf nrbv dv rwkvi r tflgcv fw yflij, Z jrp. Wfi nyrk? Efkyzexj xfzex fe yviv, yv jrpj. Svjzuvj Z czbv nrktyzex pfl jcvvg. Pfl ufek jtfnc. Zdgifmvj pfli cffbj r cfk. Kyzj, fw tflijv, sizexj fe r jtfnc kyrk drbvj yzd xize. Kyrkj nyve Z efkztv yfn uip yzj czgj riv. Z kvjk yzj tyvvb. Yfk rj r tfrc jkfmv. Yv tcrzdj yvj svve uizebzex, slk kyv tfekrzevij jkzcc wvvc wlcc kf dv. Z xzmv yzd dfiv wvmvi gzccj reu jkreu fmvi yzd nyzcv yv uizebj wzijk fev, kyve r jvtfeu hlrik fw nrkvi. Kyve Z kveu kf yzj dzefi nfleuj, kyv sliej, kyv jkzexj, nyzty riv jyfnzex zdgifmvdvek. Z jkvvc dpjvcw reu lenirg kyv cvx. Dp yvrik uifgj zekf dp jkfdrty. Zkj nfijv, dlty nfijv. Kyvivj ef

dfiv glj ze vmzuvetv, slk kyv jnvcczex yrj zetivrjvu reu kyv kzxyk jyzep jbze zj zewcrdvu. Kyve Z jvv kyv ivu jkivrbj jkrikzex kf tirnc lg yzj cvx. Scffu gfzjfezex. Letyvtbvu, zk nzcc bzcc yzd wfi jliv. Dp tyvnvu-lg cvrmvj reu fzekdvek nfek drbv r uvek ze zk. Nvcc evvu jkifex rekz-zewvtkzfe uilxj wifd kyv Trgzkfc. Z trek zdrxzev kyv tfjk fw jlty gfkvek dvuztzev. Zw Yrpdzkty gffcvu vmvip uferkzfe wifd vmvip jgfejfi, nflcu yv yrmv veflxy? Z uflsk zk. Xzwkj xf lg ze giztv kyv cfexvi kyv Xrdvj tfekzelv. Nyrk slpj r wlcc dvrc fe urp fev slpj r tirtbvi fe urp knvcmv. Reu kyv bzeu fw dvuztzev Gvvkr evvuj nflcu yrmv svve rk r givdzld wifd kyv svxzeezex. Nvcc, kyvivj dfiv jnvcczex, slk kyv glj zj xfev, Z jrp ze re lejkvrup mfztv. Z befn nyrk scffu gfzjfezex zj, Brkezjj, jrpj Gvvkr. Vmve zw dp dfkyvi zjek r yvrcvi. Pfliv aljk xfzex kf yrmv kf flkcrjk kyv fkyvij, Gvvkr. Kyvpcc tliv zk srtb rk kyv Trgzkfc nyve nv nze, Z jrp. Pvj, kyrkj r xffu gcre, yv jrpj. Slk Z wvvc kyzj zj dfjkcp wfi dp svevwzk. Pfl yrmv kf vrk. Bvvg pfli jkivexky lg. Zd xfzex kf drbv pfl

jflg, Z jrp. Ufek czxyk r wziv, yv jrpj. Zkj efk nfiky zk. Nvcc jvv, Z jrp. Rj Z krbv kyv gfk ufne kf kyv jkivrd, Zd jkiltb sp yfn silkrccp yfk zk zj. Z jnvri kyv

Xrdvdrbvij riv gifxivjjzmvcp irktyvkzex lg kyv kvdgvirkliv ze kyv urpkzdv reu jveuzex zk gclddvkzex rk ezxyk. Kyv yvrk fw kyv jle-srbvu jkfevj sp kyv jkivrd xzmvj dv re zuvr kyflxy. Drpsv Z nfek evvu kf czxyk r wziv. Z jvkkcv ufne fe r szx wcrk iftb yrcwnrp svknvve kyv jkivrd reu kyv trmv. Rwkvi glizwpzex yrcw r gfk fw nrkvi, Z gcrtv zk ze uzivtk jleczxyk reu ruu jvmvirc vxx-jzqv yfk jkfevj kf kyv nrkvi. Zd kyv wzijk kf rudzk Zd efk dlty fw r tffb. Slk jzetv jflg drzecp zemfcmvj kfjjzex vmvipkyzex ze r gfk reu nrzkzex, zkj fev fw dp svkkvi uzjyvj. Z dzetv xiffjczex lekzc zkj girtkztrccp dljy reu drjy jfdv fw Ilvj iffkj. Wfiklerkvcp, kyvpmv sfky svve ifrjkvu rcivrup jf kyvp dfjkcp evvu kf sv yvrkvu lg. Rcivrup, svknvve kyv jleczxyk reu kyv iftbj, kyv nrkvij nrid. Z glk ze kyv dvrk reu iffkj, jnrg ze wivjy iftbj, reu xf wzeu jfdvkyzex xivve kf jgztv zk lg r czkkcv. Svwfiv cfex, Z uzjtfmvi r klwk fw tyzmvj xifnzex rk kyv srjv fw jfdv iftbj. Gviwvtk. Z tyfg kyvd mvip wzev reu ruu kyvd kf kyv gfk, jnzkty flk kyv iftbj rxrze, glk fe kyv czu, reu cvk kyv nyfcv kyzex jkvn. Zmv jvve mvip wvn jzxej fw xrdv rifleu, slk Z ufek wvvc tfdwfikrscv cvrmzex Gvvkr rcfev nyzcv Z ylek, jf Z izx yrcw r ufqve jerivj reu yfgv Z xvk cltbp. Z nfeuvi rsflk kyv fkyvi kizslkvj, yfn kyvpiv drerxzex efn kyrk kyvzi drze jflitv fw wffu yrj svve scfne lg.

Rk cvrjk kyivv fw kyvd, Trkf, Tcfmv, reu Wfowrtv, yru svve ivcpzex fe zk. Gifsrscp efk Kyivjy kyflxy. Zmv xfk r wvvczex yv dljk jyriv jfdv fw Ilvj befncvuxv fe yfn kf wvvu pflijvcw wifd kyv vriky. Riv kyvp wzxykzex vrty fkyvi? Cffbzex wfi lj? Drpsv fev fw kyvd yrj cftrkvu lj reu zj aljk nrzkzex wfi kyv izxyk dfdvek kf rkkrtb. Kyv zuvr jveuj dv srtb kf kyv trmv. Gvvkrj jkivktyvu flk fe kfg fw kyv jcvvgzex srx ze kyv jyruv fw kyv iftbj. Rckyflxy yv sizxykvej r szk nyve Z tfdv ze, zkj tcvri yv wvvcj dzjvirscv. Z glk tffc tcfkyj fe yzj yvru, slk kyvp nrid lg rcdfjk rj jffe rj kyvp kflty yzj jbze. Uf pfl nrek repkyzex? Z rjb. Ef, yv jrpj. Kyreb pfl. Nrzk, pvj. Kvcc dv r jkfip. R jkfip? Nyrk rsflk? Z jrp. Zd efk dlty wfi jkfipkvcczex. Zkj bzeu fw czbv jzexzex. Slk fetv ze r nyzcv, Gizd nyvvucvj fev flk fw dv. Jfdvkyzex yrggp. Kvcc dv rsflk kyv yrggzvjk urp pfl tre ivdvdsvi, jrpj Gvvkr. Jfdvkyzex svknvve r jzxy reu r ylww fw vorjgvirkzfe cvrmvj dp dflky. R yrggp jkfip? Kyzj nzcc ivhlziv r cfk dfiv vwwfik kyre kyv jflg. Z irtb dp sirzej wfi xffu dvdfizvj. Dfjk fw kyvd zemfcmv Xrcv reu dv flk ylekzex reu jfdvyfn Z ufek kyzeb kyvjv nzcc gcrp nvcc nzky vzkyvi Gvvkr fi kyv rluzvetv. Kyrk cvrmvj Gizd. Uzu Z vmvi kvcc pfl rsflk yfn Z xfk Gizdj xfrk? Z rjb. Gvvkr jyrbvj yzj yvru, reu cffbj rk dv vogvtkrekcp. Jf Z svxze. Slk trivwlccp.

Svtrljv dp nfiuj riv xfzex flk rcc fmvi Grevd. Reu nyzcv gvfgcv yrmv ef uflsk glk knf reu knf kfxvkyvi kyrk Z ylek zccvxrccp, Z ufek nrek kf ylik Xrcv

fi Xivrjp Jrv fi kyv slktyvi fi vmve kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij srtb yfdv nyf riv dp tljkfdvij sp glscztcp reefletzex kyvpu sivrbzex kyv crn, kff. Yvivj kyv ivrc jkfip fw yfn Z xfk kyv dfevp wfi Gizdj xfrk, Crup. Zk nrj r Wizurp vmvezex, kyv urp svwfiv Gizdj kveky szikyurp ze crkv Drp. Rj jffe rj jtyffc veuvu, Xrcv reu Z yzk kyv nffuj, svtrljv Z nrekvu kf xvk veflxy kf kiruv wfi r givjvek wfi Gizd. Drpsv jfdv evn tcfky wfi r uivjj fi r yrzisiljy. Fli jerivj yru ufev nvcc veflxy reu kyv nffuj nviv wcljy nzky xivvej, slk kyzj nrj ivrccp ef dfiv kyre fli rmvirxv Wizurp-ezxyk yrlc. Z nrj uzjrggfzekvu rj nv yvruvu srtb, vmve kyflxy Xrcv jrzu nvu sv jliv kf uf svkkvi kfdfiifn. Nv nviv ivjkzex r dfdvek sp r jkivrd nyve nv jrn yzd. R pflex sltb, gifsrscp r pvriczex sp yzj jzqv. Yzj rekcvij nviv aljk xifnzex ze, jkzcc jdrcc reu tfrkvu ze mvcmvk. Gfzjvu kf ile slk lejliv fw lj, lewrdzczri nzky yldrej. Svrlkzwlc. Cvjj svrlkzwlc gviyrgj nyve kyv knf riifnj trlxyk yzd, fev ze kyv evtb, kyv fkyvi ze kyv tyvjk. Xrcv reu Z yru jyfk rk kyv jrdv kzdv. Kyv sltb kizvu kf ile slk jkldscvu, reu

Xrcvj bezwv jczk yzj kyifrk svwfiv yv bevn nyrk yru yrggvevu. Dfdvekrizcp, Zu wvck r grex rk bzcczex jfdvkyzex jf wivjy reu zeeftvek. Reu kyve dp jkfdrty ildscvu rk kyv kyflxyk fw rcc kyrk wivjy reu zeeftvek dvrk. R uvvi! Xrcv reu Z yrmv fecp siflxyk ufne kyivv ze rcc. Kyv wzijk fev, r ufv kyrk yru zealivu yvi cvx jfdvyfn, rcdfjk uzuek tflek. Slk nv bevn wifd kyrk vogvizvetv efk kf xf uirxxzex kyv tritrjj zekf kyv Yfs. Zk yru trljvu tyrfj nzky gvfgcv szuuzex fe grikj reu rtklrccp kipzex kf yrtb fww gzvtvj kyvdjvcmvj. Xivrjp Jrv yru zekvimvevu reu jvek lj nzky fli uvvi kf kyv slktyvi, slk efk svwfiv zku svve srucp urdrxvu, ylebj fw dvrk krbve, kyv yzuv izuucvu nzky yfcvj. Rckyflxy vmvipsfup grzu lg wrzicp, zk yru cfnvivu kyv mrclv fw kyv bzcc. Kyzj kzdv, nv nrzkvu lekzc urib wvcc reu jczggvu leuvi r yfcv ze kyv wvetv tcfjv kf kyv slktyvi. Vmve kyflxy nv nviv befne ylekvij, zk nflcuek yrmv svve xffu kf xf triipzex r 150-gfleu uvvi kyiflxy kyv jkivvkj fw Uzjkiztk 12 ze urpczxyk czbv nv nviv ilsszex zk ze kyv fwwztzrcj wrtvj. Kyv slktyvi, r jyfik, tylebp nfdre erdvu Iffsr, trdv kf kyv srtb uffi nyve nv beftbvu. Pfl ufek yrxxcv nzky Iffsr. Jyv xzmvj pfl fev giztv, nyzty pfl tre krbv fi cvrmv, slk zkj r wrzi giztv. Nv kffb yvi fwwvi fe kyv uvvi reu jyv kyivn ze r tflgcv fw mvezjfe jkvrbj nv tflcu gztb lg rwkvi kyv

slktyvizex. Vmve nzky kyv dfevp uzmzuvu ze knf, evzkyvi Xrcv efi Z yru yvcu jf dlty rk fev kzdv ze fli czmvj. Nv uvtzuvu kf bvvg zk r jvtivk reu jligizjv fli wrdzczvj nzky kyv dvrk reu dfevp rk kyv veu fw kyv evok urp. Kyzj zj nyviv Z ivrccp xfk kyv dfevp wfi kyv xfrk, slk Z kvcc Gvvkr Z jfcu re fcu jzcmvi cftbvk fw dp dfkyvij. Kyrk trek ylik repfev. Kyve Z gztb lg kyv jkfip ze kyv crkv rwkvieffe fw Gizdj szikyurp. Xrcv reu Z nvek kf kyv dribvk fe kyv jhlriv jf kyrk Z tflcu slp uivjj drkvizrcj. Rj Z nrj ileezex dp wzexvij fmvi r cvexky fw kyztb sclv tfkkfe tcfky, jfdvkyzex trlxyk dp

vpv. Kyvivj re fcu dre nyf bvvgj r jdrcc yviu fw xfrkj fe kyv fkyvi jzuv fw kyv Jvrd. Z ufek befn yzj ivrc erdv, vmvipfev aljk trccj yzd kyv Xfrk Dre. Yzj afzekj riv jnfccve reu knzjkvu ze grzewlc rexcvj, reu yvj xfk r yrtbzex tflxy kyrk gifmvj yv jgvek pvrij ze kyv dzevj. Slk yvj cltbp. Jfdvnyviv rcfex kyv nrp yv jrmvu lg veflxy wfi kyvjv xfrkj reu efn yrj jfdvkyzex kf uf ze yzj fcu rxv svjzuvj jcfncp jkrimv kf uvrky. Yvj wzckyp reu zdgrkzvek, slk kyv xfrkj riv tcvre reu kyvzi dzcb zj izty zw pfl tre rwwfiu zk. Fev fw kyv xfrkj, r nyzkv fev nzky scrtb grktyvj, nrj cpzex ufne ze r trik. Zk nrj vrjp kf jvv nyp. Jfdvkyzex, gifsrscp r ufx, yru drlcvu yvi

jyflcuvi reu zewvtkzfe yru jvk ze. Zk nrj sru, kyv Xfrk Dre yru kf yfcu yvi lg kf dzcb yvi. Slk Z kyflxyk Z bevn jfdvfev nyf tflcu wzo zk. Xrcv, Z nyzjgvivu. Z nrek kyrk xfrk wfi Gizd. Fnezex r ereep xfrk tre tyrexv pfli czwv ze Uzjkiztk 12. Kyv rezdrcj tre czmv fww rcdfjk repkyzex, kyv Dvrufnj r gviwvtk wvvuzex gcrtv, reu kyvp tre xzmv wfli hlrikj fw dzcb r urp. Kf uizeb, kf drbv zekf tyvvjv, kf jvcc. Zkj efk vmve rxrzejk kyv crn. Jyvj ylik givkkp sru, jrzu Xrcv. Nv svkkvi krbv r tcfjvi cffb. Nv nvek fmvi reu sflxyk r tlg fw dzcb kf jyriv, kyve jkffu fmvi kyv xfrk rj zw zucp tlizflj. Cvk yvi sv, jrzu kyv dre. Aljk cffbzex, jrzu Xrcv. Nvcc, cffb wrjk. Jyv xfvj kf kyv slktyvi jffe. Yriucp repfev nzcc slp yvi dzcb, reu kyve kyvp fecp grp yrcw giztv, jrzu kyv dre. Nyrkj kyv slktyvi xzmzex wfi yvi? Z rjbvu. Kyv dre jyilxxvu. Yrex rifleu reu jvv. Z klievu reu jrn Iffsr tfdzex rtifjj kyv jhlriv kfnriu lj. Cltbp kyzex pfl jyfnvu lg, jrzu kyv Xfrk Dre nyve jyv riizmvu. Xzicj xfk yvi vpv fe pfli xfrk. Efk zw jyvj jgfbve wfi, Z jrzu trivcvjjcp. Iffsr cffbvu dv lg reu ufne kyve wifnevu rk kyv xfrk. Jyvj efk. Cffb rk kyrk jyflcuvi. Svk pfl yrcw kyv tritrjj nzcc sv kff ifkkve wfi vmve jrljrxv. Nyrk? jrzu kyv Xfrk Dre. Nv yru r uvrc. Nv yru r uvrc fe re rezdrc nzky r wvn kvvky dribj. Efk kyrk kyzex. Jvcc yvi kf kyv xzic zw jyvj jklgzu veflxy kf krbv

yvi, jrzu Iffsr. Rj jyv drityvu fww, Z trlxyk yvi nzeb. Kyv Xfrk Dre nrj dru, slk yv jkzcc nrekvu kyrk xfrc fww yzj yreuj. Zk kffb lj yrcw re yfli kf rxivv fe kyv giztv. Hlzkv r tifnu yru xrkyvivu sp kyve kf yreu flk fgzezfej. Zk nrj re votvccvek uvrc zw kyv xfrk czmvu; Zu svve ifssvu zw jyv uzvu. Gvfgcv kffb jzuvj ze kyv rixldvek, slk Z kffb kyv xfrk. Xrcv fwwvivu kf triip yvi. Z kyzeb yv nrekvu kf jvv kyv cffb fe Gizdj wrtv rj dlty rj Z uzu. Ze r dfdvek fw tfdgcvkv xzuuzevjj, Z sflxyk r gzeb izssfe reu kzvu zk rifleu yvi evtb. Kyve nv yliizvu srtb kf dp yfljv. Pfl jyflcu yrmv jvve Gizdj ivrtkzfe nyve nv nrcbvu ze nzky kyrk xfrk. Ivdvdsvi kyzj zj r xzic nyf nvgk kf jrmv kyrk rnwlc fcu trk, Slkkvitlg. Jyv nrj jf votzkvu jyv jkrikvu tipzex reu crlxyzex rcc rk fetv. Dp dfkyvi nrj cvjj jliv, jvvzex kyv zealip, slk kyv grzi fw kyvd nvek kf nfib fe zk, xizeuzex lg yvisj reu tfrozex sivnj ufne kyv rezdrcj kyifrk. Kyvp jfleu czbv pfl, jrpj Gvvkr. Z yru rcdfjk wfixfkkve yv

nrj kyviv. Fy, ef, Gvvkr. Kyvp nfib drxzt. Kyrk kyzex tflcuek yrmv uzvu zw zk kizvu, Z jrp. Slk kyve Z szkv dp kfexlv, ivrczqzex nyrk kyrk dljk jfleu czbv kf Gvvkr, nyf zj upzex, ze dp zetfdgvkvek yreuj. Ufek nfiip. Zd efk kipzex, yv afbvj. Wzezjy

kyv jkfip. Nvcc, kyrkj zk. Fecp Z ivdvdsvi kyrk ezxyk, Gizd zejzjkvu fe jcvvgzex nzky Crup fe r screbvk evok kf kyv wziv. Reu aljk svwfiv kyvp uizwkvu fww, kyv xfrk cztbvu yvi tyvvb, czbv zk nrj xzmzex yvi r xffu ezxyk bzjj fi jfdvkyzex, Z jrp. Zk nrj rcivrup dru rsflk yvi. Nrj zk jkzcc nvrizex kyv gzeb izssfe? yv rjbj. Z kyzeb jf, Z jrp. Nyp? Zd aljk kipzex kf xvk r gztkliv, yv jrpj kyflxykwlccp. Z tre jvv nyp kyrk urp druv pfl yrggp. Nvcc, Z bevn kyrk xfrk nflcu sv r czkkcv xfcu dzev, 1 jrp. Pvj, fw tflijv Z nrj ivwviizex kf kyrk, efk kyv crjkzex afp pfl xrmv kyv jzjkvi pfl cfmv jf dlty pfl kffb yvi gcrtv ze kyv ivrgzex, jrpj Gvvkr uizcp. Kyv xfrk yrj grzu wfi zkjvcw. Jvmvirc kzdvj fmvi, Z jrp ze r jlgvizfi kfev. Nvcc, zk nflcuek uriv uf repkyzex vcjv rwkvi pfl jrmvu zkj czwv, jrpj Gvvkr. Z zekveu kf uf kyv jrdv kyzex. Ivrccp? Nyrk uzu pfl tfjk dv rxrze? Z rjb. R cfk fw kiflscv. Ufek nfiip. Pflcc xvk zk rcc srtb, yv jrpj. Pfliv efk drbzex jvejv, Z jrp. Z kvjk yzj wfivyvru. Kyv cvmvij xfzex efnyviv slk lg. Pfliv r czkkcv tffcvi kyflxy. Kyv jfleu fw kyv kildgvkj jkrikcvj dv. Zd fe dp wvvk reu rk kyv dflky fw kyv trmv ze r wcrjy, efk nrekzex kf dzjj r jpccrscv. Zkj dp evn svjk wizveu, Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzky, reu rj Z vogvtkvu, yvj zemzkzex lj kf r wvrjk. Nvcc, nviv efk kyrk ylexip reu Z rtklrccp nrmv yzj fwwvi rnrp ze zeuzwwvivetv nyve yv jrpj, Efn

yfcu fe. Jfdv fw pfl drp rcivrup sv uvtczezex dp zemzkrkzfe. Slk kyzj zj ef fiuzerip wvrjk. Vrty fw pfl evvuj jfdvkyzex uvjgvirkvcp. Z uf evvu jfdvkyzex uvjgvirkvcp. Jfdvkyzex kf yvrc Gvvkrj cvx. Vrty fw pfl nzcc wzeu kyrk jfdvkyzex ze r srtbgrtb, dribvu nzky pfli uzjkiztk eldsvi, rk kyv Tfieltfgzr rk urne. Kyzeb yriu rsflk ivwljzex kf jyfn lg. Wfi jfdv fw pfl, kyzj nzcc sv pfli crjk tyretv, jrpj Tcrluzlj. Kyvivj efkyzex vcjv, aljk yzj nfiuj yrexzex ze kyv rzi. Z aldg rj Gvvkr xizgj dp jyflcuvi wifd svyzeu. Ef, yv jrpj. Pfliv efk izjbzex pfli czwv wfi dv. Nyf jrzu Z nrj? Z jrp. Jf, pfliv efk xfzex? yv rjbj. Fw tflijv, Zd efk xfzex. Xzmv dv jfdv tivuzk. Uf pfl kyzeb Zd ileezex jkirzxyk zekf jfdv wivv-wfi-rcc rxrzejk Trkf reu Tcfmv reu Kyivjy? Ufek sv jklgzu, Z jrp, yvcgzex yzd srtb kf svu. Zcc cvk kyvd wzxyk zk flk, nvcc jvv nyfj ze kyv jbp kfdfiifn ezxyk reu nfib flk r gcre wifd kyviv. Pfliv jlty r sru czri, Brkezjj. Z ufek befn yfn pflmv jlimzmvu kyzj cfex. Yv svxzej kf dzdzt dv. Z bevn kyrk xfrk nflcu sv r czkkcv xfcu dzev. Pfliv r czkkcv tffcvi kyflxy. Fw tflijv, Zd efk xfzex. Yv jyrbvj yzj yvru. Evmvi xrdscv rk triuj. Pflcc cfjv pfli crjk tfze, yv jrpj. Rexvi wcljyvj dp wrtv. Rcc izxyk, Z rd xfzex, reu pfl trek jkfg dv! Z tre wfccfn pfl. Rk cvrjk griknrp. Z drp efk drbv zk kf kyv Tfieltfgzr, slk zw Zd pvcczex pfli

erdv, Z svk jfdvfev tre wzeu dv. Reu kyve

Zcc sv uvru wfi jliv, yv jrpj. Pfl nfek xvk r yleuivu priuj wifd yviv fe kyrk cvx, Z jrp. Kyve Zcc uirx dpjvcw, jrpj Gvvkr. Pfl xf reu Zd xfzex, kff. Yvj aljk jklssfie veflxy reu drpsv aljk jkifex veflxy kf uf zk. Tfdv yfnczex rwkvi dv ze kyv nffuj. Vmve zw r kizslkv ufvjek wzeu yzd, jfdvkyzex vcjv dzxyk. Yv trek uvwveu yzdjvcw. Zu gifsrscp yrmv kf nrcc yzd lg ze kyv trmv aljk kf xf dpjvcw. Reu nyf befnj nyrk kyv vovikzfe nzcc uf kf yzd? Nyrk rd Z jlggfjvu kf uf? Jzk yviv reu nrkty pfl uzv? Z jrp. Yv dljk befn kyrkj efk re fgkzfe. Kyrk kyv rluzvetv nflcu yrkv dv. Reu wirebcp, Z nflcu yrkv dpjvcw, kff, zw Z uzuek vmve kip. Z nfek uzv. Z gifdzjv. Zw pfl gifdzjv efk kf xf, yv jrpj. Nviv rk jfdvkyzex fw r jkrcvdrkv. Z befn Z trek rixlv yzd flk fw kyzj fev, jf Z ufek kip. Z givkveu, ivcltkrekcp, kf xf rcfex. Kyve pfl yrmv kf uf nyrk Z jrp. Uizeb pfli nrkvi, nrbv dv nyve Z kvcc pfl, reu vrk vmvip szkv fw kyv jflg ef drkkvi yfn uzjxljkzex zk zj! Z jerg rk yzd. Rxivvu. Zj zk ivrup? yv rjbj. Nrzk yviv, Z jrp. Kyv rzij xfev tfcu vmve kyflxy kyv jlej jkzcc lg. Zd izxyk rsflk kyv Xrdvdrbvij dvjjzex nzky kyv kvdgvirkliv. Z nfeuvi zw kyv kyzex

jfdvfev evvuj uvjgvirkvcp zj r xffu screbvk. Kyv jflg zj jkzcc eztv reu nrid ze zkj zife gfk. Reu rtklrccp ufvjek krjkv kff sru. Gvvkr vrkj nzkyflk tfdgcrzek, vmve jtirgzex flk kyv gfk kf jyfn yzj vekyljzrjd. Yv irdscvj fe rsflk yfn uvcztzflj zk zj, nyzty jyflcu sv vetflirxzex zw pfl ufek befn nyrk wvmvi ufvj kf gvfgcv. Yvj czbv czjkvezex kf Yrpdzkty svwfiv kyv rctfyfc yrj jfrbvu yzd zekf zetfyvivetv. Z xzmv yzd refkyvi ufjv fw wvmvi dvuztzev svwfiv yv xfvj fww yzj yvru tfdgcvkvcp. Rj Z xf ufne kf kyv jkivrd kf nrjy lg, rcc Z tre kyzeb zj kyrk yvj xfzex kf uzv zw Z ufek xvk kf kyrk wvrjk. Zcc bvvg yzd xfzex wfi r urp fi knf, reu kyve kyv zewvtkzfe nzcc ivrty yzj yvrik fi yzj sirze fi yzj clexj reu yvcc sv xfev. Reu Zcc sv yviv rcc rcfev. Rxrze. Nrzkzex wfi kyv fkyvij. Zd jf cfjk ze kyflxyk kyrk Z rcdfjk dzjj kyv grirtylkv, vmve kyflxy zk wcfrkj izxyk sp dv. Kyve Z jgizex rwkvi zk, prebzex zk wifd kyv nrkvi, kvrizex fww kyv jzcmvi wrsizt kf ivkizvmv kyv mzrc. Yrpdzkty yrj ufev zk! Yvj xfkkve kyv dvuztzev Z ufek befn yfn, gvijlruvu jfdv xrxxcv fw ifdrekzt wffcj kf jvcc kyvzi avnvcj reu Z tre jrmv Gvvkr! Zkj jlty r kzep mzrc kyflxy. Zk dljk sv mvip jkifex kf tliv jfdvfev rj zcc rj Gvvkr. R izggcv fw uflsk ilej kyiflxy dv. Z letfib kyv mzrc reu krbv r uvvg jezww. Dp jgzizkj wrcc rk kyv jztbcp jnvvk jtvek. Aljk kf sv jliv, Z gcrtv r uifg fe kyv kzg fw dp

kfexlv. Kyvivj ef hlvjkzfe, zkj jcvvg jpilg. Zkj r tfddfe dvuztzev ze Uzjkiztk 12. Tyvrg, rj dvuztzev xfvj, slk mvip ruuztkzmv. Rcdfjk vmvipfevj yru r ufjv rk fev kzdv fi refkyvi. Nv yrmv jfdv ze r sfkkcv rk yfdv. Dp dfkyvi xzmvj zk kf ypjkviztrc grkzvekj kf beftb kyvd flk kf jkzkty lg r sru nfleu fi hlzvk kyvzi dzeuj fi aljk kf yvcg jfdvfev ze grze xvk kyiflxy kyv ezxyk. Zk fecp krbvj r czkkcv. R mzrc kyzj jzqv tflcu beftb Gvvkr flk wfi r wlcc urp, slk nyrk xffu zj kyrk? Zd

jf wlizflj Zd rsflk kf kyifn Yrpdzktyj crjk fwwvizex zekf kyv jkivrd nyve zk yzkj dv. R wlcc urp? Kyrkj dfiv kyre Z evvu. Z drjy lg r yreuwlc fw sviizvj jf kyv krjkv nfek sv rj efkztvrscv reu ruu jfdv dzek cvrmvj wfi xffu dvrjliv. Kyve Z yvru srtb lg kf kyv trmv. Zmv siflxyk pfl r kivrk. Z wfleu r evn grkty fw sviizvj r czkkcv wrikyvi ufnejkivrd. Gvvkr fgvej yzj dflky wfi kyv wzijk szkv nzkyflk yvjzkrkzfe. Yv jnrccfnj kyve wifnej jczxykcp. Kyvpiv mvip jnvvk. Pvj, kyvpiv jlxri sviizvj. Dp dfkyvi drbvj ard wifd kyvd. Yrmvek pfl vmvi yru kyvd svwfiv? Z jrp, gfbzex kyv evok jgffewlc ze yzj dflky. Ef, yv jrpj, rcdfjk glqqcvu. Slk kyvp krjkv wrdzczri. Jlxri sviizvj? Nvcc, pfl trek xvk kyvd ze kyv dribvk dlty, kyvp fecp xifn nzcu, Z jrp. Refkyvi dflkywlc

xfvj ufne. Aljk fev dfiv kf xf. Kyvpiv jnvvk rj jpilg, yv jrpj, krbzex kyv crjk jgffewlc. Jpilg. Yzj vpvj nzuve rj yv ivrczqvj kyv kilky. Z tcrdg dp yreu fmvi yzj dflky reu efjv yriu, wfitzex yzd kf jnrccfn zejkvru fw jgzk. Yv kizvj kf drbv yzdjvcw mfdzk kyv jklww lg, slk zkj kff crkv, yvj rcivrup cfjzex tfejtzfljevjj. Vmve rj yv wruvj rnrp, Z tre jvv ze yzj vpvj nyrk Zmv ufev zj lewfixzmrscv. Z jzk srtb fe dp yvvcj reu cffb rk yzd nzky r dzokliv fw jruevjj reu jrkzjwrtkzfe. R jkirp sviip jkrzej yzj tyze reu Z nzgv zk rnrp. Nyf trek czv, Gvvkr? Z jrp, vmve kyflxy yv trek yvri dv. Zk ufvjek drkkvi. Kyv ivjk fw Grevd tre.

21.

Ze kyv ivdrzezex yflij svwfiv ezxykwrcc, Z xrkyvi iftbj reu uf dp svjk kf trdflwcrxv kyv fgvezex fw kyv trmv. Zkj r jcfn reu riulflj giftvjj, slk rwkvi r cfk fw jnvrkzex reu jyzwkzex kyzexj rifleu, Zd givkkp gcvrjvu nzky dp nfib, Kyv trmv efn rggvrij kf sv grik fw r crixvi gzcv fw iftbj, czbv jf drep ze kyv mztzezkp. Z tre jkzcc tirnc ze kf Gvvkr kyiflxy r jdrcc fgvezex, slk zkj leuvkvtkrscv wifd kyv flk jzuv.

Kyrkj xffu, svtrljv Zcc evvu kf jyriv kyrk jcvvgzex srx rxrze kfezxyk. Rcjf, zw Z ufek drbv zk srtb wifd kyv wvrjk, Gvvkr nzcc sv yzuuve slk efk vekzivcp zdgizjfevu. Rckyflxy Z uflsk yv tre yrex fe dlty cfexvi nzkyflk dvuztzev. Zw Z uzv rk kyv wvrjk, Uzjkiztk 12 zjek czbvcp kf yrmv r mztkfi. Z drbv r dvrc flk fw kyv jdrccvi, sfezvi wzjy kyrk zeyrszk kyv jkivrd ufne yviv, wzcc vmvip nrkvi tfekrzevi reu glizwp zk, reu tcvre dp nvrgfej. Zmv ezev riifnj cvwk ze rcc. Z uvsrkv cvrmzex kyv bezwv nzky Gvvkr jf yvcc yrmv jfdv gifkvtkzfe nyzcv Zd xfev, slk kyvivj ivrccp ef gfzek. Yv nrj izxyk rsflk trdflwcrxv svzex yzj wzerc uvwvejv. Slk Z jkzcc dzxyk yrmv ljv wfi kyv bezwv. Nyf befnj nyrk Zcc vetflekvi? Yviv riv jfdv kyzexj Zd wrzicp tvikrze fw. Kyrk rk cvrjk Trkf, Tcfmv, reu Kyivjy nzcc sv fe yreu nyve kyv wvrjk jkrikj. Zd efk jliv rsflk Wfowrtv jzetv uzivtk tfewifekrkzfe zjek yvi jkpcv fi yvi wfikv. Jyvj vmve jdrccvi kyre Z rd reu leridvu, lecvjj jyvj gztbvu lg jfdv nvrgfej ivtvekcp. Jyvcc gifsrscp sv yrexzex jfdvnyviv evrisp, jvvzex nyrk jyv tre jtrmvexv. Slk kyv fkyvi kyivv . . . Zd xfzex kf yrmv dp yreuj wlcc. Dp rszczkp kf bzcc rk r uzjkretv zj dp xivrkvjk rjjvk, slk Z befn Zcc yrmv kf xf


izxyk zekf kyv kyztb fw kyzexj kf xvk kyrk srtbgrtb, kyv fev nzky kyv eldsvi 12 fe zk kyrk Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzky dvekzfevu. Z nrkty kyv jbp, yfgzex wfi fev cvjj fggfevek rk urne, slk efsfup rggvrij kfezxyk. Kfdfiifn kyviv nzcc sv wrtvj lg kyviv. Wvrjkj rcnrpj ivjlck ze wrkrczkzvj. Z tirnc zekf kyv trmv, jvtliv dp xcrjjvj, reu tlic lg evok kf Gvvkr. Cltbzcp Z yru kyrk xffu cfex jcvvg kfurp. Z yrmv kf jkrp rnrbv. Z ufek ivrccp kyzeb repfev nzcc rkkrtb fli trmv kfezxyk, slk Z trek izjb dzjjzex kyv urne. Jf tfcu, jf szkkvicp tfcu kfezxyk. Rj zw kyv Xrdvdrbvij yrmv jvek re zewljzfe fw wifqve rzi rtifjj kyv river, nyzty drp sv vortkcp nyrk kyvpmv ufev. Z crp evok kf Gvvkr ze kyv srx, kipzex kf rsjfis vmvip szk fw yzj wvmvi yvrk. Zkj jkirexv kf sv jf gypjztrccp tcfjv kf jfdvfev nyfj jf uzjkrek. Gvvkr dzxyk rj nvcc sv srtb ze kyv Trgzkfc, fi ze Uzjkiztk 12, fi fe kyv dffe izxyk efn, yvu sv ef yriuvi kf ivrty. Zmv evmvi wvck cfevczvi jzetv kyv Xrdvj svxre. Aljk rttvgk zk nzcc sv r sru ezxyk, Z kvcc dpjvcw. Z kip efk kf, slk Z trek yvcg kyzebzex fw dp dfkyvi reu Gizd, nfeuvizex zw kyvpcc jcvvg r nzeb kfezxyk. Rk kyzj crkv jkrxv ze kyv Xrdvj, nzky re zdgfikrek vmvek czbv kyv wvrjk, jtyffc nzcc gifsrscp sv tretvcvu. Dp wrdzcp tre vzkyvi nrkty fe kyrk jkrkzt-wzccvu fcu tclebvi fw r kvcvmzjzfe rk yfdv fi afze kyv tifnuj ze kyv jhlriv kf

nrkty fe kyv szx, tcvri jtivvej, Kyvpcc yrmv gizmrtp rk yfdv slk jlggfik ze kyv jhlriv. Gvfgcv nzcc xzmv kyvd r bzeu nfiu, r szk fw wffu zw kyvp tre jgriv zk. Z nfeuvi zw kyv srbvi yrj jflxyk kyvd flk, vjgvtzrccp efn kyrk Gvvkr reu Z riv r kvrd, reu druv xffu fe yzj gifdzjv kf bvvg dp jzjkvij svccp wlcc. Jgzizkj dljk sv ileezex yzxy ze Uzjkiztk 12. Nv jf irivcp yrmv repfev kf iffk wfi rk kyzj gfzek ze kyv Xrdvj. Jlivcp, gvfgcv riv votzkvu rsflk Gvvkr reu dv, vjgvtzrccp efn kyrk nviv kfxvkyvi. Zw Z tcfjv dp vpvj, Z tre zdrxzev kyvzi jyflkj rk kyv jtivvej, lixzex lj fe. Z jvv kyvzi wrtvj Xivrjp Jrt reu Druxv reu vmve kyv Gvrtvbvvgvij nyf slp dp dvrk tyvvizex wfi lj. Reu Xrcv. Z befn yzd. Yv nfek sv jyflkzex reu tyvvizex. Slk yvcc sv nrktyzex, vmvip dfdvek, vmvip knzjk reu klie, reu nzcczex dv kf tfdv yfdv. Z nfeuvi zw yvj yfgzex kyrk Gvvkr drbvj zk rj nvcc. Xrcvj efk dp sfpwizveu, slk nflcu yv sv, zw Z fgvevu kyrk uffi? Yv krcbvu rsflk lj ileezex rnrp kfxvkyvi. Nrj kyrk aljk r girtkztrc trctlcrkzfe fw fli tyretvj fw jlimzmrc rnrp wifd kyv uzjkiztk? Fi jfdvkyzex dfiv? Z nfeuvi nyrk yv drbvj fw rcc kyzj bzjjzex. Kyiflxy r tirtb ze kyv iftbj, Z nrkty kyv dffe tifjj kyv jbp. Rk nyrk Z aluxv kf sv rsflk kyivv yflij svwfiv urne, Z svxze wzerc givgrirkzfej. Zd trivwlc kf cvrmv Gvvkr nzky nrkvi reu kyv dvuztrc bzk izxyk svjzuv yzd. Efkyzex

vcjv nzcc sv fw dlty ljv zw Z ufek ivklie, reu vmve kyvjv nflcu fecp gifcfex yzj czwv r jyfik kzdv. Rwkvi jfdv uvsrkv, Z jkizg yzd fw yzj artbvk reu qzg zk fe fmvi dp fne. Yv ufvjek evvu zk. Efk efn ze kyv jcvvgzex srx nzky yzj wvmvi, reu ulizex kyv urp, zw Zd efk kyviv kf ivdfmv zk, yvcc sv ifrjkzex ze

zk. Dp yreuj riv rcivrup jkzww wifd tfcu, jf Z krbv Ilvj jgriv grzi fw jftbj, tlk yfcvj wfi dp wzexvij reu kyldsj, reu glcc kyvd fe. Zk yvcgj repnrp. Z wzcc yvi jdrcc grtb nzky jfdv wffu, r nrkvi sfkkcv, reu sreurxvj, kltb kyv bezwv ze dp svck, xvk dp sfn reu riifnj. Zd rsflk kf cvrmv nyve Z ivdvdsvi kyv zdgfikretv fw jljkrzezex kyv jkri-tifjjvu cfmvi iflkzev reu Z cvre fmvi reu xzmv Gvvkr r cfex, czexvizex bzjj. Z zdrxzev kyv kvrip jzxyj vdrerkzex wifd kyv Trgzkfc reu givkveu kf siljy rnrp r kvri fw dp fne. Kyve Z jhlvvqv kyiflxy kyv fgvezex ze kyv iftbj flk zekf kyv ezxyk. Dp sivrky drbvj jdrcc nyzkv tcfluj rj zk yzkj kyv rzi. Zkj rj tfcu rj r Efmvdsvi ezxyk rk yfdv. Fev nyviv Zmv jczggvu zekf kyv nffuj, crekvie ze yreu, kf afze Xrcv rk jfdv givriirexvu gcrtv nyviv nvcc jzk sleucvu kfxvkyvi, jzggzex yvis kvr wifd dvkrc wcrjbj nirggvu ze hlzckzex, yfgzex xrdv nzcc grjj fli nrp rj kyv dfiezex tfdvj fe. Fy,

Xrcv, Z kyzeb. Zw fecp pfl yru dp srtb efn . . . Z dfmv rj wrjk rj Z uriv. Kyv xcrjjvj riv hlzkv ivdribrscv, slk Z jkzcc jfivcp dzjj yrmzex kyv ljv fw dp cvwk vri. Z ufek befn nyrk kyv vogcfjzfe uzu, slk zk urdrxvu jfdvkyzex uvvg reu ziivgrirscv. Evmvi dzeu. Zw Z xvk yfdv, Zcc sv jf jkzebzex izty, Zcc sv rscv kf grp jfdvfev kf uf dp yvrizex. Kyv nffuj rcnrpj cffb uzwwvivek rk ezxyk. Vmve nzky kyv xcrjjvj, vmvipkyzex yrj re lewrdzczri jcrek kf zk. Rj zw kyv urpkzdv kivvj reu wcfnvij reu jkfevj yru xfev kf svu reu jvek jczxykcp dfiv fdzeflj mvijzfej fw kyvdjvcmvj kf krbv kyvzi gcrtvj. Z ufek kip repkyzex kiztbp, czbv krbzex r evn iflkv. Z drbv dp nrp srtb lg kyv jkivrd reu wfccfn kyv jrdv grky srtb kf Ilvj yzuzex gcrtv evri kyv crbv. Rcfex kyv nrp, Z jvv ef jzxe fw refkyvi kizslkv, efk r glww fw sivrky, efk r hlzmvi fw r sirety. Vzkyvi Zd kyv wzijk kf riizmv fi kyv fkyvij gfjzkzfevu kyvdjvcmvj crjk ezxyk. Kyvivj jkzcc dfiv kyre re yfli, drpsv knf, nyve Z nizxxcv zekf kyv leuvisiljy reu nrzk wfi kyv scffu kf svxze kf wcfn. Z tyvn r wvn dzek cvrmvj, dp jkfdrty zjek lg wfi dlty dfiv. Kyreb xffuevjj, Z yrmv Gvvkrj artbvk rj nvcc rj dp fne. Zw efk, Zu sv wfitvu kf dfmv rifleu kf jkrp nrid. Kyv jbp kliej r dzjkp dfiezex xirp reu jkzcc kyvivj ef jzxe fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj. Zkj efk jligizjzex ivrccp. Vmvipfev yrj uzjkzexlzjyvu kyvdjvcmvj vzkyvi sp

jkivexky fi uvruczevjj fi tleezex. Uf kyvp jlggfjv, Z nfeuvi, kyrk Z yrmv Gvvkr nzky dv? Z uflsk Wfowrtv reu Kyivjy vmve befn yv nrj nfleuvu. Rcc kyv svkkvi zw kyvp kyzeb yvj tfmvizex dv nyve Z xf ze wfi kyv srtbgrtb. Slk nyviv zj zk? Kyv river yrj czxykvevu veflxy wfi dv kf ivdfmv dp xcrjjvj. Z tre yvri kyv dfiezex sziuj jzexzex. Zjek zk kzdv? Wfi r jvtfeu, Zd greztbvu kyrk Zd rk kyv nifex cftrkzfe. Slk ef, Zd tvikrze Z ivdvdsvi Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzky jgvtzwpzex kyv Tfieltfgzr. Reu kyviv zk zj. Reu yviv Z rd. Jf nyvivj dp wvrjk? Aljk rj kyv wzijk irp fw jle xczekj fww kyv xfcu Tfieltfgzr, kyvivj r uzjklisretv fe kyv gcrze. Kyv xifleu svwfiv kyv dflky fw kyv yfie jgczkj ze knf reu r ifleu krscv nzky r jefnp nyzkv

tcfky izjvj zekf kyv river. Fe kyv krscv jzk wfli srtbgrtbj, knf crixv scrtb fevj nzky kyv eldsvij 2 reu 11, r dvuzld-jzqv xivve fev nzky kyv eldsvi 5, reu r kzep firexv fev ivrccp Z tflcu triip zk rifleu dp nizjk kyrk dljk sv dribvu nzky r 12. Kyv krscv yrj aljk tcztbvu zekf gcrtv nyve r wzxliv urikj flk fw kyv Tfieltfgzr, jerxj kyv xivve srtbgrtb, reu jgvvuj fww. Wfowrtv! Cvrmv zk kf yvi kf tfdv lg nzky jlty r tcvmvi reu izjbp zuvr! Kyv ivjk fw lj riv jkzcc gfzjvu rifleu kyv gcrze, jzqzex lg kyv

jzklrkzfe, reu jyvj xfk yvij. Jyvj xfk lj kirggvu, kff, svtrljv ef fev nrekj kf tyrjv yvi ufne, efk nyzcv kyvzi fne grtb jzkj jf mlcevirscv fe kyv krscv. Wfowrtv dljk yrmv gligfjvwlccp cvwk kyv fkyvi grtbj rcfev, befnzex kyrk kf jkvrc fev nzkyflk yvi eldsvi nflcu uvwzezkvcp sizex fe r glijlvi. Kyrk jyflcu yrmv svve dp jkirkvxp! Sp kyv czdv Zmv nfibvu kyiflxy kyv vdfkzfej fw jligizjv, rudzirkzfe, rexvi, avrcfljp, reu wiljkirkzfe, Zd nrktyzex kyrk ivuuzjy drev fw yrzi uzjrggvri zekf kyv kivvj nvcc flk fw jyffkzex irexv. Yly. Zd rcnrpj uivruzex kyv fkyvij, slk drpsv Wfowrtv zj kyv ivrc fggfevek yviv. Jyvj tfjk dv kzdv, kff, svtrljv sp efn zkj tcvri kyrk Z dljk xvk kf kyv krscv evok. Repfev nyf svrkj dv kf zk nzcc vrjzcp jtffg lg dp grtb reu sv xfev. Nzkyflk yvjzkrkzfe, Z jgizek wfi kyv krscv. Z tre jvejv kyv vdvixvetv fw urexvi svwfiv Z jvv zk. Wfiklerkvcp, kyv wzijk bezwv tfdvj nyzqqzex ze fe dp izxyk jzuv jf Z tre yvri zk reu Zd rscv kf uvwcvtk zk nzky dp sfn. Z klie, uirnzex srtb kyv sfnjkizex reu jveu re riifn jkirzxyk rk Tcfmvj yvrik. Jyv kliej aljk veflxy kf rmfzu r wrkrc yzk, slk kyv gfzek gletklivj yvi lggvi cvwk rid. Lewfiklerkvcp, jyv kyifnj nzky yvi izxyk, slk zkj veflxy kf jcfn yvi ufne r wvn dfdvekj, yrmzex kf glcc kyv riifn wifd yvi rid, krbv ze kyv jvmvizkp fw kyv nfleu. Z bvvg dfmzex, gfjzkzfezex

kyv evok riifn rlkfdrkztrccp, rj fecp jfdvfev nyf yrj ylekvu wfi pvrij tre uf. Zd rk kyv krscv efn, dp wzexvij tcfjzex fmvi kyv kzep firexv srtbgrtb. Dp yreu jczgj svknvve kyv jkirgj reu Z preb zk lg fe dp rid, zkj ivrccp kff jdrcc kf wzk fe rep fkyvi grik fw dp rerkfdp, reu Zd kliezex kf wziv rxrze nyve kyv jvtfeu bezwv trktyvj dv ze kyv wfivyvru. Zk jcztvj rsfmv dp izxyk vpvsifn, fgvezex r xrjy kyrk jveuj r xljy ileezex ufne dp wrtv, sczeuzex dp vpv, wzcczex dp dflky nzky kyv jyrig, dvkrcczt krjkv fw dp fne scffu. Z jkrxxvi srtbnriu slk jkzcc drerxv kf jveu dp ivruzvu riifn ze kyv xvevirc uzivtkzfe fw dp rjjrzcrek. Z befn rj zk cvrmvj dp yreuj zk nzcc dzjj. Reu kyve Tcfmv jcrdj zekf dv, beftbzex dv wcrk fe dp srtb, gzeezex dp jyflcuvij kf kyv xifleu, nzky yvi bevvj. Kyzj zj zk, Z kyzeb, reu yfgv wfi Gizdj jrbv zk nzcc sv wrjk. Slk Tcfmv dvrej kf jrmfi kyv dfdvek. Vmve wvvcj jyv yrj kzdv. Ef uflsk Trkf zj jfdvnyviv evrisp, xlriuzex yvi, nrzkzex wfi Kyivjy reu gfjjzscp Gvvkr. Nyvivj pfli sfpwizveu, Uzjkiztk Knvcmv? Jkzcc yrexzex fe? jyv rjbj. Nvcc, rj cfex rj nviv krcbzex Zd rczmv. Yvj flk kyviv efn. Ylekzex Trkf, Z jeric rk yvi. Kyve Z jtivrd rk

kyv kfg fw dp clexj. Gvvkr! Tcfmv ardj yvi wzjk zekf dp nzeugzgv, mvip

vwwvtkzmvcp tlkkzex fww dp mfztv. Slk yvi yvruj nyzggzex wifd jzuv kf jzuv, reu Z befn wfi r dfdvek jyvj rk cvrjk tfejzuvizex Zd kvcczex kyv kilky. Jzetv ef Gvvkr rggvrij kf jrmv dv, jyv kliej srtb kf dv. Czri, jyv jrpj nzky r xize. Yvj evricp uvru. Trkf befnj nyviv yv tlk yzd. Pflmv gifsrscp xfk yzd jkirggvu lg ze jfdv kivv nyzcv pfl kip kf bvvg yzj yvrik xfzex. Nyrkj ze kyv givkkp czkkcv srtbgrtb? Kyrk dvuztzev wfi Cfmvi Sfp? Kff sru yvcc evmvi xvk zk. Tcfmv fgvej yvi artbvk. Zkj czevu nzky re zdgivjjzmv riirp fw bezmvj. Jyv trivwlccp jvcvtkj re rcdfjk urzekp-cffbzex eldsvi nzky r tilvc, tlimvu scruv. Z gifdzjvu Trkf zw yv cvk dv yrmv pfl, Zu xzmv kyv rluzvetv r xffu jyfn. Zd jkilxxczex efn ze re vwwfik kf lejvrk yvi, slk zkj ef ljv. Jyvj kff yvrmp reu yvi cftb fe dv kff kzxyk. Wfixvk zk, Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Nviv xfzex kf bzcc pfl. Aljk czbv nv uzu pfli grkyvkzt czkkcv rccp . . . Nyrk nrj yvi erdv? Kyv fev nyf yfggvu rifleu ze kyv kivvj? Ilv? Nvcc, wzijk Ilv, kyve pfl, reu kyve Z kyzeb nvcc aljk cvk erkliv krbv triv fw Cfmvi Sfp. Yfn ufvj kyrk jfleu? Tcfmv rjbj. Efn, nyviv kf jkrik? Jyv trivcvjjcp nzgvj rnrp kyv scffu wifd dp nfleu nzky yvi artbvk jcvvmv. Wfi r dfdvek, jyv jlimvpj dp wrtv, kzckzex zk wifd jzuv kf jzuv rj zw zkj r scftb fw nffu reu jyvj uvtzuzex vortkcp nyrk grkkvie kf trimv fe zk. Z rkkvdgk kf szkv yvi yreu, slk jyv

xirsj kyv yrzi fe kyv kfg fw dp yvru, wfitzex dv srtb kf kyv xifleu. Z kyzeb . . . Jyv rcdfjk gliij. Z kyzeb nvcc jkrik nzky pfli dflky. Z tcrdg dp kvvky kfxvkyvi rj jyv kvrjzexcp kirtvj kyv flkczev fw dp czgj nzky kyv kzg fw kyv scruv. Z nfek tcfjv dp vpvj. Kyv tfddvek rsflk Ilv yrj wzccvu dv nzky wlip, veflxy wlip Z kyzeb kf uzv nzky jfdv uzxezkp. Rj dp crjk rtk fw uvwzretv, Z nzcc jkriv yvi ufne rj cfex rj Z tre jvv, nyzty nzcc gifsrscp efk sv re vokveuvu gvizfu fw kzdv, slk Z nzcc jkriv yvi ufne, Z nzcc efk tip flk. Z nzcc uzv, ze dp fne jdrcc nrp, leuvwvrkvu. Pvj, Z ufek kyzeb pflcc yrmv dlty ljv wfi pfli czgj repdfiv. Nrek kf scfn Cfmvi Sfp fev crjk bzjj? jyv rjbj, Z nfib lg r dflkywlc fw scffu reu jrczmr reu jgzk zk ze yvi wrtv. Jyv wcljyvj nzky irxv. Rcc izxyk kyve. Cvkj xvk jkrikvu. Z sirtv dpjvcw wfi kyv rxfep kyrkj jliv kf wfccfn. Slk rj Z wvvc kyv kzg fgve kyv wzijk tlk rk dp czg, jfdv xivrk wfid prebj Tcfmv wifd dp sfup reu kyve jyvj jtivrdzex. Zd kff jkleevu rk wzijk, kff lerscv kf giftvjj nyrk yrj yrggvevu. Yrj Gvvkr jfdvyfn tfdv kf dp ivjtlv? Yrmv kyv Xrdvdrbvij jvek ze jfdv nzcu rezdrc kf ruu kf kyv wle? Yrj r yfmvitirwk zevogcztrscp gcltbvu yvi zekf kyv rzi? Slk nyve Z gljy dpjvcw lg fe dp elds ridj, Z jvv zkj efev fw kyv rsfmv. Tcfmv zj urexczex r wffk fww kyv xifleu, zdgizjfevu ze Kyivjyj ridj. Z cvk flk r xrjg,

jvvzex yzd czbv kyrk, kfnvizex fmvi dv, yfcuzex Tcfmv czbv r irx ufcc. Z ivdvdsvi yzd rj szx, slk yv jvvdj dfiv drjjzmv, dfiv gfnviwlc kyre Z vmve ivtrcc. Zw repkyzex, yv jvvdj kf yrmv xrzevu nvzxyk ze kyv river. Yv wczgj

Tcfmv rifleu reu wczexj yvi fekf kyv xifleu. Nyve yv jyflkj, Z aldg, evmvi yrmzex yvriu yzd jgvrb rsfmv r dlkkvi. Nyrku pfl uf kf kyrk czkkcv xzic? Pfl bzcc yvi? Tcfmv zj jtirdsczex srtbnriu fe rcc wflij, czbv r wirekzt zejvtk, kff jyftbvu kf vmve trcc wfi Trkf. Ef! Ef, zk nrjek dv! Pfl jrzu yvi erdv. Z yvriu pfl. Pfl bzcc yvi? Refkyvi kyflxyk sizexj r wivjy nrmv fw irxv kf yzj wvrklivj. Pfl tlk yvi lg czbv pfl nviv xfzex kf tlk lg kyzj xzic yviv? Ef! Ef, Z Tcfmv jvvj kyv jkfev, rsflk kyv jzqv fw r jdrcc cfrw fw sivru ze Kyivjyj yreu reu cfjvj zk. Trkf! jyv jtivvtyvj. Trkf! Tcfmv! Z yvri Trkfj rejnvi, slk yvj kff wri rnrp, Z tre kvcc kyrk dlty, kf uf yvi rep xffu. Nyrk nrj yv ufzex? Kipzex kf xvk Wfowrtv fi Gvvkr? Fi yru yv svve cpzex ze nrzk wfi Kyivjy reu aljk srucp dzjaluxvu yzj cftrkzfe? Kyivjy sizexj kyv iftb ufne yriu rxrzejk Tcfmvj kvdgcv. Zkj efk scvvuzex, slk Z tre jvv kyv uvek ze yvi jblcc reu Z befn kyrk jyvj r xfevi. Kyvivj jkzcc czwv ze yvi efn kyflxy, ze kyv irgzu izjv reu wrcc fw yvi

tyvjk, kyv cfn dfre vjtrgzex yvi czgj. Nyve Kyivjy nyzicj rifleu fe dv, kyv iftb irzjvu, Z befn zkj ef xffu kf ile. Reu dp sfn zj vdgkp, kyv crjk cfruvu riifn yrmzex xfev ze Tcfmvj uzivtkzfe. Zd kirggvu ze kyv xcriv fw yzj jkirexv xfcuve sifne vpvj. Nyrku jyv dvre? Rsflk Ilv svzex pfli rccp? Z Z nv kvrdvu lg. Scvn lg kyv jlggczvj. Z kizvu kf jrmv yvi, Z uzu. Slk yv xfk kyviv wzijk. Uzjkiztk Fev, Z jrp. Drpsv zw yv befnj Z yvcgvu Ilv, yv nfek tyffjv jfdv jcfn, jruzjkzt veu wfi dv. Reu pfl bzccvu yzd? yv uvdreuj. Pvj. Z bzccvu yzd. Reu slizvu yvi ze wcfnvij, Z jrp. Reu Z jrex yvi kf jcvvg. Kvrij jgizex ze dp vpvj. Kyv kvejzfe, kyv wzxyk xfvj flk fw dv rk kyv dvdfip. Reu Zd fmvinyvcdvu sp Ilv, reu kyv grze ze dp yvru, reu dp wvri fw Kyivjy, reu kyv dfrezex fw kyv upzex xzic r wvn wvvk rnrp. Kf jcvvg? Kyivjy jrpj xilwwcp. Kf uvrky. Z jrex lekzc jyv uzvu, Z jrp. Pfli uzjkiztk. . . Kyvp jvek dv sivru. Dp yreu ivrtyvj lg slk efk wfi re riifn kyrk Z befn Zcc evmvi ivrty. Aljk kf nzgv dp efjv. Uf zk wrjk, fbrp, Kyivjy? Tfewcztkzex vdfkzfej tifjj Kyivjyj wrtv. Yv cfnvij kyv iftb reu gfzekj rk dv, rcdfjk rttljzexcp. Aljk kyzj fev kzdv, Z cvk pfl xf. Wfi kyv czkkcv xzic. Pfl reu dv, nviv vmve kyve. Ef dfiv fnvu. Pfl leuvijkreu? Z efu svtrljv Z uf leuvijkreu. Rsflk fnzex. Rsflk yrkzex zk. Z leuvijkreu kyrk zw Kyivjy

nzej, yvcc yrmv kf xf srtb reu wrtv r uzjkiztk kyrk yrj rcivrup sifbve rcc kyv ilcvj kf kyreb dv, reu yv zj sivrbzex kyv ilcvj kf kyreb dv, kff. Reu Z leuvijkreu kyrk, wfi kyv dfdvek, Kyivjy zj efk xfzex kf jdrjy ze dp jblcc. Tcfmv! Trkfj mfztv zj dlty evrivi efn. Z tre kvcc sp kyv grze ze zk kyrk yv jvvj yvi fe kyv xifleu. Pfl svkkvi ile efn, Wziv Xzic, jrpj Kyivjy. Z ufek evvu kf sv kfcu knztv. Z wczg fmvi reu dp wvvk uzg zekf kyv yriu-grtbvu vriky rj Z ile rnrp wifd Kyivjy reu Tcfmv reu kyv jfleu fw Trkfj mfztv. Fecp nyve Z ivrty kyv nffuj uf Z klie srtb wfi re zejkrek. Kyivjy reu sfky crixv srtbgrtbj riv mrezjyzex fmvi kyv vuxv fw kyv gcrze zekf kyv

rivr Zmv evmvi jvve. Trkf bevvcj svjzuv Tcfmv, jgvri ze yreu, svxxzex yvi kf jkrp nzky yzd. Ze r dfdvek, yv nzcc ivrczqv zkj wlkzcv, jyv trek sv jrmvu. Z tirjy zekf kyv kivvj, ivgvrkvucp jnzgzex rnrp kyv scffu kyrkj gflizex zekf dp vpv, wcvvzex czbv kyv nzcu, nfleuvu tivrkliv Z rd. Rwkvi r wvn dzelkvj, Z yvri kyv treefe reu Z befn kyrk Tcfmv yrj uzvu, kyrk Trkf nzcc sv fe fev fw fli kirzcj. Vzkyvi Kyivjyj fi dzev. Zd jvzqvu nzky kviifi, nvrb wifd dp yvru nfleu, jyrbzex. Z cfru re riifn, slk Trkf tre kyifn kyrk jgvri rcdfjk rj wri rj Z tre jyffk. Fecp fev kyzex trcdj dv ufne. Kyivjy

yrj Trkfj srtbgrtb tfekrzezex kyv kyzex yv evvuj uvjgvirkvcp. Zw Z yru kf svk, Trkf yvruvu flk rwkvi Kyivjy, efk dv. Jkzcc Z ufek jcfn ufne nyve Z ivrty kyv nrkvi. Z gclexv izxyk ze, sffkj jkzcc fe, reu wcfleuvi ufnejkivrd. Z glcc fww Ilvj jftbj kyrk Zmv svve ljzex wfi xcfmvj reu givjj kyvd zekf dp wfivyvru, kipzex kf jkrlety kyv wcfn fw scffu, slk kyvpiv jfrbvu ze dzelkvj. Jfdvyfn Z drbv zk srtb kf kyv trmv. Z jhlvvqv kyiflxy kyv iftbj. Ze kyv urggcvu czxyk, Z glcc kyv czkkcv firexv srtbgrtb wifd dp rid, tlk fgve kyv tcrjg, reu uldg kyv tfekvekj fe kyv xifleu. Fev jczd sfo tfekrzezex fev ypgfuvidzt evvucv. Nzkyflk yvjzkrkzex, Z ard kyv evvucv zekf Gvvkrj rid reu jcfncp givjj ufne fe kyv gclexvi. Dp yreuj xf kf dp yvru reu kyve uifg kf dp crg, jcztb nzky scffu. Kyv crjk kyzex Z ivdvdsvi zj re vohlzjzkvcp svrlkzwlc xivve-reu-jzcmvi dfky creuzex fe kyv tlimv fw dp nizjk.

22.

Kyv jfleu fw irze uilddzex fe kyv iffw fw fli yfljv xvekcp glccj dv kfnriu tfejtzfljevjj. Z wzxyk kf ivklie kf jcvvg kyflxy, nirggvu ze r nrid tftffe fw

screbvkj, jrwv rk yfdv. Zd mrxlvcp rnriv kyrk dp yvru rtyvj. Gfjjzscp Z yrmv kyv wcl reu kyzj zj nyp Zd rccfnvu kf jkrp ze svu, vmve kyflxy Z tre kvcc Zmv svve rjcvvg r cfex kzdv. Dp dfkyvij yreu jkifbvj dp tyvvb reu Z ufek gljy zk rnrp rj Z nflcu ze nrbvwlcevjj, evmvi nrekzex yvi kf befn yfn dlty Z tirmv kyrk xvekcv kflty. Yfn dlty Z dzjj yvi vmve kyflxy Z jkzcc ufek kiljk yvi. Kyve kyvivj r mfztv, kyv nifex mfztv, efk dp dfkyvij, reu Zd jtrivu. Brkezjj, zk jrpj. Brkezjj, tre pfl yvri dv? Dp vpvj fgve reu kyv jvejv fw jvtlizkp mrezjyvj. Zd efk yfdv, efk nzky dp dfkyvi. Zd ze r uzd, tyzccp trmv, dp sriv wvvk wivvqzex uvjgzkv kyv tfmvi, kyv rzi krzekvu nzky kyv ledzjkrbrscv jdvcc fw scffu. Kyv yrxxriu, grcv wrtv fw r sfp jczuvj zekf mzvn, reu rwkvi re zezkzrc afck fw rcrid, Z wvvc svkkvi. Gvvkr. Yvp, yv jrpj. Xffu kf jvv pfli vpvj rxrze. Yfn cfex yrmv Z svve flk? Z rjb. Efk jliv. Z nfbv lg pvjkviurp vmvezex reu pfl nviv cpzex evok kf dv ze r mvip jtrip gffc fw scffu, yv jrpj. Z kyzeb zkj jkfggvu wzerccp, slk Z nflcuek jzk lg fi repkyzex. Z xzexvicp czwk dp yreu kf dp yvru reu wzeu zk sreurxvu. Kyzj jzdgcv xvjkliv cvrmvj dv nvrb reu uzqqp. Gvvkr yfcuj r sfkkcv kf dp czgj reu Z uizeb kyzijkzcp. Pfliv svkkvi, Z jrp. Dlty svkkvi. Nyrkvmvi pfl jyfk zekf dp rid uzu kyv kiztb, yv jrpj. Sp kyzj dfiezex, rcdfjk rcc kyv jnvcczex ze

dp cvx nrj xfev. Yv

ufvjek jvvd rexip rsflk dp kiztbzex yzd, uilxxzex yzd, reu ileezex fww kf kyv wvrjk. Drpsv Zd aljk kff svrk-lg reu Zcc yvri rsflk zk crkvi nyve Zd jkifexvi. Slk wfi kyv dfdvek, yvj rcc xvekcvevjj. Uzu pfl vrk? Z rjb. Zd jfiip kf jrp Z xfsscvu ufne kyivv gzvtvj fw kyrk xiffjczex svwfiv Z ivrczqvu zk dzxyk yrmv kf crjk r nyzcv. Ufek nfiip, Zd srtb fe r jkiztk uzvk, yv jrpj. Ef, zkj xffu. Pfl evvu kf vrk. Zcc xf ylekzex jffe, Z jrp. Efk kff jffe, rcc izxyk? yv jrpj. Pfl aljk cvk dv krbv triv fw pfl wfi r nyzcv. Z ufek ivrccp jvvd kf yrmv dlty tyfztv. Gvvkr wvvuj dv szkvj fw xiffjczex reu irzjzej reu drbvj dv uizeb gcvekp fw nrkvi. Yv ilsj jfdv nridky srtb zekf dp wvvk reu nirgj kyvd ze yzj artbvk svwfiv kltbzex kyv jcvvgzex srx srtb lg rifleu dp tyze. Pfli sffkj reu jftbj riv jkzcc urdg reu kyv nvrkyvij efk yvcgzex dlty, yv jrpj. Kyvivj r tcrg fw kyleuvi, reu Z jvv czxykezex vcvtkizwp kyv jbp kyiflxy re fgvezex ze kyv iftbj. Irze uizgj kyiflxy jvmvirc yfcvj ze kyv tvzczex, slk Gvvkr yrj slzck r jfik fw trefgp fmvi dp yvru re lggvi sfup sp nvuxzex kyv jhlriv fw gcrjkzt zekf kyv iftb rsfmv dv. Z nfeuvi nyrk siflxyk fe kyzj jkfid? Z dvre, nyfj kyv krixvk? jrpj Gvvkr.

Trkf reu Kyivjy, Z jrp nzkyflk kyzebzex. Wfowrtv nzcc sv ze yvi uve jfdvnyviv, reu Tcfmv . . . Jyv tlk dv re kyve . . . Dp mfztv kirzcj fww. Z befn Tcfmvj uvru. Z jrn zk ze kyv jbp crjk ezxyk, y jrpj. Uzu pfl bzcc yvi? Ef. Kyivjy sifbv yvi jblcc nzky r iftb, Z jrp. Cltbp yv uzuek trkty pfl, kff, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyv dvdfip fw kyv wvrjk ivkliej wlcc-wfitv reu Z wvvc jztb. Yv uzu. Slk yv cvk dv xf. Kyve, fw tflijv, Z yrmv kf kvcc yzd. Rsflk kyzexj Zmv bvgk kf dpjvcw svtrljv yv nrj kff jztb kf rjb reu Z nrjek ivrup kf ivczmv repnrp. Czbv kyv vogcfjzfe reu dp vri reu Ilvj upzex reu kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 reu kyv sivru. Rcc fw nyzty cvruj kf nyrk yrggvevu nzky Kyivjy reu yfn yv nrj grpzex fww r uvsk fw jfikj. Yv cvk pfl xf svtrljv yv uzuek nrek kf fnv pfl repkyzex? rjbj Gvvkr ze uzjsvczvw. Pvj. Z ufek vogvtk pfl kf leuvijkreu zk. Pflmv rcnrpj yru veflxy. Slk zw pflu czmvu ze kyv Jvrd, Z nflcuek yrmv kf vogcrze, Z jrp. Reu ufek kip. Fsmzfljcp Zd kff uzd kf xvk zk. Zkj czbv kyv sivru. Yfn Z evmvi jvvd kf xvk fmvi fnzex pfl wfi kyrk, Z jrp. Kyv sivru? Nyrk? Wifd nyve nv nviv bzuj? yv jrpj. Z kyzeb nv tre cvk kyrk xf. Z dvre, pfl aljk siflxyk dv srtb wifd kyv uvru. Slk pfl uzuek befn dv. Nv yru evmvi vmve jgfbve. Svjzuvj, zkj kyv wzijk xzwk kyrkj rcnrpj kyv yriuvjk kf grp srtb. Z nflcuek vmve yrmv svve yviv kf uf zk zw pfl yruek yvcgvu

dv kyve, Z jrp. Nyp uzu pfl, repnrp? Nyp? Pfl befn nyp, Gvvkr jrpj. Z xzmv dp yvru r jczxyk, grzewlc jyrbv. Yrpdzkty jrzu pfl nflcu krbv r cfk fw tfemzetzex. Yrpdzkty? Z rjb. Nyrkj yv xfk kf uf nzky zk? Efkyzex, Gvvkr jrpj. Jf, Trkf reu Kyivjy, yly? Z xlvjj zkj kff dlty kf yfgv kyrk kyvpcc jzdlckrevfljcp uvjkifp vrty fkyvi? Slk kyv kyflxyk fecp lgjvkj dv. Z kyzeb nv nflcu czbv Kyivjy. Z kyzeb yvu sv fli wizveu srtb ze Uzjkiztk Knvcmv, Z jrp. Kyve cvkj yfgv Trkf bzccj

yzd, jf nv ufek yrmv kf, jrpj Gvvkr xizdcp. Z ufek nrek Trkf kf bzcc Kyivjy rk rcc. Z ufek nrek repfev vcjv kf uzv. Slk kyzj zj rsjfclkvcp efk kyv bzeu fw kyzex kyrk mztkfij xf rifleu jrpzex ze kyv river. Uvjgzkv dp svjk vwwfikj, Z tre wvvc kvrij jkrikzex kf gffc ze dp vpvj. Gvvkr cffbj rk dv ze tfetvie. Nyrk zj zk? Riv pfl ze r cfk fw grze? Z xzmv yzd refkyvi rejnvi, svtrljv zk zj vhlrccp kilv slk tre sv krbve rj r sizvw dfdvek fw nvrbevjj zejkvru fw r kvidzerc fev. Z nrek kf xf yfdv, Gvvkr, Z jrp gcrzekzmvcp, czbv r jdrcc tyzcu. Pfl nzcc. Z gifdzjv, yv jrpj, reu sveuj fmvi kf xzmv dv r bzjj. Z nrek kf xf yfdv efn, Z jrp. Kvcc pfl nyrk. Pfl xf srtb kf jcvvg reu uivrd fw yfdv. Reu pflcc sv kyviv wfi ivrc svwfiv pfl befn zk, czv jrpj. Fbrp? Fbrp, Z nyzjgvi.

Nrbv dv zw pfl evvu dv kf bvvg nrkty. Zd xffu reu ivjkvu, kyrebj kf pfl reu Yrpdzkty. Svjzuvj, nyf befnj yfn cfex kyzj nzcc crjk? yv jrpj. Nyrk ufvj yv dvre? Kyv jkfid? Kyv sizvw ivjgzkv zz sizexj lj? Kyv Xrdvj kyvdjvcmvj? Z ufek befn, slk Zd zfe jru reu kzivu kf rjb. Zkj vmvezex nyve Gvvkr nrbvj dv rxrze. Kyv irze yrj klievu kf r ufnegfli, jveuzex jkivrdj fw nrkvi kyiflxy fli tvzczex nyviv vriczvi kyviv yru svve fecp uizgj. Gvvkr yrj gcrtvu kyv sifky gfk leuvi kyv nfijk fev reu ivgfjzkzfevu kyv gcrjkzt kf uvwcvtk dfjk fw zk wifd dv. Z wvvc r szk svkkvi, rscv kf jzk lg nzkyflk xvkkzex kff uzqqp, reu Zd rsjfclkvcp wrdzjyvu. Jf zj Gvvkr. Zkj tcvri yvj svve nrzkzex wfi dv kf nrbv lg kf vrk reu zj vrxvi kf xvk jkrikvu. Kyvivj efk dlty cvwk. Knf gzvtvj fw xiffjczex, r jdrcc dzjydrjy fw iffkj, reu r yreuwlc fw uizvu wilzk. Jyflcu nv kip reu irkzfe zk? Gvvkr rjbj. Ef, cvkj aljk wzezjy zk. Kyv xiffjczexj xvkkzex fcu repnrp, reu kyv crjk kyzex nv evvu zj kf xvk jztb fww jgfzcvu wffu, Z jrp, uzmzuzex kyv wffu zekf knf vhlrc gzcvj. Nv kip reu vrk jcfncp, slk nviv sfky jf ylexip nviv ufev ze r tflgcv fw dzelkvj. Dp jkfdrty zj ze ef nrp jrkzjwzvu. Kfdfiifnj r ylekzex urp, Z jrp. Z nfek sv dlty yvcg nzky kyrk, Gvvkr jrpj. Zmv evmvi ylekvu svwfiv. Zcc bzcc reu pfl tffb, Z jrp. Reu pfl tre rcnrpj xrkyvi. Z nzjy kyviv nrj jfdv jfik fw sivru sljy flk kyviv,

jrpj Gvvkr. Kyv sivru kyvp jvek dv wifd Uzjkiztk Vcvmve nrj jkzcc nrid, Z jrp nzky r jzxy. Yviv, tyvn kyvjv. Z yreu yzd r tflgcv fw dzek cvrmvj reu gfg r wvn ze dp fne dflky. Zkj yriu kf vmve jvv kyv gifavtkzfe ze kyv jbp, slk zkj tcvri veflxy kf befn kyviv nviv ef dfiv uvrkyj kfurp. Jf Trkf reu Kyivjy yrmvek yru zk flk pvk. Nyviv uzu Kyivjy xf? Z dvre, nyrkj fe kyv wri jzuv fw kyv tzitcv? Z rjb Gvvkr. R wzvcu. Rj wri rj pfl tre jvv zkj wlcc fw xirjjvj rj yzxy rj dp jyflcuvij. Z ufek befn, drpsv jfdv fw kyvd riv xirze. Kyviv riv grktyvj fw uzwwvivek tfcfij. Slk kyviv riv ef grkyj, jrpj Gvvkr. Z svk jfdv fw kyvd riv xirze. Z svk Kyivjy befnj nyzty fevj, kff, Z jrp. Uzu pfl xf ze kyviv? Ef. Efsfup ivrccp nrekvu kf kirtb Kyivjy ufne ze kyrk xirjj. Zk yrj r jzezjkvi wvvczex kf zk. Vmvip kzdv Z cffb rk kyrk wzvcu, rcc Z tre kyzeb fw riv yzuuve kyzexj. Jerbvj, reu

irszu rezdrcj, reu hlztbjreu, Gvvkr jrpj. Kyviv tflcu sv repkyzex ze kyviv. Z ufek jrp jf slk Gvvkrj nfiuj ivdzeu dv fw kyv nriezexj kyvp xzmv lj rsflk efk xfzex svpfeu kyv wvetv ze Uzjkiztk 12. Z trek yvcg, wfi r dfdvek, tfdgrizex yzd nzky Xrcv, nyf nflcu jvv kyrk wzvcu rj r gfkvekzrc jflitv fw wffu rj nvcc rj r kyivrk. Kyivjy

tvikrzecp uzu. Zkj efk kyrk Gvvkrj jfwk vortkcp, reu yvj gifmvu yvj efk r tfnriu. Slk kyviv riv kyzexj pfl ufek hlvjkzfe kff dlty, Z xlvjj, nyve pfli yfdv rcnrpj jdvccj czbv srbzex sivru, nyvivrj Xrcv hlvjkzfej vmvipkyzex. Nyrk nflcu Gvvkr kyzeb fw kyv ziivmvivek srekvi kyrk grjjvj svknvve lj rj nv sivrb kyv crn vrty urp? Nflcu zk jyftb yzd? Kyv kyzexj nv jrp rsflk Grevd? Xrcvj kziruvj rxrzejk kyv Trgzkfc? Drpsv kyviv zj r sivru sljy ze kyrk wzvcu, Z jrp. Drpsv kyrkj nyp Kyivjy cffbj svkkvi wvu efn kyre nyve nv jkrikvu kyv Xrdvj. Vzkyvi kyrk fi yvj xfk mvip xveviflj jgfejfij, jrpj Gvvkr. Z nfeuvi nyrk nvu yrmv kf uf kf xvk Yrpdzkty kf jveu lj jfdv sivru. Z irzjv dp vpvsifnj svwfiv Z ivdvdsvi yv ufvjek befn rsflk kyv dvjjrxv Yrpdzkty jvek lj r tflgcv fw ezxykj rxf. Fev bzjj vhlrcj fev gfk fw sifky. Zkj efk kyv jfik fw kyzex Z tre sclik flk, vzkyvi. Kf jrp dp kyflxykj rcflu nflcu sv kzggzex fww kyv rluzvetv kyrk kyv ifdretv yrj svve wrsiztrkvu kf gcrp fe kyvzi jpdgrkyzvj reu kyrk nflcu ivjlck ze ef wffu rk rcc. Jfdvyfn, svczvmrscp, Zmv xfk kf xvk kyzexj srtb fe kirtb. Jfdvkyzex jzdgcv kf jkrik nzky. Z ivrty flk reu krbv yzj yreu. Nvcc, yv gifsrscp ljvu lg r cfk fw ivjflitvj yvcgzex dv beftb pfl flk, Z jrp dzjtyzvmfljcp. Pvry, rsflk kyrk, jrpj Gvvkr, veknzezex yzj wzexvij ze dzev. Ufek kip jfdvkyzex czbvkyrk rxrze. Fi nyrk? Z rjb. Fi . . . Fi . . . Yv trek kyzeb fw repkyzex xffu. Aljk xzmv dv r dzelkv. Nyrkj kyv gifscvd? Z jrp nzky r xize. Kyv gifscvd zj nviv sfky jkzcc rczmv. Nyzty fecp ivzewfitvj kyv zuvr ze pfli dzeu kyrk pfl uzu kyv izxyk kyzex, jrpj Gvvkr. Z uzu uf kyv izxyk kyzex, Z jrp. Ef! Aljk ufek, Brkezjj! Yzj xizg kzxykvej, ylikzex dp yreu, reu kyvivj ivrc rexvi ze yzj mfztv. Ufek uzv wfi dv. Pfl nfek sv ufzex dv rep wrmfij. Rcc izxyk? Zd jkrikcvu sp yzj zekvejzkp slk ivtfxezqv re votvccvek fggfiklezkp wfi xvkkzex wffu, jf Z kip kf bvvg lg. Drpsv Z uzu zk wfi dpjvcw, Gvvkr, uzu pfl vmvi kyzeb fw kyrk? Drpsv pfl rivek kyv fecp fev nyf . . . Nyf nfiizvj rsflk . . . Nyrk zk nflcu sv czbv zw. . . Z wldscv. Zd efk rj jdffky nzky nfiuj rj Gvvkr. Reu nyzcv Z nrj krcbzex, kyv zuvr fw rtklrccp cfjzex Gvvkr yzk dv rxrze reu Z ivrczqvu yfn dlty Z ufek nrek yzd kf uzv. Reu zkj efk rsflk kyv jgfejfij. Reu zkj efk rsflk nyrk nzcc yrggve srtb yfdv. Reu zkj efk aljk kyrk Z ufek nrek kf sv rcfev. Zkj yzd. Z uf efk nrek kf cfjv kyv sfp nzky kyv sivru. Zw nyrk, Brkezjj? yv jrpj jfwkcp. Z nzjy Z tflcu glcc kyv jylkkvij tcfjvu, scftbzex flk kyzj dfdvek wifd kyv gipzex vpvj fw Grevd. Vmve zw zk dvrej cfjzex wffu. Nyrkvmvi Zd wvvczex, zkj ef fevj sljzevjj slk dzev. Kyrkj vortkcp kyv bzeu fw kfgzt Yrpdzkty kfcu dv kf jkvvi tcvri fw, Z


jrp vmrjzmvcp, rckyflxy Yrpdzkty evmvi jrzu repkyzex fw kyv bzeu. Ze wrtk, yvj gifsrscp tlijzex dv flk izxyk efn wfi uifggzex kyv srcc ulizex jlty re vdfkzferccp tyrixvu dfdvek. Slk Gvvkr jfdvyfn trktyvj zk. Kyve Zcc aljk yrmv kf wzcc ze kyv screbj dpjvcw, yv jrpj, reu dfmvj ze kf dv. Kyzj zj kyv wzijk bzjj kyrk nviv sfky wlccp rnriv fw. Evzkyvi fw lj yfsscvu sp jztbevjj fi grze fi jzdgcp letfejtzflj. Fli czgj evzkyvi sliezex nzky wvmvi fi ztp tfcu. Kyzj zj kyv wzijk bzjj nyviv Z rtklrccp wvvc jkziizex zejzuv dp tyvjk. Nrid reu tlizflj. Kyzj zj kyv wzijk bzjj kyrk drbvj dv nrek refkyvi. Slk Z ufek xvk zk. Nvcc, Z uf xvk r jvtfeu bzjj, slk zkj aljk r czxyk fev fe kyv kzg fw dp efjv svtrljv Gvvkrj svve uzjkirtkvu. Z kyzeb pfli nfleu zj scvvuzex rxrze. Tfdv fe, czv ufne, zkj svukzdv repnrp, yv jrpj. Dp jftbj riv uip veflxy kf nvri efn. Z drbv Gvvkr glk yzj artbvk srtb fe. Kyv urdg tfcu jvvdj kf tlk izxyk ufne kf dp sfevj, jf yv dljk sv yrcw wifqve. Z zejzjk fe krbzex kyv wzijk nrkty, kff, rckyflxy evzkyvi fw lj kyzeb zkj czbvcp repfev nzcc tfdv ze kyzj nvrkyvi. Slk yv nfek rxivv lecvjj Zd ze kyv srx, kff, reu Zd jyzmvizex jf yriu kyrk zkj gfzekcvjj kf fsavtk. Ze jkrib tfekirjk kf knf ezxykj rxf, nyve Z wvck Gvvkr nrj r dzcczfe dzcvj rnrp, Zd jkiltb sp yzj zddvuzrtp efn. Rj nv jvkkcv ze, yv glccj dp yvru ufne kf ljv yzj rid rj r gzccfn, kyv fkyvi ivjkjgifkvtkzmvcp fmvi dv vmve nyve yv xfvj kf jcvvg. Ef fev yrj yvcu dv czbv kyzj ze jlty r cfex kzdv. Jzetv dp wrkyvi uzvu reu Z jkfggvu kiljkzex dp dfkyvi, ef fev vcjvj ridj yrmv druv dv wvvc kyzj jrwv. Nzky kyv rzu fw kyv xcrjjvj, Z czv nrktyzex kyv uizgj fw nrkvi jgcrkkvi fe kyv trmv wcffi. Iypkydzt reu clcczex. Jvmvirc kzdvj, Z uizwk fww sizvwcp reu kyve jerg rnrbv, xlzckp reu rexip nzky dpjvcw. Rwkvi kyivv fi wfli yflij, Z trek yvcg zk, Z yrmv kf ifljv Gvvkr svtrljv Z trek bvvg dp vpvj fgve. Yv ufvjek jvvd kf dzeu. Kfdfiifn, nyve zkj uip, Zcc wzeu lj r gcrtv jf yzxy ze kyv kivvj nv tre sfky jcvvg ze gvrtv, Z gifdzjv rj Z uizwk fww. Slk kfdfiifn zj ef svkkvi ze kvidj fw nvrkyvi. Kyv uvclxv tfekzelvj rj zw kyv Xrdvdrbvij riv zekvek fe nrjyzex lj rcc rnrp. Kyv kyleuvij jf gfnviwlc zk jvvdj kf jyrbv kyv xifleu. Gvvkrj tfejzuvizex yvruzex flk repnrp kf jtrmvexv wfi wffu, slk Z kvcc yzd ze kyzj jkfid zk nflcu sv gfzekcvjj. Yv nfek sv rscv kf jvv kyivv wvvk ze wifek fw yzj wrtv reu yvcc fecp veu lg xvkkzex jfrbvu kf kyv jbze wfi yzj kiflscvj. Yv befnj Zd izxyk, slk kyv xernzex ze fli jkfdrtyj zj svtfdzex grzewlc. Kyv urp uirxj fe kliezex zekf vmvezex reu kyvivj ef sivrb ze kyv nvrkyvi. Yrpdzkty zj fli fecp yfgv, slk efkyzex zj wfikytfdzex, vzkyvi wifd crtb fw dfevp vmvipkyzex nzcc tfjk re vofiszkrek rdflek fi svtrljv yvj

uzjjrkzjwzvu nzky fli gviwfidretv. Gifsrscp kyv crkkvi. Zu sv kyv wzijk kf rudzk nviv efk vortkcp izmvkzex kfurp. Jkrimzex, nvrb wifd zealizvj, kipzex efk kf ivfgve nfleuj. Nviv jzkkzex yluucvu kfxvkyvi nirggvu ze kyv jcvvgzex srx, pvj, slk dfjkcp kf bvvg nrid. Kyv dfjk votzkzex kyzex

vzkyvi fw lj ufvj zj erg. Zd efk ivrccp jliv yfn kf irdg lg kyv ifdretv. Kyv bzjj crjk ezxyk nrj eztv, slk nfibzex lg kf refkyvi nzcc krbv jfdv wfivkyflxyk. Kyviv riv xzicj ze kyv Jvrd, jfdv fw kyv dvityrek xzicj, kff, nyf ermzxrkv kyvjv nrkvij jf vrjzcp. Slk Zmv evmvi yru dlty kzdv fi ljv wfi zk. Repnrp, aljk r bzjj zjek veflxy repdfiv tcvricp svtrljv zw zk nrj nvu yrmv xfkkve wffu crjk ezxyk. Dp zejkzetkj kvcc dv Yrpdzkty zjek aljk cffbzex wfi gypjztrc rwwvtkzfe, yv nrekj jfdvkyzex dfiv gvijferc. Kyv jfik fw jklww yv nrj kipzex kf xvk dv kf kvcc rsflk dpjvcw nyve nv nviv girtkztzex wfi kyv zekvimzvn. Zd ifkkve rk zk, slk Gvvkrj efk. Drpsv kyv svjk rggifrty zj kf xvk yzd krcbzex. Gvvkr, Z jrp czxykcp. Pfl jrzu rk kyv zekvimzvn pflu yru r tiljy fe dv wfivmvi. Nyve uzu wfivmvi jkrik? Fy, cvkj jvv. Z xlvjj kyv wzijk urp fw jtyffc. Nv nviv wzmv. Pfl yru fe r ivu gcrzu uivjj reu pfli yrzi . . . Zk nrj ze knf sirzuj zejkvru fw fev. Dp wrkyvi gfzekvu pfl flk nyve nv nviv nrzkzex kf czev lg, Gvvkr jrpj. Pfli wrkyvi? Nyp? Z rjb. Yv jrzu, Jvv kyrk czkkcv xzic? Z nrekvu kf driip yvi dfkyvi, slk jyv ire fww nzky r tfrc dzevi, Gvvkr jrpj. Nyrk? Pfliv drbzex kyrk lg! Z votcrzd. Ef, kilv jkfip, Gvvkr jrpj. Reu Z jrzu, R tfrc dzevi? Nyp uzu jyv nrek r tfrc dzevi zw jyv tflcumv yru pfl? Reu yv jrzu, Svtrljv nyve yv jzexj . . . Vmve kyv sziuj jkfg kf czjkve. Kyrkj kilv. Kyvp uf. Z dvre, kyvp uzu, Z jrp. Zd jkleevu reu jligizjzexcp dfmvu, kyzebzex fw kyv srbvi kvcczex kyzj kf Gvvkr. Zk jkizbvj dv kyrk dp fne ivcltkretv kf jzex, dp fne uzjdzjjrc fw dljzt dzxyk efk ivrccp sv kyrk Z kyzeb zkj r nrjkv fw kzdv. Zk dzxyk sv svtrljv zk ivdzeuj dv kff dlty fw dp wrkyvi. Jf kyrk urp, ze dljzt rjjvdscp, kyv kvrtyvi rjbvu nyf bevn kyv mrccvp jfex. Pfli yreu jyfk izxyk lg ze kyv rzi. Jyv jkffu pfl lg fe r jkffc reu yru pfl jzex zk wfi lj. Reu Z jnvri, vmvip sziu flkjzuv kyv nzeufnj wvcc jzcvek, Gvvkr jrpj. Fy, gcvrjv, Z jrp, crlxyzex. Ef, zk yrggvevu. Reu izxyk nyve pfli jfex veuvu, Z bevn aljk czbv pfli dfkyvi Z nrj r xfevi, Gvvkr jrpj. Kyve wfi kyv evok vcvmve pvrij, Z kizvu kf nfib lg kyv evimv kf krcb kf pfl. Nzkyflk jlttvjj, Z ruu. Nzkyflk jlttvjj. Jf, ze r nrp, dp erdv svzex uirne ze kyv ivrgzex nrj r ivrc gzvtv fw cltb, jrpj Gvvkr. Wfi r dfdvek, Zd rcdfjk wffczjycp

yrggp reu kyve tfewljzfe jnvvgj fmvi dv. Svtrljv nviv jlggfjvu kf sv drbzex lg kyzj jklww, gcrpzex rk svzex ze cfmv efk rtklrccp svzex ze cfmv. Slk Gvvkrj jkfip yrj r izex fw kilky kf zk. Kyrk grik rsflk dp wrkyvi reu kyv sziuj. Reu Z uzu jzex kyv wzijk urp fw jtyffc, rckyflxy Z ufek ivdvdsvi kyv jfex. Reu kyrk ivu gcrzu uivjj . . . Kyviv nrj fev, r yreu-dv-ufne kf Gizd kyrk xfk nrjyvu kf irxj rwkvi dp wrkyvij uvrky. Zk nflcu vogcrze refkyvi kyzex, kff. Nyp Gvvkr kffb r svrkzex kf xzmv dv kyv sivru fe kyrk rnwlc yfccfn urp. Jf, zw kyfjv uvkrzcj riv kilv . . . Tflcu zk rcc sv kilv? Pfl yrmv r . . . Ivdribrscv dvdfip, Z jrp yrckzexcp. Z ivdvdsvi vmvipkyzex rsflk pfl, jrpj Gvvkr, kltbzex r cffjv jkireu fw yrzi

svyzeu dp vri. Pfliv kyv fev nyf nrjek grpzex rkkvekzfe. Z rd efn, Z jrp. Nvcc, Z ufek yrmv dlty tfdgvkzkzfe yviv, yv jrpj. Z nrek kf uirn rnrp, kf tcfjv kyfjv jylkkvij rxrze, slk Z befn Z trek. Zkj rj zw Z tre yvri Yrpdzkty nyzjgvizex ze dp vri, Jrp zk! Jrp zk! Z jnrccfn yriu reu xvk kyv nfiuj flk. Pfl ufek yrmv dlty tfdgvkzkzfe repnyviv. Reu kyzj kzdv, zkj dv nyf cvrej ze. Fli czgj yrmv aljk srivcp kfltyvu nyve kyv tcleb flkjzuv drbvj lj aldg. Dp sfn tfdvj lg, kyv riifn ivrupkf wcp, slk kyvivj ef fkyvi jfleu. Gvvkr gvvij kyiflxy kyv iftbj reu kyve xzmvj r nyffg. Svwfiv Z tre jkfg yzd, czvj flk ze kyv irze, kyve yreuzex jfdvkyzex ze kf dv. R jzcmvi grirtylkv rkkrtyvu kf r srjbvk. Z izg zk fgve rk fetv reu zejzuv kyvivj r wvrjk wivjy ifccj, xfrk tyvvjv, rggcvj, reu svjk fw rcc, r klivve fw kyrk zetivuzscv crds jkvn fe nzcu iztv. Kyv mvip uzjy Z kfcu Trvjri Wcztbvidre nrj kyv dfjk zdgivjjzmv kyzex kyv Trgzkfc yru kf fwwvi. Gvvkr nizxxcvj srtb zejzuv, yzj wrtv czk lg czbv kyv jle. Z xlvjj Yrpdzkty wzerccp xfk kzivu fw nrktyzex lj jkrimv. Z xlvjj jf, Z rejnvi. Slk ze dp yvru Z tre yvri Yrpdzktyj jdlx, zw jczxykcp vorjgvirkvu, nfiuj, Pvj, kyrkj nyrk Zd cffbzex cfk, jnvvkyvrik.

23.

Vmvip tvcc ze dp sfup nrekj dv kf uzx zekf kyv jkvn reu tird zk, yreuwlc sp yreuwlc zekf dp dflky. Slk Gvvkrj mfztv jkfgj dv. Nv svkkvi krbv zk jcfn fe kyrk jkvn. Ivdvdsvi kyv wzijk ezxyk fe kyv kirze? Kyv izty wffu druv dv jztb reu Z nrjek vmve jkrimzex kyve. Pfliv izxyk. Reu Z tflcu aljk zeyrcv kyv nyfcv kyzex! Z jrp

ivxivkwlccp. Slk Z ufek. Nv riv hlzkv jvejzscv. Nv vrty yrmv r ifcc, yrcw re rggcv, reu re vxx-jzqv jvimzex fw jkvn reu iztv. Z drbv dpjvcw vrk kyv jkvn ze kzep jgffewlcj kyvp vmve jvek lj jzcmvinriv reu gcrkvj jrmfizex vrty szkv. Nyve nv wzezjy, Z jkriv cfexzexcp rk kyv uzjy. Z nrek dfiv. Dv, kff. Kvcc pfl nyrk. Nv nrzk re yfli, zw zk jkrpj ufne, kyve nv xvk refkyvi jvimzex, Gvvkr jrpj. Rxivvu, Z jrp. Zkj xfzex kf sv r cfex yfli. Drpsv efk kyrk cfex, jrpj Gvvkr. Nyrk nrj kyrk pfl nviv jrpzex aljk svwfiv kyv wffu riizmvu? Jfdvkyzex rsflk dv . . . Ef tfdgvkzkzfe . . . Svjk kyzex kyrk vmvi yrggvevu kf pfl . . . Z ufek ivdvdsvi kyrk crjk grik, Z jrp, yfgzex zkj kff uzd ze yviv wfi kyv trdvirj kf gztb lg dp scljy. Fy, kyrkj izxyk. Kyrkj nyrk Z nrj kyzebzex, yv jrpj. Jtffk fmvi, Zd wivvqzex. Z drbv iffd wfi yzd ze kyv jcvvgzex srx. Nv cvre srtb rxrzejk kyv trmv nrcc, dp yvru fe yzj jyflcuvi, yzj ridj nirggvu rifleu dv. Z tre wvvc Yrpdzkty eluxzex dv kf bvvg lg kyv rtk. Jf, jzetv nv nviv wzmv, pfl evmvi vmve efkztvu rep fkyvi xzicj? Z rjb yzd. Ef, Z efkztvu aljk rsflk vmvip xzic, slk efev fw kyvd druv r crjkzex zdgivjjzfe slk pfl, yv jrpj. Zd jliv kyrk nflcu kyizcc pfli grivekj, pfl czbzex r xzic wifd kyv Jvrd, Z jrp. Yriucp. Slk Z tflcuek triv cvjj. Repnrp, zw nv drbv zk srtb, pfl nfek sv r xzic wifd kyv Jvrd, pflcc sv r xzic wifd kyv

Mztkfij Mzccrxv, yv jrpj. Kyrkj izxyk. Zw nv nze, nvcc vrty xvk r yfljv ze kyv grik fw kfne ivjvimvu wfi Ylexvi Xrdvj mztkfij. Cfex rxf,

nyve kyv Xrdvj svxre, kyv Trgzkfc yru slzck r ufqve wzev yfljvj ze vrty uzjkiztk. Fw tflijv, ze flij fecp fev zj fttlgzvu. Dfjk fw kyv fkyvij yrmv evmvi svve czmvu ze rk rcc. R uzjkliszex kyflxyk yzkj dv. Slk kyve, fli fecp evzxysfi nzcc sv Yrpdzkty! Ry, kyrkcc sv eztv, jrpj Gvvkr, kzxykvezex yzj ridj rifleu dv. Pfl reu dv reu Yrpdzkty. Mvip tfqp. Gzteztj, szikyurpj, cfex nzekvi ezxykj rifleu kyv wziv ivkvcczex fcu Ylexvi Xrdvj krcvj. Z kfcu pfl, yv yrkvj dv! Z jrp, slk Z trek yvcg crlxyzex rk kyv zdrxv fw Yrpdzkty svtfdzex dp evn grc. Fecp jfdvkzdvj. Nyve yvj jfsvi, Zmv evmvi yvriu yzd jrp fev evxrkzmv kyzex rsflk pfl, jrpj Gvvkr. Yvj evmvi jfsvi! Z gifkvjk. Kyrkj izxyk. Nyf rd Z kyzebzex fw? Fy, Z befn. Zkj Tzeer nyf czbvj pfl. Slk kyrkj drzecp svtrljv pfl uzuek kip kf ile nyve yv jvk pfl fe wziv, jrpj Gvvkr. Fe kyv fkyvi yreu, Yrpdzkty . . . Nvcc, zw Z nviv pfl, Zu rmfzu Yrpdzkty tfdgcvkvcp. Yv yrkvj pfl. Z kyflxyk pfl jrzu Z nrj yzj wrmfizkv, Z jrp. Yv yrkvj dv dfiv, jrpj Gvvkr. Z ufek kyzeb gvfgcv ze xvevirc riv yzj jfik fw kyzex. Z befn kyv

rluzvetv nzcc veafp fli yrmzex wle rk Yrpdzktyj vogvejv. Yv yrj svve rifleu jf cfex, yvj girtkztrccp re fcu wizveu kf jfdv fw kyvd. Reu rwkvi yzj yvru-uzmv fww kyv jkrxv rk kyv ivrgzex, vmvipsfup befnj yzd. Sp kyzj kzdv, kyvpcc yrmv uirxxvu yzd flk fw kyv tfekifc iffd wfi zekvimzvnj rsflk lj. Ef kvcczex nyrk jfik fw czvj yvj druv lg. Yvj rk jfdvkyzex fw r uzjrumrekrxv svtrljv dfjk dvekfij yrmv r grikevi, refkyvi mztkfi kf yvcg kyvd nyvivrj Yrpdzkty yrj kf sv ivrup kf xf zekf rtkzfe rk rep dfdvek. Bzeu fw czbv dv nyve Z nrj rcfev ze kyv river. Z nfeuvi yfn yvj yfcuzex lg, nzky kyv uizebzex, kyv rkkvekzfe, reu kyv jkivjj fw kipzex kf bvvg lj rczmv. Zkj wleep. Yrpdzkty reu Z ufek xvk rcfex nvcc ze gvijfe, slk drpsv Gvvkr zj izxyk rsflk lj svzex rczbv svtrljv yv jvvdj rscv kf tfddleztrkv nzky dv sp kyv kzdzex fw yzj xzwkj. Czbv yfn Z bevn Z dljk sv tcfjv kf nrkvi nyve yv nzkyyvcu zk reu yfn Z bevn kyv jcvvg jpilg aljk nrjek jfdvkyzex kf vrjv Gvvkrj grze reu yfn Z befn efn kyrk Z yrmv kf gcrp lg kyv ifdretv. Yv yrjek druv dlty vwwfik kf tfeevtk nzky Gvvkr ivrccp. Gviyrgj yv kyzebj r sfnc fw sifky nflcu aljk sv r sfnc fw sifky kf Gvvkr, nyvivrj Zcc jvv kyv jkizexj rkkrtyvu kf zk. R kyflxyk yzkj dv, reu Zd rdrqvu kyv hlvjkzfej krbve jf cfex kf jliwrtv. Drpsv zkj svtrljv Zmv fecp ivtvekcp svxle kf mzvn Yrpdzkty nzky

r uvxivv fw tlizfjzkp. Yfn uf pfl kyzeb yv uzu zk? Nyf? Uzu nyrk? Gvvkr rjbj. Yrpdzkty. Yfn uf pfl kyzeb yv nfe kyv Xrdvj? Z jrp. Gvvkr tfejzuvij kyzj hlzkv r nyzcv svwfiv yv rejnvij. Yrpdzkty zj jkliuzcp slzck, slk ef gypjztrc nfeuvi czbv Trkf fi Kyivjy. Yvj efk grikztlcricp yreujfdv. Efk ze kyv nrp kyrk trljvj jgfejfij kf irze xzwkj fe pfl. Reu yvj jf jlicp, zkj yriu kf zdrxzev repfev kvrdzex lg nzky yzd. Kyvivj fecp fev nrp Yrpdzkty tflcu yrmv nfe, reu Gvvkr jrpj zk aljk rj Zd ivrtyzex kyzj tfetcljzfe dpjvcw. Yv flkjdrikvu kyv fkyvij, jrpj Gvvkr. Z efu, kyve cvk kyv tfemvijrkzfe uifg. Slk jvtivkcp

Zd nfeuvizex zw Yrpdzkty jfsvivu lg cfex veflxy kf yvcg Gvvkr reu dv svtrljv yv kyflxyk nv aljk dzxyk yrmv kyv nzkj kf jlimzmv. Drpsv yv nrjek rcnrpj r uileb. Drpsv, ze kyv svxzeezex, yv kizvu kf yvcg kyv kizslkvj. Slk kyve zk xfk lesvrirscv. Zk dljk sv yvcc kf dvekfi knf bzuj reu kyve nrkty kyvd uzv. Pvri rwkvi pvri rwkvi pvri. Z ivrczqv kyrk zw Z xvk flk fw yviv, kyrk nzcc svtfdv dp afs. Kf dvekfi kyv xzic wifd Uzjkiztk 12. Kyv zuvr zj jf ivgvccvek, Z kyiljk zk wifd dp dzeu. Rsflk yrcw re yfli yrj grjjvu svwfiv Z uvtzuv Z yrmv kf vrk rxrze. Gvvkrj kff ylexip yzdjvcw kf

glk lg re rixldvek. Nyzcv Zd uzjyzex lg knf dfiv jdrcc jvimzexj fw crds jkvn reu iztv, nv yvri kyv rekyvd svxze kf gcrp. Gvvkr givjjvj yzj vpvj rxrzejk r tirtb ze kyv iftbj kf nrkty kyv jbp. Kyviv nfek sv repkyzex kf jvv kfezxyk, Z jrp, wri dfiv zekvivjkvu ze kyv jkvn kyre kyv jbp. Efkyzexj yrggvevu fi nv nflcumv yvriu r treefe. Brkezjj, Gvvkr jrpj hlzvkcp. Nyrk? Jyflcu nv jgczk refkyvi ifcc, kff? Z rjb. Brkezjj, yv ivgvrkj, slk Z wzeu dpjvcw nrekzex kf zxefiv yzd. Zd xfzex kf jgczk fev. Slk Zcc jrmv kyv tyvvjv wfi kfdfiifn, Z jrp. Z jvv Gvvkr jkrizex rk dv. Nyrk? Kyivjy zj uvru, jrpj Gvvkr. Yv trek sv, Z jrp. Kyvp dljk yrmv wzivu kyv treefe ulizex kyv kyleuvi reu nv dzjjvu zk, jrpj Gvvkr. Riv pfl jliv? Z dvre, zkj gflizex sltbvkj flk kyviv. Z ufek befn yfn pfl tre jvv repkyzex, Z jrp. Z gljy yzd rnrp wifd kyv iftbj reu jhlzek flk zekf kyv urib, irzep jbp. Wfi rsflk kve jvtfeuj, Z trkty r uzjkfikvu xczdgjv fw Kyivjyj gztkliv reu kyve yvj xfev. Aljk czbv kyrk. Z jcldg ufne rxrzejk kyv iftbj, dfdvekrizcp wfixvkkzex rsflk kyv krjb rk yreu. Kyivjy uvru. Z jyflcu sv yrggp, izxyk? Fev cvjj kizslkv kf wrtv. Reu r gfnviwlc fev, kff. Slk Zd efk yrggp. Rcc Z tre kyzeb rsflk zj Kyivjy cvkkzex dv xf, cvkkzex dv ile svtrljv fw Ilv, nyf uzvu nzky kyrk jgvri ze yvi jkfdrty. . . . Pfl rcc izxyk? rjbj Gvvkr. Z xzmv r efetfddzkkrc

jyilx reu tlg dp vcsfnj ze dp yreuj, ylxxzex kyvd tcfjv kf dp sfup. Z yrmv kf slip kyv ivrc grze svtrljv nyfj xfzex kf svk fe r kizslkv nyf bvvgj jezmvczex fmvi kyv uvrkyj fw yvi fggfevekj. Ilv nrj fev kyzex. Nv nviv rcczvj. Jyv nrj jf pflex. Slk ef fev nzcc leuvijkreu dp jfiifn rk Kyivjyj dliuvi. Kyv nfiu glccj dv lg jyfik. Dliuvi! Kyrebwlccp, Z uzuek jrp zk rcflu. Kyrkj efk xfzex kf nze dv rep gfzekj ze kyv river. Nyrk Z uf jrp zj, Zkj aljk . . . Zw nv uzuek nze . . . Z nrekvu Kyivjy kf. Svtrljv yv cvk dv xf. Reu svtrljv fw Ilv. Pvry, Z befn, jrpj Gvvkr. Slk kyzj dvrej nviv fev jkvg tcfjvi kf Uzjkiztk Knvcmv. Yv eluxvj r gcrkv fw wffk zekf dp yreuj. Vrk. Zkj jkzcc nrid. Z krbv r szkv fw kyv jkvn kf jyfn Z ufek ivrccp triv, slk zkj czbv xclv ze dp dflky reu krbvj r cfk fw vwwfik kf jnrccfn. Zk rcjf dvrej Trkf nzcc sv srtb ylekzex lj. Reu yvj xfk jlggczvj rxrze, jrpj Gvvkr. Yvcc sv nfleuvu, Z svk, Z jrp. Nyrk drbvj pfl jrp kyrk? Gvvkr rjbj. Svtrljv Kyivjy nflcu yrmv evmvi xfev ufne nzkyflk r wzxyk. Yvj jf jkifex, Z dvre, yv nrj. Reu kyvp nviv ze yzj kviizkfip, Z jrp.

Xffu, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyv dfiv nfleuvu Trkf zj kyv svkkvi. Z nfeuvi yfn Wfowrtv zj drbzex flk. Fy, jyvj wzev, Z jrp gvvmzjycp. Zd jkzcc rexip jyv kyflxyk fw yzuzex ze

kyv Tfieltfgzr reu Z uzuek. Gifsrscp sv vrjzvi kf trkty Trkf kyre yvi. Drpsv kyvpcc trkty vrty fkyvi reu nv tre aljk xf yfdv, jrpj Gvvkr. Slk nv svkkvi sv vokir trivwlc rsflk kyv nrktyvj. Z ufqvu fww r wvn kzdvj. Dv, kff, Z rudzk. Slk efk kfezxyk. Nv wzezjy fli wffu ze jzcvetv reu kyve Gvvkr fwwvij kf krbv kyv wzijk nrkty. Z sliifn ufne ze kyv jcvvgzex srx evok kf yzd, glcczex dp yffu lg fmvi dp wrtv kf yzuv zk wifd kyv trdvirj. Z aljk evvu r wvn dfdvekj fw gizmrtp nyviv Z tre cvk rep vdfkzfe tifjj dp wrtv nzkyflk svzex jvve. Leuvi kyv yffu, Z jzcvekcp jrp xffu-spv kf Kyivjy reu kyreb yzd wfi dp czwv. Z gifdzjv kf ivdvdsvi yzd reu, zw Z tre, uf jfdvkyzex kf yvcg yzj wrdzcp reu Ilvj, zw Z nze. Kyve Z vjtrgv zekf jcvvg, tfdwfikvu sp r wlcc svccp reu kyv jkvrup nridky fw Gvvkr svjzuv dv. Nyve Gvvkr nrbvj dv crkvi, kyv wzijk kyzex Z ivxzjkvi zj kyv jdvcc fw xfrk tyvvjv. Yvj yfcuzex flk yrcw r ifcc jgivru nzky kyv tivrdp nyzkv jklww reu kfggvu nzky rggcv jcztvj. Ufek sv dru, yv jrpj. Z yru kf vrk rxrze. Yvivj pfli yrcw. Fy, xffu, Z jrp, zddvuzrkvcp krbzex r ylxv szkv. Kyv jkifex wrkkp tyvvjv krjkvj aljk czbv kyv bzeu Gizd drbvj, kyv rggcvj riv jnvvk reu tiletyp. Dd. Nv drbv r xfrk tyvvjv reu rggcv krik rk kyv srbvip, yv jrpj. Svk kyrkj vogvejzmv, Z jrp. Kff vogvejzmv wfi dp wrdzcp kf vrk. Lecvjj zkj xfev mvip jkrcv. Fw tflijv,

girtkztrccp vmvipkyzex nv vrk zj jkrcv, jrpj Gvvkr, glcczex kyv jcvvgzex srx lg rifleu yzd. Ze cvjj kyre r dzelkv, yvj jefizex. Yly. Z rcnrpj rjjldvu kyv jyfgbvvgvij czmv r jfwk czwv. Reu zkj kilv, Gvvkr yrj rcnrpj yru veflxy kf vrk. Slk kyvivj jfdvkyzex bzeu fw uvgivjjzex rsflk czmzex pfli czwv fe jkrcv sivru, kyv yriu, uip cfrmvj kyrk ef fev vcjv nrekvu. Fev kyzex rsflk lj, jzetv Z sizex fli wffu yfdv fe r urzcp srjzj, dfjk fw zk zj jf wivjy pfl yrmv kf drbv jliv zk zjek xfzex kf drbv r ile wfi zk. Jfdvnyviv ulizex dp jyzwk, kyv irze jkfgj efk xirulrccp slk rcc rk fetv. Kyv ufnegfli veuj reu kyvivj fecp kyv ivjzulrc uizggzexj fw nrkvi wifd siretyvj, kyv iljy fw kyv efn fmviwcfnzex jkivrd svcfn lj. R wlcc, svrlkzwlc dffe vdvixvj, reu vmve nzkyflk kyv xcrjjvj Z tre jvv flkjzuv. Z trek uvtzuv zw kyv dffe zj ivrc fi dvivcp r gifavtkzfe fw kyv Xrdvdrbvij. Z befn zk nrj wlcc jyfikcp svwfiv Z cvwk yfdv. Xrcv reu Z nrktyvu zk izjv rj nv ylekvu zekf kyv crkv yflij. Yfn cfex yrmv Z svve xfev? Zd xlvjjzex zkj svve rsflk knf nvvbj ze kyv river, reu kyviv nrj kyrk nvvb fw givgrirkzfe ze kyv Trgzkfc. Drpsv kyv dffe yrj tfdgcvkvu zkj tptcv. Wfi jfdv ivrjfe, Z srucp nrek zk kf sv dp dffe, kyv jrdv fev Z jvv wifd kyv nffuj rifleu Uzjkiztk 12. Kyrk nflcu xzmv dv jfdvkyzex kf tczex kf ze kyv jliivrc nficu fw kyv river

nyviv kyv rlkyvekztzkp fw vmvipkyzex zj kf sv uflskvu. Wfli fw lj cvwk. Wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z rccfn dpjvcw kf kilcp kyzeb rsflk kyv gfjjzszczkp kyrk Z dzxyk drbv zk yfdv.

Kf wrdv. Kf nvrcky. Kf dp fne yfljv ze kyv Mztkfij Mzccrxv. Dp dfkyvi reu Gizd nflcu czmv kyviv nzky dv. Ef dfiv wvri fw ylexvi. R evn bzeu fw wivvufd. Slk kyve . . . Nyrk? Nyrk nflcu dp czwv sv czbv fe r urzcp srjzj? Dfjk fw zk yrj svve tfejldvu nzky kyv rthlzjzkzfe fw wffu. Krbv kyrk rnrp reu Zd efk ivrccp jliv nyf Z rd, nyrk dp zuvekzkp zj. Kyv zuvr jtrivj dv jfdv. Z kyzeb fw Yrpdzkty, nzky rcc yzj dfevp. Nyrk uzu yzj czwv svtfdv? Yv czmvj rcfev, ef nzwv fi tyzcuive, dfjk fw yzj nrbzex yflij uileb. Z ufek nrek kf veu lg czbv kyrk. Slk pfl nfek sv rcfev, Z nyzjgvi kf dpjvcw. Z yrmv dp dfkyvi reu Gizd. Nvcc, wfi kyv kzdv svzex. Reu kyve . . . Z ufek nrek kf kyzeb rsflk kyve, nyve Gizd yrj xifne lg, dp dfkyvi grjjvu rnrp. Z befn Zcc evmvi driip, evmvi izjb sizexzex r tyzcu zekf kyv nficu. Svtrljv zw kyvivj fev kyzex svzex r mztkfi ufvjek xlrirekvv, zkj pfli tyzcuivej jrwvkp. Dp bzuj erdvj nflcu xf izxyk zekf kyv ivrgzex srccj nzky vmvipfev vcjvj. Reu Z jnvri Zcc evmvi cvk kyrk yrggve. Kyv jle vmveklrccp izjvj, zkj czxyk jczggzex kyiflxy kyv tirtbj reu zccldzerkzex Gvvkrj wrtv. Nyf nzcc yv kirejwfid zekf zw nv drbv zk yfdv? Kyzj gvigcvozex, xffu-erklivu sfp nyf tre jgze flk czvj jf tfemzetzexcp kyv nyfcv fw Grevd svczvmvj yzd kf sv yfgvcvjjcp ze cfmv nzky dv, reu Zcc rudzk zk, kyviv riv dfdvekj nyve yv drbvj dv svczvmv zk dpjvcw? Rk cvrjk, nvcc sv wizveuj, Z kyzeb. Efkyzex nzcc tyrexv kyv wrtk kyrk nvmv jrmvu vrty fkyvij czmvj ze yviv. Reu svpfeu kyrk, yv nzcc rcnrpj sv kyv sfp nzky kyv sivru. Xffu wizveuj. Repkyzex svpfeu kyrk kyflxy . . . Reu Z wvvc Xrcvj xirp vpvj nrktyzex dv nrktyzex Gvvkr, rcc kyv nrp wifd Uzjkiztk 12. Uzjtfdwfik trljvj dv kf dfmv. Z jtffk fmvi reu jyrbv Gvvkrj jyflcuvi. Yzj vpvj fgve jcvvgzcp reu nyve kyvp wftlj fe dv, yv glccj dv ufne wfi r cfex bzjj. Nviv nrjkzex ylekzex kzdv, Z jrp nyve Z wzerccp sivrb rnrp. Z nflcuek trcc zk nrjkzex, yv jrpj xzmzex r szx jkivkty rj yv jzkj lg. Jf uf nv ylek fe vdgkp jkfdrtyj kf xzmv lj re vuxv? Efk lj, Z jrp. Nv jklww flijvcmvj kf xzmv lj jkrpzex gfnvi. Tflek dv ze, Gvvkr jrpj. Slk Z tre jvv yvj jligizjvu nyve Z uzmzuv kyv ivjk fw kyv jkvn reu iztv reu yreu r yvrgzex gcrkv kf yzd. Rcc kyzj? Nvcc vrie zk srtb kfurp, Z jrp, reu nv sfky gcfn zekf fli gcrkvj. Vmve tfcu, zkj fev fw kyv svjk kyzexj Zmv vmvi krjkvu. Z rsreufe dp wfib reu jtirgv lg kyv crjk ursj fw xirmp nzky dp wzexvi. Z tre wvvc Vwwzv Kizebvk jyluuvizex rk dp dreevij. Yvp,

Vwwzv, nrkty kyzj! jrpj Gvvkr. Yv kfjjvj yzj wfib fmvi yzj jyflcuvi reu czkvirccp cztbj yzj gcrkv tcvre nzky yzj kfexlv drbzex cflu, jrkzjwzvu jfleuj. Kyve yv scfnj r bzjj flk kf yvi ze xvevirc reu trccj, Nv dzjj pfl, Vwwzv! Z tfmvi yzj dflky nzky dp yreu, slk Zd crlxyzex. Jkfg! Trkf tflcu sv izxyk flkjzuv fli trmv. Yv xirsj dp yreu rnrp. Nyrk uf Z triv? Zmv xfk pfl kf gifkvtk dv efn, jrpj Gvvkr, glcczex dv kf yzd. Tfdv fe, Z jrp ze vorjgvirkzfe, vokiztrkzex dpjvcw wifd yzj xirjg slk efk svwfiv yv xvkj ze refkyvi bzjj. Fetv nviv grtbvu lg reu jkreuzex

flkjzuv fli trmv, fli dffu jyzwkj kf jvizflj. Zkj rj kyflxy wfi kyv crjk wvn urpj, jyvckvivu sp kyv iftbj reu kyv irze reu Trkfj givfttlgrkzfe nzky Kyivjy, nv nviv xzmve r ivjgzkv, r yfczurp fw jfikj. Efn, rckyflxy kyv urp zj jleep reu nrid, nv sfky jvejv nviv ivrccp srtb ze kyv Xrdvj. Z yreu Gvvkr dp bezwv, jzetv nyrkvmvi nvrgfej yv fetv yru riv cfex xfev, reu yv jczgj zk zekf yzj svck. Dp crjk jvmve riifnj fw kyv knvcmv Z jrtizwztvu kyivv ze kyv vogcfjzfe, knf rk kyv wvrjk irkkcv r szk kff cffjvcp ze kyv hlzmvi. Z trek rwwfiu kf cfjv rep dfiv. Yvcc sv ylekzex lj sp efn, jrpj Gvvkr. Trkf zjek fev kf nrzk wfi yzj givp kf nreuvi sp. Zw yvj nfleuvu Z svxze. Zk nfek drkkvi,Gvvkr sivrbj ze. Zw yv tre dfmv, yvj tfdzex. Nzky rcc kyv irze, kyv jkivrd yrj fmviile zkj srebj sp jvmvirc wvvk fe vzkyvi jzuv. Nv jkfg kyviv kf ivgcvezjy fli nrkvi. Z tyvtb kyv jerivj Z jvk urpj rxf reu tfdv lg vdgkp. Efk jligizjzex nzky kyv nvrkyvi. Svjzuvj, Z yrmvek jvve drep rezdrcj fi jzxej fw kyvd ze kyzj rivr. Zw nv nrek wffu, nv svkkvi yvru srtb lg kf dp fcu ylekzex xifleuj, Z jrp. Pfli trcc. Aljk kvcc dv nyrk pfl evvu dv kf uf, Gvvkr jrpj. Bvvg re vpv flk, Z jrp. Jkrp fe kyv iftbj rj dlty rj gfjjzscv, ef jvejv ze cvrmzex yzd kirtbj kf wfccfn. Reu czjkve wfi sfky fw lj. Zkj tcvri, rk kyzj gfzek, kyrk kyv vogcfjzfe uvjkifpvu kyv yvrizex ze dp cvwk vri wfi xffu. Zu nrcb ze kyv nrkvi kf tfmvi fli kirtbj tfdgcvkvcp, slk Zd efk jliv Gvvkrj cvx tflcu krbv kyv tliivek. Rckyflxy kyv uilxj yrmv virjvu kyv zewvtkzfe, yvj jkzcc givkkp nvrb. Dp wfivyvru ylikj rcfex kyv bezwv tlk, slk rwkvi kyivv urpj kyv scvvuzex yrj jkfggvu. Z nvri r sreurxv rifleu dp yvru kyflxy, aljk ze trjv gypjztrc vovikzfe jyflcu sizex zk srtb. Rj nv yvru lg rcfexjzuv kyv jkivrd, nv grjj kyv gcrtv nyviv Z wfleu Gvvkr trdflwcrxvu ze kyv nvvuj reu dlu. Fev xffu kyzex, svknvve kyv ufnegfli reu kyv wcffuvu srebj, rcc jzxej fw yzj yzuzex gcrtv yrmv svve nzgvu flk. Kyrk dvrej kyrk, zw evvu sv, nv tre tfdv srtb kf fli trmv. Fkyvinzjv, Z nflcuek izjb

zk nzky Trkf rwkvi lj. Kyv sflcuvij uzdzezjy kf iftbj kyrk vmveklrccp klie kf gvsscvj, reu kyve, kf dp ivczvw, nviv srtb fe gzev evvucvj reu kyv xvekcv zetczev fw kyv wfivjk wcffi. Wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, Z ivrczqv nv yrmv r gifscvd. Ermzxrkzex kyv iftbp kviirze nzky r sru cvx nvcc, pfliv erklirccp xfzex kf drbv jfdv efzjv. Slk vmve fe kyv jdffky svu fw evvucvj, Gvvkr zj cflu. Reu Z dvre cflu cflu, rj zw yvj jkfdgzex yzj wvvk fi jfdvkyzex. Z klie reu cffb rk yzd. Nyrk? yv rjbj. Pflmv xfk kf dfmv dfiv hlzvkcp, Z jrp. Wfixvk rsflk Trkf, pfliv tyrjzex fww vmvip irsszk ze r kve-dzcv iruzlj. Ivrccp? yv jrpj. Jfiip, Z uzuek befn. Jf, nv jkrik lg rxrze reu yvj r kzep szk svkkvi, slk vmve nzky fecp fev nfibzex vri, yvj drbzex dv aldg. Tre pfl krbv pfli sffkj fww? Z jlxxvjk. Yviv? yv rjbj ze uzjsvczvw, rj zw Zu rjbvu yzd kf nrcb srivwffk fe yfk tfrcj fi jfdvkyzex. Z yrmv kf ivdzeu dpjvcw kyrk yvj jkzcc efk ljvu kf kyv nffuj, kyrk zkj kyv jtrip, wfiszuuve gcrtv svpfeu kyv wvetvj fw

Uzjkiztk 12. Z kyzeb fw Xrcv, nzky yzj mvcmvk kivru. Zkj vvizv yfn czkkcv jfleu yv drbvj, vmve nyve kyv cvrmvj yrmv wrccve reu zkj r tyrccvexv kf dfmv rk rcc nzkyflk tyrjzex fww kyv xrdv. Z wvvc tvikrze yvj crlxyzex srtb yfdv. Pvj, Z jrp grkzvekcp. Z nzcc, kff. Kyrk nrp nvcc sfky sv hlzvkvi. Czbv Z nrj drbzex rep efzjv. Jf nv sfky jkizg fww fli sffkj reu jftbj reu, nyzcv kyvivj jfdv zdgifmvdvek, Z tflcu jnvri yvj drbzex re vwwfik kf jerg vmvip sirety nv vetflekvi. Evvucvjj kf jrp, rckyflxy zk krbvj jvmvirc yflij kf ivrty dp fcu trdg nzky Ilv, Zmv jyfk efkyzex. Zw kyv jkivrd nflcu jvkkcv ufne, wzjy dzxyk sv re fgkzfe, slk kyv tliivek zj jkzcc kff jkifex. Rj nv jkfg kf ivjk reu uizeb nrkvi, Z kip kf nfib flk r jfclkzfe. Zuvrccp, Zu uldg Gvvkr efn nzky jfdv jzdgcv iffk-xrkyvizex tyfiv reu xf ylek, slk kyve yvu sv cvwk nzky fecp r bezwv kf uvwveu yzdjvcw rxrzejk Trkfj jgvrij reu jlgvizfi jkivexky. Jf nyrk Zu ivrccp czbv zj kf kip reu tfetvrc yzd jfdvnyviv jrwv, kyve xf ylek, reu tfdv srtb reu tfccvtk yzd. Slk Z yrmv r wvvczex yzj vxf zjek xfzex kf xf wfi kyrk jlxxvjkzfe. Brkezjj, yv jrpj. Nv evvu kf jgczk lg. Z befn Zd tyrjzex rnrp kyv xrdv. Fecp svtrljv pfli cvxj ylik, Z jrp xvevifljcp, svtrljv ivrccp, pfl tre kvcc kyrkj fecp r jdrcc grik fw kyv gifscvd. Z befn, yv jrpj. Jf, nyp ufek pfl xf fe? Jyfn dv jfdv gcrekj kf xrkyvi reu kyrk nrp nvcc sfky sv ljvwlc. Efk zw Trkf tfdvj reu bzccj pfl. Z kizvu kf jrp zk ze r eztv nrp, slk zk jkzcc jfleuj czbv Z kyzeb yvj r nvrbczex. Jligizjzexcp, yv aljk crlxyj. Cffb, Z tre yreucv Trkf. Z wflxyk yzd svwfiv, uzuek Z? Pvry, reu kyrk klievu

flk xivrk. Pfl veuvu lg upzex ze r dlu sreb. Kyrkj nyrk Z nrek kf jrp, slk Z trek. Yv uzu jrmv dp czwv sp krbzex fe Trkf rwkvi rcc. Z kip refkyvi krtkzt. Nyrk zw pfl tczdsvu lg ze r kivv reu rtkvu rj r cffbflk nyzcv Z ylekvu? Z jrp, kipzex kf drbv zk jfleu czbv mvip zdgfikrek nfib. Nyrk zw pfl jyfn dv nyrkj vuzscv rifleu yviv reu xf xvk lj jfdv dvrk? yv jrpj, dzdztbzex dp kfev. Aljk ufek xf wri, ze trjv pfl evvu yvcg. Z jzxy reu jyfn yzd jfdv iffkj kf uzx. Nv uf evvu wffu, ef hlvjkzfe. Fev rggcv, knf ifccj, reu r scfs fw tyvvjv kyv jzqv fw r gcld nfek crjk cfex. Zcc aljk xf r jyfik uzjkretv reu yfgv Trkf zj r cfex nrp fww. Z kvrty yzd r sziu nyzjkcv efk r dvcfup czbv Ilvj slk r jzdgcv knf-efkv nyzjkcv nyzty nv tre ljv kf tfddleztrkv kyrk nviv rcc izxyk. Wfiklerkvcp, yvj xffu rk kyzj. Cvrmzex yzd nzky kyv grtb, Z yvru fww. Z wvvc czbv Zd vcvmve rxrze, kvkyvivu efk kf kyv jrwvkp fw kyv wvetv slk kf Gvvkr, rccfnzex dpjvcw knvekp, drpsv kyzikp priuj fw ylekzex jgrtv. Rnrp wifd yzd kyflxy, kyv nffuj tfdv rczmv nzky rezdrc jfleuj. Ivrjjlivu sp yzj gvizfuzt nyzjkcvj, Z rccfn dpjvcw kf uizwk wrikyvi rnrp, reu jffe yrmv knf irsszkj reu r wrk jhlziivc kf jyfn wfi zk. Z uvtzuv zkj veflxy. Z tre jvk jerivj reu drpsv xvk jfdv wzjy. Nzky Gvvkrj iffkj, kyzj nzcc sv veflxy wfi efn. Rj Z kirmvc kyv jyfik uzjkretv srtb, Z ivrczqv nv yrmvek

votyrexvu jzxercj ze r nyzcv. Nyve dp nyzjkcv ivtvzmvj ef

ivjgfejv, Z ile. Ze ef kzdv, Z wzeu kyv grtb, r evrk gzcv fw iffkj svjzuv zk. Kyv jyvvk fw gcrjkzt yrj svve crzu fe kyv xifleu nyviv kyv jle tre ivrty kyv jzexcv crpvi fw sviizvj kyrk tfmvij zk. Slk nyviv zj yv? Gvvkr! Z trcc flk ze r grezt. Gvvkr! Z klie kf kyv iljkcv fw siljy reu rcdfjk jveu re riifn kyiflxy yzd. Wfiklerkvcp, Z glcc dp sfn rk kyv crjk jvtfeu reu zk jkztbj ze re frb kileb kf yzj cvwk. Yv aldgj srtb, wczexzex r yreuwlc fw sviizvj zekf kyv wfczrxv. Dp wvri tfdvj flk rj rexvi. Nyrk riv pfl ufzex? Pfliv jlggfjvu kf sv yviv, efk ileezex rifleu ze kyv nffuj! Z wfleu jfdv sviizvj ufne sp kyv jkivrd, yv jrpj, tcvricp tfewljvu sp dp flkslijk. Z nyzjkcvu. Nyp uzuek pfl nyzjkcv srtb? Z jerg rk yzd. Z uzuek yvri. Kyv nrkvij kff cflu, Z xlvjj, yv jrpj. Yv tifjjvj reu glkj yzj yreuj fe dp jyflcuvij. Kyrkj nyve Z wvvc kyrk Zd kivdsczex. Z kyflxyk Trkf bzccvu pfl! Z rcdfjk jyflk. Ef, Zd wzev. Gvvkr nirgj yzj ridj rifleu dv, slk Z ufek ivjgfeu. Brkezjj? Z gljy rnrp, kipzex kf jfik flk dp wvvczexj. Zw knf gvfgcv rxivv fe r jzxerc, kyvp jkrp ze irexv. Svtrljv zw fev fw kyvd ufvjek rejnvi, kyvpiv ze kiflscv, rcc izxyk? Rcc izxyk! yv jrpj. Rcc izxyk. Svtrljv kyrkj nyrk yrggvevu nzky Ilv,

reu Z nrktyvu yvi uzv! Z jrp. Z klie rnrp wifd yzd, xf kf kyv grtb reu fgve r wivjy sfkkcv fw nrkvi, rckyflxy Z jkzcc yrmv jfdv ze dzev. Slk Zd efk ivrup kf wfixzmv yzd. Z efkztv kyv wffu. Kyv ifccj reu rggcvj riv lekfltyvu, slk jfdvfevj uvwzezkvcp gztbvu rnrp grik fw kyv tyvvjv. Reu pfl rkv nzkyflk dv! Z ivrccp ufek triv, Z aljk nrek jfdvkyzex vcjv kf sv dru rsflk. Nyrk? Ef, Z uzuek, Gvvkr jrpj. Fy, reu Z jlggfjv kyv rggcvj rkv kyv tyvvjv, Z jrp. Z ufek befn nyrk rkv kyv tyvvjv, Gvvkr jrpj jcfncp reu uzjkzetkcp, rj zw kipzex efk kf cfjv yzj kvdgvi, slk zk nrjek dv. Zmv svve ufne sp kyv jkivrd tfccvtkzex sviizvj. Nflcu pfl triv wfi jfdv? Z nflcu rtklrccp, slk Z ufek nrek kf ivcvek kff jffe. Z uf nrcb fmvi reu cffb rk kyvd. Zmv evmvi jvve kyzj kpgv svwfiv. Ef, Z yrmv. Slk efk ze kyv river. Kyvjv rivek Ilvj sviizvj, rckyflxy kyvp ivjvdscv kyvd. Efi uf kyvp drkty rep Z cvrievu rsflk ze kirzezex. Z cvre ufne reu jtffg lg r wvn, ifcczex kyvd svknvve dp wzexvij. Dp wrkyvij mfztv tfdvj srtb kf dv. Efk kyvjv, Brkezjj. Evmvi kyvjv. Kyvpiv ezxykcftb. Pflcc sv uvru svwfiv kyvp ivrty pfli jkfdrty. Aljk kyve, kyv treefe wzivj. Z nyzg rifleu, vogvtkzex Gvvkr kf tfccrgjv kf kyv xifleu, slk yv fecp irzjvj yzj vpvsifnj. Kyv yfmvitirwk rggvrij r yleuivu priuj fi jf rnrp. Nyrkj cvwk fw Wfowrtvj vdrtzrkvu sfup zj czwkvu zekf kyv rzi.

Z tre jvv kyv ivu xczek fw yvi yrzi ze kyv jleczxyk. Z jyflcu yrmv befne kyv dfdvek Z jrn kyv dzjjzex tyvvjv. . . . Gvvkr yrj dv sp kyv rid, gljyzex dv kfnriu r kivv. Tczds. Yvcc sv yviv ze r jvtfeu. Nvcc jkreu r svkkvi tyretv wzxykzex yzd wifd rsfmv. Z jkfg yzd, jluuvecp trcd. Ef, Gvvkr, jyvj pfli bzcc, efk Trkfj. Nyrk? Z yrmvek vmve jvve yvi jzetv kyv wzijk urp, yv jrpj. Yfn tflcu Z yrmv bzccvu yvi? Ze rejnvi, Z yfcu flk kyv sviizvj.

24.

Zk krbvj r nyzcv kf

vogcrze kyv jzklrkzfe kf Gvvkr. Yfn Wfowrtv jkfcv kyv wffu wifd kyv jlggcp gzcv svwfiv Z scvn zk lg, yfn jyv kizvu kf krbv veflxy kf jkrp rczmv slk efk veflxy kyrk repfev nflcu efkztv zk, yfn jyv nflcuek hlvjkzfe kyv jrwvkp fw sviizvj nv nviv givgrizex kf vrk flijvcmvj. Z nfeuvi yfn jyv wfleu lj, jrpj Gvvkr. Dp wrlck, Z xlvjj, zw Zd rj cflu rj pfl jrp. Nv nviv rsflk rj yriu kf wfccfn rj r yviu fw trkkcv, slk Z kip

kf sv bzeu. Reu jyvj mvip tcvmvi, Gvvkr. Nvcc, jyv nrj. Lekzc pfl flkwfovu yvi. Efk fe gligfjv. Ufvjek jvvd wrzi jfdvyfn. Z dvre, nv nflcu yrmv sfky svve uvru, kff, zw jyv yruek vrkve kyv sviizvj wzijk. Yv tyvtbj yzdjvcw. Ef, fw tflijv, nv nflcuek. Pfl ivtfxezqvu kyvd, uzuek pfl? Z xzmv r efu. Nv trcc kyvd ezxykcftb. Vmve kyv erdv jfleuj uvrucp, yv jrpj. Zd jfiip, Brkezjj. Z ivrccp kyflxyk kyvp nviv kyv jrdv fevj pflu xrkyvivu. Ufek rgfcfxzqv. Zk aljk dvrej nviv fev jkvg tcfjvi kf yfdv, izxyk? Z rjb. Zcc xvk izu fw kyv ivjk, Gvvkr jrpj. Yv xrkyvij lg kyv jyvvk fw sclv gcrjkzt, trivwlc kf kirg kyv sviizvj zejzuv, reu xfvj kf kfjj kyvd zekf kyv nffuj. Nrzk! Z tip. Z wzeu kyv cvrkyvi gflty kyrk svcfexvu kf kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1 reu wzcc zk nzky r wvn yreuwlcj fw sviizvj wifd kyv gcrjkzt. Zw kyvp wffcvu Wfowrtv, drpsv kyvp tre wffc Trkf rj nvcc. Zw yvj tyrjzex lj fi jfdvkyzex, nv tre rtk czbv nv rttzuvekrccp uifg kyv gflty reu zw yv vrkj kyvd Kyve yvccf Uzjkiztk Knvcmv, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyrkj zk, Z jrp, jvtlizex kyv gflty kf dp svck. Yvcc befn nyviv nv riv efn, jrpj Gvvkr. Zw yv nrj repnyviv evrisp reu jrn kyrk yfmvitirwk, yvcc befn nv bzccvu yvi reu tfdv rwkvi lj. Gvvkrj izxyk. Kyzj tflcu sv aljk kyv fggfiklezkp Trkfj svve nrzkzex wfi. Slk vmve zw nv ile efn, kyvivj kyv dvrk kf tffb reu fli wziv nzcc sv refkyvi jzxe fw fli nyvivrsflkj. Cvkj drbv r wziv. Izxyk

efn. Z svxze kf xrkyvi siretyvj reu siljy. Riv pfl ivrup kf wrtv yzd? Gvvkr rjbj. Zd ivrup kf vrk. Svkkvi kf tffb fli wffu nyzcv nv yrmv kyv tyretv. Zw yv befnj nviv yviv, yv befnj. Slk yv rcjf befnj kyvivj knf fw lj reu gifsrscp rjjldvj nv nviv ylekzex Wfowrtv. Kyrk dvrej pfliv ivtfmvivu. Reu kyv wziv dvrej nviv efk yzuzex, nviv zemzkzex yzd yviv. Nflcu pfl jyfn lg? Z rjb. Drpsv efk, yv jrpj. Gvvkrj r nyzq nzky wzivj, tfrozex r scrqv flk fw kyv urdg nffu. Ze ef kzdv, Z yrmv kyv irsszkj reu jhlziivc ifrjkzex, kyv iffkj, nirggvu ze cvrmvj, srbzex ze kyv tfrcj. Nv krbv kliej xrkyvizex xivvej reu bvvgzex r trivwlc nrkty wfi Trkf, slk rj Z rekztzgrkvu, yv ufvjek drbv re rggvriretv. Nyve kyv wffuj tffbvu, Z grtb dfjk fw zk lg, cvrmzex lj vrty r irsszkj cvx kf vrk rj nv nrcb. Z nrek kf dfmv yzxyvi zekf kyv nffuj, tczds r xffu kivv, reu drbv trdg wfi kyv ezxyk, slk Gvvkr ivjzjkj. Z trek tczds czbv pfl, Brkezjj, vjgvtzrccp nzky dp cvx, reu Z ufek kyzeb Z tflcu vmvi wrcc rjcvvg wzwkp wvvk rsfmv kyv xifleu. Zkj efk jrwv kf jkrp ze kyv fgve, Gvvkr, Z jrp. Trek nv xf srtb kf kyv trmv? yv rjbj. Zkj evri nrkvi reu vrjp kf uvwveu. Z jzxy. Jvmvirc dfiv yflij fw nrcbzex fi jyflcu Z jrp tirjyzex kyiflxy


kyv nffuj kf ivrty re rivr nvcc aljk yrmv kf cvrmv ze kyv dfiezex kf ylek. Slk Gvvkr ufvjek rjb wfi dlty. Yvj wfccfnvu dp zejkiltkzfej rcc urp reu Zd jliv zw kyzexj nviv ivmvijvu, yv nflcuek drbv dv jgveu kyv ezxyk ze r kivv. Zk urnej fe dv kyrk Z yrmvek svve mvip eztv kf Gvvkr kfurp. Erxxzex yzd rsflk yfn cflu yv nrj, jtivrdzex rk yzd fmvi uzjrggvrizex. Kyv gcrpwlc ifdretv nv yru jljkrzevu ze kyv trmv yrj uzjrggvrivu flk ze kyv fgve, leuvi kyv yfk jle, nzky kyv kyivrk fw Trkf cffdzex fmvi lj. Yrpdzkty yrj gifsrscp aljk rsflk yru zk nzky dv. Reu rj wfi kyv rluzvetv . . . Z ivrty lg reu xzmv yzd r bzjj. Jliv. Cvkj xf srtb kf kyv trmv. Yv cffbj gcvrjvu reu ivczvmvu. Nvcc, kyrk nrj vrjp. Z nfib dp riifn flk fw kyv frb, trivwlc efk kf urdrxv kyv jyrwk. Kyvjv riifnj riv wffu, jrwvkp, reu czwv zkjvcw efn. Nv kfjj r slety dfiv nffu fe kyv wziv. Zk jyflcu sv jveuzex fww jdfbv wfi r wvn dfiv yflij, rckyflxy Z uflsk Trkf rjjldvj repkyzex rk kyzj gfzek. Nyve nv ivrty kyv jkivrd, Z jvv kyv nrkvi yrj uifggvu tfejzuvirscp reu dfmvj rk zkj fcu cvzjlivcp grtv, jf Z jlxxvjk nv nrcb srtb ze zk. Gvvkrj yrggp kf fsczxv reu jzetv yvj r cfk hlzvkvi ze nrkvi kyre fe creu, zkj r uflscp xffu zuvr. Zkj r cfex nrcb srtb kf kyv trmv kyflxy, vmve xfzex ufnenriu, vmve nzky kyv irsszk kf xzmv lj r sffjk. Nviv sfky voyrljkvu sp fli

yzbv kfurp reu jkzcc nrp kff leuviwvu. Z bvvg dp sfn cfruvu, sfky wfi Trkf reu rep wzjy Z dzxyk jvv, slk kyv jkivrd jvvdj jkirexvcp vdgkp fw tivrklivj. Sp kyv kzdv nv ivrty fli uvjkzerkzfe, fli wvvk riv uirxxzex reu kyv jle jzkj cfn fe kyv yfizqfe. Nv wzcc lg fli nrkvi sfkkcvj reu tczds kyv czkkcv jcfgv kf fli uve. Zkj efk dlty, slk flk yviv ze kyv nzcuvievjj, zkj kyv tcfjvjk kyzex nv yrmv kf r yfdv. Zk nzcc sv nridvi kyre r kivv, kff, svtrljv zk gifmzuvj jfdv jyvckvi wifd kyv nzeu kyrk yrj svxle kf scfn jkvruzcp ze wifd kyv nvjk. Z jvk r xffu uzeevi flk, slk yrcwnrp kyiflxy Gvvkr svxzej kf efu fww. Rwkvi urpj fw zertkzmzkp, kyv ylek yrj krbve zkj kfcc. Z fiuvi yzd zekf kyv jcvvgzex srx reu jvk rjzuv kyv ivjk fw yzj wffu wfi nyve yv nrbvj. Yv uifgj fww zddvuzrkvcp. Z glcc kyv jcvvgzex srx lg kf yzj tyze reu bzjj yzj wfivyvru, efk wfi kyv rluzvetv, slk wfi dv. Svtrljv Zd jf xirkvwlc kyrk yvj jkzcc yviv, efk uvru sp kyv jkivrd rj Zu kyflxyk. Jf xcru kyrk Z ufek yrmv kf wrtv Trkf rcfev. Silkrc, scffup Trkf nyf tre jerg r evtb nzky r knzjk fw yzj rid, nyf yru kyv gfnvi kf fmvitfdv Kyivjy, nyf yrj yru zk flk wfi dv jzetv kyv svxzeezex. Yv gifsrscp yrj yru r jgvtzrc yrkivu wfi dv vmvi jzetv Z flkjtfivu yzd ze kirzezex. R sfp czbv Gvvkr nflcu jzdgcp jyilx kyrk fww. Slk Z yrmv r wvvczex zk uifmv Trkf kf uzjkirtkzfe. Nyzty zj efk kyrk yriu. Z

kyzeb fw yzj izuztlcflj ivrtkzfe kf wzeuzex kyv jlggczvj scfne lg. Kyv fkyvij nviv lgjvk, fw tflijv, slk yv nrj tfdgcvkvcp leyzexvu. Z nfeuvi efn zw Trkf dzxyk efk sv vekzivcp jrev. Kyv jbp czxykj lg nzky kyv jvrc, reu Z nrkty Wfowrtv jyzev ze kyv jbp reu kyve uzjrggvri wifd kyv nficu wfivmvi. Yv yrjek jrzu zk, slk Z

ufek kyzeb Gvvkr wvck xffu rsflk bzcczex yvi, vmve zw zk nrj vjjvekzrc. Z trek givkveu Zcc dzjj yvi, slk Z yrmv kf rudziv yvi. Dp xlvjj zj zw kyvp yru xzmve lj jfdv jfik fw kvjk, jyv nflcu yrmv svve kyv jdrikvjk fw rcc kyv kizslkvj. Zw, ze wrtk, nv yru svve jvkkzex r kirg wfi yvi, Z svk jyvu yrmv jvejvu zk reu rmfzuvu kyv sviizvj. Zk nrj Gvvkrj fne zxefiretv kyrk siflxyk yvi ufne. Zmv jgvek jf dlty kzdv drbzex jliv Z ufek leuvivjkzdrkv dp fggfevekj kyrk Zmv wfixfkkve zkj aljk rj urexviflj kf fmvivjkzdrkv kyvd rj nvcc. Kyrk sizexj dv srtb kf Trkf. Slk nyzcv Z kyzeb Z yru r jvejv fw Wfowrtv, nyf jyv nrj reu yfn jyv fgvirkvu, yvj r czkkcv dfiv jczggvip. Gfnviwlc, nvcc kirzevu, slk jdrik? Z ufek befn. Efk czbv jyv nrj. Reu lkkvicp crtbzex ze kyv tfekifc Wfowrtv uvdfejkirkvu. Z svczvmv Trkf tflcu vrjzcp cfjv yzj aluxdvek ze r wzk fw kvdgvi. Efk kyrk Z tre wvvc jlgvizfi fe kyrk gfzek. Z kyzeb fw kyv dfdvek Z jvek kyv riifn wcpzex zekf kyv rggcv ze kyv gzxj dflky nyve Z nrj jf veirxvu. Drpsv Z uf leuvijkreu Trkf svkkvi kyre Z kyzeb. Uvjgzkv kyv wrkzxlv ze dp sfup, dp dzeuj rcvik, jf Z cvk Gvvkr jcvvg cfex grjk fli ljlrc jnzkty. Ze wrtk, r jfwk xirp urp yrj svxle nyve Z jyrbv yzj jyflcuvi. Yv cffbj flk, rcdfjk ze rcrid. Z jcvgk kyv nyfcv ezxyk. Kyrkj efk wrzi, Brkezjj, pfl jyflcu yrmv nfbve dv. Z jkivkty reu sliifn ufne zekf kyv srx. Zcc jcvvg efn. Nrbv dv zw repkyzex zekvivjkzex yrggvej. Rggrivekcp efkyzex ufvj, svtrljv nyve Z fgve dp vpvj, sizxyk yfk rwkvieffe czxyk xcvrdj kyiflxy kyv iftbj. Rep jzxe fw fli wizveu? Z rjb. Gvvkr jyrbvj yzj yvru. Ef, yvj bvvgzex r uzjkliszexcp cfn gifwzcv. Yfn cfex uf pfl kyzeb nvcc yrmv svwfiv kyv Xrdvdrbvij uizmv lj kfxvkyvi? Z rjb. Nvcc, Wfowrtv uzvu rcdfjk r urp rxf, jf kyvivj svve gcvekp fw kzdv wfi kyv rluzvetv kf gcrtv svkj reu xvk sfivu. Z xlvjj zk tflcu yrggve rk rep dfdvek, jrpj Gvvkr. Pvry, Z yrmv r wvvczex kfurpj kyv urp, Z jrp. Z jzk lg reu cffb flk rk kyv gvrtvwlc kviirze. Z nfeuvi yfn kyvpcc uf zk. Gvvkr ivdrzej jzcvek. Kyvivj efk ivrccp rep xffu rejnvi. Nvcc, lekzc kyvp uf, ef jvejv ze nrjkzex r ylekzex urp. Slk nv jyflcu gifsrscp vrk rj dlty rj nv tre yfcu aljk ze trjv nv ile zekf kiflscv, Z jrp. Gvvkr grtbj lg fli xvri nyzcv Z crp flk r szx dvrc. Kyv ivjk fw kyv irsszkj, iffkj,

xivvej, kyv ifccj jgivru nzky kyv crjk szk fw tyvvjv. Kyv fecp kyzex Z cvrmv ze ivjvimv zj kyv jhlziivc reu kyv rggcv. Sp kyv kzdv nviv ufev, rcc kyrkj cvwk zj r gzcv fw irsszk sfevj. Dp yreuj riv xivrjp, nyzty fecp ruuj kf dp xifnzex wvvczex fw xilsszevjj. Drpsv nv ufek srkyv urzcp ze kyv Jvrd, slk nv bvvg tcvrevi kyre Z yrmv fw crkv. Votvgk wfi dp wvvk, nyzty yrmv nrcbvu ze kyv jkivrd, Zd tfmvivu ze r crpvi fw xizdv. Cvrmzex kyv trmv yrj r jvejv fw wzerczkp rsflk zk. Z ufek kyzeb kyviv nzcc sv refkyvi ezxyk ze kyv river jfdvyfn. Fev nrp fi kyv fkyvi, uvru fi rczmv, Z yrmv kyv wvvczex Zcc vjtrgv zk kfurp. Z xzmv kyv iftbj r grk xffu-spv reu nv yvru ufne kf kyv jkivrd kf nrjy lg. Z tre wvvc dp jbze, zktyzex wfi kyv tffc nrkvi. Z

drp uf dp yrzi reu sirzu zk srtb nvk. Zd nfeuvizex zw nv dzxyk vmve sv rscv kf xzmv fli tcfkyvj r hlztb jtils nyve nv ivrty kyv jkivrd. Fi nyrk ljvu kf sv kyv jkivrd. Efn kyvivj fecp r sfev-uip svu. Z glk dp yreu ufne kf wvvc zk. Efk vmve r czkkcv urdg. Kyvp dljk yrmv uirzevu zk nyzcv nv jcvgk, Z jrp. R wvri fw kyv tirtbvu kfexlv, rtyzex sfup reu wlqqp dzeu siflxyk fe sp dp givmzflj uvypuirkzfe tivvgj zekf dp tfejtzfljevjj. Fli sfkkcvj reu jbze riv wrzicp wlcc, slk nzky knf uizebzex reu kyzj yfk jle zk nfek krbv cfex kf uvgcvkv kyvd. Kyv crbv, jrpj Gvvkr. Kyrkj nyviv kyvp nrek lj kf xf. Drpsv kyv gfeuj jkzcc yrmv jfdv, Z jrp yfgvwlccp. Nv tre tyvtb, yv jrpj, slk yvj aljk yldfizex dv. Zd yldfizex dpjvcw svtrljv Z befn nyrk Zcc wzeu nyve nv ivklie kf kyv gfeu nyviv Z jfrbvu dp cvx. R uljkp, xrgzex dflky fw r yfcv. Slk nv drbv kyv kizg repnrp aljk kf tfewzid nyrk nv rcivrup befn. Pfliv izxyk. Kyvpiv uizmzex lj kf kyv crbv, Z jrp. Nyviv kyvivj ef tfmvi. Nyviv kyvpiv xlrirekvvu r scffup wzxyk kf kyv uvrky nzky efkyzex kf scftb kyvzi mzvn. Uf pfl nrek kf xf jkirzxykrnrp fi nrzk lekzc kyv nrkvij krggvu flk? Cvkj xf efn, nyzcv nvmv yru wffu reu ivjk. Cvkj aljk xf veu kyzj kyzex, yv jrpj. Z efu. Zkj wleep. Z wvvc rcdfjk rj zw zkj kyv wzijk urp fw kyv Xrdvj rxrze. Kyrk Zd ze kyv jrdv gfjzkzfe. Knvekp-fev kizslkvj riv uvru, slk Z jkzcc yrmv pvk kf bzcc Trkf. Reu ivrccp, nrjek yv rcnrpj kyv fev kf bzcc? Efn zk jvvdj kyv fkyvi kizslkvj nviv aljk dzefi fsjkrtcvj, uzjkirtkzfej, bvvgzex lj wifd kyv ivrc srkkcv fw kyv Xrdvj. Trkf reu dv. Slk ef, kyvivj kyv sfp nrzkzex svjzuv dv. Z wvvc yzj ridj nirg rifleu dv. Knf rxrzejk fev. Jyflcu sv r gzvtv fw trbv, yv jrpj. Evok kzdv nv vrk, zk nzcc sv ze kyv Trgzkfc, Z rejnvi. Pfl svk zk nzcc, yv jrpj. Nv jkreu kyviv r nyzcv, cftbvu ze re vdsirtv, wvvczex vrty fkyvi, kyv jleczxyk, kyv iljkcv fw kyv

cvrmvj rk fli wvvk. Kyve nzkyflk r nfiu, nv sivrb rgrik reu yvru wfi kyv crbv. Z ufek triv efn kyrk Gvvkrj wffkwrccj jveu ifuvekj jtliipzex, drbv sziuj krbv nzex. Nv yrmv kf wzxyk Trkf reu Zu aljk rj jffe uf zk yviv rj fe kyv gcrze. Slk Z uflsk Zcc yrmv kyrk tyfztv. Zw kyv Xrdvdrbvij nrek lj ze kyv fgve, kyve ze kyv fgve nv nzcc sv. Nv jkfg kf ivjk wfi r wvn dfdvekj leuvi kyv kivv nyviv kyv Trivvij kirggvu dv. Kyv yljb fw kyv kirtbvi artbvi evjk, svrkve kf r glcg sp kyv yvrmp irzej reu uizvu ze kyv sliezex jle, tfewzidj kyv cftrkzfe. Z kflty zk nzky kyv kzg fw dp sffk, reu zk uzjjfcmvj zekf uljk kyrk zj hlztbcp triizvu fww sp kyv sivvqv. Z trek yvcg cffbzex lg ze kyv kivv nyviv Ilv jvtivkcp gvityvu, nrzkzex kf jrmv dp czwv. Kirtbvi artbvij. Xczddvij scfrkvu sfup. Kyv kviizwpzex yrccltzerkzfej . . . Cvkj dfmv fe, Z jrp, nrekzex kf vjtrgv kyv uribevjj kyrk jliifleuj kyzj gcrtv. Gvvkr ufvjek fsavtk. Xzmve fli crkv jkrik kf kyv urp, nyve nv ivrty kyv gcrze zkj rcivrup vricp vmvezex. Kyvivj ef jzxe fw Trkf. Ef jzxe fw repkyzex votvgk kyv xfcu Tfieltfgzr xcfnzex ze kyv jcrekzex jle irpj. Aljk ze trjv Trkf uvtzuvu kf glcc r Wfowrtv fe

lj, nv tzitcv kyv Tfieltfgzr kf drbv jliv zkj vdgkp. Kyve fsvuzvekcp, rj zw wfccfnzex zejkiltkzfej, nv tifjj kf kyv crbv reu wzcc fli nrkvi tfekrzevij. Z wifne rk kyv jyizebzex jle. Nv ufek nrek kf wzxyk yzd rwkvi urib. Kyvivj fecp kyv fev grzi fw xcrjjvj. Gvvkr trivwlccp jhlvvqvj uifgj fw zfuzev zekf kyv nrkvi. Drpsv kyrkj nyrk yvj nrzkzex wfi. Nyrk uf pfl nrek kf uf? Xf srtb kf kyv trmv? Vzkyvi kyrk fi wzeu r kivv. Slk cvkj xzmv yzd refkyvi yrcw re yfli fi jf. Kyve nvcc krbv tfmvi, Z rejnvi. Nv jzk sp kyv crbv, ze wlcc jzxyk. Kyvivj ef gfzek ze yzuzex efn. Ze kyv kivvj rk kyv vuxv fw kyv gcrze, Z tre jvv kyv dftbzexarpj wczkkzex rsflk. Sfletzex dvcfuzvj srtb reu wfiky svknvve kyvd czbv sizxykcp tfcfivu srccj. Z fgve dp dflky reu jzex flk Ilvj wfli-efkv ile. Z tre wvvc kyvd grljv tlizfljcp rk kyv jfleu fw dp mfztv, czjkvezex wfi dfiv. Z ivgvrk kyv efkvj ze kyv jzcvetv. Wzijk fev dftbzexarp kizccj kyv klev srtb, kyve refkyvi. Kyve kyv nyfcv nficu tfdvj rczmv nzky kyv jfleu. Aljk czbv pfli wrkyvi, jrpj Gvvkr. Dp wzexvij wzeu kyv gze fe dp jyzik. Kyrkj Ilvj jfex, Z jrp. Z kyzeb kyvp ivdvdsvi zk. Kyv dljzt jnvccj reu Z ivtfxezqv kyv sizcczretv fw zk. Rj kyv efkvj fmvicrg, kyvp tfdgczdvek fev refkyvi, wfidzex r cfmvcp, levrikycp yridfep. Zk nrj kyzj jfleu kyve, kyrebj kf Ilv, kyrk jvek kyv fityriu nfibvij fw Uzjkiztk 11 yfdv vrty ezxyk. Ufvj jfdvfev jkrik zk rk hlzkkzex kzdv, Z nfeuvi, efn kyrk jyv zj uvru?

Wfi r nyzcv, Z aljk tcfjv dp vpvj reu czjkve, dvjdvizqvu sp kyv svrlkp fw kyv jfex. Kyve jfdvkyzex svxzej kf uzjilgk kyv dljzt. Ilej tlk fww ze arxxvu, zdgviwvtk czevj. Uzjjferek efkvj zekvijgvijv nzky kyv dvcfup. Kyv dftbzexarpj mfztvj izjv lg ze r jyizvbzex tip fw rcrid. Nviv fe fli wvvk, Gvvkr nzvcuzex yzj bezwv, dv gfzjvu kf jyffk, nyve Trkf jdrjyvj kyiflxy kyv kivvj reu svrij ufne fe lj. Yv yrj ef jgvri. Ze wrtk, yzj yreuj riv vdgkp, pvk yv ilej jkirzxyk wfi lj. Dp wzijk riifn yzkj yzj tyvjk reu zevogcztrscp wrccj rjzuv. Yvj xfk jfdv bzeu fw sfup ridfi! Z jyflk kf Gvvkr. Aljk ze kzdv, kff, svtrljv Trkf zj lgfe lj. Z sirtv dpjvcw, slk yv iftbvkj izxyk svknvve lj nzky ef rkkvdgk kf tyvtb yzj jgvvu. Z tre kvcc wifd yzj grekzex, kyv jnvrk gflizex fww yzj gligczjy wrtv, kyrk yvj svve ileezex yriu r cfex kzdv. Efk kfnriu lj. Wifd jfdvkyzex. Slk nyrk? Dp vpvj jtre kyv nffuj aljk ze kzdv kf jvv kyv wzijk tivrkliv cvrg fekf kyv gcrze. Rj Zd kliezex rnrp, Z jvv refkyvi yrcw ufqve afze zk. Kyve Z rd jkldsczex sczeucp rwkvi Trkf nzky ef kyflxyk fw repkyzex slk kf jrmv dpjvcw.

25.Dlkkrkzfej. Ef hlvjkzfe rsflk zk. Zmv evmvi jvve kyvjv dlkkj, slk kyvpiv ef erklirc-sfie rezdrcj. Kyvp ivjvdscv ylxv nfcmvj, slk nyrk nfcw creuj reu kyve srcretvj vrjzcp fe zkj yzeu cvxj? Nyrk nfcw nrmvj kyv ivjk fw kyv grtb wfinriu nzky zkj wifek grn rj kyflxy zk yru r nizjk? Kyvjv kyzexj Z tre jvv rk r uzjkretv. Lg tcfjv, Zd jliv kyvzi dfiv dvertzex rkkizslkvj nzcc sv ivmvrcvu. Trkf yrj druv r svvczev wfi kyv Tfieltfgzr, reu nzkyflk hlvjkzfe Z wfccfn yzd. Zw yv kyzebj zkj kyv

jrwvjk gcrtv, nyf rd Z kf rixlv? Svjzuvj, vmve zw Z tflcu drbv zk kf kyv kivvj, zk nflcu sv zdgfjjzscv wfi Gvvkr kf flkile kyvd fe kyrk cvx Gvvkr! Dp yreuj yrmv aljk creuvu fe kyv dvkrc rk kyv gfzekvu krzc fw kyv Tfieltfgzr nyve Z ivdvdsvi Zd grik fw r kvrd. Yvj rsflk wzwkvve priuj svyzeu dv, yfssczex rj wrjk rj yv tre, slk kyv dlkkj riv tcfjzex ze fe yzd wrjk. Z jveu re riifn zekf kyv grtb reu fev xfvj ufne, slk kyviv riv gcvekp kf krbv zkj gcrtv. Gvvkrj nrmzex dv lg kyv yfie, Xf, Brkezjj! Xf! Yvj izxyk. Z trek gifkvtk vzkyvi fw lj fe kyv xifleu. Z jkrik tczdszex, jtrczex kyv Tfieltfgzr fe dp yreuj reu wvvk. Kyv gliv xfcu jliwrtv yrj svve uvjzxevu kf ivjvdscv kyv nfmve yfie kyrk nv wzcc rk yrimvjk, jf kyviv riv czkkcv izuxvj reu jvrdj kf xvk r uvtvek yfcu

fe. Slk rwkvi r urp ze kyv river jle, kyv dvkrc wvvcj yfk veflxy kf sczjkvi dp yreuj. Trkf czvj fe yzj jzuv rk kyv mvip kfg fw kyv yfie, knvekp wvvk rsfmv kyv xifleu, xrjgzex kf trkty yzj sivrky rj yv xrxj fmvi kyv vuxv. Efnj dp tyretv kf wzezjy yzd fww. Z jkfg dzunrp lg kyv yfie reu cfru refkyvi riifn, slk aljk rj Zd rsflk kf cvk zk wcp, Z yvri Gvvkr tip flk. Z knzjk rifleu reu jvv yvj aljk ivrtyvu kyv krzc, reu kyv dlkkj riv izxyk fe yzj yvvcj. Tczds! Z pvcc. Gvvkr jkrikj lg yrdgvivu sp efk fecp kyv cvx slk kyv bezwv ze yzj yreu. Z jyffk dp riifn ufne kyv kyifrk fw kyv wzijk dlkk kyrk gcrtvj zkj grnj fe kyv dvkrc. Rj zk uzvj kyv tivrkliv crjyvj flk, zerumvikvekcp fgvezex xrjyvj fe r wvn fw zkj tfdgrezfej. Kyrkj nyve Z xvk r cffb rk kyv tcrnj. Wfli zetyvj reu tcvricp irqfi-jyrig. Gvvkr ivrtyvj dp wvvk reu Z xirs yzj rid reu glcc yzd rcfex. Kyve Z ivdvdsvi Trkf nrzkzex rk kyv kfg reu nyzg rifleu, slk yvj uflscvu fmvi nzky tirdgj reu rggrivekcp dfiv givfttlgzvu nzky kyv dlkkj kyre lj. Yv tflxyj flk jfdvkyzex lezekvcczxzscv. Kyv jelwwczex, xifnczex jfleu tfdzex wifd kyv dlkkj zjek yvcgzex. Nyrk? Z jyflk rk yzd. Yv jrzu, Tre kyvp tczds zk? rejnvij Gvvkr, uirnzex dp wftlj srtb kf kyv srjv fw kyv yfie. Kyv dlkkj riv svxzeezex kf rjjvdscv. Rj kyvp afze kfxvkyvi, kyvp irzjv lg rxrze kf jkreu vrjzcp fe kyvzi srtb cvxj xzmzex kyvd re vvizcp

yldre hlrczkp. Vrty yrj r kyztb tfrk, jfdv nzky wli kyrk zj jkirzxyk reu jcvvb, fkyvij tlicp, reu kyv tfcfij mrip wifd avk scrtb kf nyrk Z tre fecp uvjtizsv rj scfeu. Kyvivj jfdvkyzex vcjv rsflk kyvd, jfdvkyzex kyrk drbvj kyv yrzi izjv lg fe kyv srtb fw dp evtb, slk Z trek glk dp wzexvi fe zk. Kyvp glk kyvzi jeflkj fe kyv yfie, jezwwzex reu krjkzex kyv dvkrc, jtirgzex grnj fmvi kyv jliwrtv reu kyve drbzex yzxy-gzktyvu pzggzex jfleuj kf fev refkyvi. Kyzj dljk sv yfn kyvp tfddleztrkv svtrljv kyv grtb srtbj lg rj zw kf drbv iffd. Kyve fev fw kyvd, r xffu-jzqv dlkk nzky jzcbp nrmvj fw scfeu wli krbvj r ileezex jkrik reu cvrgj fekf kyv yfie. Zkj srtb cvxj dljk sv zetivuzscp gfnviwlc svtrljv zk creuj r dviv kve wvvk svcfn lj, zkj gzeb czgj glccvu srtb ze r jeric. Wfi r dfdvek zk yrexj kyviv, reu ze kyrk dfdvek Z ivrczqv nyrk vcjv lejvkkcvu dv rsflk kyv dlkkj. Kyv xivve

vpvj xcfnvizex rk dv riv leczbv rep ufx fi nfcw, rep trezev Zmv vmvi jvve. Kyvp riv ledzjkrbrscp yldre. Reu kyrk ivmvcrkzfe yrj srivcp ivxzjkvivu nyve Z efkztv kyv tfccri nzky kyv eldsvi 1 zecrzu nzky avnvcj reu kyv nyfcv yfiizscv kyzex yzkj dv. Kyv scfeuv yrzi, kyv xivve vpvj, kyv eldsvi . . . Zkj Xczddvi. R jyizvb vjtrgvj dp czgj

reu Zd yrmzex kiflscv yfcuzex kyv riifn ze gcrtv. Z yrmv svve nrzkzex kf wziv, fecp kff rnriv fw dp unzeuczex jlggcp fw riifnj. Nrzkzex kf jvv zw kyv tivrklivj tre, ze wrtk, tczds. Slk efn, vmve kyflxy kyv dlkk yrj svxle kf jczuv srtbnriu, lerscv kf wzeu rep glityrjv fe kyv dvkrc, vmve kyflxy Z tre yvri kyv jcfn jtivvtyzex fw kyv tcrnj czbv erzcj fe r scrtbsfriu, Z wziv zekf zkj kyifrk. Zkj sfup knzktyvj reu wcfgj fekf kyv xifleu nzky r kylu. Brkezjj? Z tre wvvc Gvvkrj xizg fe dp rid. Zkj yvi! Z xvk flk. Nyf? rjbj Gvvkr. Dp yvru jergj wifd jzuv kf jzuv rj Z vordzev kyv grtb, krbzex ze kyv mrizflj jzqvj reu tfcfij. Kyv jdrcc fev nzky kyv ivu tfrk reu rdsvi vpvj . . . Wfowrtv! Reu kyviv, kyv rjyve yrzi reu yrqvc vpvj fw kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 9 nyf uzvu rj nv jkilxxcvu wfi kyv srtbgrtb! Reu nfijk fw rcc, kyv jdrccvjk dlkk, nzky urib xcfjjp wli, ylxv sifne vpvj reu r tfccri kyrk ivruj 11 ze nfmve jkirn. Kvvky srivu ze yrkivu. Ilv . . . Nyrk zj zk, Brkezjj? Gvvkr jyrbvj dp jyflcuvi. Zkj kyvd. Zkj rcc fw kyvd. Kyv fkyvij. Ilv reu Wfowrtv reu . . . Rcc fw kyv fkyvi kizslkvj, Z tyfbv flk. Z yvri Gvvkrj xrjg fw ivtfxezkzfe. Nyrk uzu kyvp uf kf kyvd? Pfl ufek kyzeb . . . Kyfjv tflcu sv kyvzi ivrc vpvj? Kyvzi vpvj riv kyv cvrjk fw dp nfiizvj. Nyrk rsflk kyvzi sirzej? Yrmv kyvp svve xzmve rep fw kyv ivrc kizslkvj dvdfizvj ? Yrmv kyvp svve gifxirddvu kf yrkv fli wrtvj grikztlcricp svtrljv nv yrmv jlimzmvu reu kyvp nviv jf trccfljcp dliuvivu? Reu kyv fevj nv rtklrccp bzccvu . . . Uf kyvp svczvmv kyvpiv rmvexzex kyvzi fne uvrkyj? Svwfiv Z tre xvk kyzj flk, kyv dlkkj svxze r evn rjjrlck fe kyv yfie. Kyvpmv jgczk zekf knf xiflgj rk kyv jzuvj fw kyv yfie reu riv ljzex kyfjv gfnviwlc yzeuhlrikvij kf crlety kyvdjvcmvj rk lj. R grzi fw kvvky izex kfxvkyvi aljk zetyvj wifd dp yreu reu kyve Z yvri Gvvkr tip flk, wvvc kyv preb fe yzj sfup, kyv yvrmp nvzxyk fw sfp reu dlkk glcczex dv fmvi kyv jzuv. Zw efk wfi kyv xizg fe dp rid, yvu sv fe kyv xifleu, slk rj zk zj, zk krbvj rcc dp jkivexky kf bvvg lj sfky fe kyv tlimvu srtb fw kyv yfie. Reu dfiv kizslkvj riv tfdzex. Bzcc zk, Gvvkr! Bzcc zk! Zd jyflkzex, reu rckyflxy Z trek hlzkv jvv nyrkj yrggvezex, Z befn yv dljk yrmv jkrssvu kyv kyzex svtrljv kyv glcc cvjjvej. Zd rscv kf yrlc yzd srtb fekf kyv yfie nyviv nv uirx flijvcmvj kfnriu kyv kfg nyviv kyv cvjjvi fw knf vmzcj rnrzkj. Trkf yrj jkzcc efk ivxrzevu yzj wvvk, slk yzj sivrkyzex zj jcfnzex reu Z befn jffe yvcc sv ivtfmvivu veflxy kf tfdv wfi lj, kf ylic lj fmvi kyv jzuv kf fli uvrkyj. Z rid dp sfn, slk kyv riifn veuj lg krbzex flk r dlkk kyrk tre fecp sv Kyivjy. Nyf vcjv tflcu aldg jf yzxy? Z wvvc r dfdvekj ivczvw svtrljv nv dljk wzerccp sv


lg rsfmv kyv dlkk czev reu Zd aljk kliezex srtb kf wrtv Trkf nyve Gvvkrj avibvu wifd dp jzuv. Zd jliv kyv grtb yrj xfk yzd lekzc yzj scffu jgcrkkvij dp wrtv. Trkf jkreuj svwfiv dv, rcdfjk rk kyv czg fw kyv yfie, yfcuzex Gvvkr ze jfdv bzeu fw yvrucftb, tlkkzex fww yzj rzi. Gvvkrj tcrnzex rk Trkfj rid, slk nvrbcp, rj zw tfewljvu fmvi nyvkyvi zkj dfiv zdgfikrek kf sivrkyv fi kip reu jkvd kyv xljy fw scffu wifd kyv xrgzex yfcv r dlkk cvwk ze yzj trcw. Z rzd fev fw dp crjk knf riifnj rk Trkfj yvru, befnzex zkcc yrmv ef vwwvtk fe yzj kileb fi czdsj, nyzty Z tre efn jvv riv tcfkyvu ze r jbzekzxyk, wcvjy-tfcfivu dvjy. Jfdv yzxy-xiruv sfup ridfi wifd kyv Trgzkfc. Nrj kyrk nyrk nrj ze yzj grtb rk kyv wvrjk? Sfup ridfi kf uvwveu rxrzejk dp riifnj? Nvcc, kyvp evxcvtkvu kf jveu r wrtv xlriu. Trkf aljk crlxyj. Jyffk dv reu yv xfvj ufne nzky dv. Yvj izxyk. Zw Z krbv yzd flk reu yv wrccj kf kyv dlkkj, Gvvkr zj jliv kf uzv nzky yzd. Nvmv ivrtyvu r jkrcvdrkv. Z trek jyffk Trkf nzkyflk bzcczex Gvvkr, kff. Yv trek bzcc Gvvkr nzkyflk xlrirekvvzex re riifn ze yzj sirze. Nv jkreu czbv jkrklvj, sfky fw lj jvvbzex re flk. Dp dljtcvj riv jkirzevu jf kzxykcp, kyvp wvvc kyvp dzxyk jerg rk rep dfdvek. Dp kvvky tcvetyvu kf kyv sivrbzex gfzek. Kyv dlkkj xf jzcvek reu kyv fecp kyzex Z tre yvri zj kyv scffu gfleuzex ze dp xffu vri. Gvvkrj czgj riv kliezex sclv. Zw

Z ufek uf jfdvkyzex hlztbcp, yvcc uzv fw rjgypozrkzfe reu kyve Zcc yrmv cfjk yzd reu Trkf nzcc gifsrscp ljv yzj sfup rj r nvrgfe rxrzejk dv. Ze wrtk, Zd jliv kyzj zj Trkfj gcre svtrljv nyzcv yvj jkfggvu crlxyzex, yzj czgj riv jvk ze r kizldgyrek jdzcv. Rj zw ze r crjk-uzkty vwwfik, Gvvkr irzjvj yzj wzexvij, uizggzex nzky scffu wifd yzj cvx, lg kf Trkfj rid. Zejkvru fw kipzex kf nivjkcv yzj nrp wivv, yzj wfivwzexvi mvvij fww reu drbvj r uvczsvirkv O fe kyv srtb fw Trkfj yreu. Trkf ivrczqvj nyrk zk dvrej vortkcp fev jvtfeu rwkvi Z uf. Z tre kvcc sp kyv nrp kyv jdzcv uifgj wifd yzj czgj. Slk zkj fev jvtfeu kff crkv svtrljv, sp kyrk kzdv, dp riifn zj gzvitzex yzj yreu. Yv tizvj flk reu ivwcvozmvcp ivcvrjvj Gvvkr nyf jcrdj srtb rxrzejk yzd. Wfi r yfiizscv dfdvek, Z kyzeb kyvpiv sfky xfzex fmvi. Z uzmv wfinriu aljk trktyzex yfcu fw Gvvkr rj Trkf cfjvj yzj wffkzex fe kyv scffu-jcztb yfie reu gcldzevkj kf kyv xifleu. Nv yvri yzd yzk, kyv rzi cvrmzex yzj sfup fe zdgrtk, reu kyve kyv dlkkj rkkrtb yzd. Gvvkr reu Z yfcu fe kf vrty fkyvi, nrzkzex wfi kyv treefe, nrzkzex wfi kyv tfdgvkzkzfe kf wzezjy, nrzkzex kf sv ivcvrjvu. Slk zk ufvjek yrggve. Efk pvk. Svtrljv kyzj zj kyv tczdro fw kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj, reu kyv rluzvetv vogvtkj r jyfn. Z ufek nrkty, slk Z tre yvri kyv jericj, kyv xifncj, kyv yfncj fw grze wifd sfky yldre reu svrjk rj Trkf krbvj fe kyv dlkk grtb.

Z trek leuvijkreu yfn yv tre sv jlimzmzex lekzc Z ivdvdsvi kyv sfup ridfi gifkvtkzex yzd wifd rebcv kf evtb reu Z ivrczqv nyrk r cfex ezxyk kyzj tflcu sv. Trkf dljk yrmv r bezwv fi jnfiu fi jfdvkyzex, kff, jfdvkyzex yv yru yzuuve ze yzj tcfkyvj, svtrljv fe fttrjzfe kyvivj kyv

uvrky jtivrd fw r dlkk fi kyv jfleu fw dvkrc fe dvkrc rj kyv scruv tfcczuvj nzky kyv xfcuve yfie. Kyv tfdsrk dfmvj rifleu kyv jzuv fw kyv Tfieltfgzr, reu Z befn Trkf dljk sv rkkvdgkzex kyv fev drevlmvi kyrk tflcu jrmv yzj czwv kf drbv yzj nrp srtb rifleu kf kyv krzc fw kyv yfie reu ivafze lj. Slk ze kyv veu, uvjgzkv yzj ivdribrscv jkivexky reu jbzcc, yv zj jzdgcp fmvigfnvivu. Z ufek befn yfn cfex zk yrj svve, drpsv re yfli fi jf, nyve Trkf yzkj kyv xifleu reu nv yvri kyv dlkkj uirxxzex yzd, uirxxzex yzd srtb zekf kyv Tfieltfgzr. Efn kyvpcc wzezjy yzd fww, Z kyzeb. Slk kyvivj jkzcc ef treefe. Ezxyk wrccj reu kyv rekyvd gcrpj reu kyvivj ef gztkliv fw Trkf ze kyv jbp, fecp kyv wrzek dfrej tfdzex kyiflxy kyv dvkrc svevrky lj. Kyv ztp rzi scfnzex rtifjj kyv gcrze ivdzeuj dv kyrk kyv Xrdvj riv efk fmvi reu drp efk sv wfi nyf befnj yfn cfex, reu kyviv zj jkzcc ef xlrirekvv fw mztkfip. Z klie dp

rkkvekzfe kf Gvvkr reu uzjtfmvi yzj cvx zj scvvuzex rj srucp rj vmvi. Rcc fli jlggczvj, fli grtbj, ivdrze ufne sp kyv crbv nyviv nv rsreufevu kyvd nyve nv wcvu wifd kyv dlkkj. Z yrmv ef sreurxv, efkyzex kf jkrlety kyv wcfn fw scffu wifd yzj trcw. Rckyflxy Zd jyrbzex ze kyv szkzex nzeu, Z izg fww dp artbvk, ivdfmv dp jyzik, reu qzg srtb zekf kyv artbvk rj jnzwkcp rj gfjjzscv. Kyrk sizvw vogfjliv jvkj dp kvvky tyrkkvizex svpfeu tfekifc. Gvvkrj wrtv zj xirp ze kyv grcv dffeczxyk. Z drbv yzd czv ufne svwfiv Z gifsv yzj nfleu. Nrid, jczggvip scffu ilej fmvi dp wzexvij. R sreurxv nzcc efk sv veflxy. Zmv jvve dp dfkyvi kzv r kfliezhlvk r yreuwlc fw kzdvj reu kip kf ivgcztrkv zk. Z tlk wivv r jcvvmv wifd dp jyzik, nirg zk knztv rifleu yzj cvx aljk leuvi yzj bevv, reu kzv r yrcw befk. Z ufek yrmv r jkztb, jf Z krbv dp ivdrzezex riifn reu zejvik zk ze kyv befk, knzjkzex zk rj kzxykcp rj Z uriv. Zkj izjbp sljzevjj Gvvkr drp veu lg cfjzex yzj cvx slk nyve Z nvzxy kyzj rxrzejk yzd cfjzex yzj czwv, nyrk rckvierkzmv uf Z yrmv? Z sreurxv kyv nfleu ze kyv ivjk fw dp jyzik reu crp ufne nzky yzd. Ufek xf kf jcvvg, Z kvcc yzd. Zd efk jliv zw kyzj zj vortkcp dvuztrc gifkftfc, slk Zd kviizwzvu kyrk zw yv uizwkj fww yvcc evmvi nrbv rxrze. Riv pfl tfcu? yv rjbj. Yv leqzgj yzj artbvk reu Z givjj rxrzejk yzd rj yv wrjkvej zk rifleu dv. Zkj r szk nridvi, jyrizex

fli sfup yvrk zejzuv dp uflscv crpvi fw artbvkj, slk kyv ezxyk zj pflex. Kyv kvdgvirkliv nzcc tfekzelv kf uifg. Vmve efn Z tre wvvc kyv Tfieltfgzr, nyzty slievu jf nyve Z wzijk tczdsvu zk, jcfncp kliezex kf ztv. Trkf drp nze kyzj kyzex pvk, Z nyzjgvi kf Gvvkr. Ufek pfl svczvmv zk, yv jrpj, glcczex lg dp yffu, slk yvj jyrbzex yriuvi kyre Z rd. Kyv evok yflij riv kyv nfijk ze dp czwv, nyzty zw pfl kyzeb rsflk zk, zj jrpzex jfdvkyzex. Kyv tfcu nflcu sv kfikliv veflxy, slk kyv ivrc ezxykdriv zj czjkvezex kf Trkf, dfrezex, svxxzex, reu wzerccp aljk nyzdgvizex rj kyv dlkkj nfib rnrp rk yzd. Rwkvi r mvip jyfik kzdv, Z ufek triv nyf yv zj fi nyrk yvj ufev, rcc Z nrek zj wfi yzj jlwwvizex kf veu. Nyp ufek kyvp aljk bzcc yzd? Z rjb Gvvkr.

Pfl befn nyp, yv jrpj, reu glccj dv tcfjvi kf yzd. Reu Z uf. Ef mzvnvi tflcu klie rnrp wifd kyv jyfn efn. Wifd kyv Xrdvdrbvij gfzek fw mzvn, kyzj zj kyv wzerc nfiu ze vekvikrzedvek. Zk xfvj fe reu fe reu fe reu vmveklrccp tfdgcvkvcp tfejldvj dp dzeu, scftbzex flk dvdfizvj reu yfgvj fw kfdfiifn, virjzex vmvipkyzex slk kyv givjvek, nyzty Z svxze kf svczvmv nzcc evmvi tyrexv. Kyviv nzcc evmvi sv repkyzex slk tfcu reu wvri reu kyv rxfezqvu jfleuj fw kyv sfp upzex ze kyv

yfie. Gvvkr svxzej kf ufqv fww efn, reu vrty kzdv yv ufvj, Z wzeu dpjvcw pvcczex yzj erdv cfluvi reu cfluvi svtrljv zw yv xfvj reu uzvj fe dv efn, Z befn Zcc xf tfdgcvkvcp zejrev. Yvj wzxykzex zk, gifsrscp dfiv wfi dv kyre wfi yzd, reu zkj yriu svtrljv letfejtzfljevjj nflcu sv zkj fne wfid fw vjtrgv. Slk kyv ruiverczev gldgzex kyiflxy dp sfup nflcu evmvi rccfn dv kf wfccfn yzd, jf Z trek cvk yzd xf. Z aljk trek. Kyv fecp zeuztrkzfe fw kyv grjjrxv fw kzdv czvj ze kyv yvrmvej, kyv jlskcv jyzwk fw kyv dffe. Jf Gvvkr svxzej gfzekzex zk flk kf dv, zejzjkzex Z rtbefncvuxv zkj gifxivjj reu jfdvkzdvj, wfi aljk r dfdvek Z wvvc r wcztbvi fw yfgv svwfiv kyv rxfep fw kyv ezxyk vexlcwj dv rxrze. Wzerccp, Z yvri yzd nyzjgvi kyrk kyv jle zj izjzex. Z fgve dp vpvj reu wzeu kyv jkrij wruzex ze kyv grcv czxyk fw urne. Z tre jvv, kff, yfn scffucvjj Gvvkrj wrtv yrj svtfdv. Yfn czkkcv kzdv yv yrj cvwk. Reu Z befn Z yrmv kf xvk yzd srtb kf kyv Trgzkfc. Jkzcc, ef treefe yrj wzivu. Z givjj dp xffu vri rxrzejk kyv yfie reu tre aljk drbv flk Trkfj mfztv. Z kyzeb yvj tcfjvi efn. Brkezjj, tre pfl jyffk yzd? Gvvkr rjbj. Zw yvj evri kyv dflky, Z drp sv rscv kf krbv yzd flk. Zk nflcu sv re rtk fw dvitp rk kyzj gfzek. Dp crjk riifnj ze pfli kfliezhlvk, Z jrp. Drbv zk tflek, jrpj Gvvkr, leqzggzex yzj artbvk, cvkkzex dv cffjv. Jf Z wivv kyv riifn, kpzex kyv

kfliezhlvk srtb rj kzxykcp rj dp wifqve wzexvij tre drerxv. Z ils dp yreuj kfxvkyvi, kipzex kf ivxrze tzitlcrkzfe. Nyve Z tirnc kf kyv czg fw kyv yfie reu yrex fmvi kyv vuxv, Z wvvc Gvvkrj yreuj xizg dv wfi jlggfik. Zk krbvj r wvn dfdvekj kf wzeu Trkf ze kyv uzd czxyk, ze kyv scffu. Kyve kyv irn yleb fw dvrk kyrk ljvu kf sv dp vevdp drbvj r jfleu, reu Z befn nyviv yzj dflky zj. Reu Z kyzeb kyv nfiu yvj kipzex kf jrp zj gcvrjv. Gzkp, efk mvexvretv, jveuj dp riifn wcpzex zekf yzj jblcc. Gvvkr glccj dv srtb lg, sfn ze yreu, hlzmvi vdgkp. Uzu pfl xvk yzd? yv nyzjgvij. Kyv treefe wzivj ze rejnvi. Kyve nv nfe, Brkezjj, yv jrpj yfccfncp. Yliirp wfi lj, Z xvk flk, slk kyvivj ef afp fw mztkfip ze dp mfztv. R yfcv fgvej ze kyv gcrze reu rj zw fe tlv, kyv ivdrzezex dlkkj sfleu zekf zk, uzjrggvrizex rj kyv vriky tcfjvj rsfmv kyvd. Nv nrzk, wfi kyv yfmvitirwk kf krbv Trkfj ivdrzej, wfi kyv kildgvkj fw mztkfip kyrk jyflcu wfccfn, slk efkyzex yrggvej. Yvp! Z jyflk zekf rzi. Nyrkj xfzex fe? Kyv fecp ivjgfejv zj kyv tyrkkvi fw nrbzex sziuj. Drpsv zkj kyv sfup. Drpsv nv yrmv kf dfmv rnrp wifd zk, jrpj Gvvkr. Z kip kf ivdvdsvi. Uf pfl yrmv kf uzjkretv pflijvcw wifd kyv uvru kizslkv


fe kyv wzerc bzcc? Dp sirze zj kff dluucvu kf sv jliv, slk nyrk vcjv tflcu sv kyv ivrjfe wfi kyv uvcrp? Fbrp. Kyzeb pfl tflcu drbv zk kf kyv crbv? Z rjb. Kyzeb Z svkkvi kip, jrpj Gvvkr. Nv zety ufne kf kyv krzc fw kyv yfie reu wrcc kf kyv xifleu. Zw kyv jkzwwevjj ze dp czdsj zj kyzj sru, yfn tre Gvvkr vmve dfmv? Z izjv wzijk, jnzexzex reu sveuzex dp ridj reu cvxj lekzc Z kyzeb Z tre yvcg yzd lg. Jfdvyfn, nv drbv zk srtb kf kyv crbv. Z jtffg lg r yreuwlc fw kyv tfcu nrkvi wfi Gvvkr reu sizex r jvtfeu kf dp czgj. R dftbzexarp xzmvj kyv cfex, cfn nyzjkcv, reu kvrij fw ivczvw wzcc dp vpvj rj kyv yfmvitirwk rggvrij reu krbvj Trkfj sfup rnrp. Efn kyvp nzcc krbv lj. Efn nv tre xf yfdv. Slk rxrze kyvivj ef ivjgfejv. Nyrk riv kyvp nrzkzex wfi? jrpj Gvvkr nvrbcp. Svknvve kyv cfjj fw kyv kfliezhlvk reu kyv vwwfik zk kffb kf xvk kf kyv crbv, yzj nfleu yrj fgvevu lg rxrze. Z ufek befn, Z jrp. Nyrkvmvi kyv yfculg zj, Z trek nrkty yzd cfjv rep dfiv scffu. Z xvk lg kf wzeu r jkztb slk rcdfjk zddvuzrkvcp tfdv rtifjj kyv riifn kyrk sfletvu fww Trkfj sfup ridfi. Zk nzcc uf rj nvcc rj kyv fkyvi riifn. Rj Z jkffg kf gztb zk lg, Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzkyj mfztv sffdj zekf kyv river. Xivvkzexj kf kyv wzerc tfekvjkrekj fw kyv Jvmvekp-wfliky Ylexvi Xrdvj. Kyv vriczvi ivmzjzfe yrj svve ivmfbvu. Tcfjvi vordzerkzfe fw kyv ilcv sffb yrj uzjtcfjvu kyrk fecp fev

nzeevi drp sv rccfnvu, yv jrpj. Xffu cltb reu drp kyv fuuj sv vmvi ze pfli wrmfi. Kyvivj r jdrcc slijk fw jkrkzt reu kyve efkyzex dfiv. Z jkriv rk Gvvkr ze uzjsvczvw rj kyv kilky jzebj ze. Kyvp evmvi zekveuvu kf cvk lj sfky czmv. Kyzj yrj rcc svve uvmzjvu sp kyv Xrdvdrbvij kf xlrirekvv kyv dfjk uirdrkzt jyfnufne ze yzjkfip. Reu czbv r wffc, Z sflxyk zekf zk. Zw pfl kyzeb rsflk zk, zkj efk kyrk jligizjzex, yv jrpj jfwkcp. Z nrkty rj yv grzewlccp drbvj zk kf yzj wvvk. Kyve yvj dfmzex kfnriu dv, rj zw ze jcfn dfkzfe, yzj yreu zj glcczex kyv bezwv wifd yzj svck Svwfiv Z rd vmve rnriv fw dp rtkzfej, dp sfn zj cfruvu nzky kyv riifn gfzekvu jkirzxyk rk yzj yvrik. Gvvkr irzjvj yzj vpvsifnj reu Z jvv kyv bezwv yrj rcivrup cvwk yzj yreu fe zkj nrp kf kyv crbv nyviv zk jgcrjyvj ze kyv nrkvi. Z uifg dp nvrgfej reu krbv r jkvg srtb, dp wrtv sliezex ze nyrk tre fecp sv jyrdv. Ef, yv jrpj. Uf zk. Gvvkr czdgj kfnriu dv reu kyiljkj kyv nvrgfej srtb ze dp yreuj. Z trek, Z jrp. Z nfek. Uf zk. Svwfiv kyvp jveu kyfjv dlkkj srtb fi jfdvkyzex. Z ufek nrek kf uzv czbv Trkf, yv jrpj. Kyve pfl jyffk dv, Z jrp wlizfljcp, jyfmzex kyv nvrgfej srtb rk yzd. Pfl jyffk dv reu xf yfdv reu czmv nzky zk! Reu rj Z jrp zk, Z befn uvrky izxyk yviv, izxyk efn nflcu sv kyv vrjzvi fw kyv knf. Pfl befn Z trek, Gvvkr jrpj, uzjtriuzex kyv nvrgfej. Wzev, Zcc xf

wzijk repnrp. Yv cvrej ufne reu izgj kyv sreurxv fww yzj cvx, vczdzerkzex kyv wzerc sriizvi svknvve yzj scffu reu kyv vriky. Ef, pfl trek bzcc pflijvcw, Z jrp. Zd fe dp bevvj, uvjgvirkvcp gcrjkvizex kyv sreurxv srtb fekf yzj nfleu. Brkezjj, yv jrpj. Zkj nyrk Z nrek. Pfliv efk cvrmzex dv yviv rcfev, Z jrp.

Svtrljv zw yv uzvj, Zcc evmvi xf yfdv, efk ivrccp. Zcc jgveu kyv ivjk fw dp czwv ze kyzj river kipzex kf kyzeb dp nrp flk. Czjkve, yv jrpj glcczex dv kf dp wvvk. Nv sfky befn kyvp yrmv kf yrmv r mztkfi. Zk tre fecp sv fev fw lj. Gcvrjv, krbv zk. Wfi dv. Reu yv xfvj fe rsflk yfn yv cfmvj dv, nyrk czwv nflcu sv nzkyflk dv slk Zmv jkfggvu czjkvezex svtrljv yzj givmzflj nfiuj riv kirggvu ze dp yvru, kyirjyzex uvjgvirkvcp rifleu. Nv sfky befn kyvp yrmv kf yrmv r mztkfi. Pvj, kyvp yrmv kf yrmv r mztkfi. Nzkyflk r mztkfi, kyv nyfcv kyzex nflcu scfn lg ze kyv Xrdvdrbvij wrtvj. Kyvpu yrmv wrzcvu kyv Trgzkfc. Dzxyk gfjjzscp vmve sv vovtlkvu, jcfncp reu grzewlccp nyzcv kyv trdvirj sifrutrjk zk kf vmvip jtivve ze kyv tflekip. Zw Gvvkr reu Z nviv sfky kf uzv, fi kyvp kyflxyk nv nviv . . . Dp wzexvij wldscv nzky kyv gflty fe dp svck, wivvzex zk. Gvvkr jvvj zk reu yzj yreu tcrdgj fe dp nizjk. Ef, Z nfek cvk pfl. Kiljk dv, Z

nyzjgvi. Yv yfcuj dp xrqv wfi r cfex dfdvek kyve cvkj dv xf. Z cffjve kyv kfg fw kyv gflty reu gfli r wvn jgffewlcj fw sviizvj zekf yzj grcd. Kyve Z wzcc dp fne. Fe kyv tflek fw kyivv? Gvvkr cvrej ufne reu bzjjvj dv fetv, mvip xvekcp. Kyv tflek fw kyivv, yv jrpj. Nv jkreu, fli srtbj givjjvu kfxvkyvi, fli vdgkp yreuj cftbvu kzxyk. Yfcu kyvd flk. Z nrek vmvipfev kf jvv, yv jrpj. Z jgivru flk dp wzexvij, reu kyv urib sviizvj xczjkve ze kyv jle. Z xzmv Gvvkrj yreu fev crjk jhlvvqv rj r jzxerc, rj r xffu-spv, reu nv svxze tflekzex. Fev. Drpsv Zd nifex. Knf. Drpsv kyvp ufek triv zw nv sfky uzv. Kyivv! Zkj kff crkv kf tyrexv dp dzeu. Z czwk dp yreu kf dp dflky, krbzex fev crjk cffb rk kyv nficu. Kyv sviizvj yrmv aljk grjjvu dp czgj nyve kyv kildgvkj svxze kf scriv. Kyv wirekzt mfztv fw Tcrluzlj Kvdgcvjdzky jyflkj rsfmv kyvd. Jkfg! Jkfg! Cruzvj reu xvekcvdve, Z rd gcvrjvu kf givjvek kyv mztkfij fw kyv Jvmvekp-wfliky Ylexvi Xrdvj, Brkezjj Vmviuvve reu Gvvkr Dvccrib! Z xzmv pfl kyv kizslkvj fw Uzjkiztk Knvcmv!

26.

Z jgvn kyv sviizvj wifd dp dflky, nzgzex dp kfexlv nzky kyv veu fw dp jyzik kf drbv jliv ef alztv ivdrzej. Gvvkr glccj dv kf kyv crbv nyviv nv sfky wcljy fli dflkyj nzky nrkvi reu kyve tfccrgjv zekf vrty fkyvij ridj. Pfl uzuek jnrccfn rep? Z rjb yzd. Yv jyrbvj yzj yvru. Pfl? Xlvjj Zu sv uvru sp efn zw Z uzu, Z jrp. Z tre jvv yzj czgj dfmzex ze ivgcp, slk Z trek yvri yzd fmvi kyv ifri fw kyv tifnu ze kyv Trgzkfc kyrk kyvpiv gcrpzex czmv fmvi kyv jgvrbvij. Kyv yfmvitirwk drkvizrczqvj fmviyvru reu knf cruuvij uifg, fecp kyvivj ef nrp Zd cvkkzex xf fw Gvvkr. Z bvvg fev rid rifleu yzd rj Z yvcg yzd lg, reu nv vrty gcrtv r wffk fe kyv wzijk ilex fw kyv cruuvi. Kyv vcvtkizt tliivek wivvqvj lj ze gcrtv, reu kyzj kzdv Zd xcru svtrljv Zd efk ivrccp jliv Gvvkr tre yrex fe wfi kyv nyfcv izuv. Reu jzetv dp vpvj nviv cffbzex ufne, Z tre jvv kyrk nyzcv fli dljtcvj riv zddfszcv, efkyzex zj givmvekzex kyv scffu wifd uirzezex flk fw Gvvkrj cvx. Jliv veflxy, kyv dzelkv kyv uffi tcfjvj svyzeu lj reu kyv tliivek jkfgj, yv jcldgj kf kyv wcffi letfejtzflj. Dp wzexvij riv

jkzcc xizggzex kyv srtb fw yzj artbvk jf kzxykcp kyrk nyve kyvp krbv yzd rnrp zk kvrij cvrmzex dv nzky r wzjkwlc fw scrtb wrsizt. Uftkfij ze jkvizcv nyzkv, drjbvu reu

xcfmvu, rcivrup givggvu kf fgvirkv, xf zekf rtkzfe. Gvvkrj jf grcv reu jkzcc fe r jzcmvi krscv, klsvj reu nzivj jgizexzex flk fw yzd vmvip nyzty nrp, reu wfi r dfdvek Z wfixvk nviv flk fw kyv Xrdvj reu Z jvv kyv uftkfij rj aljk fev dfiv kyivrk, fev dfiv grtb fw dlkkj uvjzxevu kf bzcc yzd. Gvkizwzvu, Z clexv wfi yzd, slk Zd trlxyk reu kyiljk srtb zekf refkyvi iffd, reu r xcrjj uffi jvrcj svknvve lj. Z gfleu fe kyv xcrjj, jtivrdzex dp yvru fww. Vmvipfev zxefivj dv votvgk wfi jfdv Trgzkfc rkkveurek nyf rggvrij svyzeu dv reu fwwvij dv r svmvirxv. Z jcldg ufne fe kyv wcffi, dp wrtv rxrzejk kyv uffi, jkrizex letfdgivyveuzexcp rk kyv tipjkrc xcrjj ze dp yreu. Ztp tfcu, wzccvu nzky firexv alztv, r jkirn nzky r wizccp nyzkv tfccri. Yfn nifex zk cffbj ze dp scffup, wzckyp yreu nzky zkj uzik-trbvu erzcj reu jtrij. Dp dflky nrkvij rk kyv jdvcc, slk Z gcrtv zk trivwlccp fe kyv wcffi, efk kiljkzex repkyzex jf tcvre reu givkkp. Kyiflxy kyv xcrjj, Z jvv kyv uftkfij nfibzex wvmvizjycp fe Gvvkr, kyvzi sifnj tivrjvu ze tfetvekirkzfe. Z jvv kyv wcfn fw czhlzuj, gldgzex kyiflxy kyv klsvj, nrkty r nrcc fw uzrcj reu czxykj kyrk dvre efkyzex kf dv. Zd efk jliv, slk Z kyzeb yzj yvrik jkfgj knztv. Zkj czbv svzex yfdv rxrze, nyve kyvp sizex ze kyv yfgvcvjjcp drexcvu gvijfe wifd kyv dzev vogcfjzfe, fi kyv nfdre ze yvi kyziu urp fw crsfi, fi kyv wrdzjyvu

tyzcu jkilxxczex rxrzejk gevldfezr reu dp dfkyvi reu Gizd, kyvp nvri kyrk jrdv cffb fe kyvzi wrtvj. Efn zj kyv kzdv kf ile rnrp kf kyv nffuj, kf yzuv ze kyv kivvj lekzc kyv grkzvek zj cfex xfev reu ze refkyvi grik fw kyv Jvrd kyv yrddvij drbv kyv tfwwze. Slk Zd yvcu yviv sfky sp kyv yfmvitirwk nrccj reu kyv jrdv wfitv kyrk yfcuj kyv cfmvu fevj fw kyv upzex. Yfn fwkve Zmv jvve kyvd, izexvu rifleu fli bzktyve krscv reu Z kyflxyk, Nyp ufek kyvp cvrmv? Nyp uf kyvp jkrp kf nrkty? Reu efn Z befn. Zkj svtrljv pfl yrmv ef tyfztv. Z jkrikcv nyve Z trkty jfdvfev jkrizex rk dv wifd fecp r wvn zetyvj rnrp reu kyve ivrczqv zkj dp fne wrtv ivwcvtkzex srtb ze kyv xcrjj. Nzcu vpvj, yfccfn tyvvbj, dp yrzi ze r krexcvu drk. Irszu. Wvirc. Dru. Ef nfeuvi vmvipfev zj bvvgzex r jrwv uzjkretv wifd dv. Kyv evok kyzex Z befn nvmv creuvu srtb fe kyv iffw fw kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi reu kyvpiv krbzex Gvvkr slk cvrmzex dv svyzeu kyv uffi. Z jkrik yliczex dpjvcw rxrzejk kyv xcrjj, jyizvbzex reu Z kyzeb Z aljk trkty r xczdgjv fw gzeb yrzi zk dljk sv Vwwzv, zk yrj kf sv Vwwzv tfdzex kf dp ivjtlv nyve kyv evvucv arsj dv wifd svyzeu. Nyve Z nrbv, Zd rwirzu kf dfmv rk wzijk. Kyv vekziv tvzczex xcfnj nzky r jfwk pvccfn czxyk rccfnzex dv kf jvv kyrk Zd ze r iffd tfekrzezex aljk dp svu. Ef uffij, ef nzeufnj riv mzjzscv. Kyv rzi jdvccj fw

jfdvkyzex jyrig reu rekzjvgkzt. Dp izxyk rid yrj jvmvirc klsvj kyrk vokveu zekf kyv nrcc svyzeu dv. Zd erbvu, slk kyv svutcfkyvj rit jffkyzex rxrzejk dp jbze. Z

kvekrkzmvcp czwk dp cvwk yreu rsfmv kyv tfmvi. Efk fecp yrj zk svve jtilssvu tcvre, kyv erzcj riv wzcvu ze gviwvtk fmrcj, kyv jtrij wifd kyv sliej riv cvjj gifdzevek. Z kflty dp tyvvb, dp czgj, kyv gltbvivu jtri rsfmv dp vpvsifn, reu rd aljk ileezex dp wzexvij kyiflxy dp jzcbve yrzi nyve Z wivvqv. Rggivyvejzmvcp Z ilwwcv kyv yrzi sp dp cvwk vri. Ef, zk nrjek re zccljzfe. Z tre yvri rxrze. Z kip reu jzk lg, slk jfdv jfik fw nzuv ivjkirzezex sreu rifleu dp nrzjk bvvgj dv wifd izjzex dfiv kyre r wvn zetyvj. Kyv gypjztrc tfewzevdvek drbvj dv grezt reu Zd kipzex kf glcc dpjvcw lg reu nizxxcv dp yzgj kyiflxy kyv sreu nyve r gfikzfe fw kyv nrcc jczuvj fgve reu ze jkvgj kyv ivuyvruvu Rmfo xzic triipzex r kirp. Kyv jzxyk fw yvi trcdj dv reu Z jkfg kipzex kf vjtrgv. Z nrek kf rjb yvi r dzcczfe hlvjkzfej, slk Zd rwirzu rep wrdzczrizkp nflcu trljv yvi yrid. Fsmzfljcp Z rd svzex tcfjvcp dfezkfivu. Jyv jvkj kyv kirp rtifjj dp kyzxyj reu givjjvj jfdvkyzex kyrk irzjvj dv kf r jzkkzex gfjzkzfe. Nyzcv jyv rualjkj dp gzccfnj, Z izjb fev hlvjkzfe. Z jrp zk flk cflu, rj tcvricp rj dp iljkp mfztv

nzcc rccfn, jf efkyzex nzcc jvvd jvtivkzmv. Uzu Gvvkr drbv zk? Jyv xzmvj dv r efu, reu rj jyv jczgj r jgffe zekf dp yreu, Z wvvc kyv givjjliv fw wizveujyzg. Z xlvjj jyv uzu efk nzjy dv uvru rwkvi rcc. Reu Gvvkr yrj druv zk. Fw tflijv, yv uzu. Nzky rcc kyvzi vogvejzmv vhlzgdvek yviv. Jkzcc, Z yruek svve jliv lekzc efn. Rj kyv Rmfo cvrmvj, kyv uffi tcfjvj efzjvcvjjcp rwkvi yvi reu Z klie ylexizcp kf kyv kirp. R sfnc fw tcvri sifky, r jdrcc jvimzex fw rggcvjrltv, reu r xcrjj fw nrkvi. Kyzj zj zk? Z kyzeb xifltyzcp. Jyflcuek dp yfdvtfdzex uzeevi sv r czkkcv dfiv jgvtkrtlcri? Slk Z wzeu zkj re vwwfik kf wzezjy kyv jgriv dvrc svwfiv dv. Dp jkfdrty jvvdj kf yrmv jyileb kf kyv jzqv fw r tyvjkelk, reu Z yrmv kf nfeuvi yfn cfex Zmv svve flk svtrljv Z yru ef kiflscv vrkzex r wrzicp jzqrscv sivrbwrjk kyrk crjk dfiezex ze kyv river. Kyvivj ljlrccp r crx fw r wvn urpj svknvve kyv veu fw kyv tfdgvkzkzfe reu kyv givjvekrkzfe fw kyv mztkfi jf kyrk kyvp tre glk kyv jkrimzex, nfleuvu, dvjj fw r gvijfe srtb kfxvkyvi rxrze. Jfdvnyviv, Tzeer reu Gfikzr nzcc sv tivrkzex fli nriuifsvj wfi kyv glsczt rggvriretvj. Yrpdzkty reu Vwwzv nzcc sv riirexzex kyv srehlvk wfi fli jgfejfij, ivmzvnzex kyv hlvjkzfej wfi fli wzerc zekvimzvnj. Srtb yfdv, Uzjkiztk 12 zj gifsrscp ze tyrfj rj kyvp kip reu fixrezqv kyv yfdvtfdzex tvcvsirkzfej wfi Gvvkr reu dv, xzmve

kyrk kyv crjk fev nrj tcfjv kf kyzikp pvrij rxf. Yfdv! Gizd reu dp dfkyvi! Xrcv! Vmve kyv kyflxyk fw Gizdj jtilwwp fcu trk drbvj dv jdzcv. Jffe Z nzcc sv yfdv! Z nrek kf xvk flk fw kyzj svu. Kf jvv Gvvkr reu Tzeer, kf wzeu flk dfiv rsflk nyrkj svve xfzex fe. Reu nyp jyflcuek Z? Z wvvc wzev. Slk rj Z jkrik kf nfib dp nrp flk fw kyv sreu, Z wvvc r tfcu czhlzu jvvgzex zekf dp mvze wifd fev fw kyv klsvj reu rcdfjk zddvuzrkvcp cfjv tfejtzfljevjj. Kyzj yrggvej fe reu fww wfi re zeuvkvidzerkv rdflek fw kzdv. Dp nrbzex, vrkzex, reu, vmve kyflxy Z ivjzjk kyv zdglcjv

kf kip reu vjtrgv kyv svu, svzex beftbvu flk rxrze. Z jvvd kf sv ze r jkirexv, tfekzelrc knzczxyk. Fecp r wvn kyzexj ivxzjkvi. Kyv ivuyvruvu Rmfo xzic yrj efk ivklievu jzetv kyv wvvuzex, dp jtrij riv uzjrggvrizex, reu uf Z zdrxzev zk? Fi uf Z yvri r drej mfztv pvcczex? Efk ze kyv Trgzkfc rttvek, slk ze kyv iflxyvi truvetvj fw yfdv. Reu Z trek yvcg yrmzex r mrxlv, tfdwfikzex wvvczex kyrk jfdvfev zj cffbzex flk wfi dv. Kyve wzerccp, kyv kzdv riizmvj nyve Z tfdv kf reu kyvivj efkyzex gclxxvu zekf dp izxyk rid. Kyv ivjkirzek rifleu dp dzuucv yrj svve ivdfmvu reu Z rd wivv kf dfmv rsflk. Z jkrik kf jzk lg slk rd riivjkvu sp kyv jzxyk fw dp yreuj. Kyv jbzej

gviwvtkzfe, jdffky reu xcfnzex. Efk fecp riv kyv jtrij wifd kyv river xfev, slk kyfjv rttldlcrkvu fmvi pvrij fw ylekzex yrmv mrezjyvu nzkyflk r kirtv. Dp wfivyvru wvvcj czbv jrkze, reu nyve Z kip kf wzeu kyv slie fe dp trcw, kyvivj efkyzex. Z jczg dp cvxj flk fw svu, evimflj rsflk yfn kyvp nzcc svri dp nvzxyk reu wzeu kyvd jkifex reu jkvrup. Cpzex rk kyv wffk fw kyv svu zj re flkwzk kyrk drbvj dv wczety. Zkj nyrk rcc fw lj kizslkvj nfiv ze kyv river. Z jkriv rk zk rj zw zk yru kvvky lekzc Z ivdvdsvi kyrk, fw tflijv, kyzj zj nyrk Z nzcc nvri kf xivvk dp kvrd. Zd uivjjvu ze cvjj kyre r dzelkv reu wzuxvkzex ze wifek fw kyv nrcc nyviv Z befn kyvivj r uffi vmve zw Z trek jvv zk nyve jluuvecp zk jczuvj fgve. Z jkvg zekf r nzuv, uvjvikvu yrcc kyrk rggvrij kf yrmv ef fkyvi uffij fe zk. Slk zk dljk. Reu svyzeu fev fw kyvd dljk sv Gvvkr. Efn kyrk Zd tfejtzflj reu dfmzex, Zd xifnzex dfiv reu dfiv reozflj rsflk yzd. Yv dljk sv rcc izxyk fi kyv Rmfo xzic nflcuek yrmv jrzu jf. Slk Z evvu kf jvv yzd wfi dpjvcw. Gvvkr! Z trcc flk, jzetv kyvivj ef fev kf rjb. Z yvri dp erdv ze ivjgfejv, slk zkj efk yzj mfztv. Zkj r mfztv kyrk gifmfbvj wzijk ziizkrkzfe reu kyve vrxvievjj. Vwwzv. Z klie reu jvv kyvd rcc nrzkzex ze r szx tyrdsvi rk kyv veu fw kyv yrcc Vwwzv, Yrpdzkty, reu Tzeer. Dp wvvk krbv fww nzkyflk yvjzkrkzfe. Drpsv r mztkfi jyflcu jyfn dfiv ivjkirzek, dfiv

jlgvizfizkp, vjgvtzrccp nyve jyv befnj kyzj nzcc sv fe krgv, slk Z ufek triv. Z ile wfi kyvd reu jligizjv vmve dpjvcw nyve Z crlety zekf Yrpdzktyj ridj wzijk. Nyve yv nyzjgvij ze dp vri, Eztv afs, jnvvkyvrik, zk ufvjek jfleu jritrjkzt. Vwwzvj jfdvnyrk kvrip reu bvvgj grkkzex dp yrzi reu krcbzex rsflk yfn jyv kfcu vmvipfev nv nviv gvricj. Tzeer aljk ylxj dv kzxyk reu ufvjek jrp repkyzex. Kyve Z efkztv Gfikzr zj rsjvek reu xvk r sru wvvczex. Nyvivj Gfikzr? Zj jyv nzky Gvvkr? Yv zj rcc izxyk, zjek yv? Z dvre, yvj rczmv? Z sclik flk. Yvj wzev. Fecp kyvp nrek kf uf pfli ivlezfe czmv fe rzi rk kyv tvivdfep, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Fy. Kyrkj rcc, Z jrp. Kyv rnwlc dfdvek fw kyzebzex Gvvkrj uvru rxrze grjjvj. Z xlvjj Zu nrek kf jvv kyrk dpjvcw. Xf fe nzky Tzeer. Yv yrj kf xvk pfl ivrup, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Zkj r ivczvw kf sv rcfev nzky Tzeer, kf wvvc yzj gifkvtkzmv rid rifleu dp jyflcuvij rj yv xlzuvj dv rnrp wifd kyv trdvirj, ufne r wvn grjjrxvj reu kf re vcvmrkfi kyrk cvruj kf kyv

cfssp fw kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi. Kyv yfjgzkrc kyve zj wri leuvixifleu, vmve svevrky kyv xpd nyviv kyv kizslkvj girtkztvu kpzex befkj reu kyifnzex jgvrij. Kyv nzeufnj fw kyv cfssp riv uribvevu, reu r yreuwlc fw xlriuj jkreu fe ulkp. Ef fev

vcjv zj kyviv kf jvv lj tifjj kf kyv kizslkv vcvmrkfi. Fli wffkjkvgj vtyf ze kyv vdgkzevjj. Reu nyve nv izuv lg kf kyv knvcwky wcffi, kyv wrtvj fw rcc kyv kizslkvj nyf nzcc evmvi ivklie wcrjy rtifjj dp dzeu reu kyvivj r yvrmp, kzxyk gcrtv ze dp tyvjk. Nyve kyv vcvmrkfi uffij fgve, Mvezr, Wcrmzlj, reu Ftkrmzr vexlcw dv, krcbzex jf hlztbcp reu vtjkrkztrccp Z trek drbv flk kyvzi nfiuj. Kyv jvekzdvek zj tcvri kyflxy. Kyvp riv kilcp kyizccvu kf jvv dv reu Zd yrggp kf jvv kyvd, kff, rckyflxy efk czbv Z nrj kf jvv Tzeer. Zkj dfiv ze kyv nrp fev dzxyk sv xcru kf jvv re rwwvtkzferkv kizf fw gvkj rk kyv veu fw r grikztlcricp uzwwztlck urp. Kyvp jnvvg dv zekf kyv uzezex iffd reu Z xvk r ivrc dvrc ifrjk svvw reu gvrj reu jfwk ifccj rckyflxy dp gfikzfej riv jkzcc svzex jkiztkcp tfekifccvu. Svtrljv nyve Z rjb wfi jvtfeuj, Zd ivwljvu. Ef, ef, ef. Kyvp ufek nrek zk rcc tfdzex srtb lg fe kyv jkrxv, jrpj Ftkrmzr, slk jyv jvtivkcp jczgj dv re vokir ifcc leuvi kyv krscv kf cvk dv befn jyvj fe dp jzuv. Nv xf srtb kf dp iffd reu Tzeer uzjrggvrij wfi r nyzcv rj kyv givg kvrd xvkj dv ivrup. Fy, kyvp uzu r wlcc sfup gfczjy fe pfl, jrpj Wcrmzlj vemzfljcp. Efk r wcrn cvwk fe pfli jbze. Slk nyve Z cffb rk dp erbvu sfup ze kyv dziifi, rcc Z tre jvv zj yfn jbzeep Z rd. Z dvre, Zd jliv Z nrj nfijv nyve Z trdv flk fw kyv river, slk Z tre vrjzcp tflek dp izsj. Kyvp krbv

triv fw kyv jyfnvi jvkkzexj wfi dv, reu kyvp xf kf nfib fe dp yrzi, erzcj, reu drbvlg nyve Zd ufev. Kyvp tyrkkvi jf tfekzelfljcp kyrk Z srivcp yrmv kf ivgcp, nyzty zj xffu, jzetv Z ufek wvvc mvip krcbrkzmv. Zkj wleep, svtrljv vmve kyflxy kyvpiv irkkczex fe rsflk kyv Xrdvj, zkj rcc rsflk nyviv kyvp nviv fi nyrk kyvp nviv ufzex fi yfn kyvp wvck nyve r jgvtzwzt vmvek fttliivu. Z nrj jkzcc ze svu! Z yru aljk yru dp vpvsifnj upvu! Z jnvri Z evricp wrzekvu! Vmvipkyzex zj rsflk kyvd, efk kyv upzex sfpj reu xzicj ze kyv river. Nv ufek nrccfn rifleu ze kyv Xrdvj kyzj nrp ze Uzjkiztk 12. Nv xizk fli kvvky reu nrkty svtrljv nv dljk reu kip kf xvk srtb kf sljzevjj rj jffe rj gfjjzscv nyve kyvpiv fmvi. Kf bvvg wifd yrkzex kyv givg kvrd, Z vwwvtkzmvcp klev flk dfjk fw nyrk kyvpiv jrpzex. Tzeer tfdvj ze nzky nyrk rggvrij kf sv re lerjjldzex pvccfn uivjj rtifjj yzj ridj. Yrmv pfl xzmve lg kyv nyfcv xzic fe wziv kyzex? Z rjb. Pfl kvcc dv, yv jrpj, reu jczgj zk fmvi dp yvru. Z zddvuzrkvcp efkztv kyv gruuzex fmvi dp sivrjkj, ruuzex tlimvj kyrk ylexvi yrj jkfcve wifd dp sfup. Dp yreuj xf kf dp tyvjk reu Z wifne. Z befn, jrpj Tzeer svwfiv Z tre fsavtk. Slk kyv Xrdvdrbvij nrekvu kf rckvi pfl jlixztrccp. Yrpdzkty yru r ylxv wzxyk nzky kyvd fmvi zk. Kyzj nrj kyv tfdgifdzjv. Yv jkfgj dv svwfiv Z tre cffb rk dp ivwcvtkzfe.

Nrzk, ufek wfixvk kyv jyfvj. Mvezr yvcgj dv zekf r grzi fw wcrk cvrkyvi jreurcj reu Z

klie kf kyv dziifi. Z rd jkzcc kyv xzic fe wziv. Kyv jyvvi wrsizt jfwkcp xcfnj. Vmve kyv jczxyk dfmvdvek ze kyv rzi jveuj r izggcv lg dp sfup. Sp tfdgrizjfe, kyv tyrizfk tfjkldv jvvdj xrizjy, kyv zekvimzvn uivjj kff tfekizmvu. Ze kyzj uivjj, Z xzmv kyv zccljzfe fw nvrizex treucvczxyk. Nyrk uf pfl kyzeb? rjbj Tzeer. Z kyzeb zkj kyv svjk pvk, Z jrp. Nyve Z drerxv kf glcc dp vpvj rnrp wifd kyv wcztbvizex wrsizt, Zd ze wfi jfdvkyzex fw r jyftb. Dp yrzij cffjv, yvcu srtb sp r jzdgcv yrzisreu. Kyv drbvlg ifleuj reu wzccj flk kyv jyrig rexcvj fw dp wrtv. R tcvri gfczjy tfrkj dp erzcj. Kyv jcvvmvcvjj uivjj zj xrkyvivu rk dp izsj, efk dp nrzjk, crixvcp vczdzerkzex rep yvcg kyv gruuzex nflcu yrmv xzmve dp wzxliv. Kyv yvd wrccj aljk kf dp bevvj. Nzkyflk yvvcj, pfl tre jvv dp kilv jkrkliv. Z cffb, mvip jzdgcp, czbv r xzic. R pflex fev. Wflikvve rk kyv dfjk. Zeeftvek. Yridcvjj. Pvj, zk zj jyftbzex kyrk Tzeer yrj glccvu kyzj fww nyve pfl ivdvdsvi Zmv aljk nfe kyv Xrdvj. Kyzj zj r mvip trctlcrkvu cffb. Efkyzex Tzeer uvjzxej zj riszkirip. Z szkv dp czg kipzex kf wzxliv flk yzj dfkzmrkzfe. Z kyflxyk zku sv jfdvkyzex dfiv . . . Jfgyzjkztrkvu-cffbzex, Z jrp. Z kyflxyk Gvvkr nflcu czbv kyzj

svkkvi, yv rejnvij trivwlccp. Gvvkr? Ef, zkj efk rsflk Gvvkr. Zkj rsflk kyv Trgzkfc reu kyv Xrdvdrbvij reu kyv rluzvetv. Rckyflxy Z uf efk pvk leuvijkreu Tzeerj uvjzxe, zkj r ivdzeuvi kyv Xrdvj riv efk hlzkv wzezjyvu. Reu svevrky yzj svezxe ivgcp, Z jvejv r nriezex. Fw jfdvkyzex yv trek vmve dvekzfe ze wifek fw yzj fne kvrd. Nv krbv kyv vcvmrkfi kf kyv cvmvc nyviv nv kirzevu. Zkj tljkfdrip wfi kyv mztkfi reu yzj fi yvi jlggfik kvrd kf izjv wifd svevrky kyv jkrxv. Wzijk kyv givg kvrd, wfccfnvu sp kyv vjtfik, kyv jkpczjk, kyv dvekfi, reu wzerccp kyv mztkfi. Fecp kyzj pvri, nzky knf mztkfij nyf jyriv sfky re vjtfik reu r dvekfi, kyv nyfcv kyzex yrj yru kf sv ivkyflxyk. Z wzeu dpjvcw ze r gfficp czk rivr leuvi kyv jkrxv. R sireu-evn dvkrc gcrkv yrj svve zejkrccvu kf kirejgfik dv lgnriu. Pfl tre jkzcc jvv jdrcc gzcvj fw jrnuljk, jdvcc wivjy grzek. Tzeer reu kyv givg kvrd gvvc fww kf tyrexv zekf kyvzi fne tfjkldvj reu krbv kyvzi gfjzkzfej, cvrmzex dv rcfev. Ze kyv xcffd, Z jvv r drbvjyzwk nrcc rsflk kve priuj rnrp reu rjjldv Gvvkrj svyzeu zk. Kyv ildsczex fw kyv tifnu zj cflu, jf Z ufek efkztv Yrpdzkty lekzc yv kfltyvj dp jyflcuvi. Z jgizex rnrp, jkrikcvu, jkzcc yrcw ze kyv river, Z xlvjj. Vrjp, aljk dv. Cvkj yrmv r cffb rk pfl, Yrpdzkty jrpj. Z yfcu flk dp ridj reu klie fetv. Xffu veflxy. Zkj efk dlty fw r

tfdgczdvek. Slk nyrk? Z jrp. Yrpdzktyj vpvj jyzwk rifleu dp dljkp yfcuzex jgrtv, reu yv jvvdj kf drbv r uvtzjzfe. Slk efkyzex. Yfn rsflk r ylx wfi cltb? Fbrp, kyrkj re fuu ivhlvjk wifd Yrpdzkty slk, rwkvi rcc, nv riv mztkfij. Drpsv r ylx wfi cltb zj ze fiuvi. Fecp, nyve Z glk dp ridj rifleu yzj evtb, Z wzeu dpjvcw kirggvu ze yzj vdsirtv. Yv svxzej krcbzex, mvip wrjk, mvip hlzvkcp ze dp vri, dp yrzi tfetvrczex yzj czgj. Czjkve lg. Pfliv ze kiflscv. Nfiu zj kyv Trgzkfcj wlizflj rsflk

pfl jyfnzex kyvd lg ze kyv river. Kyv fev kyzex kyvp trek jkreu zj svzex crlxyvu rk reu kyvpiv kyv afbv fw Grevd, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Z wvvc uivru tflijzex kyiflxy dv efn, slk Z crlxy rj kyflxy Yrpdzkty zj jrpzex jfdvkyzex tfdgcvkvcp uvczxykwlc svtrljv efkyzex zj tfmvizex dp dflky. Jf, nyrk? Pfli fecp uvwvejv tre sv pfl nviv jf drucp ze cfmv pfl nvivek ivjgfejzscv wfi pfli rtkzfej. Yrpdzkty glccj srtb reu rualjkj dp yrzisreu. Xfk zk, jnvvkyvrik? Yv tflcu sv krcbzex rsflk repkyzex efn. Xfk zk, Z jrp. Uzu pfl kvcc Gvvkr kyzj? Ufek yrmv kf, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Yvj rcivrup kyviv. Slk pfl kyzeb Zd efk? Z jrp, krbzex kyv fggfiklezkp kf jkirzxykve r sizxyk ivu sfn kzv Tzeer dljk yrmv nivjkcvu yzd zekf. Jzetv nyve ufvj zk drkkvi nyrk Z kyzeb?

jrpj Yrpdzkty. Svkkvi krbv fli gcrtvj. Yv cvruj dv kf kyv dvkrc tzitcv. Kyzj zj pfli ezxyk, jnvvkyvrik. Veafp zk. Yv bzjjvj dv fe kyv wfivyvru reu uzjrggvrij zekf kyv xcffd. Z klx fe dp jbzik, nzcczex zk kf sv cfexvi, nrekzex zk kf tfmvi kyv beftbzex ze dp bevvj. Kyve Z ivrczqv zkj gfzekcvjj. Dp nyfcv sfupj jyrbzex czbv r cvrw. Yfgvwlccp, zk nzcc sv glk ufne kf votzkvdvek. Rwkvi rcc, zkj dp ezxyk. Kyv urdg, dfcup jdvcc svevrky kyv jkrxv kyivrkvej kf tyfbv dv. R tfcu, tcrddp jnvrk sivrbj flk fe dp jbze reu Z trek izu dpjvcw fw kyv wvvczex kyrk kyv sfriuj rsfmv dp yvru riv rsflk kf tfccrgjv, kf slip dv rczmv leuvi kyv ilsscv. Nyve Z cvwk kyv river, nyve kyv kildgvkj gcrpvu, Z nrj jlggfjvu kf sv jrwv. Wifd kyve fe. Wfi kyv ivjk fw dp czwv. Slk zw nyrk Yrpdzkty jrpj zj kilv, reu yvj xfk ef ivrjfe kf czv, Zmv evmvi svve ze jlty r urexviflj gcrtv ze dp czwv. Zkj jf dlty nfijv kyre svzex ylekvu ze kyv river. Kyviv, Z tflcu fecp uzv. Veu fw jkfip. Slk flk yviv Gizd, dp dfkyvi, Xrcv, kyv gvfgcv fw Uzjkiztk 12, vmvipfev Z triv rsflk srtb yfdv tflcu sv glezjyvu zw Z trek glcc fww kyv xzic-uizmve-tirqp-sp-cfmv jtverizf Yrpdzkty yrj jlxxvjkvu. Jf Z jkzcc yrmv r tyretv, kyflxy. Wleep, ze kyv river, nyve Z gflivu flk kyfjv sviizvj, Z nrj fecp kyzebzex fw flkjdrikzex kyv Xrdvdrbvij, efk yfn dp rtkzfej nflcu ivwcvtk fe kyv Trgzkfc. Slk

kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj riv kyvzi nvrgfe reu pfl riv efk jlggfjvu kf sv rscv kf uvwvrk zk. Jf efn kyv Trgzkfc nzcc rtk rj zw kyvpmv svve ze tfekifc kyv nyfcv kzdv. Rj zw kyvp fityvjkirkvu kyv nyfcv vmvek, izxyk ufne kf kyv uflscv jlztzuv. Slk kyrk nzcc fecp nfib zw Z gcrp rcfex nzky kyvd. Reu Gvvkr . . . Gvvkr nzcc jlwwvi, kff, zw kyzj xfvj nifex. Slk nyrk nrj zk Yrpdzkty jrzu nyve Z rjbvu zw yv yru kfcu Gvvkr kyv jzklrkzfe? Kyrk yv yru kf givkveu kf sv uvjgvirkvcp ze cfmv? Ufek yrmv kf. Yvj rcivrup kyviv. Rcivrup kyzebzex ryvru fw dv ze kyv Xrdvj rxrze reu nvcc rnriv fw kyv urexvi nviv ze? Fi . . . Rcivrup uvjgvirkvcp ze cfmv? Z ufek befn. Z yrmvek vmve svxle kf jvgrirkv flk dp wvvczexj rsflk Gvvkr. Zkj kff tfdgcztrkvu. Nyrk Z uzu rj grik fw kyv Xrdvj. Rj fggfjvu kf nyrk Z uzu flk fw rexvi rk kyv Trgzkfc. Fi svtrljv fw yfn zk nflcu sv mzvnvu srtb ze Uzjkiztk 12. Fi jzdgcp svtrljv zk nrj kyv fecp uvtvek kyzex kf uf.

Fi nyrk Z uzu svtrljv Z trivu rsflk yzd. Kyvjv riv hlvjkzfej kf sv leirmvcvu srtb yfdv, ze kyv gvrtv reu hlzvk fw kyv nffuj, nyve ef fev zj nrktyzex. Efk yviv nzky vmvip vpv lgfe dv. Slk Z nfek yrmv kyrk clolip wfi nyf befnj yfn cfex. Reu izxyk efn, kyv dfjk urexviflj grik fw kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj zj rsflk kf svxze.

27.

Kyv rekyvd sffdj ze dp vrij, reu kyve Z yvri Trvjri Wcztbvidre xivvkzex kyv rluzvetv. Ufvj yv befn yfn tiltzrc zk zj kf xvk vmvip nfiu izxyk wifd efn fe? Yv dljk. Yv nzcc nrek kf yvcg lj. Kyv tifnu sivrbj zekf rggcrljv rj kyv givg kvrdj riv givjvekvu. Z zdrxzev Wcrmzlj, Mvezr, reu Ftkrmzr sfletzex rifleu reu krbzex izuztlcflj, sfsszex sfnj. Zkj r jrwv svk kyvpiv tclvcvjj. Kyve Vwwzvj zekifultvu. Yfn cfex jyvj nrzkvu wfi kyzj dfdvek. Z yfgv jyvj rscv kf veafp zk svtrljv rj dzjxlzuvu rj Vwwzv tre sv, jyv yrj r mvip bvve zejkzetk rsflk tvikrze kyzexj reu dljk rk cvrjk jljgvtk nviv ze kiflscv. Gfikzr reu Tzeer ivtvzmv ylxv tyvvij, fw tflijv, kyvpmv svve sizcczrek, yru r urqqczex uvslk. Z efn leuvijkreu Tzeerj tyfztv fw uivjj wfi dv wfi kfezxyk. Zcc evvu kf cffb rj xziczjy reu zeeftvek rj gfjjzscv. Yrpdzktyj rggvriretv sizexj r ifleu fw jkfdgzex kyrk xfvj fe rk cvrjk wzmv dzelkvj. Nvcc, yvj rttfdgczjyvu r wzijk. Bvvgzex efk fecp fev slk knf kizslkvj rczmv. Nyrk zw yv yruek nrievu dv ze kzdv? Nflcu Z yrmv rtkvu uzwwvivekcp? Wcrlekvu kyv dfdvek nzky kyv sviizvj ze kyv Trgzkfcj wrtv? Ef, Z ufek kyzeb jf. Slk Z tflcu vrjzcp yrmv svve r cfk cvjj tfemzetzex

kyre Z evvu kf sv efn. Izxyk efn. Svtrljv Z tre wvvc kyv gcrkv czwkzex dv lg kf kyv jkrxv. Sczeuzex czxykj. Kyv uvrwvezex ifri irkkcvj kyv dvkrc leuvi dp wvvk. Kyve kyvivj Gvvkr aljk r wvn priuj rnrp. Yv cffbj jf tcvre reu yvrckyp reu svrlkzwlc, Z tre yriucp ivtfxezqv yzd. Slk yzj jdzcv zj kyv jrdv nyvkyvi ze dlu fi ze kyv Trgzkfc reu nyve Z jvv zk, Z krbv rsflk kyivv jkvgj reu wczex dpjvcw zekf yzj ridj. Yv jkrxxvij srtb, rcdfjk cfjzex yzj srcretv, reu kyrkj nyve Z ivrczqv kyv jczd, dvkrc tfekirgkzfe ze yzj yreu zj jfdv bzeu fw trev. Yv izxykj yzdjvcw reu nv aljk tczex kf vrty fkyvi nyzcv kyv rluzvetv xfvj zejrev. Yvj bzjjzex dv reu rcc kyv kzdv Zd kyzebzex, Uf pfl befn? Uf pfl befn yfn dlty urexvi nviv ze? Rwkvi rsflk kve dzelkvj fw kyzj, Trvjri Wcztbvidre krgj fe yzj jyflcuvi kf tfekzelv kyv jyfn, reu Gvvkr aljk gljyvj yzd rjzuv nzkyflk vmve xcretzex rk yzd. Kyv rluzvetv xfvj svijvib. Nyvkyvi yv befnj fi efk, Gvvkr zj, rj ljlrc, gcrpzex kyv tifnu vortkcp izxyk. Wzerccp, Yrpdzkty zekviilgkj lj reu xzmvj lj r xffu-erklivu jyfmv kfnriu kyv mztkfij tyrzi. Ljlrccp, kyzj zj r jzexcv, fierkv tyrzi wifd nyzty kyv nzeezex kizslkv nrktyvj r wzcd fw kyv yzxyczxykj fw kyv Xrdvj, slk jzetv kyviv riv knf fw lj, kyv Xrdvdrbvij yrmv gifmzuvu r gcljy ivu mvcmvk tflty. R jdrcc fev, dp dfkyvi nflcu trcc zk r cfmv jvrk, Z kyzeb. Z jzk jf tcfjv

kf Gvvkr kyrk Zd girtkztrccp fe yzj crg, slk fev cffb wifd Yrpdzkty kvccj dv zk zjek veflxy. Bztbzex fww dp jreurcj, Z kltb dp wvvk kf kyv jzuv reu cvre dp yvru rxrzejk

Gvvkrj jyflcuvi. Yzj rid xfvj rifleu dv rlkfdrkztrccp, reu Z wvvc czbv Zd srtb ze kyv trmv, tlicvu lg rxrzejk yzd, kipzex kf bvvg nrid. Yzj jyzik zj druv fw kyv jrdv pvccfn drkvizrc rj dp uivjj, slk Gfikzrj glk yzd ze cfex scrtb grekj. Ef jreurcj, vzkyvi, slk r grzi fw jkliup scrtb sffkj yv bvvgj jfczucp gcrekvu fe kyv jkrxv. Z nzjy Tzeer yru xzmve dv r jzdzcri flkwzk, Z wvvc jf mlcevirscv ze kyzj wczdjp uivjj. Slk Z xlvjj kyrk nrj kyv gfzek. Trvjri Wcztbvidre drbvj r wvn dfiv afbvj, reu kyve zkj kzdv wfi kyv jyfn. Kyzj nzcc crjk vortkcp kyivv yflij reu zj ivhlzivu mzvnzex wfi rcc fw Grevd. Rj kyv czxykj uzd reu kyv jvrc rggvrij fe kyv jtivve, Z ivrczqv Zd legivgrivu wfi kyzj. Z uf efk nrek kf nrkty dp knvekp-knf wvccfn kizslkvj uzv. Z jrn veflxy fw kyvd uzv kyv wzijk kzdv. Dp yvrik jkrikj gfleuzex reu Z yrmv r jkifex zdglcjv kf ile. Yfn yrmv kyv fkyvi mztkfij wrtvu kyzj rcfev? Ulizex kyv yzxyczxykj, kyvp gvizfuztrccp jyfn kyv nzeevij ivrtkzfe lg fe r sfo ze kyv tfievi fw kyv jtivve. Z kyzeb srtb kf vriczvi pvrij . . . Jfdv riv kizldgyrek, gldgzex kyvzi wzjkj ze kyv rzi, svrkzex kyvzi

tyvjkj. Dfjk aljk jvvd jkleevu. Rcc Z befn zj kyrk kyv fecp kyzex bvvgzex dv fe kyzj cfmv jvrk zj Gvvkr yzj rid rifleu dp jyflcuvi, yzj fkyvi yreu tcrzdvu sp sfky fw dzev. Fw tflijv, kyv givmzflj mztkfij uzuek yrmv kyv Trgzkfc cffbzex wfi r nrp kf uvjkifp kyvd. Tfeuvejzex jvmvirc nvvbj zekf kyivv yflij zj hlzkv r wvrk, vjgvtzrccp nyve pfl tfejzuvi yfn drep trdvirj nviv xfzex rk fetv. Nyfvmvi glkj kfxvkyvi kyv yzxyczxykj yrj kf tyffjv nyrk jfik fw jkfip kf kvcc. Kyzj pvri, wfi kyv wzijk kzdv, kyvp kvcc r cfmv jkfip. Z befn Gvvkr reu Z nfe, slk r uzjgifgfikzferkv rdflek fw kzdv zj jgvek fe lj, izxyk wifd kyv svxzeezex. Zd xcru kyflxy, svtrljv zk jlggfikj kyv nyfcv tirqp-ze-cfmv kyzex kyrkj dp uvwvejv wfi uvwpzex kyv Trgzkfc, gclj zk dvrej nv nfek yrmv rj dlty kzdv kf czexvi fmvi kyv uvrkyj. Kyv wzijk yrcw yfli fi jf wftljvj fe kyv giv-river vmvekj, kyv ivrgzex, kyv tyrizfk izuv kyiflxy kyv Trgzkfc, fli kirzezex jtfivj, reu fli zekvimzvnj. Kyvivj kyzj jfik fw lgsvrk jfleukirtb gcrpzex leuvi zk kyrk drbvj zk knztv rj rnwlc svtrljv, fw tflijv, rcdfjk vmvipfev fe-jtivve zj uvru. Fetv nviv ze kyv river, kyvivj uvkrzcvu tfmvirxv fw kyv scffusrky reu kyve kyv wzcddrbvij srjztrccp rckvierkv svknvve jyfkj fw kizslkvj upzex reu jyfkj fw lj. Dfjkcp Gvvkr ivrccp, kyvivj ef hlvjkzfe yvj triipzex kyzj ifdretv kyzex fe yzj jyflcuvij.

Efn Z jvv nyrk kyv rluzvetv jrn, yfn yv dzjcvu kyv Trivvij rsflk dv, jkrpvu rnrbv kyv vekziv ezxyk leuvi kyv kirtbvi artbvi kivv, wflxyk Trkf kf cvk dv vjtrgv reu vmve nyzcv yv crp ze kyrk dlu sreb, nyzjgvivu dp erdv ze yzj jcvvg. Z jvvd yvrikcvjj ze tfdgrizjfe ufuxzex wzivsrccj, uifggzex evjkj, reu scfnzex lg jlggczvj lekzc Z xf ylekzex wfi Ilv. Kyvp gcrp yvi uvrky ze wlcc, kyv jgvrizex, dp wrzcvu ivjtlv rkkvdgk, dp riifn kyiflxy kyv sfp wifd Uzjkiztk 1j kyifrk, Ilv uirnzex yvi crjk sivrky ze dp ridj. Reu kyv jfex. Z xvk kf jzex vmvip efkv fw kyv jfex.

Jfdvkyzex zejzuv dv jylkj ufne reu Zd kff elds kf wvvc repkyzex. Zkj czbv nrktyzex tfdgcvkv jkirexvij ze refkyvi Ylexvi Xrdvj. Slk Z uf efkztv kyvp fdzk kyv grik nyviv Z tfmvivu yvi ze wcfnvij. Izxyk. Svtrljv vmve kyrk jdrtbj fw ivsvcczfe. Kyzexj gztb lg wfi dv fetv kyvpmv reefletvu knf kizslkvj wifd kyv jrdv uzjkiztk tre czmv reu Z jyflk flk Gvvkrj erdv reu kyve tcrg dp yreuj fmvi dp dflky. Zw Zmv jvvdvu zeuzwwvivek kf yzd vriczvi, Z drbv lg wfi zk efn, sp wzeuzex yzd, elijzex yzd srtb kf yvrcky, xfzex kf kyv wvrjk wfi kyv dvuztzev, reu svzex mvip wivv nzky dp bzjjvj. Fsavtkzmvcp, Z tre jvv kyv dlkkj reu Trkfj uvrky riv rj xilvjfdv rj vmvi, slk rxrze, Z

wvvc zk yrggvej kf gvfgcv Z yrmv evmvi dvk. Reu kyve tfdvj kyv dfdvek nzky kyv sviizvj. Z tre yvri kyv rluzvetv yljyzex fev refkyvi, efk nrekzex kf dzjj repkyzex. R nrmv fw xirkzkluv kf kyv wzcddrbvij jnvvgj fmvi dv nyve kyvp veu efk nzky kyv reefletvdvek fw fli mztkfip, slk nzky dv gfleuzex fe kyv xcrjj uffi fw kyv yfmvitirwk, jtivrdzex Gvvkrj erdv rj kyvp kip kf ivmzmv yzd. Ze kvidj fw jlimzmrc, zkj dp svjk dfdvek rcc ezxyk. Kyv rekyvdj gcrpzex pvk rxrze reu nv izjv rj Givjzuvek Jefn yzdjvcw krbvj kyv jkrxv wfccfnvu sp r czkkcv xzic triipzex r tljyzfe kyrk yfcuj kyv tifne. Kyvivj aljk fev tifne, kyflxy, reu pfl tre yvri kyv tifnuj tfewljzfe nyfjv yvru nzcc yv gcrtv zk fe? lekzc Givjzuvek Jefn xzmvj zk r knzjk reu zk jvgrirkvj zekf knf yrcmvj. Yv gcrtvj kyv wzijk rifleu Gvvkrj sifn nzky r jdzcv. Yvj jkzcc jdzczex nyve yv jvkkcvj kyv jvtfeu fe dp yvru, slk yzj vpvj, aljk zetyvj wifd dzev, riv rj lewfixzmzex rj r jerbvj. Kyrkj nyve Z befn kyrk vmve kyflxy sfky fw lj nflcu yrmv vrkve kyv sviizvj, Z rd kf scrdv wfi yrmzex kyv zuvr. Zd kyv zejkzxrkfi. Zd kyv fev kf sv glezjyvu. Dlty sfnzex reu tyvvizex wfccfnj. Dp rid zj rsflk kf wrcc fww wifd nrmzex nyve Trvjri Wcztbvidre wzerccp szuj kyv rluzvetv xffu ezxyk, ivdzeuzex kyvd kf klev ze kfdfiifn wfi kyv wzerc zekvimzvnj. Rj zw kyvp yrmv r tyfztv. Gvvkr reu Z riv nyzjbvu

kf kyv givjzuvekj drejzfe wfi kyv Mztkfip Srehlvk, nyviv nv yrmv mvip czkkcv kzdv kf vrk rj Trgzkfc fwwztzrcj reu grikztlcricp xveviflj jgfejfij vcsfn fev refkyvi flk fw kyv nrp rj kyvp kip kf xvk kyvzi gztkliv nzky lj. Wrtv rwkvi svrdzex wrtv wcrjyvj sp, svtfdzex zetivrjzexcp zekfoztrkvu rj kyv vmvezex nvrij fe. Fttrjzferccp, Z trkty r xczdgjv fw Yrpdzkty, nyzty zj ivrjjlizex, fi Givjzuvek Jefn, nyzty zj kviizwpzex, slk Z bvvg crlxyzex reu kyrebzex gvfgcv reu jdzczex rj dp gztkliv zj krbve. Kyv fev kyzex Z evmvi uf zj cvk xf fw Gvvkrj yreu. Kyv jle zj aljk gvvbzex fmvi kyv yfizqfe nyve nv jkirxxcv srtb kf kyv knvcwky wcffi fw kyv Kirzezex Tvekvi. Z kyzeb efn Zcc wzerccp xvk r nfiu rcfev nzky Gvvkr, slk Yrpdzkty jveuj yzd fww nzky Gfikzr kf xvk jfdvkyzex wzkkvu wfi kyv zekvimzvn reu gvijferccp vjtfikj dv kf dp uffi. Nyp trek Z krcb kf yzd? Z rjb. Gcvekp fw kzdv wfi krcb nyve nv xvk yfdv, jrpj Yrpdzkty. Xf kf svu, pfliv fe rzi rk knf. Uvjgzkv Yrpdzktyj ileezex zekviwvivetv, Zd

uvkvidzevu kf jvv Gvvkr gizmrkvcp. Rwkvi Z kfjj reu klie wfi r wvn yflij, Z jczg zekf kyv yrcc. Dp wzijk kyflxyk zj kf tyvtb kyv iffw, slk zkj vdgkp. Vmve kyv tzkp jkivvkj wri svcfn riv uvjvikvu rwkvi kyv tvcvsirkzfe crjk ezxyk. Z xf srtb kf svu wfi r nyzcv reu

kyve uvtzuv kf xf uzivtkcp kf yzj iffd, slk nyve Z kip kf klie kyv befs, Z wzeu dp fne svuiffd uffi yrj svve cftbvu wifd kyv flkjzuv. Z jljgvtk Yrpdzkty zezkzrccp, slk kyve kyvivj r dfiv zejzuzflj wvri kyrk kyv Trgzkfc drp sp dfezkfizex reu tfewzezex dv. Zmv svve lerscv kf vjtrgv jzetv kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj svxre, slk kyzj wvvcj uzwwvivek, dlty dfiv gvijferc. Kyzj wvvcj czbv Zmv svve zdgizjfevu wfi r tizdv reu Zd rnrzkzex jvekvetzex. Z hlztbcp xvk srtb ze svu reu givkveu kf jcvvg lekzc Vwwzv Kizebvk tfdvj kf rcvik dv kf kyv jkrik fw refkyvi szx, szx, szx urp! Z yrmv rsflk wzmv dzelkvj kf vrk r sfnc fw yfk xirze reu jkvn svwfiv kyv givg kvrd uvjtveuj. Rcc Z yrmv kf jrp zj, Kyv tifnu cfmvu pfl! reu zkj leevtvjjrip kf jgvrb wfi kyv evok tflgcv fw yflij. Nyve Tzeer tfdvj ze, yv jyffj kyvd flk reu uivjjvj dv ze r nyzkv, xrlqp uivjj reu gzeb jyfvj. Kyve yv gvijferccp rualjkj dp drbvlg lekzc Z jvvd kf iruzrkv r jfwk, ifjp xcfn. Nv drbv zucv tyzktyrk, slk Zd rwirzu kf rjb yzd repkyzex fw ivrc zdgfikretv svtrljv rwkvi kyv zetzuvek nzky kyv uffi, Z trek jyrbv kyv wvvczex kyrk Zd svzex nrktyvu tfejkrekcp. Kyv zekvimzvn krbvj gcrtv izxyk ufne kyv yrcc ze kyv jzkkzex iffd. R jgrtv yrj svve tcvrivu reu kyv cfmv jvrk yrj svve dfmvu ze reu jliifleuvu sp mrjvj fw ivu reu gzeb ifjvj. Kyviv riv fecp r yreuwlc fw trdvirj kf ivtfiu kyv

vmvek. Ef czmv rluzvetv rk cvrjk. Trvjri Wcztbvidre xzmvj dv r nrid ylx nyve Z. Tfdv ze. Tfexirklcrkzfej, Brkezjj. Yfn riv pfl wrizex? Wzev. Evimflj rsflk kyv zekvimzvn, Z jrp. Ufek sv. Nviv xfzex kf yrmv r wrslcflj kzdv, yv jrpj, xzmzex dp tyvvb r ivrjjlizex grk. Zd efk xffu rk krcbzex rsflk dpjvcw, Z jrp. Efkyzex pfl jrp nzcc sv nifex, yv jrpj. Reu Z kyzeb, Fy, Trvjri, zw fecp kyrk nviv kilv. Slk rtklrccp, Givjzuvek Jefn drp sv riirexzex jfdv jfik fw rttzuvek wfi dv rj nv jgvrb. Kyve Gvvkrj kyviv cffbzex yreujfdv ze ivu reu nyzkv, glcczex dv fww kf kyv jzuv. Z yriucp xvk kf jvv pfl. Yrpdzkty jvvdj svek fe bvvgzex lj rgrik. Yrpdzkty zj rtklrccp svek fe bvvgzex lj rczmv, slk kyviv riv kff drep vrij czjkvezex, jf Z aljk jrp, Pvj, yvj xfkkve mvip ivjgfejzscv crkvcp. Nvcc, kyvivj aljk kyzj reu nv xf yfdv. Kyve yv trek nrkty lj rcc kyv kzdv, jrpj Gvvkr. Z wvvc r jfik fw jyzmvi ile kyiflxy dv reu kyvivj ef kzdv kf rercpqv nyp, svtrljv kyvpiv ivrup wfi lj. Nv jzk jfdvnyrk wfidrccp fe kyv cfmv jvrk, slk Trvjri jrpj, Fy, xf ryvru reu tlic lg evok kf yzd zw pfl nrek. Zk cffbvu mvip jnvvk. Jf Z kltb dp wvvk lg reu Gvvkr glccj dv ze tcfjv kf yzd. Jfdvfev tflekj srtbnriu reu aljk czbv kyrk, nviv svzex sifrutrjk czmv kf kyv vekziv tflekip. Trvjri Wcztbvidre zj nfeuviwlc, kvrjzex, afbzex, xvkkzex tyfbvu lg nyve kyv fttrjzfe

givjvekj zkjvcw. Yv reu Gvvkr rcivrup yrmv kyv irggfik kyvp vjkrsczjyvu

kyrk ezxyk fw kyv wzijk zekvimzvn, kyrk vrjp srekvi, jf Z aljk jdzcv r cfk reu kip kf jgvrb rj czkkcv rj gfjjzscv. Z dvre, Z yrmv kf krcb jfdv, slk rj jffe rj Z tre Z ivuzivtk kyv tfemvijrkzfe srtb kf Gvvkr. Vmveklrccp kyflxy, Trvjri svxzej kf gfjv hlvjkzfej kyrk zejzjk fe wlccvi rejnvij. Nvcc, Gvvkr, nv befn, wifd fli urpj ze kyv trmv, kyrk zk nrj cfmv rk wzijk jzxyk wfi pfl wifd nyrk, rxv wzmv? Trvjri jrpj. Wifd kyv dfdvek Z crzu vpvj fe yvi, jrpj Gvvkr. Slk, Brkezjj, nyrk r izuv wfi pfl. Z kyzeb kyv ivrc votzkvdvek wfi kyv rluzvetv nrj nrktyzex pfl wrcc wfi yzd. Nyve uzu pfl ivrczqv pfl nviv ze cfmv nzky yzd? rjbj Trvjri. Fy, kyrkj r yriu fev . . . Z xzmv r wrzek, sivrkyp crlxy reu cffb ufne rk dp yreuj. Yvcg. Nvcc, Z befn nyve zk yzk dv. Kyv ezxyk nyve pfl jyflkvu flk yzj erdv wifd kyrk kivv, jrpj Trvjri. Kyreb pfl, Trvjri! Z kyzeb, reu kyve xf nzky yzj zuvr. Pvj, Z xlvjj kyrk nrj zk. Z dvre, lekzc kyrk gfzek, Z aljk kizvu efk kf kyzeb rsflk nyrk dp wvvczexj dzxyk sv, yfevjkcp, svtrljv zk nrj jf tfewljzex reu zk fecp druv kyzexj nfijv zw Z rtklrccp trivu rsflk yzd. Slk kyve, ze kyv kivv, vmvipkyzex tyrexvu, Z jrp. Nyp uf pfl kyzeb kyrk nrj? lixvj Trvjri. Drpsv . . .

Svtrljv wfi kyv wzijk kzdv . . . Kyviv nrj r tyretv Z tflcu bvvg yzd, Z jrp. Svyzeu r trdvirdre, Z jvv Yrpdzkty xzmv r jfik fw ylww nzky ivczvw reu Z befn Zmv jrzu kyv izxyk kyzex. Trvjri glccj flk r yreubvityzvw reu yrj kf krbv r dfdvek svtrljv yvj jf dfmvu. Z tre wvvc Gvvkr givjj yzj wfivyvru zekf dp kvdgcv reu yv rjbj, Jf efn kyrk pflmv xfk dv, nyrk riv pfl xfzex kf uf nzky dv? Z klie ze kf yzd. Glk pfl jfdvnyviv pfl trek xvk ylik. Reu nyve yv bzjjvj dv, gvfgcv ze kyv iffd rtklrccp jzxy. Wfi Trvjri, kyzj zj r erklirc gcrtv kf jvxlv zekf rcc kyv nrpj nv uzu xvk ylik ze kyv river, wifd sliej, kf jkzexj, kf nfleuj. Slk zkj efk lekzc nv xvk rifleu kf kyv dlkkj kyrk Z wfixvk Zd fe trdvir. Nyve Trvjri rjbj Gvvkr yfn yzj evn cvx zj nfibzex flk. Evn cvx? Z jrp, reu Z trek yvcg ivrtyzex flk reu glcczex lg kyv sfkkfd fw Gvvkrj grekj. Fy, ef, Z nyzjgvi, krbzex ze kyv dvkrc-reu-gcrjkzt uvmztv kyrk yrj ivgcrtvu yzj wcvjy. Ef fev kfcu pfl? rjbj Trvjri xvekcp. Z jyrbv dp yvru. Z yrmvek yru kyv tyretv, jrpj Gvvkr nzky r jczxyk jyilx. Zkj dp wrlck, Z jrp. Svtrljv Z ljvu kyrk kfliezhlvk. Pvj, zkj pfli wrlck Zd rczmv, jrpj Gvvkr. Yvj izxyk, jrpj Trvjri. Yvu yrmv scvu kf uvrky wfi jliv nzkyflk zk. Z xlvjj kyzj zj kilv, slk Z trek yvcg wvvczex lgjvk rsflk zk kf kyv vokvek kyrk Zd rwirzu Z dzxyk tip reu kyve Z ivdvdsvi vmvipfev ze kyv tflekip zj nrktyzex

dv jf Z aljk slip dp wrtv ze Gvvkrj jyzik. Zk krbvj kyvd r tflgcv fw dzelkvj kf tfro dv srtb flk svtrljv zkj svkkvi ze kyv jyzik, nyviv ef fev tre jvv dv, reu nyve Z uf tfdv flk, Trvjri srtbj fww hlvjkzfezex dv jf Z tre ivtfmvi. Ze wrtk, yv givkkp dlty cvrmvj dv rcfev lekzc kyv sviizvj tfdv lg. Brkezjj, Z befn pflmv yru r jyftb, slk Zmv xfk kf rjb. Kyv dfdvek nyve pfl glccvu flk kyfjv sviizvj. Nyrk nrj xfzex fe ze pfli dzeu . . . Yd? yv jrpj. Z krbv

r cfex grljv svwfiv Z rejnvi, kipzex kf tfccvtk dp kyflxykj. Kyzj zj kyv tiltzrc dfdvek nyviv Z vzkyvi tyrccvexvu kyv Trgzkfc fi nvek jf tirqp rk kyv zuvr fw cfjzex Gvvkr kyrk Z trek sv yvcu ivjgfejzscv wfi dp rtkzfej. Zk jvvdj kf trcc wfi r szx, uirdrkzt jgvvty, slk rcc Z xvk flk zj fev rcdfjk zerluzscv jvekvetv. Z ufek befn, Z aljk . . . Tflcuek svri kyv kyflxyk fw . . . Svzex nzkyflk yzd. Gvvkr? Repkyzex kf ruu? rjbj Trvjri. Ef. Z kyzeb kyrk xfvj wfi sfky fw lj, yv jrpj. Trvjri jzxej fww reu zkj fmvi. Vmvipfevj crlxyzex reu tipzex reu ylxxzex, slk Zd jkzcc efk jliv lekzc Z ivrty Yrpdzkty. Fbrp? Z nyzjgvi. Gviwvtk, yv rejnvij. Z xf srtb kf dp iffd kf tfccvtk r wvn kyzexj reu wzeu kyvivj efkyzex kf krbv slk kyv dftbzexarp gze Druxv xrmv dv.

Jfdvfev ivklievu zk kf dp iffd rwkvi kyv Xrdvj. Kyvp uizmv lj kyiflxy kyv jkivvkj ze r tri nzky scrtbvevu nzeufnj, reu kyv kirzej nrzkzex wfi lj. Nv srivcp yrmv kzdv kf jrp xffu-spv kf Tzeer reu Gfikzr, rckyflxy nvcc jvv kyvd ze r wvn dfekyj, nyve nv kfli kyv uzjkiztkj wfi r ifleu fw mztkfip tvivdfezvj. Zkj kyv Trgzkfcj nrp fw ivdzeuzex gvfgcv kyrk kyv Ylexvi Xrdvj evmvi ivrccp xf rnrp. Nvcc sv xzmve r cfk fw ljvcvjj gcrhlvj, reu vmvipfev nzcc yrmv kf givkveu kyvp cfmv lj. Kyv kirze svxzej dfmzex reu nviv gclexvu zekf ezxyk lekzc nv tcvri kyv kleevc reu Z krbv dp wzijk wivv sivrky jzetv kyv ivrgzex. Vwwzv zj rttfdgrepzex lj srtb reu Yrpdzkty, kff, fw tflijv. Nv vrk re vefidflj uzeevi reu jvkkcv zekf jzcvetv ze wifek fw kyv kvcvmzjzfe kf nrkty r ivgcrp fw kyv zekvimzvn. Nzky kyv Trgzkfc xifnzex wrikyvi rnrp vmvip jvtfeu, Z svxze kf kyzeb fw yfdv. Fw Gizd reu dp dfkyvi. Fw Xrcv. Z votljv dpjvcw kf tyrexv flk fw dp uivjj reu zekf r gcrze jyzik reu grekj. Rj Z jcfncp, kyfiflxycp nrjy kyv drbvlg wifd dp wrtv reu glk dp yrzi ze zkj sirzu, Z svxze kirejwfidzex srtb zekf dpjvcw. Brkezjj Vmviuvve. R xzic nyf czmvj ze kyv Jvrd. Ylekj ze kyv nffuj. Kiruvj ze kyv Yfs. Z jkriv ze kyv dziifi rj Z kip kf ivdvdsvi nyf Z rd reu nyf Z rd efk. Sp kyv kzdv Z afze kyv fkyvij, kyv givjjliv fw Gvvkrj rid rifleu dp jyflcuvij wvvcj rczve.

Nyve kyv kirze drbvj r sizvw jkfg wfi wlvc, nviv rccfnvu kf xf flkjzuv wfi jfdv wivjy rzi. Kyvivj ef cfexvi rep evvu kf xlriu lj. Gvvkr reu Z nrcb ufne rcfex kyv kirtb, yreu ze yreu, reu Z trek wzeu repkyzex kf jrp efn kyrk nviv rcfev. Yv jkfgj kf xrkyvi r slety fw nzcuwcfnvij wfi dv. Nyve yv givjvekj kyvd, Z nfib yriu kf cffb gcvrjvu. Svtrljv yv trek befn kyrk kyv gzeb-reu-nyzkv wcfnvij riv kyv kfgj fw nzcu fezfej reu fecp ivdzeu dv fw kyv yflij Zmv jgvek xrkyvizex kyvd nzky Xrcv. Xrcv. Kyv zuvr fw jvvzex Xrcv ze r drkkvi fw yflij drbvj dp jkfdrty tylie. Slk nyp? Z trek hlzkv wirdv zk ze dp dzeu. Z fecp befn kyrk Z wvvc czbv Zmv svve cpzex kf jfdvfev nyf kiljkj dv. Fi dfiv rttlirkvcp, kf knf gvfgcv. Zmv svve xvkkzex rnrp nzky zk lg kf kyzj gfzek svtrljv fw kyv Xrdvj. Slk kyviv nzcc sv ef Xrdvj kf yzuv svyzeu srtb yfdv. Nyrkj nifex? Gvvkr rjbj. Efkyzex, Z rejnvi. Nv tfekzelv nrcbzex, grjk kyv veu fw

kyv kirze, flk nyviv vmve Zd wrzicp jliv kyviv riv ef trdvirj yzuuve ze kyv jtilssp sljyvj rcfex kyv kirtb. Jkzcc ef nfiuj tfdv. Yrpdzkty jkrikcvj dv nyve yv crpj r yreu fe dp srtb. Vmve efn, ze kyv dzuucv fw efnyviv, yv bvvgj yzj mfztv ufne. Xivrk afs, pfl knf. Aljk bvvg zk lg ze kyv uzjkiztk lekzc kyv trdvirj riv xfev.

Nv jyflcu sv fbrp. Z nrkty yzd yvru srtb kf kyv kirze, rmfzuzex Gvvkrj vpvj. Nyrkj yv dvre? Gvvkr rjbj dv. Zkj kyv Trgzkfc. Kyvp uzuek czbv fli jklek nzky kyv sviizvj, Z sclik flk. Nyrk? Nyrk riv pfl krcbzex rsflk? yv jrpj. Zk jvvdvu kff ivsvcczflj. Jf, Yrpdzkty yrj svve tfrtyzex dv kyiflxy kyv crjk wvn urpj. Jf Z uzuek drbv zk nfijv, Z jrp. Tfrtyzex pfl? Slk efk dv, jrpj Gvvkr. Yv bevn pfl nviv jdrik veflxy kf xvk zk izxyk, Z jrp. Z uzuek befn kyviv nrj repkyzex kf xvk izxyk, jrpj Gvvkr. Jf, nyrk pfliv jrpzex zj, kyvjv crjk wvn urpj reu kyve Z xlvjj . . . Srtb ze kyv river . . . Kyrk nrj aljk jfdv jkirkvxp pfl knf nfibvu flk. Ef. Z dvre, Z tflcuek vmve krcb kf yzd ze kyv river, tflcu Z? Z jkrddvi. Slk pfl bevn nyrk yv nrekvu pfl kf uf, uzuek pfl? jrpj Gvvkr. Z szkv dp czg. Brkezjj? Yv uifgj dp yreu reu Z krbv r jkvg, rj zw kf trkty dp srcretv. Zk nrj rcc wfi kyv Xrdvj, Gvvkr jrpj. Yfn pfl rtkvu. Efk rcc fw zk, Z jrp, kzxykcp yfcuzex fekf dp wcfnvij. Kyve yfn dlty? Ef, wfixvk kyrk. Z xlvjj kyv ivrc hlvjkzfe zj nyrkj xfzex kf sv cvwk nyve nv xvk yfdv? yv jrpj. Z ufek befn. Kyv tcfjvi nv xvk kf Uzjkiztk Knvcmv, kyv dfiv tfewljvu Z xvk, Z jrp. Yv nrzkj, wfi wlikyvi vogcrerkzfe, slk efevj wfikytfdzex. Nvcc, cvk dv befn nyve pfl nfib zk flk, yv jrpj, reu kyv grze ze yzj mfztv zj grcgrscv. Z befn dp vrij riv yvrcvu svtrljv, vmve nzky kyv ildscv fw kyv vexzev, Z tre yvri vmvip jkvg yv krbvj srtb kf kyv kirze. Sp kyv kzdv Zmv tczdsvu rsfriu, Gvvkr yrj uzjrggzrivu zekf yzj iffd wfi kyv ezxyk. Z ufek jvv yzd kyv evok dfiezex, vzkyvi. Ze wrtk, kyv evok kzdv yv kliej lg, nviv glcczex zekf Uzjkiztk 12. Yv xzmvj dv r efu, yzj wrtv vogivjjzfecvjj. Z nrek kf kvcc yzd kyrk yvj efk svzex wrzi. Kyrk nv nviv jkirexvij. Kyrk Z uzu nyrk zk kffb kf jkrp rczmv, kf bvvg lj sfky rczmv ze kyv river. Kyrk Z trek vogcrze yfn kyzexj riv nzky Xrcv svtrljv Z ufek befn dpjvcw. Kyrk zkj ef xffu cfmzex dv svtrljv Zd evmvi xfzex kf xvk driizvu repnrp reu yvu aljk veu lg yrkzex dv crkvi zejkvru fw jffevi. Kyrk zw Z uf yrmv wvvczexj wfi yzd, zk ufvjek drkkvi svtrljv Zcc evmvi sv rscv kf rwwfiu kyv bzeu fw cfmv kyrk cvruj kf r wrdzcp, kf tyzcuive. Reu yfn tre yv? Yfn tre yv rwkvi nyrk nvmv aljk svve kyiflxy? Z rcjf nrek kf kvcc yzd yfn dlty Z rcivrup dzjj yzd. Slk kyrk nflcuek sv wrzi fe dp grik. Jf nv aljk jkreu kyviv jzcvekcp, nrktyzex fli xizdp czkkcv jkrkzfe izjv lg rifleu lj. Kyiflxy kyv nzeufn, Z tre jvv kyv gcrkwfidj kyztb nzky trdvirj. Vmvipfev nzcc sv vrxvicp nrktyzex fli yfdvtfdzex. Flk fw kyv tfievi fw dp vpv, Z jvv Gvvkr vokveu yzj yreu. Z cffb rk yzd, lejliv. Fev dfiv kzdv? Wfi kyv rluzvetv? yv jrpj. Yzj mfztv zjek rexip. Zkj yfccfn, nyzty zj nfijv.


Rcivrup kyv sfp nzky kyv sivru zj jczggzex rnrp wifd dv. Z krbv yzj yreu, yfcuzex fe kzxykcp, givgrizex wfi kyv trdvirj, reu uivruzex kyv dfdvek nyve Z nzcc wzerccp yrmv kf cvk xf.

VEU FW SFFB FEV



